Authors
James Sanford
Number of Reviews
290

Title
Review for Shining, The (1980)
If you think the 18-month shoot of "Eyes Wide Shut" is out of the ordinary
for perfectionist director Stanley Kubrick consider that "The Shining" also
took two years to get onscreen; the film began shooting in May of 1978 and
was released in June of 1980.
 Early reviews were decidedly mixed, with some critics wondering what
attracted Kubrick to Stephen King's tale of murder and madness in a remote,
snowbound hotel in the first place and why, if he had to make the picture at
all, Kubrick had given it such a deliberate, dreamy pace and allowed Jack
Nicholson to go so far over the top. Though "The Shining" performed fairly
well at the box office, it continued to be controversial: King panned it in
the press for the liberties Kubrick had taken with his book, and instead of
Oscar nominations, Kubrick and Shelley Duvall instead found themselves in
the running for the uncoveted Golden Raspberry Awards as Worst Director and
Worst Actress respectively. Just for the record, both lost.
 As demonstrated by an excellent website devoted to "The Shining" at
brain.mindbuilder.com/mkraft/shining/index.html, the movie's reputation has
improved substantially in the past 18 years. Nicholson fans hail his work
here as one of his landmark funny/scary performances and Kubrick admirers
who once dismissed the movie as a misstep have since learned to appreciate
its special brand of psychological terror. Few directors would dare to make
a horror movie in which the first hour is devoted almost entirely to
backstory and character development, but that's one of the reasons Kubrick
is, well, Kubrick.
 Its unconventionality makes "The Shining" one of those rare thrillers that
actually benefits from repeated viewings, although the movie is so unnerving
many viewers have never made it all the way through even once. Frustrated
writer and recovering alcoholic Jack Torrance (Nicholson), his colorless
wife Wendy (Duvall) and young son Danny (Danny Lloyd) agree to move into the
mammoth Overlook Hotel and to look after the property during the winter
season when the mountain resort is shut down. Almost immediately however,
the bad vibes begin to flow, and Danny's psychic powers go into overdrive,
conjuring up visions of blood-spattered walls, sinister-looking twin girls
and the cryptic message "REDRUM."
 Though the recent "Shining" TV mini-series was more faithful to King's
original and was perhaps more frightening in the traditional sense, few
films have ever built up and sustained an eerie atmosphere as successful as
Kubrick does here. Although The Overlook is an enormous place with multiple
floors and seemingly endless hallways (which we are forced to explore
repeatedly in one Steadicam tracking shot after another) Kubrick makes it
clear the hotel is as constraining as a prison cell -- a nicely appointed
cell, perhaps, but a cell nonetheless. By the movie's midpoint, the feeling
of claustrophobia is inescapable, and when Jack's mind finally snaps and he
begins stalking Wendy and Danny, "The Shining" becomes a true nerve-wracker.
 Of course, nobody plays madness quite like Nicholson, and you can see him
laying the groundwork in this manic performance for such later wackos as
Darryl Van Horn in "The Witches of Eastwick" and the Joker in "Batman." With
her fey Texas accent and rag-doll smile, Duvall is truly irritating, but
that actually works in the actress' favor; she daringly challenges us to
root for Wendy. Scatman Crothers is also effective as the Overlook veteran
who has something in common with Danny.
 Is "The Shining" really the masterpiece Kubrick worshippers would have you
believe it is? No. Even though the tension is sustained throughout, the
first reviews were right about the movie being overlong, and Jack flies off
the handle a bit too abruptly rather than gradually sinking into psychotic
behavior as he did in the book. The ending may initially strike you as
clever, but the more you think about it the less satisfying it seems.
 But there's never been a shocker quite like "The Shining," and it seems
likely to remain one-of-a-kind. Like all of Kubrick's films, whether you
love it or hate it, it's sure to be a conversation-starter.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Anaconda (1997)
        It took six writers to concoct ``Anaconda,'' and the fact that
they each wanted to take credit for their contribution is the scariest
thing about this creature feature.
  Imagine being brave enough to claim you penned dialogue that
rarely rises above ``Let's get the hell out of here!,'' or ``What the
hell is going on?,'' as well as a plot that would have seemed hokey
back when Grandma was an ingenue.
  ``Anaconda'' may someday make a great ``Mystery Science
Theatre 3000'' episode, but it's not something most would want on
their resumes.
  The feeble story follows a documentary filmmaking crew down
the Amazon as they search for a lost tribe, ``the people of the
mist.'' You'd have to turn to a WWII combat movie to find a finer
collection of stereotypes: Terri the Latin fireball (Jennifer Lopez),
Danny the cynical homeboy (Ice Cube), Denise the airhead sex-kitten
who proclaims the jungle makes her ``horny'' (Kari Wuhrer), pothead
Gary (Owen Wilson), and Warren the world-weary sophisticate (Jonathan
Hyde) are all on board.
  There's also Steven (Eric Stoltz), a doctor of some sort,
who manages to somehow get a water wasp in his mouth while scuba
diving and spends most of the journey recuperating in bed.
  They're soon joined by Paul Sarone, the scarred mystery man
with a hidden agenda, played with a ridiculous, impenetrable
mock-Venezuelan accent by Jon Voight. It's a performance that should
torpedo any dreams he has of making a comeback.
  As the title signifies, large snakes are also part of the
goings-on.  After Sarone hijacks the boat, Terri and company find
they're heading into a part of the river so dangerous the natives have
built a wall, a la ``King Kong,'' to contain the danger.
  Of course, had Sarone simply turned the craft around,
``Anaconda'' would only be about 45 minutes long, so you can bet the
barrier is dynamited, the cruise continues, and the audience is soon
taking bets on who'll be the first meal.
  An opening title informs us that anacondas will sometimes
regurgitate their victims, just to have the pleasure of devouring them
again: Yes, friends, prepare for the awesome spectacle of a vomiting
giant serpent!
  ``Anaconda'' is the follow-up to director Luis Llosa's last
masterwork, ``The Specialist,'' a 1994 clunker that marked a new low
even for Sylvester Stallone and Sharon Stone. Rest assured that taking
a few years off has not sharpened Llosa's skills one iota. His knack
for clumsy action sequences remains intact, and his chronic ineptitude
makes most of ``Anaconda'' an unintended laugh riot.
  Even the special effects don't pass muster. The anacondas,
created through animatronics and computer animation, often look more
showy than scary, even though the sextet of scribes have gone to
admirable lengths to devise inventive deaths for most of the cast.
  It's a shame the performers didn't all follow Voight's lead
and head straight to camp. Hyde and a smirky Stoltz ham it up
admirably, but the ever-mumbly Cube is lifeless, and Lopez makes the
mistake of acting as if she's in a real movie. Check your script,
girl: It ain't ``Selena,'' it's ``Anaconda''!

Title
Review for Stir of Echoes (1999)
         Before you spend countless hours at the word processor turning
that great high-concept idea for a movie into a full-length screenplay,
realize that somewhere in Hollywood some other writer has probably had
exactly the same flash of brilliance you did.
 Don't believe it? Look at the past few years. In 1998, we had
two epics in which Earth was about to be obliterated by giant rocks from
outer space: a comet in "Deep Impact," an asteroid in "Armageddon." In
1997, two thrillers revolved around murders in the Capitol, "Absolute
Power" and "Murder at 1600." In 1996, there were two extravaganzas about
evil aliens terrorizing the planet ("Independence Day" and "Mars
Attacks!").
 And let's not even try to count how many "body-switcher"
comedies there were in the late 1980s.
 With "Stir of Echoes" and "The Sixth Sense" currently slugging
it out for space at the cineplex, it would seem little boys talking to
ghosts is the latest trendy topic. But before you dismiss
writer-director David Koepp's "Stir" as a rip-off, take into account
that it was filming at the same time as "Sense" and that it's based on a
novel by Richard Matheson that predates even Stephen King's "The
Shining," which is for many people the last word in psychic-kid
literature.
 But now that millions have seen "Sense" (in some cases, more
than once), "Stir" can't help but look like a rehash. Although the
stories eventually take different courses, the initial similarities
between the two pictures are striking and, unfortunately, mostly
unflattering to Koepp's film. "Stir" does, however, have some terrific
performances that elevate it several notches above the run-of-the-mill
spook show, particularly from Kevin Bacon, who proves you need not go
over the top to play a man on the brink of madness.
 Bacon plays Tom, a blue-collar Chicagoan with a tough but
faithful wife named Maggie (Kathryn Erbe, an actress who always seems to
find intriguing angles in her characters) and a wide-eyed 5-year-old son
named Jake (Zachary David Cope) who spends a considerable amount of time
in what seem to be one-way conversations with unseen friends. Tom also
has a sister-in-law, Lisa (Illena Douglas), who fancies herself an
amateur hypnotherapist.
 At a beer-fueled bash one night, Lisa hypnotizes the skeptical
Tom and is surprised by how receptive he is to her suggestions. Soon
after coming out of the trance, Tom begins having gruesome
hallucinations about missing teeth and missing teens, sleeping 12 hours
a day and guzzling orange juice as if he were at an all-night rave
party. Only Jake seems to have a clue what's going on when Daddy
suddenly decides to dig up the backyard.
 Like "Sense," "Stir" works up a convincingly chilly atmosphere
and has a few jolting moments. To his credit, Koepp doesn't rely too
heavily on bursts of loud music or people jumping out of the shadows to
generate cheap shocks. Bacon is outstanding, and Douglas and Erbe do
wonders with their somewhat sketchy roles.
 But there are enough odd loose ends in "Stir" to indicate Koepp
(whose screenplays include "Death Becomes Her" and "Jurassic Park,"
among others) was so preoccupied with his directorial chores he didn't
pay enough attention to his material. Subplots about Maggie's pregnancy
and a vaguely creepy cult are introduced with great fanfare and then
abruptly discarded. Even Jake's gift, which seems to be the key to the
whole story, turns out to play only a minor role in the overall scheme
of things.
 Ultimately, where "Stir" suffers most in comparison with
"Sense" is in its last reel. "Sense" has a climax that ambushes you and
leaves you dazed. On the other hand, the ending of "Stir" is telegraphed
so far in advance, you won't need a psychic to determine what's in Tom
and Maggie's future. James Sanford

Title
Review for Deep Blue Sea (1999)
         If science can make sharks super-intelligent, why can't it do
the same for screenwriters?
 That's the question posed by "Deep Blue Sea," a thriller set in an
undersea lab where medical researcher Susan McAlester (Saffron Burrows)
and her crew are being hunted by predators of their own creation. The
essentials of the storyline are best summed up by McAlester's hypertense
co-worker Tom (Michael Rapaport): "She screwed with the sharks, and now
the sharks are screwin' with us!".
 Directed by Renny Harlin, the man who gave us "Die Hard 2: Die
Harder" and "Cliffhanger" when he was at his peak and the infamous
"Cutthroat Island" at his nadir, "Sea" is essentially a series of
explosions and crises, occasionally interrupted by stern warnings about
the consequences of fooling around with Mother Nature. The movie is so
poorly written it's almost laughable, but it does provide a few genuine
jolts, which is more than can be said for most of the current crop of
horror films.
 "Sea" begins with McAlester inviting financier Russell Franklin
(Samuel L. Jackson) to her base of operations, in hope of convincing him
not to cut off funding for her quest to find a cure for Alzheimer's
Disease. She and her staff have been using "hormonal enhancers" to
tinker with the brains of a trio of sharks at their Aquatica compound
and McAlester is certain a breakthrough is just around the corner.
 Unfortunately, so is a typhoon, which devestates Aquatica and
nearly kills everyone in it. Soon the hallways are flooded, the escape
routes are impassable and the humans are turning into snacks for their
toothy pet monsters.
 "These sharks aren't just breaking down doors for the fun of
it," Franklin realizes. "They're after us!" Most of the major lines in
"Sea" are followed by exclaimation points; the rest of the insipid
dialogue by first-time writers Duncan Kennedy, Wayne Powers and Donna
Powers is either mumbled or drowned out by the thousands of gallons of
water that wash over the cast at regular intervals.
 Among those struggling to survive alongside Franklin and
McAlester are daredevil Carter Blake (Thomas Jane), simpering Janice
(Jacqueline McKenzie) and a Gospel-spouting cook nicknamed Preach (LL
Cool J), whose sidekick is a profanity-spouting parrot -- really. None
of the actors is required to do much more than shriek, swim or scramble
to get out of the scene as quickly as possible. Those who like to see
dismemberment up close will be delighted by Harlin's insistance that we
get a look at every severed arm and leg in full, bloody detail.
 The attacks -- at least one of which is a real surprise -- are
generally exciting, although someone should have informed the authors
that just because a shark may have increased his brain size does not
necessarily mean he'll know how to turn on an oven, as one does here in
the movie's most ludicrous sequence. For a movie about the advancement
of knowledge, "Sea" is often flabbergastingly dumb. James Sanford

Title
Review for Deep End of the Ocean, The (1999)
Adapted from Jacquelyn Mitchard's best-seller - which had the
distinction of being the first novel honored as an Oprah Winfrey book
club selection - "The Deep End of the Ocean" is a flawed but often
effective family drama that turns on the deepest fear of every parent
or guardian: that one dumb move, a single moment of neglect that can
turn the rest of your life inside out.
Though she somehow keeps things together, forgetful and disorganized
Beth Cappadora (Michelle Pfeiffer) is no model mom. But neither does
she deserve what happens to her after she makes the foolish decision
to take her three kids to her high school reunion in Chicago.  Shortly
after the family arrives in town, Beth's 3-year-old son Ben
disappears, sparking a frantic search that culminates with Beth
standing outside a detectives' office, listening to cops speculating
about whether or not Ben is still alive.
Predictably, the effect of this on Beth, her husband Pat (Treat
Williams) and the Cappadora's 7-year-old son Vincent (Cory Buck) is
cataclysmic, and director Ulu Grosbard manages to make this section of
the story both taut and heartwrenching. In one of the movie's sharpest
scenes, Vincent uses his baby sister Kerry to curtail a bitter fight
between Beth and Pat, who accuses his wife ofhaving "made a career out
of being unhappy."
At this point, "Ocean" jumps ahead nine years to show us the aftermath
of the tragedy on the household; the Cappadoras have survived, but
everyone's a little worse for the wear. Then everything changes again,
thanks to a near-miraculous discovery, the kind of twist of fate that
tends to happen more often in literature than in real life.
But if the plot goes off the deep end, even throwing in a caring
detective (Whoopi Goldberg) who becomes Beth's best friend, the
movie's emotional core is solid and the understated performances - a
Grosbard trademark - ensure that "Ocean" gets the tearducts working
overtime.  Pfeiffer, Buck and Jonathan Jackson (who plays Vincent at
age 16) are particularly good at getting across their characters'
emotional states without grandstanding.
Credit screenwriter Stephen Schiff (who did the similarly subtle
recent adaptation of "Lolita") with keeping what could have been a
soapy free-for-all under control. Once it has exhausted its surprises,
"Ocean" calms down to become a thoughtful, observant study of
self-persecution and the power of forgiveness.

Title
Review for Next Best Thing, The (2000)
         Despite 15 years of experience in movies, Madonna has rarely
seemed as comfortable on the big screen as she has on MTV, on a concert
stage. She effortlessly vamped her way through such steamy videos as
"Erotica" or "Bad Girl," but froze up when she was called upon to play a
maneater in the 1993 thriller "Body of Evidence," and she's often witty
in interviews, but that sense of humor has often deserted her in such
comedies as "Who's That Girl" and "Four Rooms."
 To date, Madonna's most effective film work has come from
playing either larger than life icons (the indomitable Eva Peron in
"Evita," the voluptuous nightclub singer Breathless Mahoney in "Dick
Tracy") or non-conformists with a sense of humor about themselves (the
New Wave gypsy Susan in "Desperately Seeking Susan," the saucy baseball
player Mae in "A League of Their Own").
 But whether it's due to a new-found maturity as an actress or
her off-camera role as a first-time mother, Madonna has rarely seemed as
much at home with a part as she does in the seriocomic "The Next Best
Thing," in which she's cast as Abbie, a woman speeding toward 40 without
a husband (which she might like) or a child (which she truly wants).
Despite her career as a yoga instructor, Abbie still finds fault with
her looks and her body. Gazing at herself in the mirror, Abbie raises
her breasts and whispers "1989," then lets them droop and murmurs
miserably "1999."
 What Abbie does have, however, is a best friend, Robert (Rupert
Everett), who's always there to mop up her tears or mix up an emergency
margarita when she needs it most. The tenderness of the relationship is
completely believable because of the easy and affectionate way Everett
and Madonna play off of each other. If they ever decided to dip their
toes in the talk show pool, Madonna and Everett could make a sensational
replacement for Regis and Kathie Lee.
 Anyhow, back to our story: Robert would be the perfect man for
Abbie, except that he's gay ("He definitely falls into the 'What a
waste' category," one of Abby's friends sighs). But one sizzling
Independence Day weekend, when both are feeling particularly low, Abbie
and Robert down too many drinks, dance themselves into a frenzy and end
up getting much closer than they ever have before. Their one-time-only
tryst ends in confusion, regret and, to everyone's shock, pregnancy.
 Although it initially sets itself up as a comedy, "The Next
Best Thing" slowly evolves into a surprisingly thoughtful study of
family life, and it moves easily from lighthearted romp to poignant
drama under the guidance of John Schlesinger, the British director who
often seems to take a personal interest in projects which examine
American values in a changing society ("Midnight Cowboy," "The Falcon
and the Snowman," etc). If Abbie can't have everything she wants, she's
willing to settle for an unconventional arrangement in which she and
Robert can live in the same house and bring up their son together. But
the situation becomes increasingly complicated as the years go by and
Abbie becomes involved with Ben (Benjamin Bratt), a kind man who could
provide the stability she's always searched for.
Commendably, Thomas Ropelewski's screenplay refuses to villify
or sanctify any of the principal characters, all of whom make some
mistakes and say things they later regret as the stakes become higher.
 Even as the movie becomes progressively more serious,
Ropelewski's dialogue remains peppered with barbs, most of them aimed at
the ignorance of the well-meaning people around Abbie and Robert. A
concerned young woman asks if Abbie's baby will be gay, and Abbie
responds, "Will your kids be stupid?" When one uncouth little boy uses a
politically incorrect term to refer to Robert's love life, a girl
quickly chastises him. "You're supposed to say 'same-sex partner'!" she
notes.
 Although its subject matter is decidedly contemporary, "The
Next Best Thing" has the ravishing production design of a vintage
Technicolor extravaganza. The colors are vibrant, from the teal curtains
in Abbie's house to the startlingly red flowers in the garden, and
Elliot Davis photographs Everett, Madonna and Bratt lovingly, bathing
them in golden candle glow or warm blue lights. If every film looked
this good, going to the movies would be a whole lot easier on the eyes.
James Sanford

Title
Review for MatchMaker, The (1997)
Every so often a new talent appears on the scene and instantly wins a
devoted following. That was certainly the case with Janeane Garofalo
last year: Her not-so-ugly duckling turn in "The Truth About Cats and
Dogs" proved to be an inspiration to millions of women who don't look in
the mirror and see Julia Roberts. It also provided plenty of room for
Garofalo to show off her sassy, self-deprecating style, previously seen
only in small doses in "Reality Bites" and "Bye Bye Love."
"The Matchmaker" probably seemed like a solid choice for a follow-up
vehicle, another romantic comedy casting Garofalo as a tough cookie with
a tender heart, who finds love when she finally breaks out of her usual
insulation. In this case, she's an American single women who finds
herself stuck in a small Irish town during the annual matchmaking
festival, a set-up that should have been the perfect springboard for
Garofalo's stinging observations about cultural differences and the
mysteries of the heart.
Unfortunately, though Garofalo is still a treasure, "Matchmaker" proves
to be a crock of fool's gold. The screenplay was penned by one writer
and reworked by three others, and the story bears the fingerprints of
too many hands. Often there's so much going on in this tale director
Mark Joffe doesn't have time to capitalize on what should have been
sure-fire comic ideas. Nor does Garofalo get many chances to fling her
customary zingers, which could have put some much-needed punch into this
nicely photographed but uninspiring blarney. James Sanford

Title
Review for American Psycho (2000)
        Did Bret Easton Ellis' "American Psycho" have to be made into a
movie in the first place? Probably not, but since someone chose to do
it, we should be grateful that person was director-screenwriter Mary
Harron, who at least had the good sense to turn the stomach-churning
book into a satire of American morals in the last days of the Reagan
Administration. And Harron also made an excellent choice in picking
Christian Bale to play anti-hero Patrick Bateman, a Wall Street shark
who's more interested in murder than in the markets. As a result,
"American Psycho" the film is exceptionally well-played and Harron's
screenplay (co-written with "Go Fish" director Guinevere Turner) is
often hilarious and extremely creepy at the same time. Given the subject
matter, this is about the best result the people behind the movie could
have hoped for.
 The people most likely to be disappointed by Harron and
Turner's adaptation are those looking for non-stop carnage and gore.
Harron instead keeps most of the violence offscreen or in shadows,
making this film seem downright tame next to "Natural Born Killers" or
even your average teen slasher flick.
 Although Bale, the young Welsh actor who initially burst onto
the scene as the star of Steven Spielberg's grim epic "Empire of the
Sun" 13 years ago, has given some sharp performances in the past
(particularly in the largely unseen "Metroland" and in the Winona Ryder
version of "Little Women"), he sets a new standard for himself here.
>From the outside, his Bateman is the walking embodiment of male vanity
-- his medicine cabinet is stocked with honey-almond body scrubs and
herbal-mint facial masks and he refuses to use aftershaves containing
alcohol because alcohol "dries out your skin and makes you look older"
--  and fastidiousness. He's the type who won't set a glass down without
making sure there's a coaster to put underneath it.
 He speaks to his friends and associates in a plastic,
faux-cheerful voice, but, when necessary, he can quickly switch over to
a hollow, mock-sympathetic drone that sounds as if he's hosting a
telethon for a cause he's doesn't really believe in. He works out
obsessively, fusses over his clothes and watches and keeps his Manhattan
apartment spookily spotless.
 The fashionable exterior cloaks a truly sick mind, however.
While pretending to help out a homeless man, Bateman seizes the
opportunity to stab the guy to death and then to stomp on the victim's
dog. He sees bizarre messages on the screen of his ATM. He hires call
girls for dates that end with the women heading to the emergency room.
    Yet he finds a kind of justification for his bloodlust in
the lyrics to such Yuppie anthems as "The Greatest Love of All." "In
this world we live in, it's impossible to empathize with others," he
notes. "But we can always empathize with ourselves." Bateman often takes
time to recite his ridiculous mini-discertations on pop music, usually
just before doing something horrible; when he turns on Huey Lewis and
the News' "Hip to Be Square," his guest had better watch his back.
 "American Psycho" relies heavily on Bale since it really
doesn't have much of a story to tell. It's certainly not a mystery or a
thriller and, because the movie's biggest joke turns out to be that
nobody except his secretary (Chloe Sevigny) and his snippy fiancee
(Reese Witherspoon) seems to know who Bateman is anyway, there isn't
much suspense as to whether or not he'll get away with his crimes.
 It's impossible to imagine Leonardo DiCaprio, who was
reportedly courted to play Bateman, pulling off this role. But Bale,
with his wholesome good looks and x-ray stare, plays it for all its
worth and then some. Even as the movie becomes progressively
surrealistic in its last half hour -- it reaches a peak around the time
Bateman runs naked through the hallway of a high-rise while brandishing
a chainsaw -- Bale doesn't allow his character to become a cartoon,
which makes Bateman that much scarier. James Sanford

Title
Review for Virgin Suicides, The (1999)
         In the same way the muses inspired the artists of ancient
Greece, the five Lisbon sisters haunt the dreams of the adolescent boys
of Grosse Pointe in "The Virgin Suicides," director Sofia Coppola's
lyrical, chilling adaptation of Jeffrey Eugenides' novel about sexual
repression and promiscuity in the 1970s. Like those muses, the Lisbons
float out of reach of mere mortals and when they briefly descend to
Earth, they leave broken hearts and poetry in their wake.
 Coppola follows the book almost to the letter, using dialogue
sparingly and letting a narration by Giovanni Ribisi carry her film to
its tragic conclusion. But "Virgin Suicides" cloaks the story in layers
of mystery and fantastic imagery, tantalizing its viewers as easily as
the wise-beyond-her-years Lux (Kirsten Dunst) commands the attention of
every young man who crosses her path. No detail is too minor to escape
Coppola's attention: The thump of a needle hitting a record, the
tickling of a clock and the drip from a leaking roof are just as
important in setting the scene here as the Styx anthems, peasant skirts
and shaggy haircuts. Instead of laughing at 1975, Coppola weaves a
sensuous suburban myth that seduces you completely.
 "Suicides" is a work of fiction, although, like Eugenides'
prose, it's so believable you half-expect to find a "based on a true
story" label in its credits. The Lisbons are a quietly dysfunctional
family headed up by a do-nothing dad (an amazingly low-key and effective
James Woods) and a religious-fanatic mom (Kathleen Turner) who is so
obsessed with keeping her daughters hidden from the evils of society,
she inadvertently smothers them. Lux, the middle child, is the only one
who escapes her mother's grasp and when she does, she recklessly
searches for some kind of acceptance from the outside world.
 With a come-hither smile and relaxed body language, Dunst
magically and vibrantly brings Lux to life. Watching this hopelessly
confused girl give herself up first to a dopey jock named Trip (Josh
Hartnett), then to a parade of anonymous lovers, results in the saddest
and most heart-wrenching sex scenes since Jennifer Jason Leigh's
similarly misguided character lost her virginity in "Fast Times at
Ridgemont High."
 Coppola's screenplay doesn't throw out the humor of the novel
either. Far from the little sophisticates we've gotten used to seeing in
teen comedies such as "Down To You" and "Drive Me Crazy," the characters
here are just as awkward and fumbling as most high-schoolers. Since they
can't express their feelings in their own words, the boys call the
Lisbons up and play records over the phone for them. Songs such as
Carole King's "So Far Away" and the Bee Gees' "Run To Me" take on
enormous poignancy as they become the lifeline that keeps the girls
anchored to the outside world.
 Even Trip, perceived by all as a dreamy stud, is overwhelmed
when confronted by the love-hungry Lux. It's easy to see why: Dunst,
perhaps best-remembered as the eerily wise little blood-drinker in
"Interview With the Vampire," is now outfitted with a combination of sex
appeal and vulnerability reminiscent of what we saw when the then
teen-aged Uma Thurman slithered through "Henry and June" and "Dangerous
Liaisons." No wonder Mama Lisbon is so worried about keeping her at
home.
 The casting of former glamor girl Turner as the plump, pristine
matriarch works exceptionally well. Behind her facade of anxiety you can
glimpse the teasing siren she once was and see that somewhere along the
way Mrs. Lisbon buried her past under heaps of shame and
self-righteousness.
 Her daughters refuse to go down that path, however, and instead
find a way to remain forever young and free from their mother's
influence. What's worse, Coppola asks, having children who don't always
behave as we'd like them to, or not having children at all? James
Sanford

Title
Review for Hilary and Jackie (1998)
With its story of a brilliant musician destroyed in her prime, "Hilary
and Jackie" has already drawn comparisons to "Shine," the 1995 hit
based on the life of pianist David Helfgott. But "Hilary" is a more
accomplished and demanding film, one that doesn't find a convenient
villain (like the didactic dad Armin Muller-Stahl played in "Shine")
to pin cellist Jacqueline Du Pre's troubles on.
In the 1960s and 1970s, Du Pre was celebrated for her extraordinarily
passionate playing and her often unruly style, marked by flying hair
and grandoise gestures, or "over-emphatic body movements," as one of
her early judges calls them. Emily Watson's depictions of Jackie's
performances here may remind you of the way Tori Amos appears to make
love to her keyboard in concert.  In both cases, the player and the
instrument seem to become one.
Of course, what went on off-stage was considerably more disturbing to
see. Raised in a family of music-lovers, sisters Jackie and Hilary
(Rachel Griffiths) were both pushed from an early age to
becomeconsummate musicians, although the less outgoing Hilary - a
flutist whom the film argues may have had more innate talent than her
sister - eventually crumbled in the spotlight and became a wife and
mother.
The teen-age Jackie was quickly sucked into a whirlwind of touring and
personal appearances around the world, much to her own amazement and
bewilderment; "one day I was playing, and the next I was booked up for
two years," she says. Jackie sought some sort of an anchor to help
stabilize her while the people around her seemed too caught up in
trumpeting her latest triumphs to pay attention to her needs.
"Hilary and Jackie" is told from the sides of both siblings, although
it's not one of those films in which we're shown the exact same
incidents from two different viewpoints. Instead, the "Hilary" portion
illuminates what Jackie's increasingly erratic behavior looked like to
theoutside world while the "Jackie" segment clues us in on the private
hell Jackie was going through as she tried to deal with increasing
hatred of her craft and the slow deterioration of her body. For
Jackie, who is reminded frequently by the people around her that her
whole life is her music, there's nothing to cling to when she realizes
she may not have much longer to play.
Watson, who proved in "Breaking the Waves" that she may well be
today's foremost chronicler of quiet madness, is arresting, but
Griffiths' far less flamboyant figure is every bit as
impressive. Hilary may not have Jackie's jet-set friends or splendid
London apartment, but she does have a charming, attentive husband
(David Morrissey, also excellent) Jackie hungers for, and Griffiths
subtly conveys Hilary's uneasy sense of serenity.
In trying to ease Jackie's stress, Hilary allows herself to be talked
into doing something she doesn't want to do and the results are messy
and lasting. Though Jackie's decline is sad indeed, Frank
Cottrell-Boyce's enormously insightful screenplay makes the case that
an even greater tragedy was the separation of two extremely close
sisters who were drawn apart by circumstances far beyond their
control.

Title
Review for Steel (1997)
Watching "Steel" is like sitting through one of those sunny "let's save
Mother Earth" grade-school pageants: The intentions are certainly the best,
even though the performances and most of the productions values are
second-rate and often downright laughable. Your sentimental side begs you to
be kind to this sort of entertainment, even as the analytic part of the
brain tears the show to shreds.
 Adapted from an unsuccessful comic book, "Steel" radiates messages of
positivity and racial harmony when it's not struggling to be "Batman in Da
Hood." Shaquille O'Neal plays John Henry Irons (get it?) who helped develop
high-tech weapons during his Army days, alongside kindly Lt. Susan Sparks
(Annabeth Gish) and nefarious Nathaniel Burke (Judd Nelson). When Burke's
tomfoolery with one of the "sonic cannons" the trio wound up crippling
Sparks, Irons left the Army and returned home to inner-city L.A., which
writer-director Kenneth Johnson sees as a kind of "Sesame Street" with a few
nasty gang members hanging 'round.
 After the superguns turn up in the hands of criminals (guess who put them
there), Irons, Sparks and feisty Uncle Joe (Richard Roundtree) team up to
create an urban superhero who strolls the streets in a suit of steel and
brandishes a giant hammer that doubles as a ray gun. "He's like the Tin Man
on steroids!" squawks one gangsta, not inaccurately.
 "Steel" is every bit as silly as it sounds, and yet it's not entirely
without merit. At a time when African-American kids have their choice of the
sex-starved heroes of "Booty Call" or Bill Bellamy's super-stud in "How To
Be A Player" as role models, it's heartening to see someone like O'Neal
giving them another option. The movie also deserves points for showing how
Sparks, though paraplegic, becomes an invaluable asset to the team because
of her brilliant mind and friendly supportiveness. There's also a bit of
cute comic relief from Irma P. Hall (the scene stealer of "A Family Thing")
as Irons' grandmother, who dreams of opening a restaurant called Black and
Bleu that would combine soul food with classic French cooking.
 On a technical level, however, "Steel" is more like "Tin Foil." Its visual
effects can't hold a candle to those in "Spawn" and the tacky music that
underscores the action sounds like it was stolen from a "Starsky and Hutch"
episode. Like Michael Jordan in "Space Jam," O'Neal is most comfortable when
he's smiling or running around. Delivering lines and dredging up emotions
overtax his talents, and some of his reaction shots are unintentional hoots.
 But even with a multitude of sins, "Steel" might provide a perfectly
enjoyable afternoon for the under-12 crowd. Perhaps they'll overlook
O'Neal's wooden acting and find the movie's well-meaning heart.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Payback (1999)
If you're shocked by the mayhem Mel Gibson perpetrates in "Payback,"
keep in mind that Gibson first rose to international stardom in
director George Miller's "Mad Max" movies, deliriously violent
spectaculars in which the only rule seemed to be "kill or be killed."
In the two decades since, Gibson has mellowed out considerably. True,
plenty of blood has been spilled in the "Lethal Weapon" movies, but
director Richard Donner has upped the levity quotient so much over the
years that last summer's "Lethal Weapon 4" was practically a sitcom
with occasional kung-fu interludes.
The extraordinarily brutal "Payback" could also be seen as a comedy,
albeit an extremely sick and twisted one that offers Gibson the rare
opportunity to play against type. Some of his fans will applaud the
stretch, many will be appalled, and no one should expect a film this
unrelentingly nasty to become a major hit at the box office.
But don't be surprised if, 10 years down the line, "Payback" is hailed
as a minor cult classic. It may be bloody, sleazy and populated
entirely by trashy people, but this picture is also subtly stylish,
sensationally acted and - if you appreciate extremely bitter humor -
pretty funny as well. Somehow, someday, somewhere, "Payback" will get
its due.
Fittingly, at the center of the movie is a guy who's just trying to
get what he thinks he deserves. Porter (Gibson) was swindled out of
$70,000 and left for dead by backstabbing former partners, one of whom
used the money to pay off a debt to "the outfit." Now Porter wants
arefund, and woe to those who stand in his way, be they man, woman or
dog.
In terms of plot, that's about all "Payback" has to offer. What makes
the movie crackle is a cast of powerhouse actors and the vivid colors
in the script by Terry Hayes and director Brian Helgeland.
Porter's wife (Deborah Kara Unger) is a junkie who hides her works in
music boxes and in the hollowed-out heels of platform shoes. The only
thing Porter's ex-friend Val (Gregg Henry) enjoys more than roughing
up others is getting pulverized by dominatrix Pearl (Lucy Liu of "Ally
McBeal").
"Payback" also manages to accommodate a nod to Neil Jordan's memorable
"Mona Lisa," as Porter finds himself drawn to the pricey call girl
Rosie (Maria Bello) he's been driving around town. But the dialogue is
anything but lovey-dovey. "I think all those stories about your being
dead are true," Rosie tells Porter. "You're just too thick-headed to
admit it."
It's juicy stuff, and Helgeland demonstrates a terrific feel for the
material.  "Payback" has been shot in a cool blue tint that makes it
seem like a snapshot from the past, an effect enhanced by disorienting
backgrounds that include New Jersey commuter trains alongside Chicago
street signs.
It's already been widely reported that the primary reason the release
of "Payback" has been held up for the past six months has been
differences between Gibson and Helgeland over exactly how dark the
movie should be. Not being able to see the original cut, we'll
probably never know for certain what it was like, but it's doubtful it
was any better than this vicious, jolting little amorality play. James
Sanford

Title
Review for Girl, Interrupted (1999)
 Author Susanna Kaysen's biggest problem was probably being born
in an era when conformity was the name of the game and well-to-do girls
who wanted to sample life on the edge or experiment sexually with more
than one partner were instantly labeled as mentally disturbed. That's
exactly what happened to Kaysen in the late 1960s, when she was packed
off to a psychiatric hospital following a botched suicide attempt.
Kaysen came out of the experience with a book, "Girl, Interrupted,"
which has become something of a touchstone for young female readers over
the years. Many of her fellow patients never came out at all.
 Had she grown up in the 1990s, with her gifts for communicating
adolescent angst through language, Kaysen would almost be assured of
having a record deal or at least her own website. She was Goth before
anyone ever heard of the term.
 There's no mystery as to why Kaysen's autobiography attracted
the attention of Winona Ryder. The role of Susanna fits the actress
marvelously, and her fans may even see Susanna as a continuation of the
smart, introspective teens Ryder played in such career-establishing hits
as "Beetlejuice" and "Heathers." And, after spending a large portion of
the last few years keeping a low profile onscreen, Ryder certainly must
be anxious to get back in the spotlight.
 Unfortunately for her, however, there's an even juicier part in
"Girl, Interrupted," and it has gone to the exotic, unpredictable
Angelina Jolie. So while Ryder is baring her soul and facing off against
such formidable types as Whoopi Goldberg (cast as a stern but
sympathetic nurse) and Vanessa Redgrave (in a cameo as a psychiatrist
who pierces the clouds over Susanna's psyche), Jolie strides in and
steals the film out from under its star.
 Jolie, who made a name for herself with a sensational
performance as an ill-fated supermodel in the 1998 HBO film "Gia,"
plays Lisa, an eight-year veteran of the hospital who appears to be
beyond treatment. She's a wildcat, flirting outrageously with both men
and women and generally creating havoc in any place she visits.
 Because Ryder's boyish look here seems patterned after the late
actress and cult figure Jean Seberg, it's not much of a stretch to link
"Girl, Interrupted" to Seberg's best film "Breathless," the french New
Wave masterpiece in which she played a confused American who tries to
lose her own identity in a whirlwind affair with a Parisian criminal
(Jean-Paul Belmondo).
 Susanna, like nearly everyone else in the ward, is initially
drawn into Lisa's orbit and savors the woman's boundless energy and
attitude. In just the same way Lisa overwhelms Susanna, the statuesque
Jolie dwarfs the tiny Ryder. But although Susanna eventually stands
tall, Ryder, fine as she is in the movie, cannot help but remain
eclipsed by Jolie.
 Ryder's work here is often affecting, particularly when she starts her
journey toward self-awareness in the story's second half. Jolie smartly
realizes Lisa is not a sympathetic figure and doesn't pander for the
audience's pity.
 Instead, she's always withholding a little something, teasing
the viewer about what's really brewing behind this hellion's half-open
eyes. Eventually, we find ourselves worrying more about what's going to
happen to Lisa than about Susanna's fate; hey, we all know she went on
to write the book anyway, so things must have worked out somehow. Lisa
has mystery on her side.
 The acting battle is the primary strength of "Girl,
Interrupted," which too often resorts to a melodramatic cliché (a
suicide, an escape attempt, etc.) whenever the plot stalls. All these
incidents may have actually happened during Kaysen's one-year "rest,"
but the screenplay doesn't make them feel real. On the other hand, there
are a few interesting touches scattered throughout the script, such as
Susanna's roommate's obsession with the "Oz" books by L. Frank Baum and
Ruth Plumly Thompson and Lisa's quoting of Dorothy Parker. True, these
kids may have some problems, but they've also got terrific taste in
literature. James Sanford

Title
Review for Dancing at Lughnasa (1998)
 Just after the climactic moment in "Dancing At Lughnasa," the five
Mundy sisters stand facing one another, breathless and yet strangely
invigorated. They look at each other in silence, perhaps sensing for the
first time how much they need each other. Or maybe on a subconscious
level they each know it's only a matter of time before their way of life
comes to an end.
 "Lughnasa," adapted from Brian Friel's acclaimed play, so beautifully
captures the details of its time and place and its characters' lives
that it's difficult to resist being drawn in. Director Pat O'Connor did
a similarly fine job evoking 1950s Irish life in the lovely sleeper
"Circle of Friends," and here he recreates 1936 Ireland, specifically
rural Donegal, where the Mundys live quietly on a tiny farm that has
probably seen better days.
 The same can be said for most of the women. Self-righteous
schoolteacher Kate (Meryl Streep) rules the roost, ordering her siblings
around like servants. Her sole delight seems to come from seeing others
take a fall: "Her dancing days will be over," she smirks, when a snooty
former student is forced into marriage. Clownish Maggie (Kathy Burke)
does what she can to inject a little levity into the house. Quiet Agnes
(Brid Brennan) looks after the mentally challenged Rose (Sophie
Thompson); the youngest sister Christina (Catherine McCormack) looks
after her eight-year-old son Michael (Darrell Johnston), the result of
her affair with a devil-may-care Welshman named Gerry (Rhys Ifans), who
drops by every 18 months or so.
 None of the sisters have had much luck with love or money; their only
luxuries are a bicycle and a wireless set that occasionally picks up a
bit of music. When brother Jack (Michael Gambon) returns to Donegal
after doing missionary work in Uganda and announces he thinks he's come
home to die, Maggie gasps, "Jesus, don't! We can't afford to bury you."
 Jack's reappearance is just the first harbinger of changes for the
Mundys. He went to Africa as a Catholic priest but has since become
obsessed with the rituals and practices of the natives, much to the
dismay of Kate. Instead of saying Mass at the local church, Jack would
rather investigate the celebrations of the pagan Feast of Lughnasa, in
which drunken participants leap over bonfires and dance.
 Dancing becomes a recurring motif in the film as the only way the women
can escape the drudgery of their day-to-day routines. Small wonder Kate
and Agnes look on with just a touch of jealousy as Gerry waltzes with
Christina; the only thing better than dancing is dancing with someone
else.
 With very little in the way of plot, "Lughnasa" must rely on character
development for its drama. In lesser hands, Kate might have come off as
a stern, humorless old maid, but instead we can see how much she really
cares about keeping her family together and holding on to their home. As
expected, Streep's accent is flawless but what's even more impressive is
how she brings out Kate's hidden colors, which this woman has cloaked in
multiple layers of acid and ice.
 Burke's buoyant Maggie, McCormack's tolerant Christina and Brennan's
timid Agnes also reveal unexpected personality traits as "Lughnasa"
progresses. The screenplay falters only in a slightly melodramatic
episode involving Rose's infatuation with an unsuitable man; that
O'Connor intercuts scenes of a fox raiding a henhouse into this sequence
doesn't help matters.
 "Lughnasa" is much more effective at showing how the Mundys manage to
survive their many disputes and differences and find some peaceful
common ground. Like most families, they're often so busy worrying about
the future that they don't realize how happy they should be. They may
not be wealthy or blessed with much in the way of material possessions,
but the women of "Lughnasa" prove that sisterhood can truly be powerful.

Title
Review for U Turn (1997)
It's a telling sign that "U-Turn" is identified in the opening credits
as "An Oliver Stone Movie" rather than "An Oliver Stone Film." This is
Stone in an apolitcal, even -- dare we say it -- lighthearted
mood. But this time out his bag of tricks is filled with recycled
items: grainy film stock, black-and-white inserts, scorpions, scolding
crows, Indian soothsayers and a non-stop parade of white
trashies. "U-Turn" has some of the style of "Natural Born Killers"
with almost none of its satiric sting or kinetic energy, and the
result is a clunky black comedy with only a few scattered laughs
breaking up a monotonous cruise.
Although the story claims to be based on John Ridley's "Stray Dogs,"
it actually owes more to such modern film-noirs as "Red Rock West" and
"Body Heat." A breakdown strands luckless gambler Sean Penn in a
desert town where everyone seems to be either hot-blooded or
hot-tempered.  Sultry local slut Jennifer Lopez (awkwardly making her
way through a role originally intended for Sharon Stone) would fall in
the first category; her real-estate magnate hubby Nick Nolte belongs
in the latter. Penn gets the opportunity to murder both of them, in
between would-be wacky misadventures straight out of the far superior
Martin Scorsese opus "After Hours."
The only real amusement is provided by the vibrant Claire Danes,
playing a bubble-brained tease who desperately tries to seduce Penn
into helping her escape the town, and Joaquin Phoenix, as her even
dumber boyfriend, who calls himself "T.N.T." Penn can be extremely
funny given the right material, but "U-Turn" affords him few
opportunities to do anything except look put-upon. Nolte growls and
grimaces unmenacingly, and his tawdry sex scene with Lopez should have
been cut: It's an embarassment to both actors. Cameos by everyone from
Laurie Metcalf to Liv Tyler abound, creating only momentary interest.
When "U-Turn" finally comes to its long-delayed ending, you realize
"Donut" would have been a far more suitable title, as your unexciting
two-hour journey has only taken you around in a circle; like its hero,
this show never gets on the road.  James Sanford

Title
Review for Desperate Measures (1998)
      Perhaps there are a few moviegoers who've been anxiously anticipating
their chance to watch Michael Keaton break his own thumb and operate on his
own wounded leg. Maybe these are the same unfortunate few who've dreamed of
the day they'll see Andy Garcia plow through an emergency room on a
motorcycle and get shot through the armpit. Well, folks, your ship has come
in: All this and much, much more await you in "Desperate Measures," an
astoundingly inept thriller that's easily the worst movie ever directed by
Barbet Schroeder ("Reversal of Fortune") and may well prove to be an
all-time low for everyone else involved with it.
David Klass' screenplay is set in San Francisco, although for all the
sense it makes Wonderland might have been a more credible locale. Garcia,
who has now played a cop as often as Teri Garr has played a dizzy housewife,
is cast as Frank Connor, a lawman obsessed with finding a compatible donor
whose bone marrow could save his dying son Matt (Joseph Cross). Jailbird
Peter McCabe (Keaton) seems to be the only one in the world whose marrow
matches, so Connor pulls strings and springs McCabe for a day on the
operating table.
But somehow everyone completely forgot that not only is McCabe a
psychotic, he's also an evil genius who earned his doctorate while in
prison. Who knew?! McCabe escapes, torches a few nurses, shoots some cops
and miraculously manages to hack into the hospital's computer system with
only a couple of keystrokes.
But McCabe's not smart enough to bandage a bleeding leg, which leaves a
trail for his pursuers to follow, or to realize that if you want to go
unnoticed in a medical facility smoking in the hallway is not the best idea.
While Matt's life hangs by a thread, Connor hunts down McCabe (who must
be brought back alive in order for theoperation to proceed), and "Desperate
Measures" blossoms into awe-inspiring absurdity, with random explosions,
ridiculous car chases down the least congested freeways California has ever
seen, and a few bizarre comic inserts from McCabe that are almost as funny
as, well, a bone marrow transplant. After about 100 minutes, Schroeder
simply stops the madness without bothering to give it any sort of proper
ending, perhaps figuring few viewers would bother sticking around for the
finale anyhow.
"Desperate Measures" also deserves special condemnation as one of the
ugliest-looking films in years. The entire picture is drenched in washed-out
blues and greys, as if Tri-Star didn't bother paying the lab bill to have
the visuals color-corrected. Certainly that would have been the easiest part
of this fiasco to fix: The rest of it is far beyond repair.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Pushing Tin (1999)
"Pushing Tin" is air traffic controllers' slang for getting planes in
line for landing. That's the responsibility of Nick Falzone (John
Cusack), one of the sharpest controllers at New York's Terminal Radar
Approach Control center. Blessed with a lightning-fast mouth and mind,
he's become known as "The Zone" for his ability to sort out potential
problems in the sky before they happen.
What he's not so hot at doing is sorting out his own emotions,
particularly after the enigmatic Russell Bell (Billy Bob Thornton,
with a slimmer than usual physique and newly acquired hair) joins the
TRACON team and almost instantly arouses Nick's suspicions.  "Pushing
Tin," an agreeably twisted comedy-drama from the gifted British
director Mike Newell ("Four Weddings and a Funeral," "Donnie Brasco"),
tracks the slow unravelling of Nick's mind and his marriage as he
becomes obsessed with Russell and his comely young wife Mary (Angelina
Jolie), who guzzles vodka by the bucketful to deal with the stress in
her home.
Controllers' wives, we learn, refer to themselves as "firsts,"
"seconds," etc., a telling sign of the failure rate of most
controllers' relationships. The screenplay by Glen Charles and Les
Charles offers many such observations, and it's no surprise to find it
was based on a New York Times Sunday Magazine feature that
investigated the pressure-cooker world of guys like Nick and
Russell. But rather than playing the subject matter for high drama,
"Tin" finds a certain sardonic humor in the paradox of men and women
who can't cope with their own problems, yet take the lives of
thousands of travelers into their hands daily. We're told an air
traffic controller saves more lives in one shift than a surgeon does
in an entire career. "Tin" is also very much in the same school as
other Cusack comedies, such as "Grosse Pointe Blank" and "Say
Anything," movies that didn't break any box office records when they
were originally released, but have built up fervent followings in the
years since. This stage-trained actor generally has uncommonly good
taste in material, as well as an impressive capacity for playing
seemingly normal guys who have to deal with issues much bigger than
themselves. Nick may be only a breath away from flat-out nuttiness,
but Cusack obviously likes him nonetheless, and gives him a largely
sympathetic reading. Subtlety and nuance are the keys to Thornton's
performance as well, which keeps us guessing as to the true nature of
Russell's personality. In the potentially tricky role of Nick's wife
Connie, the luminous Cate Blanchett adopts a dead-on Long Island
accent while avoiding turning the woman into a caricature. Jolie's
abrasive/pathetic Mary - who growls "I'm too sober for this" when Nick
tries to engage her in conversation - is also colorful and funny.

Title
Review for Where the Heart Is (2000)
         Some actresses are capable of giving wonderful performances
even without the benefit of a solid script or a strong director. With
"Where the Heart Is," Natalie Portman and Ashley Judd join that select
group.
 The movie itself is a shapeless, often downright baffling
confection, made up of equal parts syrup, salt and good old-fashioned
hogwash. It's drawn from a novel by Billie Letts that became a hot
seller after it earned the Oprah Winfrey seal of approval. Often, as the
film skips from corny comedy to unconvincing drama, it appears as if
screenwriters Lowell Ganz and Babaloo Mandel completely missed whatever
it was that made the book so special.
 "Heart" was directed by Matt Williams, the man who helped
develop "Roseanne" and whenever the picture reaches for some serious
emotions, Williams tends to serve them up in the overearnest style of
one of those dreaded "very special episodes" that turn up on sitcoms
during sweeps week. Were it not for the presence of Portman and Judd,
"Heart" could easily have turned into a pilot for a lame TV series. Call
it "Wal-Mart Mama."
 The story merrily skips through the five years following the
day penniless, heavy-with-child Novalee Nation (Portman) was abandoned
at a Wal-Mart in Sequoyah, Oklahoma. That's where Novalee gave birth to
her daughter Americus -- cute is the name of the game here --  and where
she found shelter with a good-natured recovering alcoholic named Sister
Husband (Stockard Channing). What was Sister's brother named, you ask?
Why, Brother Husband, of course.
 It doesn't stop there. Lexi (Judd), Novalee's confidante, has
five kids, all of whom have been named after snack foods. The two women
become close friends, perhaps because they're the only ones in Sequoyah
who seem able to laugh away the problems of being barefoot and pregnant.
         As "Heart" unfolds, the pair will weather kidnappings, natural
disasters, abusive boyfriends, scheming relatives and much, much more.
Whatever slight credibility the plot builds up is quickly erased after
one character inherits $41,000 and proceeds to use it to build and
furnish a house that must have cost at least five times that much.
 Yet Judd and Portman seem to believe in this bunk and, to some
extent, they convince us the movie is worth watching. Since her
breakthrough role in "Ruby in Paradise," Judd has too often allowed
herself to be straitjacketed in parts unworthy of her talent: "Double
Jeopardy" and "Eye of the Beholder" were shining recent examples. Lexi
isn't fully developed, but Judd's warmth and natural charm come through
anyway. So does her sly way with a line, as when she asks Novalee if she
can drive home slowly "so I can pretend it's a vacation."
 Portman is the real engine of "Heart" though, and she delivers
a marvelous, deeply moving snapshot of a woman who has to grow up
quickly in a very short amount of time. As someone who claims she's
"never lived any place that didn't have wheels underneath it," Novalee
would seem ripe for parody, and plenty of actresses would have had a
difficult time refraining from being condescending.
 Not Portman. She seems completely sympathetic to Novalee's
situation and never once does she drift into caricature or make a cheap
joke about her. As she did in last year's much better "Anywhere But
Here," Portman slips gently into her character and embodies her with
spirit, grace and verve.
 At one point, Novalee tells Lexi, "We've all got meanness in
us, but we've got goodness, too, and the only thing worth living for is
the good." That doesn't sound like anything a teen would tell her older
friend, but Portman delivers it as if she believes every syllable. She
does it so well in fact that maybe for just a moment we can believe it
too. James Sanford

Title
Review for Dogma (1999)
         After months of debate in the media over its supposedly
sacrilegious content, it's sort of bewildering to discover
writer-director Kevin Smith's "Dogma" is not an all-out attack on the
Catholic church but rather a rambunctious satire which ultimately turns
out to be an endorsement of faith. Is it irreverent and crude? Of
course, but what else would you expect from the man who made "Clerks,"
the first film to win an NC-17 rating purely on the basis of its
dialogue?
 In "Dogma," Smith (who professes to have been raised a
Catholic) asks some of the same kinds of questions you might expect to
hear from a precocious child after Sunday School. Did Joseph and Mary
ever consummate their marriage after Jesus was born? Did Jesus have
brothers and sisters? Why does the Bible skip over what happened to
Jesus between the ages of 12 and 30? As you might expect, the answers
Smith comes up with are, to put it lightly, a bit unorthodox. But he
takes pains to warn his audience about what's coming in a disclaimer at
the beginning of the film, asserting that "even God has a sense of humor
-- just look at the platypus."
 At any rate, anyone who's likely to be offended will probably
bail out on "Dogma" in the first ten minutes, right around the time a
cardinal (played by George Carlin, for heaven's sake) unveils the new
"Catholicism Wow!" campaign which promises "a renewal of faith and
style." The centerpiece of his press conference is the unveiling of a
statue of a grinning Jesus offering a thumbs-up sign to his followers.
The cardinal dismisses the old image of the crucifix, insisting "Christ
didn't come to Earth to give us the willies."
 That bit sets the tone for a meandering tale about the race to
stop fallen angels Loki (Matt Damon) and Bartleby (Ben Affleck) from
re-entering Heaven, a feat which would prove God's fallibility and bring
on the end of existence. Linda Fiorentino plays Bethany, an abortion
clinic worker who's astonished to find she's the one hand-picked by God
to prevent this calamity, especially since she's obviously a bit
spiritually conflicted. She attends Mass dutifully, but joylessly and
confides to her co-worker Liz (Janeane Garofalo) she thinks God is dead.
"The sign of a true Catholic," Liz cracks.
 Before long, Bethany will be joined in her crusade by Jay
(Jason Mewes) and Silent Bob (Smith), the duo who've become Smith's
answer to Laurel and Hardy after their previous appearances in "Clerks,"
"Mallrats" and "Chasing Amy." Although they score a few scattered laughs
this time around -- particularly when they reveal what lured them from
New Jersey to central Illinois -- the pair's shtick is beginning to wear
thin, and "Dogma" might have been a more focused film without them.
 Much more entertaining company is provided by the muse
Serendipity (Salma Hayek), who's currently visiting the Earth in the
guise of a stripper who does her act to New Edition's "Candy Girl," and
Rufus (Chris Rock), who claims he was the thirteenth apostle and was
left out of the Bible because he's black. Smith has given these
characters many of the script's choicest and most provocative lines.
 "Dogma" is practically bursting at the seams with ideas, some
of which Smith puts across with considerably more finesse than others.
He gets a delightfully dry performance from Alan Rickman as the
underappreciated seraphim Metatron who berates Bethany for not
recognizing him. "You people -- if there's not a movie about it, it's
not worth knowing," he growls.
 Smith also proves Affleck and Damon are good sports (and able
comedians) by working in a few jokes alluding to the rumors about their
off-screen friendship, and even manages a couple of nasty swipes at
writer-director John Hughes by having Serendipity claim credit for have
inspired 19 of the top 20 films of all time. The sole exception is "Home
Alone": "Someone sold their soul to Satan to get the grosses up on
that." James Sanford

Title
Review for Kiss the Girls (1997)
KISS THE GIRLS (Paramount)Directed by Gary Fleder
Based on James Patterson's best-seller, "Kiss The Girls" comes on like an
intelligent, intense psychological thriller, and for about half an hour you
might suspect you've found the new "Silence of the Lambs," or "Seven '97."
But like a good-looking blind date who promises dinner and a movie, then
takes you to Burger King and "Wishmaster," the spell dissipates quickly,
leaving you feeling seduced and abandoned.
Put the blame partially on Patterson and screenwriter David Klass.  After
an arresting set-up involving a voyeur who kidnaps bright young women and
imprisons them in an underground lair, the story turns into a flat
combination of John Fowles' "The Collector" and "Silence," with scraps of
the far-superior "Copycat" thrown in to no good effect. Morgan Freeman,
excellent as always, plays Dr. Alex Cross, a forensic psychologist from
Washington D.C. who travels to Durham, N.C. to probe the disappearance of
his niece. Down South he runs into snickering cracker cops (are there any
other kind in second-rate movies?) who try to give him the brush-off, and
Cross, despite being hundreds of miles outside of his jurisdiction,
determines to investigate the kidnapping personally.
That's just the first of many incredulities the audience is asked to
swallow. Even more improbably, Cross teams up with a civilian, a doctor
named Kate McTiernan (Ashley Judd) who's the only victim to have escaped
from this covetous captor, who identifies himself as "Casanova." The
multi-layered relationship that appears to be developing between Cross and
McTiernan is by far the most original and intriguing aspect of "Kiss The
Girls," but the movie largely ignores it, choosing instead to trot out the
usual cat-and-mouse games and an anti-climactic trip through a haunted
house that's hauntingly similar--and inferior to--the finale of "Silence."
 Only the charisma of Freeman and Judd (who's rapidly developing into a
reliably solid performer) keeps the movie afloat and the audience awake,
since the excellent supporting cast (Cary Elwes, Jeremy Piven, Tony
Goldwyn, etc) is woefully underutilized. Cross' frequent snafus make you
wonder what this man is doing calling himself a cop, but Freeman's poise
and intelligence allows you to give the guy the benefit of the doubt.
Though McTiernan is called upon to behave almost as recklessly and
unconvincingly, Judd gives the woman a daunting sense of conviction.
 "Kiss" is further hobbled by the
look-at-me-I-just-got-out-of-film-school style of director Gary Fleder
("Things To Do In Denver When You're Dead"), whose motto seems to be "when
in doubt, shoot it with a jiggly hand-held camera." Several scenes in the
film also feature pointless slow-motion, the trademark of many a desperate
director, and those who like to spot continuity flaws will marvel at how
McTiernan's scarred face heals almost overnight and how Cross emerges from
a dunking in a well with remarkably dry clothing.
 James Sanford

Title
Review for Frequency (2000)
         At one time or another everyone has entertained the idea of
being able to go back and change the past. Usually, these thoughts are
sparked by some kind of regret: "If only I hadn't ordered another
pitcher. . ."; "If only I'd saved my money for tuition instead of buying
that New Kids on the Block box set. . ."; "If only I hadn't moved to
Portage. . ."
 For John Sullivan (Jim Caviezel), the gaping hole in his life
is the absence of his father Frank (Dennis Quaid), a firefighter who
died while battling a blaze 30 years ago. Through a truly cosmic twist
of fate, John gets the opportunity to remedy that, only to learn that
once you start playing with the past, you invariably alter the present
as well.
 That's the premise of "Frequency," a combination
fantasy/tearjerker/thriller with several dizzying twists. It's the first
screenplay of former film industry executive Noah Emmerich, and it all
but overflows with imagination, suspense and big ideas. Ultimately,
Emmerich gets so caught up in his own yarn he writes himself into a
corner, although the flawed finale by no means dampens the rest of the
movie.
 In the same way "The Sixth Sense" managed to be something more
than a spooky horror film, "Frequency" sets itself apart from most
science-fiction by focusing on its human components instead of throwing
a lot of hardware in our faces. If there's no real familial resemblence
between the soft-spoken, dewy-eyed Caviezel (the sensitive,
contemplative soldier in "The Thin Red Line") and the congenial,
devil-may-care Quaid, it's still easy to buy them as father and son
because the actors establish such a wonderful rapport with each other.
Even more impressively, they do this without actually being able to
appear onscreen together: All Caviezel's scenes take place in 1999,
while Quaid's character is still in 1969. They communicate via an old
ham radio set John inherited from Frank.
 As he demonstrated with Edward Norton and Richard Gere in
"Primal Fear," director Gregory Hoblit is not afraid to stand back and
give his performers some room when it's required. Quaid and Caviezel
reward him -- and us -- with thoughtful performances. As realities shift
and relationships change because of John's interference, Hoblit artfully
uses double exposures and slightly blurred images to reflect the
timeline being knocked out of whack.
 The only really objectionable detour in "Frequency" is
Emmerich's inclusion of a plot strand involving a serial killer who
eventually figures prominently in the lives of both heroes. While some
of this is handled innovatively, it eventually overcomplicates an
already tricky storyline and Emmerich is forced to reach into the
reliable old cliche bag to come up with an ending for it. Hoblit adds
insult to injury by slapping a blaring Garth Brooks power-ballad over
top of the final scenes; it's shameless, but it sure isn't "Shameless."
 Those missteps aside, "Frequency" is mostly fun and often
touching. It's surprisingly thought-provoking, too, since it's all but
impossible to leave the theater without asking yourself, "What if I
could reach back in time and save (insert relative or friend of your
choice)?" Maybe he or she could have prevented you from buying that New
Kids collection. James Sanford

Title
Review for Real Blonde, The (1997)
THE REAL BLONDE
Directed by Tom DiCillo
 Early on, it appears "The Real Blonde" might be out to do for struggling
thirtysomething white actors what Robert Townsend's uproarious "Hollywood
Shuffle" (1987) did for struggling twentysomething African-American actors,
namely to use the humiliations they must endure to find work as the
springboard for rich satire. Joe (Matthew Modine) is 35, good-looking and
talented, but he still has no agent, no substantial credits and no idea of
how to talk to casting agents. Hint: Telling them you won't even consider
doing a soap opera because "that's not real acting" is usually a one-way
ticket straight to the exit door. Joe's lofty ideals begin to deflate when
his friend Bob (Maxwell Caulfield) gets a long-term gig on the daytime drama
"Passion Crest" at a staggering $3600 a week, and it isn't long before Joe
is all but begging to be a beach-boy extra in a Madonna video.
 Writer-director Tom DiCillo has a lot more on his mind than Joe's
employment problems, however. DiCillo also wants to explore Bob's carnal
quest to find one real blonde, which involves sleeping his way through a
series of chemically altered models. DiCillo is also intrigued by Joe's
girlfriend Mary (Catherine Keener), a hairdresser with an enormous amount of
pent-up rage stemming from the constant sexual harrassment she's subjected
to on the streets of New York. And just to make sure his movie has enough
plot, DiCillo also throws in the plight of a neighborhood woman who's lost
her dog, the trampy behavior of an egotistical actress (Daryl Hannah) who
becomes Bob's co-star on the set and in the bedroom, a self-defense
instructor (Denis Leary) who tries to put the moves on Mary, a troubled
model (Bridgette Wilson) who claims to find spiritual enlightenment in "The
Little Mermaid," and a Madonna body double (Elizabeth Berkley) who's weary
of having hair the color of buttered popcorn.
 Soon "The Real Blonde" starts to seem more like an extended episode of "The
Real World," as we're asked to care deeply about the woes, jealousies,
inhibitions and fantasies of some fairly shallow people. A few funny lines
pop up along the way and give DiCillo credit for amusingly offbeat
casting -- Marlo Thomas as a Helmut Newton-style fashion photographer is
particularly sharp -- but much of  "Blonde" is just plain dumb. James
Sanford

Title
Review for Battlefield Earth (2000)
        In order to enjoy "Battlefield Earth," you don't necessarily
have to be the kind of person who speaks L. Ron Hubbard's name in hushed
tones and consults "Dianetics" every day. You need only be the kind of
person who'll willingly cough up your money to see a thoroughly
confused, exceptionally stupid action movie featuring a box office name
-- John Travolta, in case you hadn't heard -- who seems to be doing his
best to quickly destroy whatever clout he has with his audience. This is
his pet project, a $75 million sci-fi spectacle that finds him wobbling
around in the highest platform shoes since Elton John played the Pinball
Wizard in "Tommy" and sporting bizarre dreadlocks that make him look
like a cast-off from a reggae band. It's the oddest vanity production
imaginable, one in which the main attraction is nearly impossible to
recognize.
 But Travolta's hammy performance and sorry fashion sense are
the least of the movie's worries. Seemingly there wasn't enough even in
that lavish budget to buy a few decent special effects or to hire
screenwriters who could make a coherent story out of Hubbard's
doorstop-sized novel. Matters are not helped by director Roger
Christian's insistence on shooting almost every scene with a
headache-inducing tilted camera and employing slow-motion and echoing
dialogue, the telling signs of a hack filmmaker.
 Set in the year 3000, "Earth" predicts a world in which humans
are hunted down and enslaved by sinister alien Psychlos, who have
ravaged our planet and forced the few unlucky survivors to hide out in
caves, where they dress in pelts and buckskin, wear wispy little braids
and murmur about the "demons" who haunt the "forbidden land."
 As a rule, science-fiction demands a leap of faith, but
"Battlefield Earth" is so patently absurd only the dimmest audience
members will be able to put up with it. For example, the Psychlos, of
which nine-foot-tall Terl (Travolta) is the leader, spend much of their
time bragging about their superior intellect, yet they're dumb enough to
plop what looks like an overgrown jellyfish on top of their "man-animal"
prisoner Jonnie Goodboy (Barry Pepper, who goes through the entire movie
slack-jawed and wide-eyed) and zap all their secrets into his primitive
brain. Jonnie then goes on to rally his fellow cave-dwellers to revolt
against the giants by stealing Harrier jets and attacking the Psychlos'
domed city.
 Yes, you read correctly: We are treated to the sight of
spear-rattling cavemen jumping into high-tech fighter planes. Even the
infamously tacky filmmaker Ed Wood Jr. never thought of that one.
 Also, despite the fact that the action takes place 1,000 years
from now, somehow such 20th-century relics as Putt-Putt golf courses,
parking ramps and mannequins have managed to remain intact. Ditto the
books in the Library of Congress, where Jonnie stops by for a crash
course on human rights.
 Then, when the humans are forced to mine gold in the Colorado
hills, Terl issues a stern warning that he'll be watching them.
Obviously not very closely, since Jonnie and his crew manage to steal an
aircraft and fly all the way to Fort Knox and back without a hitch.
 We're expected to root for the man-animals to take back control
of the Earth from these extraterrestrial invaders, but there's not a
single interesting character among the bunch. At least the Psychlos have
some personality: Travolta and his sidekick Forrest Whitaker snipe at
each other like they're auditioning for the sci-fi remake of "The
Birdcage."
 About halfway through the film's interminable two hours, you're
bound to grow nostalgic for such other ill-advised star vehicles as
Kevin Costner's "The Postman" and Bruce Willis' "Hudson Hawk." Even
those clunkers were far easier to sit through than this.
 To add a bit of extra campiness to his performance, Travolta
punctuates every third line with a booming theatrical chuckle. Let's see
who's laughing after his fans find out just how abysmal "Battlefield
Earth" truly is. James Sanford

Title
Review for Career Girls (1997)
        Director Mike Leigh's "Career Girls," the follow-up to his
American breakthrough "Secrets & Lies," is a perfect example of his
improvisational style. His method of filmmaking is to give his actors an
idea for a scene --- a starting point --- and to let them run with it.
As a result, Leigh's movies tend to be full of spontaneity and color and
light on narrative drive.
 In "Career Girls," you'd be hard-pressed to find a traditional
plot. It's an aimless but amiable little portrait of two Englishwomen
who lived together for four years during the Eighties and are reunited
for a weekend ten years after their split-up. Back in University days,
Hannah (Katrin Cartlidge) and Annie (Lynda Steadman) had little in
common, aside from a shared love for the music of The Cure and a
fondness for using a copy of Emily Bronte's "Wuthering Heights" as a
sort of oracle for fortelling their futures. The rundown little flat
they shared overtop a Chinese takeaway is far removed from the upscale
condos and luxury apartments Hannah is now shopping for.
 In the initial flashbacks to the women's younger days, it looks
as if Leigh may have let Steadman and Cartlidge run a bit too wild. Plagued
by a serious case of facial determititus, Annie is a twitching bundle of
loose nerves, while Hannah (she insists that it be pronounced "Hah-NAH"
initially) is strident and self-dramatizing. Neither seems like a real
person so much as an actor's exaggerated concept of a character type,
and these early scenes play like sketches lifted from "The Tracey Ullman
Show."
 But as Cartlidge and Steadman find the right levels, "Career Girls"
develops into an insightful meditation on the nature of friendship, as
well as a peek into the psyches of two people who think they've dealt
with the past but have actually only pushed it aside. Both women have
plenty of unresolved issues that seem to keep getting in the way of
their finding true happiness and peace of mind, and each is a bit
envious of the other. The bird-voiced and retiring Annie admires
Hannah's forthrightness and drive; Hannah, who's almost always hiding
behind some sort of a front, confesses, "I'm not strong enough to be as
vulnerable as you."
 The poignancy of moments like that offset the occasional
contrivances that develop late in the film. There's at least one too
many run-ins with faces from the past, and an encounter with a former
flatmate who's now a jabbering derelict goes on far too long after it
makes its point. Leigh is most successful when he simply let Steadman
and Cartlidge work their quiet magic together, without distractions.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Theory of Flight, The (1998)

THE THEORY OF FLIGHT (Fine Line)
Directed by Paul Greengrass
 There's a certain curiosity whenever real-life lovebirds team up onscreen,
and inquiring minds will always want to know if the pairing will sizzle like
Bogart and Bacall, or fizzle like Madonna and Sean Penn. In "The Theory of
Flight," Kenneth Branagh and Helena Bonham Carter generate enough good will
to keep aloft a charming bit of whimsy that probably would crash and burn
with lesser talents at the controls. "Flight" is fluff but the actors,
particularly the spellbinding Carter, give it an aura of elegance.
 Richard Hawkins' screenplay brings eccentric painter/inventor Richard
(Branagh) and wheelchair-bound Jane (Carter) together when Richard is
sentenced to do community service after trying to fly off the top of a
London office building in a homemade glider. As it so happens, the generally
bitter Jane only comes to life when she's on the flying swing ride at the
local amusement park. Though both deny it, they know they're two of a kind.
 Though most of the people around her try to convince her otherwise, Jane
knows she's in the last stages of a muscular deterioration disease, and she
has one very specific last wish she'll need Richard's help to fulfill.
Hawkins' writing is at its best when it addresses the condescending attitude
the public tends to take towards the disabled, a stumbling block that
threatens to keep Jane from achieving her goal. Jane acknowledges that "a
long time ago my body and me separated," but she refuses to have anything to
do with those folks who assume that her often garbled speech implies that
she's losing her mind as well.
 Carter taps into Jane's rebellious passion for life and creates another in
her gallery of striking portraits of unconventional women. This performance
is easily as brave and incisive as her Oscar-nominated turn in last year's
"The Wings of the Dove," as the actress undercuts any possible pathos with a
sly naughtiness and dry wit. When Richard tells her he stopped painting
because he thought he lacked the talent, Jane sneers, "Lack of talent never
stopped anyone."
 "jasanfor"It's also pleasing to see Branagh, free of the tics that infested his
performances in "Celebrity" and "Mary Shelley's Frankenstein," relax into a
role as he does here. It's his most ingratiating work since "Much Ado About
Nothing" and a reminder of what a refreshing presence he can be when he's
not striving to hit some new histrionic high.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Seven Years in Tibet (1997)
SEVEN YEARS IN TIBET
Directed by Jean-Jacques Annaud
Starring Brad Pitt, David Thewlis, Jumyang Wangchuk, B.D. Wong and Lhakpa
Tsamchoe
 Hello Dalai!
 After numerous visits from the Dalai Lama and several high-profile,
celebrity-packed fundraisers for Tibetan freedom-fighters, it was only a
matter of time before Hollywood discovered a way to package Buddhism, and
now the time has come with "Seven Years In Tibet," focusing on the
relationship between Austrian Heinrich Harrer and the young Dalai Lama.
 At least that was the original idea. But with the casting of Brad Pitt as
the controversial Harrer "Seven Years" has become a movie that has a lot
more to do with Pitt's relationship to the audience, as the Dalai Lama,
Tibet and the Chinese occupation are just so much exotic background scenery.
It's not all Pitt's fault: A project like this could never have gotten
backing without a substantial star attached to it, and once you've signed a
major talent you're obligated to use him to get your money's worth.
 And how exactly do you use Pitt? You make sure he has plenty of chances to
flash his blinding smile. You throw in extraneous scenes with a lovely
Tibetan tailor (Lhakpa Tsamchoe) who orders him to strip so that she can
take his measurements. You make sure the lighting crew always surrounds our
man with a soft golden glow that makes his incredibly blond hair glisten.
 What you don't do is ask Pitt to attempt an accent, although he tries
mightily hard to pull one off here. Nor should you ask him to pretend to
look slovenly: Even in the scenes in which Harrer is supposed to look like
he's at death's doorway after struggling through the Himalayas, Pitt's
natural beauty betrays him in the same way Michelle Pfeiffer couldn't
convince anyone she was a plain-Jane in "Frankie & Johnny." (Interestingly,
both "Seven Years" and "Frankie" share the same recurring musical theme,
Debussey's "Clair de Lune.")
 Director Jean-Jacques Annaud's strength is composing gorgeous scenic
vistas---he's best known for movies like "The Bear" and "Quest For
Fire"---so it's hardly a shock that he first half of "Seven Years" is
preoccupied with Harrer's attempt to scale Nanga Parbet, a mountain in the
Himalayas that the Nazis would like Harrer to plant their flag at the summit
of. When that conquest is interrupted by the start of WWII and Harrer and
his partner Peter Aufschnaiter (David Thewlis, another actor with a serious
allergy to accents) are thrown into a prison camp, the story proceeds to
depict their undramatic escape and their flight through Tibet, another
opportunity for Annaud to set up picturesque shots of snow-covered slopes
and rolling green valleys.
 By the start of the film's second hour, the two have sought sanctuary in
the Holy City of Lhasa, home of the Dalai Lama (Jumyang Wangchuk). At this
point, "Seven Years" finally turns into something more than a lush
travelogue: Unfortunately, what it becomes turns out to resemble a
non-musical version of "The King & I," with Harrer educating the Dalai Lama
in the ways of the West and receiving spiritual rejuvenation in return. Most
filmmakers would have seized on this material as a chance to make the
principles of Buddhism accessible to the masses, but Annaud and screenwriter
Becky Johnston seem more interested in oggling the rituals than in trying to
explain their significance. Their view of the Tibetans isn't much more
sophisticated than James Hilton's depiction of the inhabitants of Shangri-La
in "Lost Horizon": They're mostly serene mystics, aside from a scheming
secretary (B.D. Wong) who sells out Tibet to the Chinese invaders.
 "Do you think that someday people will look at Tibet on the movie screen
and wonder what happened to us?" asks the Dalai Lama of Harrer in one of
Johnston's more obvious lines. Thanks to the presence of Pitt, it's not
inconceivable that millions worldwide will indeed flock to "Seven Years" to
learn something about the occupation of Tibet. Unfortunately, this pretty
but shallow primer raises a lot more questions than it can hope to answer.

Title
Review for How Stella Got Her Groove Back (1998)
HOW STELLA GOT HER GROOVE BACK (Twentieth-Century Fox)
Sitting through "How Stella Got Her Groove Back," adapted from the
novel by Terry McMillan, is like listening to the private fantasies of any
number of young women -- black, white, Asian, etc. -- who feel dissatisfied
with their lives but too timid to make major changes. The movie, two hours
of sumptuous-looking wish-fulfillment, should appeal greatly to this
audience, provided they're willing to overlook some substantial problems in
the material.
Stella, the ostensibly grooveless heroine, is played by the
stunning Angela Bassett, who couldn't look out-of-sorts even if she went
without sleep for a week. Although Stella has a prime position as an
investment banker, an almost eerily polite pre-teen son Quincy (Michael J.
Pagan) and a magnificent San Francisco home, she's been sleeping single in a
double bed for many moons. During an impromptu journey to Jamaica with her
ribald best friend Delilah (Whoopi Goldberg), 40-year-old Stella slips into
the arms of the improbably named Winston Shakespeare (Taye Diggs), a
20-year-old dreamboat debating over whether or not to attend medical school.
This is the kind of film that has to go to great lengths to tell us Winston
is very intelligent, since his behavior throughout the story suggests
otherwise.
Although the duo seem to have nothing in common except a penchant
for making love in rooms bathed in the glorious glow of a sunset or doing it
in the shower while warm water outlines their magnificently chieseled
bodies, Stella finds it difficult to walk away from her casual fling,
especially since she returns home to find her gossipy sisters (Regina King
and Suzzanne Douglas) want to speak of nothing else. The age difference
seems to shock most everyone in Stella's circle to no end, although one of
the curious flaws of "Stella" is that Bassett and Diggs don't look like
they're a generation removed from each other; it's not exactly Anne Bancroft
and Dustin Hoffman.
The Jamaica sojourn -- easily the best and most enjoyable portion
of the movie -- gives way to multiple conversations and debates over the
wisdom of pursuing a hot young lover. Winston eventually comes to visit
Stella and ends up spending more time playing video games with Quincy than
seeking out a career. When Stella and Winston go to the movies, they end up
seeing what looks like a sex comedy rather than the more sophisticated
entertainment she prefers, and Stella admits to Delilah Winston has been
messing up the bed with, of all things, Cocoa Puffs.
Is Stella robbing the cradle? Is Winston robbing the grave? Will
the movie ever include a single scene that doesn't feel wholly manufactured?
"Stella" comes straight from the "designer problems" school of
screenwriting, a genre in which stories are built around wealthy, gorgeous
people who have to create their own miseries in order for anything remotely
dramatic to occur. Like designer clothes, these kinds of worries are far
above the means of most of us.
Stella, for example, loses her job even though she appears to be
the only one in her office who ever works and she's certainly the only
African-American woman in the place; can you say "instant lawsuit"? Most of
us, faced with unemployment, would immediately begin a job hunt and avoid
unnecessary expenses. But our gal Stella wings to Jamaica, lives it up,
flies back to the islands again, jumps on a plane to New York at the drop of
a hat, moves Quincy and Winston into the Waldorf, and then hires a limo to
take her home from the airport. Yet she somehow finds time to fret over how
she's going to make next month's mortgage payment as she and Winston dine
out at an elegant-looking bistro.
In the midst of so much glittering cotton candy, Bassett comes
across as a pillar of strength and credibility, even if you can't imagine
such a terrific woman would ever spend a night alone or waste time listening
to the disapproval of friends and family. Diggs has a great smile but
Winston exists primarily as a concept rather than a a character. Goldberg
and King contribute refreshing sass, although Whoopi should think twice
about any future projects that call upon her to die with dewey eyes and a
tremble in her voice.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Romy and Michele's High School Reunion (1997)
             Sagebrush High School Class of 1987 graduates Romy White
(Mira Sorvino) and Michele Weinberger (Lisa Kudrow) share a
dream. Along with everyone else who was ever snubbed by the popular
clique in school, they want to get even.
    So the duo determine to bury their true underachieving
selves and attend their 10-year reunion in Tucson as brilliant
businesswomen who've made a fortune in L.A. After all, says Romy,
``What's the point of going if we're not going to impress people?''
  And so begins ``Romy and Michele's High School Reunion,''
which could just as easily have been called ``Ditzy and Ditzier.''
Friends since their teens, when Romy was chubby and Michele was stuck
in a squeaky neck brace, the two have spent the past decade
clubhopping, working run-of-the-mill jobs and wearing out their video
of ``Pretty Woman.''
  Living large has never been in their picture, but ``we never
had a really good reason like a reunion to motivate us,'' says Romy.
  Now, Romy has decided to go on a fat-free diet: ``nothing
but Gummi Bears, jelly beans and candy corn.'' Michele has made
stylish power-suits on her sewing machine. A Jaguar convertible has
been borrowed for transportation.
  Getting a hot boyfriend to escort them isn't so simple,
however. Romy applies to MTV's ``Singled Out,'' only to be rebuffed by
a production assistant, who sneers, ``Our cut-off age is 25. Try
VH1.'' Lines like that give ``Romy and Michele'' the kind of hip cache
that made ``Clueless'' all the rage two years ago.
  Consumed by the grand delusion that they're much cooler than
they actually are, Romy and Michele could easily have been turned into
self-indulgent culture vultures, but writer Robin Schiff manages to
keep them delightfully quirky.
  After such a portentous build-up, however, the reunion
itself seems a little flat. Most of what you might expect to happen
happens: the one-time dreamboat is now an alcoholic, the class nerd
has struck it rich, etc.  Even with only 91 minutes to fill, Schiff
runs out of plot and has to throw in an overextended fantasy sequence
to keep things going.
  As it is, the movie's best moments are often incidental, as
when Michele goes job-hunting in Beverly Hills or Romy evades a
pick-up artist by hobbling away, telling him ``Excuse me, I cut my
foot earlier and my shoe is filling up with blood.''
  Best of all is a tense argument between the women about
who's the cutest one, or rather who's ``the Mary'' and who's ``the
Rhoda.''
  Much of the comedy's success stems from Sorvino, who proves
her Oscar for ``Mighty Aphrodite'' was not a one-shot triumph. Her
delivery and timing are absolutely impeccable, and Sorvino seems to
empathize with Romy's compulsion to dazzle. ``If anybody needs to make
a call, I've got a phone,'' Romy announces to sarcastic ``A-group''
witches she's trying to impress, completely unaware that the device
lost its ``wow'' factor years ago.
  Kudrow makes the best of Michele, but the character is not
far removed from her TV role as Phoebe on ``Friends,'' and Schiff
shortchanges Michele in the wisecrack department.
  The most acidic quips go to the priceless Janeane Garofalo,
as the endlessly crabby Heather Mooney, who holds a grudge against
Sagebrush High in general and herself in particular. As she proved in
``Reality Bites'' and ``The Truth About Cats and Dogs,'' nobody does
self-loathing better than Garofalo, and her few scenes spark the
picture.
  Like the concurrent reunion-themed ``Grosse Pointe Blank,''
``Romy and Michele'' features a marvelous soundtrack of '80s anthems,
from the Vapors' ``Turning Japanese'' and the Pretenders ``Don't Get
Me Wrong'' to Kenny Loggins' ``Footloose,'' which Romy and Michele
struggle in vain to sing along with.
  Even when the comedy runs out of steam, it's hard to knock
any movie that dares to include not one, but two totally awsome hits
by Bananarama, the Romy and Michele of pop.

Title
Review for Matrix, The (1999)
If you find yourself completely baffled by what's going on at any
given time during "The Matrix," don't be too hard on yourself.  It
appears the Wachowski Brothers, who wrote and directed this lavish
sci-fi thriller, wound up losing track of who's doing what to whom
early on in the game and decided to simply play the rest of this opus
by ear.
Like "Alice in Wonderland," from which it takes an early cue, "The
Matrix" creates its own logic, setting up rules just to break them and
making it clear that the one thing you can count on in this tale is
that you can't count on anything.
The erratic plotting would be a built-in turn-off in most movies, but
the Wachowskis manage to somehow turn chaos into an always intriguing,
frequently nightmarish look into the dismal future. The Wachowskis'
"Bound," a tense study of a deadly love triangle, quickly became an
acclaimed cult film when it was released in 1996, and "The Matrix"
seems certain to follow a similar course.
Perhaps the most impressive thing about "The Matrix" is the
Wachowskis' handling of Keanu Reeves, an actor who has lately bombed
hard in roles outside of his patented Valley Boy/wastoid niche.
Anyone who suffered through "Johnny Mnemonic" or "Chain Reaction"
probably won't be exactly geeked about the prospect of seeing Reeves
in action again.
And yet, his flat-toned voice and blank-slate face actually work to
his advantage as Neo Anderson, who's the only man on Earth capable of
destroying the Matrix, a computer-generated dreamworld controlled by
emotionless Agents, themselves the outgrowths of artificial
intelligence run amok. Assisting Neo in his mission are the
inscrutable Morpheus (Laurence Fishburne), the unsteady Cypher (Joe
Pantoliano) and Trinity (Carrie-Anne Moss), a lithe beauty whose body
ought to be classified as a lethal weapon.
The action sequences which make up easily 80 percent of the movie are
spectacularly well-executed, combining kung fu and jujitsu moves with
time and space trickery that allows the fighters to hang in mid-air,
run up walls and freeze flying bullets before they reach their
targets.
"The Matrix" also includes some truly amazing visions of the world 200
years from now, including fields of cocooned human fetuses ready to be
harvested by towering robots, and fleets of Sentinels, electronic
monsters that look like neon-tinged jellyfish.
But what truly sets "The Matrix" apart from other exercises in style,
such as "Dark City" and "Blade" are the bursts of wit that keep
popping up: having the infamous monster movie "Night of the Lepus"
playing on TV some 200 years in the future, or showing us an
all-knowing oracle who lives not in a temple or a palace, but in a
run-down apartment where she bakes cookies in between predictions.
And, unlike "Dark" and "Blade," which lost their impetus after strong
starts, "The Matrix" actually picks up steam as it goes along. Who
cares if it never makes much sense? At least it's not dull.

Title
Review for As Good As It Gets (1997)

AS GOOD AS IT GETS
(Tri-Star)
 "How do you write women so beautifully?" a gushing fan asks romance
novelist Melvin Udall (Jack Nicholson). "I think of a man," the scribe
replies, "and take away reason and accountability." That's one of the
gentler put-downs dispensed by this acid-tongued obsessive-compulsive, a
walking testament to the power of negative thinking, and in the mouth of
anyone but Nicholson such crude remarks would probably have been horrifying
rather than humorous.
 The miracle of "As Good As It Gets" lies in how writer-director James
Brooks delicately balances the tone of the picture between comedy and
pathos, an accomplishment that's truly astonishing, given the film's
138-minute running time. But Brooks' deft touch won't surprise those who
remember the skill he demonstrated in his Oscar-winning "Terms of
Endearment" (1983) and Oscar-nominated "Broadcast News" (1987): "As Good"
marks a smashing return-to-form.
 Several intertwining stories make up the movie's core. Early on, it appears
this will be a raucous farce about Melvin and his feud with a gay neighbor
named Simon (Greg Kinnear), a painter whose scuffy little dog irritates
Melvin to no end. But then the focus shifts to the cheerfully abrasive
relationship between Melvin and put-upon waitress Carol (Helen Hunt), the
only server in Melvin's favorite cafe who can stand him long enough to take
his order. Before long we're introduced to Carol's backstory, involving
rotten dates and a sickly son. Where is this movie going?
 Just sit back and savor the ride. Rest assured that eventually the various
strands will come together, and "As Good As It Gets" will emerge as a
sensational comedy that manages to celebrate life while at the same time
laughing at its strange twists of fate. The cast is pure magic: Nicholson,
in one of his most fully rounded performances in years, creates one of the
year's most memorable characters, but Hunt and Kinnear (who does a
magnificent Nicholson impersonation at one point) are equally fine in
less-showy parts. And Jill, the adorably ugly canine star, deserves credit
for her contribution to the film's success.
 While the holidays are often a time when consumers fall victim to the
inflated claims and hyperactive hype of advertisers, anyone buying a ticket
to "As Good As It Gets" can take comfort in knowing that, in this case, the
title doesn't lie.

Title
Review for Life and Times of Hank Greenberg, The (1998)
         While attending the University of Michigan, filmmaker Aviva
Kempner worked as a cashier, selling movie tickets at the Michigan
Theatre in downtown Ann Arbor. Recently her name reappeared at the
Michigan, although this time it was on the screen: Her documentary "The
Life and Times of Hank Greenberg" played there last month.
 The movie, a fond look back at former Detroit Tiger star
"Hammerin' Hank," is the product of 13 years of research, writing and
fundraising, which Kempner said was inspired by her family.
 "I grew up in Detroit and I grew up a big Tigers fan," Kempner recalled
in a phone interview from her office in Washington, D.C. "My father
would take my brother and I to games all the time, and hence, I became a
Hank Greenberg fan.
 "(In 1986) when I heard Hank Greenberg had died, I knew I had
to make this film, because he was always my daddy's hero. My father had
always taught us that prejudice doesn't belong on the field or in
society, so for me, Hank Greenberg seemed an unsung hero, someone I had
to do a film about."
 But Kempner's movie is not for baseball fanatics only.
"Greenberg" paints a vivid portrait of America in the first half of the
century, a world in which many different cultures and nationalities sat
uneasily side by side in big cities such as Detroit, New York and St.
Louis. Prior to WWII, ethnic and racial slurs that would get you booted
out of a ballpark today were regularly shouted and chanted by crowds,
which meant the Jewish Greenberg had to endure all sorts of demeaning
nicknames. Yet that didn't discourage him from playing.
 "That Hank went to work every day, with all that catcalling,
and still performed, that's one of the things that makes him a real role
model for people," Kempner explained. "How many of us would have done
the same? I have such respect for the man because of it."
 Kempner, a child of Holocaust survivors, said she wanted to
make a film to help shatter the stereotype of Jewish men as "nebbishs,"
weak-willed types who are easily pushed around by everyone else.
Greenberg was well aware he was someone the Jewish community (and not a
few Gentiles as well) looked up to, and he did his best to behave
accordingly. In these times when sports figures such as John Rocker and
Dennis Rodman flaunt their bad-boy reputations, it's mildly startling to
see a man who went out of his way to put forth a positive image for his
fans. Kempner's film reveals Greenberg as someone who took his faith
quite seriously as well and actually sought advice from rabbis about
whether or not he should play on Yom Kippur.
 The most difficult part of putting the project together was
"sustaining it for so many years until it was done, keeping the faith
that I would eventually finish it," said Kempner. "I feel bad for two
things: that a lot of the people in the film, the fans and the players,
didn't live to see themselves; and two, if I'd raised the money a year
ago, maybe the film could have influenced the voting for the All-Century
Team (Greenberg was not included on that list)."
 Although the movie is finished and has earned honors at the
Hamptons International Film Festival and the International Sports Video
and Film Awards, Kempner said she's still trying to get a little more
money put together to cover the rights on the music used in the film.
She's particularly grateful for a contribution from the Kellogg
Foundation and joked, in her best Blanche DuBois accent, "I have always
depended upon the kindness of strangers."
 Kempner, who previously chronicled the Jewish resistance
movement in her 1986 documentary "Partisans of Vilna," was hesitant to
give many details on her next project, but she did allow it will
probably be another sports story, perhaps looking at a Jewish hockey
player she declined to name.
 "Telling our history is an important vehicle in making sure the
prejudice doesn't happen in society," Kempner said. "That's why I do
it." James Sanford

Title
Review for Species II (1998)
        Sex equals death. That's the cardinal rule of slasher movies,
and it's in full effect in ``Species II,'' a worthless follow-up to
the 1995 hit, which was notable primarily for the presence of the
decidedly uninhibited Natasha Henstridge as an alien preying on the
men of Earth.
Like the similarly ill-advised ``Grease 2,'' ``Species II''
uses the old sex-role reversal ploy to get its plot going. This time,
the monster is male, an airheaded astronaut named Patrick Ross (Justin
Lazard) who ends up infected with extraterrestrial DNA after strolling
around on Mars. When Patrick whines about not feeling well, his
politico father (James Cromwell, slumming) grouches, ``You think a
trip to Mars was rough - try a Senate campaign!''
So what's Patrick to do but pick up scores of easy ladies and
attempt to impregnate them with his otherworldly essence? Though
considered a real looker by most of the females in his circle, Pat
turns out to be considerably less attractive when he sprouts long,
slimy gray tentacles during love-making.
Meanwhile back at the lab, crusading Dr. Laura Baker (Marg
Helgenberger) has managed to create a docile knockout she calls Eve
(Henstridge) from the genes of Sil, the troublemaker from the first
film. Why Baker bothered to do this is never made clear, but
eventually Eve picks up on Patrick's scent, goes into heat and escapes
to find him. Wedding bells do not follow.  Henstridge fans will be
disappointed to learn her part in ``Species II'' is minimal and
requires her to remain fully dressed almost all of the time.
Since most of the film's running time is taken up with scenes
of exploding stomachs and splattering heads, we never find out how
Patrick manages to dress and feed his scores of humanoid offspring,
why a smart actor like Mykelti Williamson took the demeaning role of
Patrick's sex-crazed buddy, or why, despite his enormous celebrity,
only one woman in the entire vicinity of the Washington, D.C., area
seems to recognize Patrick.
It's disappointing to see a skilled director like Peter Medak
- who made ``The Krays'' and ``Let Him Have It,'' two of the best
British films of the decade - wasting his time on this kind of tripe,
although it should be noted he does give it some semblance of
professionalism. The digital soundtrack is also highly effective, with
each squish and crunch coming through loud and clear.
But what can be said about a movie that focuses largely on the
struggle of government agents to keep ex-astronauts from having sex?
Leave it to Dr.  Baker: ``It's awful,'' she moans, prior to the
slime-drenched finale.  ``Just awful!''

Title
Review for Misérables, Les (1998)
Given all the liberties Hollywood has taken with the classics lately -
spicing up "The Man In The Iron Mask" with scatological jokes; a "Romeo &
Juliet" boasting a disco-belting drag queen; Indian attacks and a happy
ending for Hester Prynne in the Demi Moore version of "The Scarlet Letter,"
etc. - it comes as a surprise to see director Bille August offering up a
perfectly straightforward and decidedly non-musical version of "Les
Miserables."
After all, the last Victor Hugo book to make it to the big screen was "The
Hunchback of Notre Dame," overhauled as a Disney animated spectacular
featuring singing gargoyles.
While therešs something to be said for reverence, nobody said it had to come
at the expense of passion or imagination, and, sadly, "Miserables" comes up
short in both those departments.
Aside from being shot on somewhat stagy-looking sets and with sometimes
inappropriate lighting levels, therešs nothing glaringly wrong with Augustšs
film, and several of the performances are terrific. Why then does it seem
about as engaging as a well-written book report?
Itšs tempting to put the blame on August himself. Since his Oscar-winning
"Pelle the Conqueror," August has floundered, directing the dismal "House of
the Spirits," which somehow managed to squander the talents of Meryl Streep,
Glenn Close, Jeremy Irons and Winona Ryder, and "Smillašs Sense of Snow," a
silly attempt to film the complex best-seller. By the low standards set by
that pair, "Les Miserables" looks almost like a comeback.
In paring down Hugošs epic melodrama to its basics, screenwriter Rafael
Yglesias has chosen to focus on the novelšs mid-section, beginning with the
parole of Jean Valjean (Liam Neeson) after two decades of serving hard time
in the quarries for stealing bread. In later years Valjean will end up as
mayor of the village of Vigau, where he oversees a tile factory.
One of his workers is Fantine (Uma Thurman), a young beauty struggling to
make ends meet. When itšs revealed that the unmarried Fantine has had a
baby, Valjeanšs underlings fire her, sending her on a downward spiral into
prostitution and poverty.
Around the same time, Vigau gets a new prefect of police in the person of
Javert (Geoffrey Rush), formerly a guard in the prison where Valjean was
incarcerated. Javert eventually recognizes Valjean and does everything he
can to ruin the lives of Valjean, Fantine - who Valjean tries to help - and
later Fantinešs child Cosette (Claire Danes), who Valjean adopts.
"Reform is a discredited fantasy," Javert tells his partners when they try
to suggest Valjeanšs nature has changed over the years. "People are either
law-abiders or law-breakers." The always subtle and detail-oriented Neeson
reads Valjean as a brute trying to reclaim his humanity, while Rush plays up
Javertšs cold detachment from the same world Valjean is reaching out to.
Both actors are outstanding.
Thurman strains to deglamorize herself, but even when shešs coughing up
blood at deathšs door she canšt help looking seductive. Still, shešs a
sympathetic Fantine, and Danes, despite a sometimes wavering accent,
sparkles as the noble, devoted Cosette.
If only the director had the same commitment to the material as his cast.
Unfortunately, Augustšs mind seems to have been elsewhere, which accounts
for why "Les Miserables" often has a perfunctory feel, as if August was
satisfied with footage that was just good enough, instead of making the
extra effort required to achieve something truly great and memorable.

Title
Review for Almost Heroes (1998)
John Belushi's last film was a failed satire called "Neighbors." The deadly
duo "Wagons East" and "Canadian Bacon" were John Candy's final efforts. Now,
Chris Farley continues the tradition of corpulent comedians leaving a lame
comedy as their legacy with "Almost Heroes," a sloppily made period piece
that's collected plenty of dust in the Warner Brothers' vault since it was
completed more than a year ago.
So much for "always leave 'em laughing."
Had Farley known he only had one more film to make, it's hard to believe he
would have picked this to be his swan song. Directed by Christopher Guest
without so much as an iota of the comic invention and energy he brought to
"Waiting For Guffman" and "The Big Picture," "Heroes" is an odd send-up of
the Lewis and Clark expedition of 1804; perhaps screenwriters Mark Nutter,
Tom Wolfe and Boyd Hale were inspired by the Ken Burns PBS series.
Like many films that studios would prefer to sweep under the carpet,
"Heroes" has a cheapish look to it and shows signs of having been truncated
in the editing room. Many scenes end abruptly with no punchline or
resolution, and others appear to have been clumsily pasted together, with a
surplus of reaction shots to cover up gaps in continuity.
Farley is typically boisterous as folksy trailblazer Bartholomew Hunt, who
teams up with genteel explorer Leslie Edwards (Matthew Perry) in a race to
beat Lewis and Clark to the Pacific Ocean. "Fear will be our breakfast and
stark, raving terror our lunch," Edwards promises.
Along the way, Hunt, Edwards and their band of misfits run afoul of placid
Indians, bad-tempered bears, an old coot who keeps a brothel full of
scarecrows, and a Spanish conquistador with a mane Fabio would envy. What
they don't discover is anything particularly humorous.
Although both Farley and Perry mug excessively in an attempt to tweak the
dullish material, it's mostly in vain. Occassional sparks fly between the
two, but "Heroes" ultimately does little to further Perry's screen career or
enhance Farley's memory.
James Sanford

Title
Review for G.I. Jane (1997)
        Demi Moore has had an incredible streak of bad luck lately.
Millions steered clear of her ribald vision of ``The Scarlet Letter''
and her tepid would-be thriller ``The Juror,'' and while her paycheck
for ``Striptease'' made her the Twelve Million Dollar Woman, her
performance made her the butt of a lot of scalding jokes.
  But Demi is eager to repent, and she's willing to give her
blood, sweat and tears - quite literally - for one more
chance. ``G.I. Jane'' offers her the opportunity to do all that and
more: She even sheds her hair in an amazing on-camera head-shaving,
sure to be one of the year's most talked-about movie moments.
  ``G.I. Jane'' casts Moore as Jordan O'Neil, an intelligence
officer who becomes the first woman to train as a Navy Seal. The title
refers to a nickname applied to O'Neil by the press as she undergoes a
grueling regimen that includes pushing tanks up sand hills in Sisyphus
fashion, being tortured in a simulated prison camp, and digging her
dinner out of a garbage can.
  Dramatically, the picture is strictly by-the-book, and
occasionally it teeters on the brink of self-parody, as stogie-gnawing
officers plot against human dynamo Jordan. But, like the similarly
over-the-top ``Face/Off,'' ``G.I. Jane'' has been directed with such
finesse and infused with so much star power the movie works, almost in
spite of itself.
  Director Ridley Scott (``Alien,'' ``Blade Runner'') lends
his customary striking visual sense to the proceedings: Even when
Jordan is battered and bleeding in the rain, Scott makes her look like
a portrait of gutsiness rather than a victimized mess. Scott's imagery
is beautifully underscored by sterling new songs from the Pretenders,
and it's typical of the film's canniness that Jordan's private moments
of self-doubt are accompanied by music from rock 'n' roll survivor
Chryssie Hynde, who could probably tell Jordan a thing or two about
trying to carve out your niche in a man's world.
  Moore's typically prickly demeanor, often cited by her
detractors as her biggest liability as an actress, actually works to
her advantage here, as she unearths the voracious ambition in Jordan's
soul. It's easy to see this role as a mirror image of the actress
herself, a similarly driven woman who's said to work out several hours
a day. If you don't believe those reports, check out the frightening
ease with which Moore executes one-armed push-ups and suspended
sit-ups.
  The screenplay by David Twohy and Danielle Alexandra makes
Jordan into a kind of Everywoman that's difficult not to root
for. Jordan's habit of boldly standing up to her superiors may not be
credible, but it gives the audience several opportunities to cheer her
on as she challenges sadistic Master Chief Urgayle (Viggo Mortensen)
and a manipulative Texas politico (a campy Anne Bancroft) who betrays
her.
  Even as the film turns into an action extravaganza in the
final stretch, Scott keeps his heroine solidly in the
forefront. ``G.I. Jane'' is first and foremost a star vehicle and,
thanks to Moore's astounding chutzpah, it's an entertaining one.

Title
Review for Pecker (1998)
PECKER (New Line)
Directed by John Waters
 Once renowned as the man behind such cinematic atrocies as "Pink Flamingos"
and "Female Trouble," writer-director John Waters has gradually eased into
the mainstream during the past decade, first with his 1988 "Hairspray," the
movie that brought Ricki Lake to prominence, and then with the lavish 1990
musical "Cry Baby," showcasing Johnny Depp, a film that plays like an
acid-soaked "Grease." Most recently, Waters gave Kathleen Turner her best
role in ages when he cast the femme fatale as the title character in 1994's
"Serial Mom," the story of a housewife who resorts to murder to solve her
domestic troubles. Fans of "Flamingos" will probably gripe that "Pecker" is
diluted Waters, but there's more than enough disturbing behavior and
off-the-wall satire here to shock the faint-of-heart and delight those who
enjoy the director's quirky sense of fun.
 Despite the pornographic-sounding title, "Pecker" is no skin flick. It
does, however, manage to detail exactly what is involved in what male
dancers call "teabagging," and to include the only voting booth sex scene in
any film in recent memory. The action is underscored by songs by such 1950s
novelty acts as The Nutty Squirrels and The Henhouse Five Plus One, which
should give you an idea of how seriously the author takes his material.
 In his short career, Edward Furlong has been known to suffer from the Daryl
Hannah Syndrome: He's only as strong as his director. Working with a James
Cameron in "Terminator 2" or Tony Kaye in "American History X," Furlong can
excel; under lesser talents, he generally flounders. Waters knows how to
bring out Furlong's goofy/grungy appeal -- here, Furlong has the silly grin
and wobbly voice of a little boy who managed to break into Daddy's liquor
cabinet -- and the character of Pecker, a happy-go-lucky amateur
photographer who is literally an overnight sensation among the culture
vultures of New York's art scene, seems tailor-made for the actor.
 Waters has also handed juicy parts to Christina Ricci, who's divinely sour
as Shelly, a laundromat manager who treats stains and customers with equal
severity, and Martha Plimpton, a solid riot as Pecker's sister Tina who
operates a bar specializing in "trade" dancers and who almost dies of grief
when a burglar makes off with her prized Liza Minnelli CDs. Brendan Sexton
III, best known as the scuzzy delinquent of "Welcome to the Dollhouse," is
utterly charming and quite funny as shoplifting ace Matt, Pecker's best
friend.
 In terms of its content, "Pecker" breaks little new ground in Waters'
world. It's set in and around Baltimore -- his locale of choice -- and
involves class clashes (as in "Hairspray" and "Cry Baby"), unsavory
businesses (like "Polyester") and slightly twisted but kindly folk, such as
Pecker's mom (Mary Kay Place), who runs a thrift store that puts
streetpeople into colorful new outfits. There are also a few gross-out
moments along the way, most of them involving either food or vermin.
Although "Pecker" rarely hits the comic heights of Waters' best films (his
movies just haven't had the same zing since the passing of his premiere
leading lady Divine in 1988) and it will do nothing to convert those who
abhor Walters and what he represents, it's a solid example of the director's
rude but good-natured style.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Black and White (1999)
         Director James Toback fancies himself a provocateur, and from
the very first scene it's obvious he intends "Black and White" to be a
startling expose of what happens when white teens try to impress the
gangsta rappers they adore. The film opens with rich kid Charlie (Bijou
Phillips) engaged in a tryst with another young woman and Rich (Wu-Tang
Clan's Oli "Power" Grant), a thug who dreams of becoming a music
industry mogul.
 What does Charlie want? She doesn't appear to know -- "I wanna
be black," she bleats when the question is asked -- and certainly
Toback, who also wrote this weird mess, hasn't got a clue. Maybe it's a
bout of adolescent rebellion, maybe it's her idea of true love, or maybe
she's just trying to fit in with her trendy friends.
 At any rate, Charlie's not the only character in "Black and
White" who seems unbalanced. Toback also trots out an airheaded
documentary filmmaker named Sam (Brooke Shields) who's in denial about
her flagrantly gay husband Terry (Robert Downey Jr.); Will (William Lee
Scott), the son of a district attorney who's thrown away his life of
privilege to work as an errand boy for Rich and his crew; Dean (Allen
Houston), who dreams of glory in the NBA but seems to take all of two
seconds to decide whether or not he wants to throw a college basketball
game for $50,000; and Greta (Claudia Schiffer), an anthropology student
who behaves like some kind of double-agent as she betrays all the men in
her life.
 None of these people is remotely likable or particularly
interesting, and only Scott attempts to make his character in any way
credible. Downey flounces around irritatingly, Shields does a lot of
squawking, and the real-life rappers Toback has brought on board to play
Rich's friends seem baffled by the director's free-form style, which
requires everyone to come up with their own dialogue while the camera is
rolling. Realizing viewers can only take so much bad improv before they
tune out entirely, Toback throws in a few gratuitous sex scenes and a
cameo appearance by a dazed Mike Tyson, who must fend off propositions
from both Sam and Terry. "No one ever expressed to me that I was
gorgeous or anything," Tyson blushes before turning down the offers.
 Although he wrote a justifiably acclaimed script for Warren
Beatty and Annette Bening's "Bugsy," Toback has never had much luck as a
filmmaker. Perhaps you remember "The Pick-Up Artist," the movie that
single-handedly killed Molly Ringwald's career? That was another Toback
production. "Black and White," for all its arty pretensions and supposed
shock value, doesn't break his losing streak. James Sanford

Title
Review for Flawless (1999)
         Somewhere in the messy, laughably titled "Flawless" is a
potentially fine character study about prejudice and the price we pay
for sex. But Joel Schumacher's script (which he also directed) is a
rhinestone in the rough, a piece of junk jewelry even Robert DeNiro and
Philip Seymour Hoffman can't make sparkle.
 Heaven knows they try, though. As Rusty, a drag queen who badly
wants to be surgically transformed into "a real woman," Hoffman huffs
and puffs and sometimes blows everyone else off the screen, as if he's
certain he can somehow turn this shabby stick figure of a character into
Mama Cass. DeNiro can't even hope to compete. He's playing Walter, a
stroke victim with partially paralyzed vocal cords who seeks out
loud-mouth Rusty for therapeutic singing lessons. Since Walter is a
hard-boiled homophobe, of course the match-up is a disaster waiting to
happen.
 To further complicate matters, Schumacher has tossed in some of
Walter's macho cop buddies, a cold-hearted "dancer" with eyes for
Walter's wallet, a beautiful love-starved mouse (Daphne Rubin-Vega) and
a passel of aggressively outrageous friends of Rusty's, most of whom
spend their days shrieking out old Sylvester anthems and smacking their
heavily glossed lips over the sight of the stud who works in the
neighborhood pizza parlor.
 All these mini-dramas prove to be irritating distractions, like
gnats buzzing around your ears. But even that's not enough -- as a
screenwriter, Schumacher can't say 'no' -- so every 15 minutes or so
"Flawless" cuts away from the stormy Rusty/Walter relationship to a
completely incongruous subplot about stolen drug money and murdered
hookers.
 But don't put your feet up yet: You've still got to sort
through episodes showing masochistic Rusty being battered by a cruel
boyfriend, scattered jabs at gay Republicans and running jokes involving
elderly ladies who can't comprehend why some men like to wear thigh-high
boots and boas. No wonder the story's message ultimately gets twisted
along the way and inadvertently links being gay with having a physical
disability. Good luck selling that theory to the local chapter of
ACT-UP, Mr. Schumacher.
 The movie would be a thorough waste of time were it not for a
handful of DeNiro and Hoffman's scenes together in which the actors cut
through Schumacher's silly yarn and try to simply let Walter and Rusty
communicate as human beings, rather than as archetypes. Those moments
far outclass everything else in the film, and it's conceivable
"Flawless" could make an intriguing one-act play if Schumacher bothered
to strip away all the ridiculous frills covering up his central theme.
In the world of drag, fussiness can be an asset; in screenwriting, it's
a major liability. James Sanford

Title
Review for Rocket Man (1997)
         Too bad Hollywood can't just find a way to clone Jim Carrey.
That would save the rest of us from the long line of Carrey wannabes
who've tried to get their own piece of the action.
  The latest pretender to Carrey's porcelain throne is Harland
Williams, who seems to fancy himself as a cross between Pee Wee Herman
and a geekier John Cusack, and the best that can be said about his
performance in ``RocketMan'' is that it's not consistently irritating,
just frequently irritating. With a better vehicle, who knows? He might
end up being just occasionally irritating.
  ``RocketMan'' could prove to be a real side-splitter for
little boys under the age of 12 or for their bigger brothers, provided
they have a blood-alcohol level of .12.
  No doubt the screenwriters used their best crayons to
scribble down this yarn about a doofus computer programmer named Fred
Randall (Williams) who, through a remarkably flimsy and inane set of
circumstances, winds up being picked to join an expedition heading to
Mars. The rest of the crew includes skeptical veteran astronaut Bill
Overbeck (William Sadler) and a chimpanzee named Ulysses who seems to
be onboard solely to complicate Fred's life and to react to his
oh-so-zany shenanigans, which include hanging his boxer shorts in
place of the American flag on the surface of Mars and coercing
everyone on Earth to join him in singing ``He's Got The Whole World In
His Hands.''
  Actually, Fred seems to burst into song quite regularly and
never quite tunefully. When he's not warbling a tune, you can rest
assured he's making a mess of the mission, accidentally serving
hemorrhoid cream for dinner and literally bouncing off the walls when
he's locked out of his ``hypersleep chamber.'' He also passes gas into
Bill's spacesuit in a scene that climaxes - like many of Fred's
foul-ups - with the lovable nerd squealing ``It wasn't me!''
  To be fair, there are a few bright bits in ``RocketMan,''
scattered through the story like a handful of diamonds at the garbage
dump. And the movie gains a wee bit of an edge for having the audacity
to cast Sadler as something other than a psychopathic killer. More
often than not the jokes fall flat, but director Stuart Gilland at
least manages to keep the film moving along.
  With this past summer's Mars mania, this would seem an
opportune time for another movie revolving around the space
program. But in the end, the only thing ``RocketMan'' has in common
with ``Contact'' is that they're both in color.

Title
Review for Phantoms (1998)
PHANTOMS(Miramax)
 Author Dean Koontz got a lot of press three years ago when he roundly
bashed the screen adaptation of his best-seller "Hideaway," and his
criticisms were justified: "Hideaway" was a lurid mess that squandered
the talents of Jeff Goldblum and Alicia Silverstone. But before someone
hires Koontz as a film critic, let it be noted that he's gone on the
record praising the filmization of  his novel "Phantoms," a movie so
dull and mechanical it makes "Hideaway" look like "Silence of the
Lambs." Combining all the worst tendencies of contemporary horror films
into one slimy package, "Phantoms" isn't even an effective gross-out,
with some of the most un-special effects to soil the screen in a long,
long time.
 The real horror here is Koontz's pathetic dialogue ("Are you okay, 'cuz
I need you to be okay, alright?" is one of his more inspired lines) and
illogical story. "Phantoms" starts off like that classic "Twilight Zone"
episode in which a man wandered through an empty town and kept finding
evidence that someone had just been there, even though he couldn't see
or hear any other people. But Koontz isn't interested in mystery, he
wants to peddle gratuitous gore and highfalutin hoodoo about
soul-sapping demons who periodically visit the Earth to digest everyone
in a remote, isolated area, be it the Roanoke Colony in 16th-century
Virginia, the ancient Mayan cities, or, in this case, everyone in sleepy
Snowfield, a hamlet in the Rockies.
 When sisters Lisa (Rose McGowan) and Jennifer (Joanna Going) realize
they're the only ones left in town, they don't go on a looting spree in
the business district. They go looking for trouble instead, stumbling
upon several decapitated bodies and gruesome remains in the process.
Sheriff Hammond (Ben Affleck) and his weirdo deputy Stu (Liev Schreiber)
show up to help investigate the mystery, which grows more tedious --and
ridiculous-- by the minute. Frequently, our heroes receive phone calls
from the evil  forces; it's a sad sight to see gifted actors like
Affleck and Going standing around and trying their best to look
terrified by what sounds like a malfunctioning car wash. A
ghastly-looking Peter O'Toole also shows up to embarass himself as a
scholar-turned-tabloid-journalist who makes such dramatic prouncements
as "It's chaos! Chaos in the flesh!" while struggling stay on his feet
during his scenes.
 Some comedies are so funny you forget to laugh; "Phantoms" is so scary
you'll forget to scream. You will, however, do a lot of yawning and
perhaps some unintended giggling before the pointless, badly staged
finale in which the "Ancient Enemy" that everyone's been babbling about
for the past hour and a half reveals itself  to be little more than an
oversized version of the old Ajax "White Tornado." The appropriate
response to "Phantoms" is a long, loud "Boooooo!".

Title
Review for Santa Claus Conquers the Martians (1964)
 If you're looking for something that really scrapes the bottom
of the Christmas barrel, you could scarcely do worse than the immortal
"Santa Claus Conquers the Martians" (1964), which used to pollute
neighborhood theaters annually as a kiddie matinee during the 1960s. I
was among the millions of innocent kids taken to see this when I was a
toddler, and it's a miracle I ever set foot in a theater again.
 "Martians" tells a warped tale of lonely Martian youth who seem
to be growing up in the Valley of the Dolls. All their meals come in
pill form and "sleep spray" is used to help them get their rest. When
the young ones appear even more lifeless than usual, Kimar (Leonard
Hicks, who intones each line with such seriousness you'd think he was
doing Shakespeare), the Martian leader, embarks on a trip to Earth to
kidnap Santa Claus (John Call, who staggers around as if Santa has been
chugging a little too much pre-holiday eggnog).
 A trip to another world would probably be a welcome change of
season for Santa, since Mrs. Claus comes off as an old scold ("Go finish
painting those hobby horses!" she barks at Santa), while Santa himself
seems a bit, shall we say, out of it, promising a TV reporter he'll be
using his reindeer "Prancer, and Dancer, and Donder, and Blitzen, and
Vixen and Nixon" to make the annual deliveries. "Wowee wow!" the
intrepid journalist responds.
 Santa is eventually spirited away to Mars, along with Earth
kids Betty and Billy, who sound like they came straight outta Newark. In
her film debut, Pia Zadora plays a cute little Martian girl with the
same vacant stare and expressionless line readings that would become her
trademark in her performances as the world's most vapid sex kitten in
movies like "Butterfly" and the infamous "The Lonely Lady."
 Although the title would seem to promise a rousing battle
between Saint Nick and the space invaders, excitement turns out to be in
short supply. Santa eventually "conquers" Mars by teaching everyone
Christmas carols and opening a toy factory on the Red Planet. There's
also a disturbingly perky theme song, "Hooray For Santa Claus," which
goes "Hoo-ray for Santy Claus/Yea yea for Santy Claus/. . .When we hear
sleigh bells ring/Our hearts go ting-a-ling!" Oh yeah, I got your
ting-a-ling right here, buddy. . .
 It's all about as heartwarming as a documentary about
reconstructive bowel surgery, a procedure you may need should you choose
to sit through all 82 minutes of "Santa Claus Conquers the Martians."
James Sanford

Title
Review for Love Letter, The (1999)
 There's one in every fiction workshop in college: the divorced mom
who's come back to school after 20 years to take some classes to help
her get started on her novel, which, as fate would have it, turns out to
be about a divorced mom who comes back to school after 20 years, wows
her fellow classmates, catches the eye of a hunky young professor and,
most importantly turns out a truly brilliant novel.
 Give one of these aspiring authors half a chance and she might turn out
something like "The Love Letter," a flaccid romantic comedy that proves
once and for all that (a) Kate Capshaw lacks the charisma to carry a
film on her own; (b) Tom Selleck should seriously consider setting up
"Magnum P.I. '99" instead of continuing to try to pass himself off as a
leading man on the big screen; and (c) it's time for Ellen DeGeneres to
finally move beyond the wink-wink lesbian jokes.
 Intended as an ode to the power of words, "Letter" is rarely worth
listening to, let alone watching, and matters aren't helped by
slice-and-dice editing that sometimes makes you wonder if the camera
started rolling in mid-scene or shut off before director Peter Ho-San
Chan called "cut." After awhile, the movie's utter lack of continuity
becomes much funnier than any of its attempts at humor.
 "Letter" is set in Loblolly By-The-Sea, the kind of provincial New
England town that exists only in lousy movies, a place where everyone is
intimately familiar with the plot of "Tosca," the local cinema runs a
Buster Keaton festival and the divorcee owner of a used book store can
somehow afford a sprawling mansion full of antiques. The divorcee in
question is Helen (Capshaw) who's managed to make it to her 40s while
still retaining the self-conscious tics of a schoolgirl. She's forever
tugging at her turtlenecks, wiping her nose with her hand and scurrying
mouse-like from room to room. For reasons known only to screenwriter
Maria Maggenti, most of the Loblolly men find this kind of behavior
irresistibly sexy, and when Helen comes across an anonymous love letter
brimming with passionate prose, she can't imagine which of her bashful
admirers might have sent it.
 Or perhaps -- since the letter had no addressee -- it was meant for
Helen's co-worker Janet (DeGeneres), a good-time gal who'd love to
kindle some flames with fireman George (Selleck). But George is hot for
Helen, who's somehow certain college student Johnny (Tom Everett Scott)
is her secret Romeo. The May-September affair that develops between
Helen and Johnny is a fairly interesting plot development -- especially
since Scott is by far the least irritating member of the cast -- but
Maggenti doesn't seem to have any idea what to do with it.
 So "Letter" soon drops that story thread in favor of giving us entirely
too much information about Helen mom's (Blythe Danner) and Grandma
(Gloria Stuart), both of whom are introduced with a burst of piccolo
music so you'll know right off the bat they're a nutty pair. No,
eccentricity is not in short supply here; as for laughs, charm and
passion, that's another story. James Sanford

Title
Review for Holy Man (1998)
 It offers up Eddie Murphy in his most endearing characterization in
years, then keeps him on the sidelines for what seems like ages. Forget the
placement of his name above the title; as he was in the infamous "Best
Defense," Murphy should have been billed in this picture as "Strategic Guest
Star."
 He's also the only conceivable reason for anyone to sit through
"Holy Man," an otherwise cardboard comedy which spends far too much of its
running time giving us updates on the budding love affair between ambitious
TV producer Ricky (Jeff Goldblum, behaving like Woody Allen after a few
doses of Ecstacy) and media analyst Kate (Kelly Preston, whose stiff and
charmless performance guarantees she'll continue to be identified primarily
for her real-life role as Mrs. John Travolta). This will please the dozen or
so people nationwide who came to see Goldblum do his standard yammering and
yelping and will greatly frustrate the rest of us who'd rather watch Murphy
skewer the home-shopping craze.
 "Holy Man" takes place in the high-pressure Good Buy Shopping
Network, where hard-up celebrities desperately try to unload useless
merchandise -- Betty White pitches an aphrodisiac perfume called Clam, James
Brown shills for the Soul Survivor System, etc. Ricky's job is on the line
after 27 consecutive months of unimpressive sales; Kate is hunting for
someone who can give the channel an identity.
 Their prayers are answered when the enigmatic, soul-searching
wanderer G (Murphy) crashes the studio, letting viewers know the truth about
the lousy products GBSN touts; typical of their wares is an in-toilet bidet
called Lil' Squirt which dispenses "a refreshing kiss of mist" to the
derriere. G quickly becomes "the biggest thing to hit home-shopping since
the cubic zirconium," although why customers would purchase any of this junk
after G has shown its worthlessness is one of the many questions left unansw
ered by Tom Schulman's half-baked screenplay.
 There's a terrific movie to be made about home-shopping and the
folks addicted to it, but "Holy Man" is not that film. Murphy's interactions
with GBSN salespeople like Florence Henderson are truly funny, and his
encounter with a terminally vain Morgan Fairchild would be hilarious had we
not seen it in the film's commercials.
 Unfortunately Schulman decided to make these satiric swipes a
subplot, and the Murphy-less scenes with Kate and Ricky seem to drone on
interminably. Goldblum is irritatingly manic while Preston seems utterly
hollow; her smiles look like someone slapped a pair of wax lips on her face.
The only notable directorial touch provided by Stephen Herek is the ending
of every third or fourth scene with a long fade to black, which will make
programmers happy when "Holy Man" debuts on TV a couple of years from now.
 After a serious career lull in the first half of the '90s, Murphy
seems unsure of his ability to carry a picture, playing second fiddle to
wise-cracking animals in "Doctor Dolittle" and hiding behind special-effects
in "The Nutty Professor." His winning performance here suggests it's time to
drop that modesty and take control of his projects again. Certainly "Holy
Man" would be infinitely easier to sit through if it had larger helpings of
its supposed star; how sadly fitting a movie that warns against believing in
advertising turns out to have been promoted deceptively.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Scream 2 (1997)
SCREAM 2
(Miramax)
Here's a shocker for you: A sequel that's just as much fun as the original.
Fans of last year's surprise smash "Scream" are unlikely to be disappointed
by "Scream 2," which, if anything, is even funnier and scarier than Part
One.
"I don't like being scared," grumbles Maureen (Jada Pinkett) as her
boyfriend Phil (Omar Epps) drags her into a sneak preview of "Stab," an
exploitation film based on the Woodsboro murders. "But scary movies are
great foreplay," Phil insists. What he's forgetting is that in the world of
slasher films, sex typically equals death: No one will be startled to find
out that Maureen and Phil don't survive through Reel One of either "Stab" or
"Scream 2," since their deaths are required to start screenwriter Kevin
Williamson's plot in motion.
And what a clever plot it is, spiked by hip one-liners that knowingly poke
fun at such targets as Sandra Bullock, sorority sisters and the sad state of
sequels in general. There are also good-natured jabs at the TV careers of
Neve Campbell and Courteney Cox, both of whom reprise their "Scream" roles
as, respectively, the tormented Sidney Prescott and Gale Weathers, the
self-centered journalist who has built her career on reporting Sidney's
travails. Gale has even tracked Sidney to the small-town college where she
was hoping to put the violence of her past behind her; Gale wants to squeeze
one more story out of Sidney on the weekend that "Stab" opens nationwide.
The murders at the "Stab" screening turn out to be just a preview of coming
attractions, however, as another maniac begins stalking Sidney's campus.
There is much to admire in "Scream 2," as director Wes Craven engineers some
genuinely chilling sequences (including a real shocker involving a stage
production of "Oedipus Rex") and Williamson brings back --and develops the
character of-- Deputy Dewey (played by the adorably loopy David Arquette),
who ends up becoming infatuated with Gale, almost against his will. Gale,
who now introduces herself as "Gale Weathers, author of "The Woodsboro
Murders"," just to make sure everyone is aware of her best-selling book, now
sports tiger-striped hair and a brazenly amoral attitude. "You need to check
your conscience at the door, sweetie: We're not here to be loved," she
snarls when her new cameraman objects to her underhanded journalistic
tactics.
Campbell's put-upon Sidney doesn't take on many new colors, despite her
snagging of a new boyfriend (Jerry O'Connell) and a vivacious roommate
(Elise Neal) who's certain Sidney's problems will disappear once she joins
the Delta Lambda crowd. Hopefully, the inevitable "Scream 3" will find
Sidney's character moving beyond the cowering victim she is for much of this
opus.
"Scream 2" falters only in its last third, when the pacing goes slightly
slack and the smart finale goes on a bit too long for its own good. But for
much of the two hours, Williamson and Craven do a sensational job of
alternating screams of horror with roars of hilarity. If "Scream 2" can't
claim the novelty value of the original, it can certainly stand as one of
the stronger sequels of recent years.

Title
Review for Halloween H20: 20 Years Later (1998)
        In a summer full of overlong epics like ``Armageddon'' and
``The Mask of Zorro,'' a modest quickie like ``Halloween H20: Twenty
Years Later'' seems refreshingly unpretentious, even though it takes
almost as long to pronounce that unwieldly title as it does to watch
the movie. But here's a case in which brevity is something of a
handicap.
  There are some intriguing issues bubbling just below the
blood-spattered surface of ``H20,'' which brings Jamie Lee Curtis of
the original two ``Halloween'' movies to restore some much-needed
class to the slasher-flick genre, but the film's 85-minute running
time leaves scores of irritating unanswered questions and unresolved
issues.
  All right, no one buying a ticket for ``H20'' is going in
expecting an insightful study of human nature, but much of the movie's
first hour devotes itself to detailing the disturbing, fragile bond
between Curtis' character Laurie Strode and her 17-year-old son John
(Josh Hartnett).
  Still traumatized from her violent brushes with her
psychotic brother Michael Myers, Laurie now lives under the alias of
Keri Tate and oversees Hillcrest, an exclusive prep school. She's
referred to by John as a ``functioning alcoholic,'' which apparently
means she can pound glasses of chardonnay at lunch, down a
triple-vodka at dinner and still have the energy to harangue
Hillcrest's useless security guard (LL Cool J).
  Director Steve Miner, whose previous films include the
clever sleeper ``Warlock,'' manages to sustain a fair level of tension
as Laurie's drink-induced hallucinations of Michael give way to the
all-too-real thing, the chalky-faced killing machine who shows up at
school while the kids are away on a Halloween field trip. While family
counseling might have worked wonders for other siblings in similar
situations, Laurie and Michael prefer to resolve their differences
with big knives, heavy machinery and the always-reliable fireman's ax.
  Curtis is both ``H20' ''s trump card and its biggest
problem, the trouble being that she does such a fine job of
illuminating Laurie's hollow shell of a life that we can't help but
want to know more about her and how she's managed to keep it together
for as long as she has. There's considerably more attention paid to
characterization here than one would expect in a horror film, and that
may cause ``H20'' to seem slightly sluggish to fans raised on the
high-energy, hip wit of the ``Scream'' movies.

Title
Review for Godzilla (1998)
        To get an idea of how director Roland Emmerich's ``Godzilla''
stacks up alongside the beloved Japanese series many of us grew up
with, imagine taking a child's drawing of Godzilla and blowing it up
into a mural that could fill the side of a skyscraper. The result
would certainly be bigger, but it would not improve the artistry of
the original.
  So it goes with this extraordinarily lavish and utterly
pointless modernization of ``Godzilla,'' which has numerous high-tech
tricks up its sleeve but no real wit or originality.
  The screenplay by Emmerich and producer Dean Devlin can't
decide whether to play the scenario for campy humor or all-out horror
and finally settles on an unsatisfying middle ground. Although the duo
eventually generate a bit of suspense - albeit with sequences that
essentially are elaborate variations on bits lifted from ``Jurassic
Park'' and ``The Lost World'' - the movie wears out both its welcome
and its audience's patience long before its nearly two-and-a-half-hour
running time is up.
  Like the recent ``Lost In Space,'' ``Godzilla'' makes its
first mistake by glossing over its origins. The charm of the Godzilla
films produced by Toho Studios stems from their bizarre plotting and
chintzy production values, and though this ``Godzilla'' utilizes
state-of-the-art computer animation and seat-shaking digital sound,
it's not nearly as entertaining as one of the truly twisted Toho
films, such as ``Godzilla vs.  Biolante,'' in which the giant lizard
battles an enormous rose that's taken root in Tokyo Harbor.
  By contrast, fun in ``Godzilla'' arises only intermittently.
It's exciting, for example, to see all the vehicles along a Manhattan
street bounce simultaneously as the heavy-footed monster makes his
first approach into the city, and to watch Godzilla's whip-like tail
carve deep gashes in the facades of familiar New York landmarks. There
are also tense moments late in the film as some imperilled humans
attempt to escape a demolished Madison Square Garden.
  But Emmerich and Devlin never know when to quit. Five
minutes of Godzilla rampaging through the Big Apple pumps up the
adrenalin; 15 minutes of destruction doesn't heighten the rush.
  When the title character is out of sight for too long,
however, the movie wheezes to a crawl, as its non-reptile characters
are a dull lot indeed.  Dr. Nick Tatopoulos (Matthew Broderick) is a
bright-eyed nice-guy who works for the Nuclear Regulatory Commission
and who tracks Godzilla from the South Pacific to the East
Coast. Meanwhile, Nick's ex-girlfriend Audrey (Maria Pitillo, in a
sincerely annoying performance) - an aspiring reporter who shows no
evidence of even being able to spell `TV,' but won't let a lack of
smarts keep her from becoming a network anchor - tries to use her
former flame to get an exclusive on Godzilla's background. Along for
the ride are videographer Victor ``Animal'' Palotti (Hank Azaria) and
secretive Frenchman Phillippe Roache (Jean Reno), who essentially
hijacks Nick into joining his team of monster-hunters.
  None of the actors seems particularly inspired, although
Azaria tries every once in a while to squeeze some laughs out of his
lines. The scenes involving Nick and Audrey re-evaluating their
relationship are custom-made for trips to the bathroom or the popcorn
counter, as Broderick and Pitillo display absolutely no spark
whatsoever.
 As in ``Independence Day,'' the previous Emmerich-Devlin
teaming, the humor is forced and generally flat. A running gag
involving a candy-noshing mayor named Ebert (Michael Lerner) and his
useless assistant Gene (Lorry Goldman) becomes tedious in no time at
all, and though ``Godzilla'' doesn't have as many dopey one-liners as
``Independence'' did, the ones it does include are groan-worthy.
 On a purely technical basis, ``Godzilla'' is impressive
enough to merit a mild recommendation. Though the animation doesn't
always jibe perfectly with the live-action, the movie has a certain
dark visual style, somewhat along the lines of the Tim Burton
``Batman'' epics. Godzilla himself has been overhauled by designer
Patrick Tatopoulos (who apparently lent his name to Broderick's
character), who has given the creature a more natural look and has
allowed him to be considerably sprightlier than ever before.
 But those expecting a shocker will be let down. Emmerich and Devlin's
``Godzilla'' turns out to be almost as overblown as the 1977 revision of
``King Kong.'' The only thing that might send you screaming from the
theater is the horrifying Puff Daddy song heard over the end credits.

Title
Review for Wilde (1997)
    "A burnt child loves the fire," Oscar Wilde was once quoted as saying,
and these six words aptly describe his own fatal attraction to the
capricious young aristocrat Lord Alfred "Bosie" Douglas. It was a
relationship that would ultimately destroy Wilde's career, his family and
his health, and yet after all the damage was done, Wilde still sought
shelter in Douglas' arms.
What was the appeal? According to "Wilde," adapted by Julian Mitchell
from Richard Ellman's biography "Oscar Wilde," it seems to have been a
combination of sheer romanticism and all-consuming masochism. As portrayed
by the gifted Jude Law (Broadway's "Indiscretions," "Gattaca"), Douglas is
almost painfully handsome and often charming. But he's also very much an
overgrown rebellious adolescent, prone to temper tantrums and blistering
verbal attacks on Wilde, whom Douglas seems to regard as both unworthy of
him and also as the perfect weapon to use in his fight against his mad
father, the Marquess of Queensberry (Tom Wilkinson).
By the time he met Douglas, Wilde (Stephen Fry) was already married, a
father and a bright light in the London theater scene, thanks to the success
of "Lady Windemere's Fan." He was also already regarded by polite society as
a shady character because of his "dangerous" novel "The Picture of Dorian
Gray." "Artists care nothing about respectability," Wilde's mother (Vanessa
Redgrave) assures his wife Constance (Jennifer Ehle), who frets about
Oscar's reputation.
In his lavish telling of a tragic story, director Brian Gilbert holds
back very little. "Wilde" does not shy away from showing either Wilde and
Douglas carousing in all-male brothels ("I do love you, Oscar, but variety
is the spice of life," Douglas huffs as he leads Wilde in) or Wilde's
voyeuristic habits.
The film also makes no attempt to conceal the walking paradox that was
Wilde himself. Wilde's story "The Selfish Giant" becomes a recurring motif
in the scenes showing Wilde's family life: Although he could write a lovely
fable about the virtues of being generous, Wilde is depicted as a father too
absorbed in his work and love affairs to pay much attention to his sons.
Even more pointedly, although the Irish-born author insists "all my
life I've fought against the English vice, hypocrisy," Wilde refused to
publicly admit his homosexuality, even going so far as to sue for libel
after the Marquess wrote a note alleging he was a "sodomite." The lawsuit --
prompted, of course, by Douglas' hatred of his father -- would ultimately
disgrace Wilde and everyone around him.
Fry brings the vulnerable soul beneath Wilde's scathing wit to the
surface, making it clear that even though Wilde realized his relationship
with Douglas was futile ("you're my catstrophe, my doom," he murmurs to
Douglas between kisses) he was powerless to resist. Fry also captures
Wilde's poise and imposing physical presence: He truly was the Selfish
Giant, not the paunchy little man he's often portrayed as. Law, quickly
becoming an actor to watch, has the necessary allure and off-putting
petulance the character of Douglas requires, and Wilkinson is suitably
frenzied as his bloodthirsty dad.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Ride (1998)
A group of energetic young people burst into an impromptu musical number.
The girls sing a few bars, the guys sing a few bars, and then one young
woman steps forward and belts out her lines: "Brotha, Brotha, you're so
fine/Want your hands on my behind."You were expecting "Summer Nights,"
maybe?
That melodic moment is one of the many low points of "Ride," a witless,
irritating comedy-drama that follows a dozen aspiring rappers from Harlem to
Miami.Former music-video auteur Millicent Shelton penned the script, which,
if you cut out all the obscenities and flatulence jokes, could comfortably
fit on the back of her business card. Though "Ride" was written and directed
by a woman it's hardly a triumph for feminism, as every female character in
the film is either a tramp, an airhead, a witch or a weakling.
Chipper, clueless Leta (Melissa DeSousa) is assigned by her nasty boss Bleau
(ex-MTV VJ Downtown Julie Brown, in bizarre makeup and fright wigs that make
her look more like Skid Row Sally) to chaperone some potential stars to a
video shoot in Florida. Getting there involves taking a ramshackle bus owned
by elderly wiseacres Roscoe (John Witherspoon) and Bo (Cedric The
Entertainer), who carp about the sad state of today's music but make no
excuses for their vehicle's perpetually backed-up toilet, where many of the
film's hijinks occur.
"Ride"'s parade of offensive stereotypes features Charity (Idalis De Leon,
another MTV refugee), a siren who tries to sleep her way into a record deal;
sex-crazed Brotha (Sticky Fingaz); pregnant Tuesday (Kellie Williams),
Brotha's weepy, mistreated girlfriend; and Casper (Rueben Asher), a
jive-spouting white boy who refuses to believe he's not African-American.
Since most of theactors can't be trusted to deliver dialogue convincingly,
Shelton drowns them out as often as possible with the strains of second-rate
rap.
Several rappers grace the screen as well. Dr. Dre and Ed Lover turn up as a
pair of leering receptionists, the Afro-puffed Lady of Rage bulldozes
through her scenes as the villainous Peaches, Luther Campbell appears to
have been dragged from a hospital bed to play sleazy music mogul Freddie B,
and at one point, the bus breaks down just around the corner from a
backwater disco where Snoop Doggy Dogg improbably happens to be hanging out.
None of these performers needs to start working on their Oscar acceptance
speech yet.
Somewhere in this wretchedly made hodgepodge is the genuinely talented Malik
Yoba, doing what he can to dignify the junkyard around him and to carry his
scenes with the vacuous DeSousa. Though he tries to put on a brave face,
Yoba seems to realize "Ride" is a one-way ticket to Dullsville, and he looks
eager to get off the bus.

Title
Review for Road Trip (2000)
         Oh, to be able to go back to those happy, carefree days of
student life, when responsibilities could be easily shrugged off,
friends were loyal, dinner consisted of leftover pizza and ramen noodles
and studies could be easily brushed aside in favor of attending a beer
bash.
 What? That wasn't your college experience?
 Then you obviously didn't attend the University of Ithaca, the
alma mater of the gang in "Road Trip," a relentlessly tacky cruise into
the depths of cheap jokes and shock humor. Pasted together from scraps
of "There's Something About Mary," "The Sure Thing" and approximately 70
other teen-oriented comedies, the movie is a prime example of what can
result from filmmakers pandering to the lowest common denominator. It's
also pretty funny in its own right, although few people over the age of
21 are going to be courageous enough to admit they laughed at it.
 Leading us on this perversion excursion is Barry (Tom Green),
an overripe undergraduate who's currently in his eighth year at Ithaca
and who conducts orientation sessions guaranteed to scare the living
daylights out of prospective attendees. Pointing out the psychology
building, he tells incoming freshmen "each semester, you'll be expected
to volunteer for cutting-edge experiments."
 Barry also has a story to tell, a real whopper about his buddy
Josh (Breckin Meyer), who accidentally videotaped the one night he was
unfaithful to Tiffany (Rachel Blanchard), his girlfriend of three years.
Since she lives 1800 miles away in Austin, that wouldn't seem to be a
major crisis -- except that Josh's roommates accidentally mailed the
tape to her, thinking it was something else.
 Now Josh, geeky Kyle (DJ Qualls), stoner Rubin (Paulo Costanzo)
and the happily amoral E.L. (Seann William Scott, destined to be forever
remembered as the "pale ale" guy from "American Pie") -- who theorizes
you're not really cheating if you and your true love are in different
area codes -- must scurry down to Texas to retrieve the cassette before
Tiffany gets ahold of it. Josh insists they must make it there in three
days, although given the speed of the U.S. mail these days, you'd think
they'd be able to take the scenic route and still make it with plenty of
time to spare. Following not so close on their heels is Josh's
one-night-stand Beth (Amy Smart), who was misled by Barry into thinking
the boys went to Boston instead of Austin and who winds up accidentally
causing some major mayhem of her own.
 The screenplay by Scot Armstrong and director Todd Phillips
keeps beating you over the head with raunchiness until you're left with
only two choices: either walk out, or succumb. If you stick around,
you'll witness a gross-out farce that should make any cretin chuckle, a
veritable barrage of potshots at overweight lovers, blind people,
clueless sorority sisters, African-American fraternity brothers,
unctuous teaching assistants, snarky motel desk clerks, smarmy
restaurant workers, innocent white mice and drug-addled senior citizens.
A Best Picture nomination next spring seems somehow unlikely.
 And yet "Road Trip" passes the test of a really good comedy: It
seems even funnier when you're telling your friends about it days later
than it did when you were watching it. Some critics have called this
phenomenon "depth-charge humor." If that's the case, then "Road Trip" is
a blast. James Sanford

Title
Review for Tarzan and the Lost City (1998)
  Take, for example, the notion of reviving Edgar Rice
Burroughs' Tarzan in the last days of the 20th century. John and Bo
Derek tried it in 1981, and the result was ``Tarzan the Ape Man,'' one
of the most abominable films of the '80s.
  In 1984, director Hugh Hudson attempted to put a new twist
on the Tarzan legend with his lavish ``Greystoke: The Legend of
Tarzan, Lord of the Apes,'' and came up with an epic as cumbersome and
confused as its title.
  At least those films had artistic pretensions, misguided
though they might have been. The cheap ``Tarzan and the Lost City,''
which comes to us through the courtesy of something called Village
Roadshow Pictures, is pure cheese - and it stinks like Limburger.
  ``Lost City'' offers as Tarzan the chiseled Casper Van Dien,
who proves again as he did in ``Starship Troopers'' he's less a
leading man than a leading mannequin. Any expression beyond a sullen
pout seems to take an extraordinary amount of concentration and
physical exertion on Van Dien's part; his infrequent attempts at
smiles are the stuff nightmares are made of.
  Jane March, best known for proving she's allergic to
clothing of any kind in ``The Lover'' and ``Color of Night,'' plays
Jane as a prissy crab.  Early in the film, Tarzan - shortly before his
scheduled wedding to Jane - has a vision that causes him to
contemplate leaving his new residence in England to make a brief
return to Africa. Jane practically bursts her corset: ``This wedding
will proceed as planned, or not at all!'' she screeches.  ``Go back to
your jungle!''
  Ever the obedient one, Tarzan scurries home, just in time to
find a band of fortune-seekers ransacking the old neighborhood in
search of the key to the lost city of Opar. Since everyone who's ever
looked for Opar has wound up dead, it's conceivable that Tarzan could
have simply waited for the villains to meet their maker. But that
wouldn't have made for a very long movie, so Tarzan attempts to thwart
their quest himself, with the help of a contrite Jane and some of the
phoniest-looking apes since ``Congo.''
  ``Tarzan and the Lost City'' serves up with a straight face
the kinds of scenes ``George of the Jungle'' lampooned, complete with
an egotistical villain (Steve Waddington) who bears an eerie
resemblance to James Cameron, and scores of politically incorrect
natives who jabber lines like ``No animal talk like that! May be
demon!'' and are helpless without Tarzan's protection.
  The photography is washed-out and grimy throughout, and the
visual effects are downright appalling, particularly a giant cobra
that guards the gates of Opar. The fabled ``lost city'' looks like
it's made of carelessly painted plywood and cardboard.
  The only curiosity in ``Tarzan and the Lost City'' stems
from Tarzan's wardrobe choices: He often wears an unbuttoned,
long-sleeved white shirt with his traditional loincloth. Perhaps this
is a conscious choice by the filmmakers to show us the hero's divided
loyalties between civilization and the jungle. Or perhaps Van Dien had
some unsightly acne on his back and needed something to cover it
up. The world may never know.

Title
Review for Budbringeren (1997)

 The phrase "going postal" has come to mean freaking out, or engaging in
fits of bizarre behavior. It's a term that's an unfair generalization about
American postal workers but perfectly applicable to Roy (Robert Skjaerstad),
the anti-hero of writer-director Pal Sletaune's "Junk Mail," a clever little
comedy that heads off in one direction, only to confound our expectations.
 Roy is exactly the kind of mail carrier no one would want to entrust their
letters to. He sees nothing wrong with steaming open potentially interesting
envelopes and rifling through the contents, or wandering into unlocked
apartments and checking out the furnishings. In addition to being lazy,
sloppy and quietly creepy, Roy is also a voyeur who spends his spare time
stalking Line (Andrine Saether), a hearing-impaired woman who works at the
neighborhood dry cleaners.
 But just when Roy looks thoroughly repulsive, it turns out there's more to
the picture than meets the eye. When he sneaks into Line's apartment to take
a mid-day nap while she's at work, Roy learns Line is not quite what he
thinks she is. She's got some unsavory secrets of her own.
 "Junk Mail" comes from Norway, the country famous for giving us the heavy,
haunting movies of Ingmar Bergman, but Sleutane's film is much closer to the
quirky, underrated comedies Alfred Hitchcock made, such as "The Trouble With
Harry" and "The Family Plot." All of the characters are eccentrics, from Roy
to Georg (Per Egil Aske), the closest thing to a villain in the story, a
derelict who's so nasty he almost throttles an old woman who makes the
mistake of weeping in his presence. No one is particularly likable, but
everyone is intriguingly quirky and unpredictable.
 The humor is often broadly played, including a sequence which proves once
and for all that karaoke lounges are scary places, no matter what country
they're in. What sets "Junk Mail" apart from most American comedies is how
much of it takes place in silence, as Roy finds himself in slapstick
situations reminiscent of Rowan Atkinson's "Mr. Bean." At one point, Roy is
mugged by street thugs trying to steal his mailbag; Roy would gladly give it
up, but he gets tangled up in the strap and can't hand it over.
 For his supposed bravery, Roy is honored by his employers and hailed as a
hero. Such twisted circumstances are common in "Junk Mail," which breezes
along for 83 minutes and quickly wraps up before Sleutane runs out of
twists.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Henry Fool (1997)
HENRY FOOL (Sony Pictures Classics) Directed by Hal Hartley
Simon can feel something's on the way. Standing in the street near his
home in Queens, Simon puts his ear to the ground and picks up the sound
of Henry's footsteps, coming steadily down the street. The peripatetic
Henry brings with him a message, part of which is revealed in the first
words he says to Simon: "Get up off your knees."
Aptly named, Simon Grim (James Urbaniak) is a garbageman whose mouth is
a frozen frown. With his rigid hair, unflattering glasses and mousy
manner, Simon is the kind of man who feels he has to tell people "I'm
not retarded," since his demeanor suggests otherwise. Henry Fool (Thomas
Jay Ryan) is Simon's polar opposite, a verbose, passionate wanderer who
seeks out new worlds to conquer. Henry is in the process of writing his
"confession," a multi-volume autobiography that he promises will "blow a
hole right through the world's own idea of itself" when it's published,
and, at Henry's urging, Simon puts pencil to paper and creates a poem so
controversial it divides first his community, then the literary world.
"Henry Fool," which won writer-director Hal Hartley the prize for Best
Screenplay at this year's Cannes Film Festival, is a deft, sometimes
perplexing comedy-drama that stubbornly refuses to bow to convention or
to soft-sell its darker, more upsetting aspects in the name of drawing a
wider audience. And why compromise anyway? It's stories like this one
that put the "independent" back into "independent film."
Hartley has crafted a demanding, sometimes funny, sometimes bleak tale
of a houseful of people thrown off-balance by fate's unexpected twists
and turns. In the beginning, Simon is the kind of guy who appears to
have never gotten a break in life: He always looks like someone has just
offended him. Henry, with the quizzical face of a big suspicious cat and
eyes like lasers, sees the potential within this underachiever and
forces it out. Simon's loud-mouthed, promiscuous sister Fay (Parker
Posey) likes to pretend she's much younger and sexier than she really
is, and she's perturbed when Henry doesn't automatically make advances
on her. Fay and Simon's mother (Maria Porter) spends most of her days
stretched out on the couch, although it's never clear if she's actually
sick or just a hypochondriac who wants attention. By the time the
quartet's story wraps up, nearly a decade later, personalities will have
evolved, fortunes will have reversed and births, deaths and disclosed
secrets will have changed everyone markedly.
Ryan, in his film debut, is made to walk a thin line. Henry has a
florid manner of speech that suggests an overeager salesman, and his
penchant for posing is reminiscent of a self-involved drama student
who's always "on." The temptation in creating such a personality is to
play him like, well, a fool. But Henry must also serve as the core of
the movie, the sun around which all the space cadets revolve. Ryan
manages to have it both ways, letting us see just enough of what's
beneath Henry's bluster to make his character arc seem credible.
An even greater challenge falls to Urbaniak, who must come up with a
way to make the often silent, vaguely menacing-looking Simon someone the
audience can identify with on a certain level. Urbaniak finds the key in
Simon's resilience, the fact that even though he's stuck in an awful
situation, he's putting up with it because he feels responsible for his
family. "Henry Fool" also marks a new high point in the meteoric career
of Posey, whose Fay matures from bratty slut into hard-won womanhood
with humor and pathos.
Hartley's script always catches the viewer a little off-guard.
Everytime you think "Henry Fool" is about to settle into a safe comedic
groove, it takes a tragic or shocking detour, and just when the movie
starts to seem morose, Hartley throws in a bit of off-the-wall humor.
There's also a strain of satire running below the surface, as evidenced
by recurring references to a Congressman who claims to be devoted to
restoring American morals: His most vocal supporter turns out to be a
former drug dealer who beats his wife and daughter while praising his
candidate's high ideals. "Henry Fool" seems slightly overlong at 138
minutes, but it's difficult to come up with much material that could be
easily trimmed. That, in and of itself, is a pretty high compliment to
Hartley and his outstanding cast.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Beloved (1998)
        A film adaptation of a novel that's won both the Nobel and Pulitzer
Prizes -- as well as a devoted following worldwide -- would seem to be a
project fraught with potential pitfalls, especially when that novel is Toni
Morrison's "Beloved," a non-linear chronicle of the lives of former slaves
in post-Civil War Ohio. But producer-actress Oprah Winfrey refused to let
naysayers dissuade her from pursuing her dream of putting the book on the
screen, and, when these skeptics take a look at the movie Winfrey and
director Jonathan Demme ("Silence of the Lambs") have created, chances are
they will eat their words.
 An intense, often impressionistic picture about the price of
freedom "Beloved" represents a personal triumph for its star, whose
performance in the role of Sethe, the runaway servant who is literally
haunted by her past, ensures Winfrey will never again be thought of as just
a talk show hostess.
 Sethe is a woman who would rather share her home with a ghost than
move on; after fleeing north with her children, Sethe insists, "I will never
run from another thing on this earth." As Winfrey journeys through the dark
caverns of Sethe's soul, you can almost see the grief seeping out of her
every pore. It's not a showy, let's-win-an-Oscar star turn, but a quiet,
devestating piece of character work.
 Demme, following Winfrey's lead, does not attempt to simplify or
launder Morrison's tale, a la Steven Spielberg's widely criticized take on
Alice Walker's "The Color Purple." From "Beloved"'s first scene, in which an
angry spirit shakes Sethe's house and hurls her dog against a wall, this is
a demanding, unsettling picture full of savage violence and deep-seated
misery. Even when Sethe finds some degree of comfort in the arms of old
friend Paul D (Danny Glover), a fellow escapee from "Sweethome," the sight
of their broken, scarred bodies coming together is heartbreaking rather than
erotic.
 Glover's work as Paul D reminds us once again what a powerful actor
he can be when he's not wasting his talents on tripe like "Lethal Weapon 4,"
and as Sethe's "charmed child" Denver, Kimberly Elise is outstanding.
 Like most of Demme's movies, this one benefits enormously from the
photography of Tak Fujimoto, whose smooth style calls attention to the drama
rather than the cameraman's artistry. "Beloved"'s often fragmented, jarring
flashback sequences have been shot on washed-out stock that gives them an
appropriately unreal look.
 Not all of Demme's risk-taking pays off, though. Particularly
detrimental to the film is Thandie Newton in the title role, as a mystery
woman who emerges from the river and takes up residence under Sethe's roof.
If Winfrey's acting is refreshingly free of technique, Newton's is crawling
with it, and her studied, almost goofy mannerisms (big eyes, a twisted jaw,
etc.) go a long way toward diluting the vivid atmosphere Demme and Winfrey
have taken such pains to create. In defense of Newton however, the ethereal
Beloved may be an unplayable part; any actress would have been perplexed by
this character who is alternately sprite and succubus, child-woman and
madwoman.
 If "Beloved" sometimes fails to deliver the emotional wallop the
audience expects, it's because Demme and his cast aren't interested in easy
tear-jerking. They're out to create a genuinely cathartic experience, and
more often than not, they succeed; when "Beloved" does connect, it does so
with the force of a sledgehammer to the heart.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Limey, The (1999)
         As directed by Steven Soderbergh, "The Limey" is a thriller
almost as jarring as the rhyming Cockney slang used by its central
character, the stoic Wilson, played with frozen fire in his eyes by the
great Terence Stamp. What sounds in synopsis like a fairly mundane story
of vengeance comes across on the screen as a collage of images, music
and crackling dialogue. Frequently, Soderbergh will take a simple
conversation and stage it in different locations, then skip blithely
between the various versions, using the soundtrack as the ribbon to hold
the pieces together. Although the effect initially seems like a gimmick
or perhaps a throwback to the "mod" caper films of the late 1960s, it
turns out to be a clever way to handle Lem Dobbs' no-frills screenplay.
 To balance Stamp's anti-hero, Soderbergh has cast another icon
of 30 years ago. As Terry Ballantine, a slick, devious record producer
who represents the worst L.A. has to offer, Peter Fonda oozes cool charm
and smarm. The director introduces both men with theme songs from the
Flower Power era: Wilson gets the Who's "The Seeker" ("They call me the
seeker, I been searching low and high/I won't get to get what I'm after
'til the day I die"), while Ballantine is saddled with the Hollies'
bitter "King Midas in Reverse." "You're not specific enough to be a
person," Terry's most recent bedmate tells him. "You're more like a
vibe."
 In contrast, Wilson is pure grit, an ex-con who's flown in to
Terry's world to seek retribution for the death of his daughter Jenny
(Melissa George) who perished in a suspicious car crash, apparently
after getting too close to the truth about her boyfriend Ballantine.
"The Limey" quickly builds to a clash between these two wildly different
titans, both of whom are haunted by their pasts.
  "What's England anyway?" one of Terry's cohorts cracks. "Some
rinkydink country half the size of Wyoming where the cops don't even
carry guns." Ah, but British criminals certainly do pack heat and, in
Wilson's case, know how to use it.
 There's plenty of violence in "The Limey," but what Soderbergh
truly seems concerned with is creating an impressionistic mood piece. As
he did in his last movie, the dynamic 1998 suspenser "Out of Sight," the
filmmaker has great fun trying to catch his audience off-guard, tossing
in a burst of humor when you least expect it (one of the guests at
Terry's party confesses "the first Christopher Cross album -- wow, man,
that changed my life"), or taking a few minutes of extra time to let
Wilson talk about his alienation from Jenny with the young woman's best
friend, an understanding speech coach (Lesley Ann Warren). Since Wilson
spent most of Jenny's childhood in one prison or another, she began
calling him "Daddy the Friendly Ghost."
 The 1960s motif is further reinforced by Soderbergh's marvelous
insertion of clips of the young Stamp playing a hood (named Wilson,
coincidentally) in director Ken Loach's 1967 drama "Poor Cow." It's a
smart alternative to the usual phoney-looking flashbacks we're used to
seeing in Hollywood films, in which makeup artists struggle to erase 20
or 30 years from the faces and hair of middle-aged stars. James Sanford

Title
Review for Small Time Crooks (2000)
        Every so often, and a lot less often than he used to, Woody
Allen makes a movie for the masses. "Small Time Crooks" is such a
picture. Free of the angst and stylization of many of Allen's recent
films, it's a cheerfully silly caper comedy that mixes in a little of
"My Fair Lady" and a lot of "The Honeymooners" as it breezes along.
 There's quite a bit of Ralph and Alice Kramden in Ray and
Frenchy Winkler, the couple at the center of "Crooks," and Allen and
Tracey Ullman spar and slander each other with an almost maniacal glee.
Ray is an ex-con who dreams of one last heist; Frenchy, a former
stripper (!) turned hard-bitten manicurist would rather play it safe.
When Ray accuses her of always shooting down his dreams, Frenchy snarls,
"You get the kind of dreams people get after they put opium in their
brownies."
 But eventually she's persuaded to participate in Ray's latest
scheme, which involves opening a cookie shop as a cover for a crime.
While Ray and his cronies try to tunnel from the basement of the shop
into a nearby bank, Frenchy whips up batch after batch of her unusual
taste treats (Chicken Chip and Tuna Mint are a couple of her flavors).
The scheme goes awry when the cookies become, quite unexpectedly, the
latest culinary craze. So Ray and Frenchy find themselves in the money,
although not in the way they anticipated.
 Getting refinement and culture is not so simple, even after
Frenchy employs art dealer David (Hugh Grant) to teach her the basics of
being a socialite. Soon she's memorizing the dictionary and using her
new vocabulary all too well. "I must asseverate she deserves accolades,"
Frenchy tells her fellow concertgoers after seeing a cellist perform.
 Allen essentially fades into the background and lets Ullman
carry the picture. Good decision: She's magnificent here, whether making
wisecracks in her best Brooklynese accent (of Ray's dopey friends she
notes, "they never finished kindergarten because they got drafted") or
flirting hopefully with the artsy crowd and wondering why they snicker
at her leopard-print outfits and her apartment filled with gold-plated
garbage. Allen's films are routinely scouted for Oscar-quality acting
(last year's "Sweet and Lowdown" garnered nominations for Sean Penn and
Samantha Morton) and hopefully Ullman's work will not be forgotten by
the Academy.
 The other standout performance here comes from veteran
writer-director Elaine May as Frenchy's astonishingly simple-minded
sister Mae, who has an uncanny knack for screwing up the simplest tasks.
Mae's face is almost always slightly tense, as if Regis Philbin was just
about to ask her the deciding question on "Who Wants To Be A
Millionaire?", and May gives her a delightfully twisted voice that makes
even throwaway lines sound like little jewels.
  Allen fans shouldn't head for "Small Time Crooks" expecting
the moral complexities of "Crimes and Misdemeanors" or the poignant
soul-searching of "Another Woman." Those were seven-course meals while
this is nothing more than a scrumptious dessert, one that should satisfy
the appetite of anyone looking for laughs. James Sanford

Title
Review for Armageddon (1998)
ARMAGEDDON
Directed by Michael Bay
A case could probably be made that Jerry Bruckheimer and the late
Don Simpson are the two men most responsible for the sorry state of the
American movie blockbuster. Why was "Godzilla" so godawful? Why did "Speed
2" crash and burn last year? Why did 99 percent of the people who saw it
despise "Batman & Robin"?
It all goes back to a little movie called "Flashdance."
Back in 1983, then-fledgling producers Simpson and Bruckheimer took
what was essentially a wisp of an idea -- blue-collar girl dreams of
becoming a ballerina -- gussied it up with eye-scorching visuals, set it to
a pulsating soundtrack, chopped it together to look like the longest,
sexiest MTV clip ever and made a film that became an overnight phenomenon.
Cashing in on the rah-rah jingoism of the Reagan era, the duo put together
fighter jets, Tom Cruise and a handful of power-ballads and created "Top
Gun," a sort of "Flashdance Goes To War."
The immense success of these pictures did not go unnoticed by the
rest of the film industry, and soon the prevailing attitude in Hollywood
seemed to be, "Who cares about characters, plot or dialogue? Just make it
look really hot!". Though Simpson and Bruckheimer's magic formula finally
lost its fizzle when Cruise's "Days of Thunder" (jokingly referred to by
many as "Top Car") quickly ran out of gas at the box-office in 1990, by then
the damage was already done: Years of seeing films that emphasized style
over substance had shaped the minds and tastes of a new generation of
would-be filmmakers who have devoutly followed The Gospel According To
Simpson And Bruckheimer. These are the folks who churn out movies like
"Batman & Robin," "Speed 2" and "Godzilla," expensive packages that look
sensational but are really just concepts in search of development.
Michael Bay is one such young director. Trained in the arena of
music videos, where no shot can last more than three seconds and chaos is
something to achieve rather than avoid, Bay proved in his first features
"Bad Boys" and "The Rock" that even though he can't actually tell a story,
he can make whatever's going on look plenty exciting. Shoot the people we
should admire from low angles, go into slow-motion every time something
important is about to take place, make sure everybody sweats picturesquely,
and you're halfway home.
Bay's hyperactive style gets a workout in the Bruckheimer-produced
"Armageddon," a breathless and utterly brainless the-sky-is-falling epic
that's so cold and contrived it makes the similarly themed and much more
sentimental "Deep Impact" look like "Schindler's List" by comparison. What
matters most to Bay and the "Armageddon" screenwriters is destruction
instead of drama and pyrotechnics, not people. Its almost total incoherence
makes "Armageddon" a kind of breakthrough: This may be the first movie
that's actually just a 150-minute trailer for itself.
The special effects are generally impressive, particularly an
opening attack on New York by a swarm of blazing meteorites and an
otherworldly storm in the last half-hour. In between those exciting segments
is a plot any seven-year-old could spot the holes in, yet "Armageddon" wears
its stupidity as a badge of honor, like the loud-mouthed class moron who
tries to make intelligent classmates feel ashamed of their good grades. It
can't be a coincidence that every character in the movie with a college
education turns out to be ineffectual or prissy and that the burden of
saving the world falls on the brawny shoulders of a bunch of hard-livin'
roughnecks who don't let silly things like rules and regulations hold them
back. Perhaps the biggest shock in "Armageddon" comes when these former oil
drillers submit their list of demands to be met in exchange for going into
space to stop the Texas-size asteroid that's about to terminate all life on
Earth: Although they ask never to have to pay taxes again and to get all
their parking tickets fixed, the boys forget to insist the "Porky's" trilogy
be brought along as the in-flight entertainment.
The leader of the mission is maverick drilling legend Harry S.
Stamper, played by Bruce Willis as a man with all the imagination and
passion of a metronome. For some reason, as Willis' paychecks have grown
substantially larger over the years, his performances have become less and
less interesting. Look back at a "Moonlighting" repeat or the original "Die
Hard" and you'll see an actor who wanted to entertain people. Look at
"Armageddon" and you'll see a self-satisfied star waiting to be adored.
Stamper has a twentysomething daughter Grace (Liv Tyler) who's
secretly wrinkling the sheets with Stamper's protege A.J. (Ben Affleck).
When Stamper first learns of the couple's afternoon delights, he responds by
grabbing a shotgun and chasing A.J. all over an oil rig, blasting away
recklessly while "black gold" rains down on one and all. This scene occurs
about ten minutes into "Armageddon," and offers a preview of the
documentary-style realism to come in the next two hours and 20 minutes.
Almost immediately after this lighthearted escapade, Stamper and
Grace are seized by government agents and whisked off to Washington, where
NASA honcho Truman (Billy Bob Thornton) begs Stamper to help destroy the
killer rock that's hurtling toward our planet at 22,000 miles per hour. "Not
a soul on Earth can hide from it," Truman warns, although lines such as this
may cause the audience to wonder if he's referring to the asteroid or
Disney's insanely expensive worldwide marketing campaign for "Armageddon."
>From this point on, you can probably put together the rest of the
movie yourself. Just cut your I.Q. in half and remember to spice up your
confused action sequences with rollicking comic interludes of the sort
generally not found outside straight-to-video "Ernest" flicks. Halfway
through "Armageddon" a goofy, English-mangling Cosmonaut (Peter Stormare)
turns up to do an extended hommage to that oft-ignored quipmaster Yakov
Smirnoff. To quote another former space traveller, "Oh, the pain, the
pain!".
Affleck, sporting distractingly bright new caps on his teeth that are
hardly in keeping with his character's hard-scrabble past, generally looks
lost amidst the fireworks. Tyler's portrayal shows once and for all she's
the Daryl Hannah of the '90s, a beautiful face with no personality and in
dire need of a strong director to bring out her potential. Hannah lucked out
in such films as "Roxanne" and "Steel Magnolias"; Tyler was perfectly fine
in "That Thing You Do" and "Stealing Beauty." But Bay isn't the kind of
director who cares about performances anyhow: As long as you can shout your
dialogue over the ruckus in the background, you're O.K. in his book.
Though Thornton lends a certain gravity to a colorless part, the
only actor who really enlivens "Armageddon" is Steve Buscemi, whose frequent
zingers are so much sharper than anything else in the script -- most of
"Armageddon"'s dialogue consists of variations on "I've got to inform the
President," "Suck it up," and the ever-popular "Go! Go! Go!" -- it would not
be a shock to discover they were ad-libbed. The only other moments of humor
in this turgid experience come from the filmmakers' attempts to visualize
life in the American Midwest, which they see as a place somewhere between
"The Waltons" and "The Grapes of Wrath," with ancient trucks, antique
radios, Moms in cotton housedresses and young'uns cavorting in rickety
homemade go-carts they might well have borrowed from The Little Rascals.
What a wonderful world it would be if "Armageddon" opened at the local
picture show and all the real-life Midwesterners stayed home to listen to
Buck Rogers radio dramas and read Flash Gordon comics instead.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Disturbing Behavior (1998)
         Back in the heyday of drive-ins, "Disturbing Behavior" would
have made a great second feature behind something like "Massacre at
Central High" or "Rock N Roll High School." Or even "The Stepford
Wives," which this often droll little chiller frequently recalls. Put
together by some of the production team responsible for "The X Files,"
"Behavior" frequently captures the same weird/wacky atmosphere found in
some of that series' more lighthearted episodes.
 Scott Rosenberg's screenplay mixes together equal parts of
"Stepford" and the 1987 cult classic "The Lost Boys" into a surprisingly
amusing little chiller full of quirky dialogue and slightly warped
stereotypes, such as its hero Steve (James Marsden), a troubled teen
whose well-meaning parents transplant the family to Cradle Bay, a hamlet
that initially seems to live up to its snoozy-sounding name.
 But before long, Cradle Bay begins to look as if it has
something in common with Twin Peaks. Steve is introduced to the members
of the Blue Ribbon Club, a bunch of squeaky-clean jocks and preps whose
brilliant sugar-frosted smiles can't quite camouflage the odd twinkle in
their eyes. Uneasy with the in-crowd, Steve hooks up with stoner Gavin
(Nick Stahl) and his friend Rachel (Katie Holmes, in a marked about-face
from her docile "Dawson's Creek" character), a slacker dream-girl in
black leather and charcoal eyeliner. While Gavin and Rachel try to
hustle beers in a supermarket parking lot, the Blue Ribbon set is
holding court at the local yogurt shop and grooving to Olivia
Newton-John's "Have You Never Been Mellow." Indeed, the Ribbons are a
mellow bunch -- until those pesky adolescent hormones begin to bubble
and cause them to get physical in a way Olivia never would have
imagined.
 Though the storyline is a bit herky-jerky (perhaps the result
of extensive last-minute editing; the DVD version offers numerous
excised scenes and an alternate ending), director David Nutter's film is
carried along by its agreeably twisted sense of humor. For example, when
a troubled kid is sentenced to be lobotomized and a nurse voices her
objections to the procedure, a doctor steps forward to assure her it's
the only sure-fire way "to cut the bruises of the banana," and when one
of the Ribbons goes berserk in public, Rachel writes it off as "toxic
jock syndrome." The movie is underscored by a well-chosen soundtrack of
gloomy alt-rock anthems, including Harvey Danger's "Flagpole Sitta"
("paranoia, paranoia, everybody's comin' to me") and the Flys' splendid
"Got You Where I Want You." Rosenberg even caps the story with a sly and
all-too-appropriate nod to Pink Floyd's "The Wall."

Title
Review for 13th Warrior, The (1999)
         Two kinds of movies wind up spending a lot of time on a studio
shelf: pictures that are so offbeat or unusual they give Hollywood's
marketing gurus sleepless nights, or films that are so wretched the
producers are ashamed to let them out.
 "The 13th Warrior" has been killing time in the vault at
Touchstone Pictures for two years, and not because it's an unappreciated
work of art. In fact, director John McTiernan reportedly washed his
hands of the movie after run-ins with Michael Crichton, whose novel
"Eaters of the Dead" was the basis for "Warrior," and seeing the
finished product, there's no mystery as to why McTiernan doesn't want to
be associated with it. Some cinematic fiascos at least provide a few
unintentional laughs; "Warrior" is simply a mess.
 It does, however, offer the sight of Antonio Banderas (in
eyeliner, no less) struggling to portray an Arab soldier, which must be
one of the most curious casting choices since Demi Moore played a
Puritan. In the proper role, Banderas can be a superb actor, as
evidenced by his films with director Pedro Almodovar, such as "Women on
the Verge of a Nervous Breakdown" and "Tie Me Up! Tie Me Down!". But
since making a much ballyhooed move to America in the early 1990s,
Banderas has missed more frequently than he's hit. This turkey won't
help balance the scale.
 The released version of "Warrior" must have been considerably
shorter than what McTiernan originally intended, since the movie opens
with a hasty narrated sequence explaining how our hero Ahmed (Banderas)
was banished to the northlands after taking a fancy to the caliph's
woman. One might also assume preview audiences were baffled by certain
segments of the film since voice-overs are constantly telling us what's
happening at any given time.
 For example, when Ahmed's party is chased by bandits who
suddenly retreat at the sight of a Viking ship, someone cries out "Look!
They are going! They are leaving!" over a shot of the cowards riding
away. Later, Ahmed pulls off the bearskin mask of a fallen enemy and
sees a human face underneath the fur. "It's a man, it's a man, it's a
man," he says, just to make sure we understand.
At the same time, the screenplay by William Wisher and Warren
Lewis does a pitiful job of establishing any sort of credibility in the
basic situation or of creating any characters worth paying attention to.
When Ahmed and his new Norsemen pals decide to take on the "terror that
has no name," a band of cannibalistic underground dwellers who are
terrorizing a settlement, no one is likely to care whether or not they
succeed. The good guys seem almost as uncouth and unappealing as the
flesh-eaters.
 The meant-to-be-rousing battles in "Warrior" are constantly
sabotaged by having been shot in medium close-up (so that we can't see
much of anything except torsos) with a hand-held camera that always
seems to miss the real action. Though a lot of heads and limbs go flying
in the course of the film, the fights are so chaotic and murky even the
gore is a bore. James Sanford

Title
Review for Any Given Sunday (1999)
         In the world of director Oliver Stone, a slap sounds like a
crack of thunder and a tackle like a building being imploded.
High-decibel jams by DMX, Moby and Kid Rock underscore almost
everything. The camera constantly jerks and weaves, frantically trying
to determine where the action is.
 The screen is cluttered with overlapping images and double
exposures. And, to be heard at all, dialogue must be shouted. That's
what you get -- for a full three hours -- in "Any Given Sunday," Stone's
tribute to the seamy institution we call professional football.
 It's a movie designed to bruise the eyes and ears, which it
does, thanks to Stone's sheer force of will and a team of editors that
turn even the most mundane moments into sonic and visual cacophony. When
coach Tony D'Amato (Al Pacino, making up for his restrained performance
in "The Insider" by bellowing and howling at every opportunity) tries to
reason with headstrong young quarterback Willie Beaman (Jamie Foxx), the
conversation is intercut with shots of storm clouds gathering, bits of
grainy black-and-white football films and clips of Charlton Heston in
"Ben Hur."
Take away the bravado and flashiness, however, and "Sunday" reveals
itself as a surprisingly conventional drama plagued with many of the
same problems that have burdened Stone's other work.
 Again, he teaches us there are three kinds of women: the
heartless, scheming harpy, a la Daryl Hannah in "Wall Street"
(represented here by Cameron Diaz as Miami Sharks owner Christina
Pagniacci); the worn-out nag, along the lines of Sissy Spacek in "JFK"
(in this case, it's Ann-Margret as Christina's bitter, cocktail-swilling
mom); and the eager prostitute/groupie who lurks on the sidelines,
waiting to ambush her man when his defenses are down (too many examples
to note). The only exception in the film is a cipher named Vanessa (Lela
Rochon), who steadfastly stands by Beaman until he becomes a star, then
jumps off the gravy train and disappears from the story.
 The men here don't fare much better, since Stone and co-author
John Logan have written them as concepts rather than as characters.
D'Amato is the die-hard veteran struggling to hold on to his place in a
changing world and to secure a place for his buddy Jack "Cap" Rooney
(Dennis Quaid), an aging quarterback whose body and spirit are rapidly
deteriorating. Beaman starts off as a bright-eyed kid from a religious
home, then turns almost immediately into a fatuous egotist who gives
self-adoring interviews and records an awful rap CD.
 Lightening up the high-pressure atmosphere a bit are John C.
McGinley as a desperate-to-be-hip sportscaster and James Woods as
Harvey, a devious team orthopedist who's all too happy to pump up the
players with painkillers in the name of the game. "What the hell's next?
" Harvey groans, as he adds up the various injuries incurred by the
Sharks during one tumultuous game. "Stigmata?"
 The conflicts and crises that erupt when these people are
thrown together against a background of politics, lucrative endorsement
deals, free drugs and expensive call girls are mostly what you'd expect,
and although Stone and Logan's melodrama reeks with in-your-face style
(D'Amato and Christina are always telling people to "pump up the
volume," and Stone cheerfully complies), it's definitely on the shallow
side. When pressed to say what has changed football from an all-American
game into the sleazy business it is today, Stone feebly points a finger
at television as the culprit, then wriggles away from the question. His
explanation for Christina's strident show-me-the-money attitude is even
lamer: It turns out her late daddy always wanted a son, so she's done
her best to deny her femininity.
 Despite such lazy scripting and two-dimensional characters,
"Sunday" is often engrossing nonetheless, simply because Stone is too
much of a showman to put on a second-rate circus. Much of the action on
the field is spectacularly staged and brilliantly cut together, and the
volatile match-up of Diaz and Pacino makes the fights between Christina
and D'Amato exciting to follow.
 The one thing all the flamboyance can't cover up is the story's
complete lack of any emotional impact whatsoever. In Stone's domain,
anything that's not loud, bright, fast or flashy never gets into the
game. This is an arena for gladiators, and mere human beings belong on
the bench. James Sanford

Title
Review for Event Horizon (1997)
In astronomical terms, an "event horizon" is defined as the point in the
boundary of a black hole at which light or matter cannot escape being pulled
in. In cinematic terms, "Event Horizon" almost immediately grabs the
attention with lavish sets, first-rate special effects and an intriguing
premise, only to end up chucking its careful set-up and resorting to a
blood-drenched finale better-suited to a "Nightmare On Elm Street"
installment. It's a classic exmplae of many admirable parts added up to an
unsatisfying whole.
 In its first hour, "Event" is startlingly beautiful and compelling,
borrowing heavily from the influential 1977 Russian film "Solaris," in which
an investigator looking into the cause of mental breakdowns among the crew
of a space station finds himself haunted by images from his past.
 "Event Horizon" revolves around a prototype superspaceship of that name
that mysteriously vanished near Neptune in 2040. Seven years later it
reappears, and Dr. William Weir (Sam Neill), the designer of the vessel,
joins the mission to salvage the ship. What made the Event Horizon special
was its "heart," a gravity drive that could fold time and space, allowing
the craft to travel at speeds faster than light. But now, the gravity drive
appears to have developed an evil mind of its own, as Weir and his teammates
are terrorized by vivid hallucinations and spooked by manifestations of
their own memories.
 Director Paul Anderson is often heavy-handed, frequently trotting out the
old false-scare-accompanied-by-a-burst-of-shrieking-music to jolt his
audience. Even so, the film has some genuinely chilling moments and
memorable visuals. The passageway through a revolving tunnel that looks like
a giant meat-grinder is a brilliant setting, and the gravity drive itself,
with its multiple rotating rings, is a thing of creepy beauty.
 The impressive cast -- Laurence Fishburne, Kathleen Quinlan, Joely
Richardson, etc. -- play out Philip Eisner's script without a hint of
campiness or condescension, although Neill's initial restraint finally gives
way to shameless hamminess.
 Likewise, "Event" deteriorates in its last half-hour into a gore-drenched
free-for-all, with images of Hell that seem to have been lifted directly
from a Nine Inch Nails video and numerous gruesome murders and
self-mutilations: One character is even forced to put out his eyes with his
own thumbs. By the time Richardson is swept through the corridors of the
ship on a tidal wave of blood, you'll realize that's a pretty apt metaphor
for what's happened to the film itself. Once "Event Horizon" goes
off-course, it never regains its bearings.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Mission to Mars (2000)
        Many science-fiction epics save their best effects for the
finale, forcing us to wait 90 minutes for something spectacular to
happen. "Mission to Mars," on the other hand, gives us the best it has
to offer in its first 30 minutes. That's happy news for people who tend
to doze off halfway through a movie, but not for those who like a
last-minute jolt on their way out of the theater.
 What the special effects crew has come up with is truly a
marvel: a Martian whirlwind that churns like a tornado, slithers like a
snake and growls like a chorus of angry bears. Anything or anyone that
gets in its way is sucked in and torn to pieces. It's quite a sight.
 Unfortunately, in terms of imagination, it's also the high
point of the film. The audience spends the next hour eagerly
anticipating the appearance of something even more awesome, more
frightening.
 You might as well be waiting for Godot.
 If it can't deliver much in the way of mind-blowing surprises,
"Mars" deserves some credit for at least trying to create a bit of human
drama as married astronauts Woody (Tim Robbins) and Terry (Connie
Nielsen) lead a rescue team to the red planet after an expedition is
nearly wiped out by that mysterious twister. Along for the ride are
jokester Phil (Jerry O'Connell) and the subdued, troubled Jim (Gary
Sinise), who is still trying to cope with the loss of his wife, also an
astronaut.
 Director Brian DePalma squeezes a considerable amount of
suspense out of the problem-plagued journey to Mars -- some of the
trials the crew face may remind you of "Apollo 13" -- while
incorporating a lot of the dizzying camerawork he's famous for. There's
a real shocker of a moment involving Phil and a nicely executed sequence
in which one of the quartet makes a slip-up and ends up adrift in space.
The dialogue is often overwrought ("What are you doing?!" "I'll tell you
what I'm not doing -- watching you die!"), but that's hardly uncommon in
these kinds of adventures and it doesn't diminish the tension.
 The screenplay by Jim Thomas, John Thomas and Graham Yost has
used up all its best ideas, however, by the time the third act begins.
After a lengthy and portentous build-up, what the rescuers discover on
Mars seems truly anti-climactic, although it should put a smile on the
faces of the Weekly World News staff who've long speculated about that
odd "face" on the Martian surface.
 The big revelation about the origins of life seems to have been
pulled directly from those pop-science "Chariots of the Gods" books that
were all the rage in the 1970s and, without giving too much away, let's
just say you'll certainly sense the hand of Disney in the last reel.
"Mars" is further undercut by a organ and string-saturated musical score
by Ennio Morricone that might have been appropriate for a Barbra
Streisand vehicle but sounds woefully out of place here. Instead of
lifting us up, it flattens us nearly every step of the way, particularly
in the last few minutes.
 Aside from "Obsession" and "The Untouchables," DePalma has
usually been a director more intrigued by sensationalism than by
sentiment and that comes through clearly in "Mars." It's evident he's
more excited and inspired by the danger of the trip than by the
destination itself. In "Mission to Mars," getting there isn't half the
fun, it's almost all the fun. James Sanford

Title
Review for Home Fries (1998)
 You could dress a hamburger up with hollandaise sauce and raspberry chutney
and still not have a dish that could pass for haute cuisine. Similarly,
writer Vince Gilligan has invested "Home Fries" with plenty of eccentric
characters and wacky situations but hasn't quite come up with enough movie
to fill the big screen. This homey, homely little tale has "Lifetime movie
special" written all over it.
 That may be part of the reason "Fries" has been on the back-burner at
Warner Brothers for the better part of two years; the only conceivable
reason for its appearance now is the surprise success of Drew Barrymore's
recent turns in "The Wedding Singer" and "Ever After."
 But though her fans may applaud Barrymore's willingness to hide her sex
appeal under a Little Orphan Annie hairdo and an enormous belly, "Fries" is
one of her lesser vehicles. As Sally, the slightly dim drive-thru cashier
whose affair with a married man ends with her pregnant and him dead,
Barrymore waddles through scene after scene in a variety of shabby
housedresses and fussy, fluffy sweaters, the kinds of ridiculous clothes
Hollywood seems for some reason to believe downtrodden young women in the
Midwest actually wear. Since Sally is a cheery and passive sort, Barrymore's
performance is little more than a series of cherubic smiles and fey
line-readings.
 Like "Meet Joe Black," "Fries" infantilizes its love interest, in this case
Luke Wilson's Dorian, who's supposed to be a helicopter pilot and former
soldier, but who still sleeps in bunk beds with his brother Angus (Jake
Busey) and gets all gee-whiz bashful whenever Sally's near. No wonder The
Reverend Horton Heat's "Big Little Baby" is featured on the soundtrack.
 The charms of "Fries" are mostly incidental, like the "Space Cadet"
lunchbox Sally carries or the wake at which "You Light Up My Life" can be
heard playing in the background. The only stand-out in the cast is Catherine
O'Hara's twisted portrait of a widow so obsessed with finding out the
identity of her late husband's mistress she believes she can feel the
woman's presence in the air, "like the sick, sweet smell of a cow's breath."
 This is a movie that strains to win over its audience with its cornpone
characters and every so often the effort pays off as director Dean Parisot
concocts a truly funny scene or a convincingly tender moment between Sally
and Dorian. But finally "Home Fries" is much like the food it takes its name
from -- a trifle greasy and sorely lacking in nourishment. James Sanford

Title
Review for Saving Private Ryan (1998)
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN (Dreamworks/Paramount)
Directed by Steven Spielberg
"Saving Private Ryan" opens and closes with the image of a faded,
almost transparent American flag waving in the breeze. It's a vaguely
unnerving sight in a movie that has offers plenty of others even more
disturbing. Director Steven Spielberg's terrifying evocations of Holocaust
atrocities in "Schindler's List" and life in a Japanese prison camp in
"Empire of the Sun" were just a warm-up for the vivid, no-holds-barred
scenes of war in "Ryan."
>From the opening half-hour -- following the preparations for the
D-Day landing of American troops on Omaha Beach -- you can tell this is not
going to be your standard rah-rah-America war picture. These soldiers are
nervous, even nauseous, as they prepare to storm into France. And with good
cause, as it turns out: Almost as soon as the ship's ramp drops into the
water, bullets and carnage begin flying. Never before has a filmmaker so
graphically depicted death on the battlefield, but Spielberg isn't aiming
merely for shock value. He's making a blood-chilling statement about the
human cost of combat, which is brilliantly delivered with the help of
effective hand-held camerawork and outstanding editing by Michael Kahn.
It's to the credit of screenwriter Robert Rodat that this harrowing
beginning proves to be just the set-up of a largely riveting tale with
echoes of "Apocalypse Now." Captain John Miller (Tom Hanks) is assigned to
track down Private James Ryan, who parachuted into France and went
off-course. It's imperative Ryan be located and brought back home. His three
brothers have all been killed in action, and orders have come down from the
top that Ryan's tour of duty be curtailed. The search for Ryan exposes
Miller and his men to numerous perils and more than a few agonizing moral
questions along the way.
Hanks is perfectly cast as the sincere Miller, whose take-charge
attitude barely conceals his lack of confidence. In one beautiful scene,
Miller's men all notice their commander's hand trembling as he talks about
the next step in their mission, but no one says a word: They all seem to
silently share their hidden terror. Tom Sizemore and Jeremy Davies also cut
memorable figures as soldiers with their own agendas. Only Edward Burns
rings false, partially because the actor seems capable of only one facial
expression, a kind of cynical pout that looks woefully out-of-place.
The other major stumbling block in "Ryan" is the title character
himself, played by Matt Damon, and it's not Damon's fault that Rodat's
script gives Ryan next to no personality and saddles him with a hideous
monologue besides. Still, "Ryan" has been made with so much care, right down
to the lusterless colors that recall tinted photos of WWII battles, that
overlooking its flaws is not difficult.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Brokedown Palace (1999)
         "One night in Bangkok, and the tough guys tumble," sang Murray
Head in the musical "Chess." Unfortunately for Alice Marano (Claire
Danes) and Darlene Davis (Kate Beckinsale) that lyric proves prophetic
in "Brokedown Palace," the latest cinematic sermon about the dangers of
visiting Asian countries. Fresh out of their Ohio high school, Alice and
Darlene jet off to Thailand for a post-graduation vacation -- "Hawaii
seemed so middle-class," Alice explains -- and wind up staying quite a
bit longer than they expected after they're caught with two kilos of
heroin in one of their backpacks.
 Had the girls gone to the movies in the last few years they
would have known travelling abroad will put you on the highway to Hell.
Didn't they see "Red Corner," in which poor Richard Gere was framed for
murder while on a business trip to China, or last year's "Return to
Paradise," which found Vince Vaughn and his buddies rotting in jail
after trying to export drugs from Thailand? No, they didn't -- and
neither did anyone else, for that matter.
 It's unlikely "Palace" will attract much of an audience either,
since it's about as thrilling as a long line at customs. The screenplay,
apparently based on those recorded warnings played in airports, follows
Alice and Darlene on a downward spiral as they hook up with a slick
blond Australian (Daniel Lapaine) who offers to fly them to Hong Kong
for a weekend of high times. Instead, the duo are railroaded by shifty
bureaucrats into a prison populated entirely by stock characters (the
easy-going Jamaican, the inscrutable dragon lady, the jaded
Englishwoman, etc.); somewhere, the Hawaii tourism board is chuckling.
 If "Palace" aims to be the female version of "Midnight
Express," it consistently rings false. For one thing, the jail is
frequently shot through gauzy golden filters, making it look more like a
dullish day camp than the nightmarish hole everyone keeps insisting it
is. Secondly, even though Darlene and Alice are supposed to be naive,
they keep doing such foolish things -- signing statements they can't
read, plotting escapes within earshot of their enemies -- you can't help
but feel they're to blame for their bad luck, not the Thai court system.
         Director Jonathan Kaplan, seemingly aware of the script's
failings, often resorts to dreamy montages of his stars to fill out
half-baked scenes. These sequences are accompanied by ethereal
dance-trance songs by Delirium and Sarah Brightman, and though the music
doesn't really jibe with the action, it's a lot easier to listen to than
David Arata's stale dialogue.
 Through it all, Danes and Beckinsale struggle to bring some
conviction to a story sorely in need of it. Though Danes occasionally
has to strain to hit Alice's emotional peaks, she's a good deal more
credible here than she was playing a former junkie in the disasterous
"Mod Squad," and Beckinsale, the fabulous British actress who did
memorable work last year in "Shooting Fish" and "The Last Days of
Disco," eloquently captures Darlene's confusion and despair. As the
lawyer who tries to spring them, Bill Pullman is undermined by an
unconvincing character. James Sanford

Title
Review for Road to El Dorado, The (2000)
         Perhaps it's written in stone somewhere in Hollywood that every
animated film has to include songs, whether they suit the story or not.
 But "The Road to El Dorado" is a shining example of a film that
would have been much stronger if it didn't have to pause every 15
minutes for a musical number. The score in this case was penned by Elton
John and Tim Rice, but the old "Lion King" lightning has not struck a
second time: These ditties are ho-hum instead of hummable and several of
them, particularly the ballads, bring the action to a near-total
standstill.
 That's a shame, since "El Dorado" is an otherwise enjoyable
adventure, with a delightful beginning and an exciting finale making up
for a somewhat muddled middle. In many ways the plot is reminiscent of
Rudyard Kipling's tale "The Man Who Would Be King," which was
beautifully filmed in 1975 with Sean Connery and Michael Caine. Like the
Kipling yarn, "El Dorado" introduces us to a pair of fortune-seekers,
Miguel (voice of Kenneth Branagh) and Tulio (voice of Kevin Kline), who
find more riches -- not to mention more headaches -- than they ever
dreamed of when they stumble upon a secret civilization.
 Escaping a shady past in Spain, the two accidentally become
castaways and travel to South America, where a mysterious map leads them
into El Dorado, the legendary lost city of gold. Their arrival time
couldn't have been better: It seems the citizens were awaiting the
appearance of a couple of gods who would help usher in "the time of the
jaguar," and Miguel and Tulio cheerfully take advantage of the natives'
hospitality.
 The first portion of "El Dorado" is by far the funniest section
of the film, featuring a highly amusing episode at sea, some bouncy
banter between our heroes and the intoduction of a saucy, sinuous thief
named Chel (voice of Rosie Perez) who provides a bit of romantic
interest. El Dorado itself is introduced in a glorious sequence that
allows the animators to pull out all the stops.
 Once Tulio and Miguel have settled in, the movie settles down
-- perhaps a bit too much, as John and Rice haul out their maudlin
melodies. It's only when Tzekel-Kan (voice of Armand Assante), the
blood-crazed high priest, starts to get suspicious of the visitors that
the picture begins to regain its momentum. Certainly there's nothing
like the unveiling of a spectacular monster and the arrival of a tidal
wave to get kids back in their seats.
 "El Dorado" comes from Dreamworks, which previously produced
the scintillating 1998 feature "Prince of Egypt." Despite some
eye-popping effects and luscious colors, this one isn't in the same
class, although parents and older siblings who have to accompany little
ones to the theater will probably find this much easier to take than
"Pokemon" or "Snow Day." "The Road to El Dorado" has its potholes, but
it's definitely a scenic route. James Sanford

Title
Review for Great Expectations (1998)
GREAT EXPECTATIONS
(Twentieth-Century Fox)
 "Great Expectations" looks so incredibly beautiful and magnificently styled
it takes you in practically from the first shot, and the luxuriant visuals
continue throughout the movie as director Alfonso Cuaron carefully and
precisely stages every scene for maximum opulence. Through his eyes even the
subways of New York and the crumbling docks of Florida take on a kind of
gritty glamor. The camera sweeps through the streets, soars into the sky and
whirls around stars Ethan Hawke and Gwyneth Paltrow, creating some of the
most striking cinematography in quite a while. Look closely and you'll see
very calculated color schemes that set the mood of each moment. Listen and
you'll hear a soundtrack that cleverly mixes many different kinds of music
with effortless grace. This movie is a dessert for the eyes and ears.
 But "Great Expectations" is also like a stunning commercial that wows you
but doesn't tell you much about the product. In the final analysis this
modernization of the Charles Dickens classic has almost nothing to say and
next to no emotional impact whatsoever. Dickens' novel was about the
difficulties of transcending the rigid class system in mid-19th-century
England; the movie ocassionally pays lip service to the idea of moving up in
the world while retaining your principles, but primarily it's about a
sweet-natured guy named Finn (Hawke) who can't get over his infatuation with
a blonde knockout of a tease named Estella (Paltrow). What drives this
obsession remains a mystery since Estella never reveals herself to be
anything more than a pretty face with a cold mind. Any man with half-sense
would have wised up after the first couple of years, but Finn's pursuit of
her goes on for almost 20 years, as she repeatedly tantalizes him, arouses
him, and then splits, usually without so much as a goodbye.
 It's difficult to see this kind of victimization as particularly
romantic --unless you're a 13-year-old boy getting your heart pulverized for
the first time by your own little Estella-- but Cuaron and company do
everything in their power to make it look spectacular. Anyone with even the
slightest interest in film production should see "Great Expectations" just
to savor the richness of the design. But don't expect to come away from it
feeling satisfied. Like its heroine, the movie is ultimately easier to
admire than to embrace.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Buffalo '66 (1998)
"Buffalo '66," a love song to director-star Vincent Gallo by screenwriter
Vincent Gallo (orchestrated, coincidentally, to the strains of music by
Vincent Gallo), is the type of tripe that gives vanity productions a bad
name.
 In fact, there's ample evidence to indicate that "Buffalo" may not actually
have been scripted at all; most of its ambling, formless content looks and
sounds suspiciously like failed improvisation, with a surplus of uneasy
dialogue, wildly shifting attitudes and, most tellingly, the slightly queasy
looks actors like Christina Ricci and Anjelica Huston exchange as they
realize their scenes aren't working. It's some sort of a credit to Gallo
that he managed to rope in names of Ricci and Huston's caliber in the first
place, and how he managed to pull that off must be considerably more
intriguing than "Buffalo '66" itself.
 If Gallo's gaunt, angular face looks familiar, it's probably from his
appearances in the much-condemned "heroin chic" ads Calvin Klein ran a
couple of years ago. As a supporting actor in edgy little films like Abel
Ferrara's "The Funeral," Gallo has proven his meddle as a credible low-life.
But he's not exactly brimming with charisma, a formidable handicap when you
cast yourself as the star of your own movie.
 Luckily, Ricci has an excess of the magnetism Gallo lacks. She looks
ridiculous throughout "Buffalo '66," sporting a brand of sky-blue eyeshadow
that should have been discontinued after 1985, wearing a half-pound of gooey
lip gloss and dressed in what looks like a cheap nightgown underneath a
cardigan sweater. But so determined is Ricci to get inside the mind of her
character Layla, a young woman so desperate for any kind of affection she
willingly goes along with being kidnapped by ex-con Billy (Gallo), no one
will laugh at her appearance. She's generally the only thing on the screen
worth watching.
 Snatched out of tap dancing school and forced to masquerade as Billy's
wife, Layla quickly gets with the program, perhaps sensing this could be
some off-the-wall opportunity to finally find the warmth she's looking for.
She proceeds to charm Billy's parents, and later in a cut-rate motel room
she tries desperately to work her magic on Billy. The result is one of the
most awkwardly played love scenes since John Travolta and Lily Tomlin
struggled to look hot for one another in the classic howler "Moment By
Moment."
 As Billy's football-crazy mom, Huston tries her best to wring comedy from
Gallo's arid writing, but the part will only serve to remind viewers how
much better Frances McDormand played a similar fanatic in director John
Sayles' "Lone Star." Ben Gazzara, stuck playing Billy's closet lech of a
dad, manages to keep his dignity, which is more than can be said for Rosanna
Arquette, who turns up as a goofball former classmate.
 As a filmmaker, Gallo has a certain unpolished charm, and the flat lighting
and grainy look of the picture suit the subject matter. The dropping in of
little scenes within scenes to illustrate memories is also clever, although
director Peter Greenaway used the technique to better advantage in "The
Pillow Book."
 It's Gallo's unfunny, uninspired script that makes "Buffalo '66" a chore to
sit through. Lines are said over and over again, ad nauseum: In one
excruiating sequence with Layla and Billy in a photo booth, the phrase "span
time" must be used at least 20 times. Martin Scorsese can get away with this
kind of repetition; Gallo cannot.
 Supposedly, "Buffalo '66" was inspired by Gallo's poisoned relationship
with his chilly parents, and perhaps Gallo is simply the latest semi-celeb
to jump on the "I had a lousy childhood, so I'm entitled to be an obnoxious
adult" bandwagon initially launched by Roseanne and recently hijacked by
Bill Clinton. The best response to that kind of thinking comes from another,
far superior, Christina Ricci movie "The Opposite of Sex": "Welcome to the
planet Maturia!" one character tells another. "We have much to teach you."
James Sanford

Title
Review for Teaching Mrs. Tingle (1999)
         One of the perks you can get if you're a highly successful
screenwriter is the freedom to direct your own little vanity
productions. If, for example, you're Kevin Williamson, the creator of
the enormously profitable "Scream" films and the highly successful
"Dawson's Creek," you might even be able to take an old script out of
the closet, dust it off and sell it to Dimension Films.
         That's exactly how "Teaching Mrs. Tingle" came to be. Unfortunately,
the downside of having so much creative license is that you might wind
up putting something on the screen that in no way compares with your
best work. "Tingle" is just such a picture.
 The movie has already been a subject of controversy in light of
the Columbine shootings last spring -- Dimension was forced to alter the
original title "Killing Mrs. Tingle" and shelve some TV ads that made
light of alcoholism -- but the film itself is essentially rather tame
and bland. Viewers expecting a bloody black comedy won't find it here.
 What they'll get instead is a stellar performance from Helen
Mirren as Mrs. Tingle, a vicious history teacher who rules her classroom
-- and the entire school, it seems -- with an iron fist and withering
sarcasm. Mirren singlehandedly rescues the project from being pointless
nonsense; this brilliant actress can communicate more with a twitch of a
lip or a well-timed flick of her eyelashes than anyone else in the cast
can with pages of dialogue.
 Katie Holmes (of "Creek" fame) plays Leigh Ann, a would-be
valedictorian whose chances of getting much-needed scholarships hinge on
her grade from Tingle. But despite having prepared as a final project an
elaborate diary of an accused witch in 17th-century Salem, Leigh Ann
finds Tingle is impossible to impress. In fact, Tingle despises Leigh
Ann and jumps at the chance to implicate her in a cheating scandal.
 In the hopes of setting things right, Leigh Ann and friends Jo
Lynn (Marisa Coughlan) and Luke (Barry Watson) pay a visit to Tingle's
home one night. Unexpected complications ensue, and therein hangs the
rest of the plot.
 For a movie that spends much time discussing and defining
"irony," "Tingle" doesn't have many twists to offer. Nor has Williamson
brought along the quirkiness that made "Scream" and "Scream 2" so much
fun. Almost everything in "Tingle" is predictable, from Tingle's uptight
wardrobe to Leigh Ann's long-suffering waitress-mom (Lesley Ann Warren)
to the sight of a long and winding staircase just waiting for someone to
fall down it. Even the musical score, which combines bits of the Wicked
Witch's theme from "The Wizard of Oz" and Bernard Herrmann's "Psycho,"
is overly obvious.
 Though Holmes, in garish eye makeup, tries valiantly to turn
Leigh Ann into someone worth caring about, she's defeated by the script,
which constantly forces supposedly smart people to do ridiculous things.
As the stereotypical hunk and ditz, Watson and Coughlan barely squeak
by.
         Aside from Mirren, the only other cast member to make an impression is
former teen queen Molly Ringwald, who shows up as an office clerk
recruited as a substitute in Tingle's classroom. The improbable sight of
Ringwald teaching school is certain to make anyone over 30 feel every
bit their age. James Sanford

Title
Review for Mission: Impossible II (2000)
         Even though it grossed about $400 million worldwide, has anyone
really been waiting anxiously for four years for a sequel to "Mission:
Impossible"? How many people do you know who really loved (much less
understood) that slick, cold and mostly forgettable movie?
 Apparently Tom Cruise did, and when it comes to getting films
produced, you don't need much more of a supporter than him. Perhaps,
after spending most of the late 1990s exercising his acting muscles in
such weighty fare as "Eyes Wide Shut" and "Magnolia" he's been yearning
for the day when he can show up on the set, throw on a black leather
jacket, jump on a mototrcycle, ride like the wind and forget all about
digging deep within his psyche to find the right emotion. "Besides," he
might rationalize, "I didn't get the Oscar for 'Magnolia,' and my fans
complained there weren't any explosions in 'Eyes Wide Shut,' so why not
give the people what they want?"
 If pyrotechnics and chases are all it takes to satisfy a summer
movie audience, no one can accuse "Mission: Impossible II" -- or "M:
I-2," as the press materials call it -- of shortchanging its viewers.
There's even a smattering of James Bond-style high-tech spy wizardry
thrown in, including a tracking device implanted in the body that can
send your position anywhere on earth to a satellite that zaps the
information back to a computer, and a variety of extraordinarily
realistic masks that can help heroes masquerade as villains and vice
versa.
 Since "M: I-2" is directed by John Woo ("Face-Off," "The
Killer"), it also includes several grandiose gun battles, almost all of
which are slowed down to emphasize, Woo's followers will say, their
balletic qualities. To the masses, however, the movie's continual use
of  slow-motion will probably be unintentionally funny at first, then
just plain irritating. Unfortunately for Woo, American directors have
ripped off his moves so many times now (most notably in "The Matrix,"
which managed both to steal them and improve upon them) it seems as if
the old master is picking his own pocket.
 Flawed as it is, "M: I-2" is still a major improvement over the
original "Mission," which Brian DePalma seemed to direct on auto-pilot.
For starters, it's got a clearly defined plot line; the original was so
unnecessarily complicated it would have taken flow charts and a slide
show to explain.
 Robert Towne, who wrote both films, borrows heavily from Alfred
Hitchcock's 1946 masterpiece "Notorious," as Cruise's super-agent Ethan
Hunt must send the woman he loves -- in this case, an exotic-looking cat
burglar named Nyah Nordoff-Hall (Thandie Newton) -- into the arms of
evil in order to get the information he needs to save the world. In
"Notorious," Cary Grant was trying to expose Nazis; here, Hunt has to
locate the lethal Chimera virus, which devours its victims from the
inside out in record time. So the dutiful Nyah beds down with her old
boyfriend Sean Ambrose (Dougray Scott), a wealthy, wicked entrepreneur
who'd like to infect all of Australia with Chimera, then put the cure on
the market at an inflated price. Supervillains these days don't want
ransom money -- they want stock options in bio-tech firms.
 In contrast to most of today's crash-and-smash epics, which
can't go more than five minutes without dropping a one-liner, "M: I-2"
maintains a straight face, even when its characters are doing fairly
ridiculous things. When the funniest guy in the movie is Anthony Hopkins
(who shows up at the beginning and the end of the story as Hunt's boss),
you know you're watching a serious-minded film.
 Disappointingly, "M: I-2" brings back Ving Rhames as Hunt's
former partner Luther Stickell, then keeps him on the bench, plopping
him in front of a computer screen or at the controls of a helicopter
instead of letting him in on the action. That territory is reserved for
Cruise and Cruise alone, and the star does a more than capable job of
handling his stunts, including a final knife fight that, while drawn-out
in the same way as Woo's overblown finale in "Face-Off," generates at
least one major shock that's sure to have everyone gasping
simultaneously.
 Cruise comes up startlingly short, however, in his scenes with
Newton. Although the story is built around their romance, there's
nothing exciting going on between them, and even when Towne follows his
"Notorious" blueprint right down to the scene in which our heroine
poisons herself in the name of duty, Hunt seems only moderately
distressed. Poor Nyah would have gotten a much warmer reception from
Cary Grant. James Sanford

Title
Review for Wings of the Dove, The (1997)
       "The Wings of the Dove" --which is "inspired by the novel by
Henry James," according to the press notes-- lifts James' basic
situation and characters but ignores the extensive backstories that
clutter the book, as well as the judgmental tone the author seemed to
take toward his anti-heroine Kate Croy (luminously played by Helena
Bonham Carter). Kate is rescued from a life of destitution with her
opium-addict father (Michael Gambon) by a generous but domineering
Aunt Maude (Charlotte Rampling) who frowns on Kate's beloved, a
penniless journalist named Merton Denscher (Linus Roache). Marriage to
Merton is out of the question, since it would mean Kate being cut off
from both 1910 London society and her aunt's much-needed money. "You
make her sound like a witch," gasps Kate's new friend Milly (Alison
Elliott), when Kate crabs about Maude's restrictions on her. "Oh no,"
Kate says, "she can't fly. . .yet."
Milly, an American innocent with millions in the bank, an eye
for Merton and a cough like Camille's, becomes Kate's unlikely
passport to happiness. What if Merton could be persuaded to woo the
terminally ill heiress? Then she might leave him her fortune, making
it possible for Kate to escape Maude's clutches and marry the man of
her choice.
"The Wings of the Dove" is almost a sort of
turn-of-the-century "Indecent Proposal," with the canals of Venice
standing in for the casinos of Vegas. But though Hossein Amini's
eloquent screenplay brings to the surface the eroticism James only
hinted at, it doesn't neglect the fascinating psychology of the
characters, all of whom have their own agendas and desires to
satisfy. Director Ian Softley (best known for "Backbeat") keeps the
picture sailing along at a surprisingly brisk pace for a period-piece,
and he's gotten exceptional performances from everyone in his cast,
particularly Roache, who conveys Merton's troubled conscience
exquisitely, and Carter, who makes sure we understand Kate's scheming
is motivated by love and desperation, and not by maliciousness.
One of the fascinating sidelights in "Dove" deals with a
skid-row doctor who "repairs" child prostitutes and sends them back
out on the streets with "virginity certificates"; though the Age of
Innocence is gone, those British do like to keep up appearances. James
Sanford

Title
Review for Air Bud: Golden Receiver (1998)
        If there's a little demon who's making your life miserable,
``Air Bud: Golden Receiver'' offers a prime opportunity for sweet
revenge. Subject any wild child to 90 minutes of this charmless,
preachy and flabbergastingly dull excuse for a movie and the kid will
promise you anything in exchange for directions to the door.
  The original ``Air Bud'' introduced us to Buddy, a golden
retriever with a knack for playing basketball. Amateurishly made,
written and acted, this slipshod sequel finds Buddy broadening his
horizons by joining the local junior high school football team
alongside his drippy 13-year-old owner Josh (Kevin Zegers).
  Any vague amusement prompted by the initial sight of the
Budster in his canine-size helmet and customized shoulder pads
evaporates as the gridiron sequences prove to be nothing more than
lazy, badly staged slapstick even young viewers will be hard-pressed
to laugh at.
  When he's not passing the pigskin, Josh is brooding about
his mom Jackie (Cynthia Stevenson) and her budding romance with
veterinarian Patrick (Gregory Harrison). At one point Josh gets so
perturbed he almost boards a train to San Francisco, but anyone hoping
the movie might turn into an eye-opening study of the seamy lives of
runaway boys in big cities will be sorely disappointed.
  Even the sickening sweetness of the domestic drama is easier
to tolerate than the just plain sickening antics of Nora Dunn and
Perry Anzilotti as a pair of moronic Russian circus owners trying to
add Buddy to their menagerie.
  Seeing such former TV faves as Stevenson, Harrison and
particularly Dunn striving to maintain some kind of dignity while
acting in the company of Tim Conway and a ghoulish-looking Dick Martin
provokes sympathetic embarassment, not chuckles.
  Director Richard Martin - perhaps you've caught some of his
other cinematic jewels, such as ``White Tiger'' and ``North of
Pittsburgh'' - is inordinantly fond of medium close-ups, regardless of
whether or not they suit the scene. Often it's a challenge to figure
out exactly what's happening in the movie and most viewers will give
up trying long before the last reel.

Title
Review for Money Talks (1997)
         No single performance in any movie this year has divided
audiences like Chris Tucker's ultra-swishy DJ Ruby Rodd in ``The Fifth
Element.''
  To some, it was the most daring acting stunt since Nicolas
Cage's squeaking Romeo in ``Peggy Sue Got Married.'' To others, it was
either A) a disgusting gay stereotype that ruined the movie, or B) an
aggressively irritating caricature that wore out its welcome after
five minutes.
  Tucker was not the main attraction of ``The Fifty Element,''
but he's the whole show in ``Money Talks,'' a self-congratulatory
showcase he also executive-produced.
  Like the worst Eddie Murphy movies, ``Money Talks'' serves
up a crude blend of flip comedy and jarring violence. Tucker plays
Franklin Hatchett, a car-wash worker who scalps tickets on the
side. Busted by TV reporter James Russell (Charlie Sheen, still
charisma-free after all these years) for no real reason other than to
get the story rolling, Hatchett soon becomes embroiled in a scheme by
some none-too-slick French thieves to get hold of a cache of diamonds.
  How dumb are these crooks? The rocks are hidden inside the
dashboard of a rare Jaguar that's about to go up for auction, and
instead of stealing the car, these guys bid on it.
  Tucker again uses the Michael Jackson-on-helium voice he
employed as Ruby Rodd, and for good reason: It seems to be the only
trick in his bag.
  Whereas Murphy, even on a bad day, can hit you with a
devastating impersonation or some inspired ad-libbing, Tucker's comedy
consists entirely of him screeching profanities.
  Tucker's limited act is easier to take if it's being played
off someone like Bruce Willis in ``Fifth,'' but Sheen's glowering
pseudo-intensity gives Tucker nothing to react to. The lamebrained
screenplay eventually has Russell sheltering the fugitive Hatchett two
days before Russell's wedding, meaning that Russell must drag Hatchett
along to the rehearsal dinner at his future in-laws' Beverly Hills
estate, and guess what Hatchett does there? He steals things! Fresh
idea, huh?
  Heather Locklear, in a miniscule role as Russell's fiancee,
looks like she was dragged to the set after a sleepless night. The
gifted Elise Neal has nothing to do but scold and scurry about as
Hatchett's pregnant girlfriend.
  At least both women were spared participation in the fatuous
finale that finds Hatchett and Russell being chased by bad dudes all
over the Los Angeles Coliseum, which someone has thoughtfully left
wide open and unguarded at 3 a.m. While helicopters explode, rockets
fly into the stands and villains shoot holes through one another,
Tucker squeals loud and long.  Here's hoping he gets the Ned Beatty
part when ``Deliverance'' is finally remade.

Title
Review for High Art (1998)
Of all the Brat Packers of the early 1980s, none was more
consistently charming and down-to-earth than Ally Sheedy. And none has kept
such a low profile in the past few years. While former co-stars such as Demi
Moore and Matthew Broderick have since become household names, Sheedy has
been toiling in films with titles like "Country Justice," "Groupies" and
"The Pickle." If you somehow managed to miss all of them, count yourself in
the majority.
 What's initially most startling about seeing Sheedy in "High Art"
is her appearance: flat black hair, a pasty face that hasn't seen the sun in
weeks, jutting shoulder blades that threaten to burst through her blue-white
flesh. Hard to imagine this is the same young woman who was the adorably
wholesome ingenue of "St. Elmo's Fire" and "War Games." Have the years been
so unkind to her?
 No, actually Sheedy appears to have spent her time out of the
spotlight learning the mechanics of performance. As Lucy Berliner, a
once-acclaimed photographer who drifted out of the New York art scene into a
private world of drugs and dead-end relationships, Sheedy is a genuine
revelation; gone are the days when she coasted by on charm and her
girl-next-door smile. Patricia Clarkson matches Sheedy magnificently as
Greta, an ex-film star from Germany who's now both Lucy's lover and the
albatross around her neck. Though Lucy can see the toil heroin has taken on
the older Greta -- Greta rarely has both eyes open at once and tends to fall
asleep in the midst of sex -- Lucy still can't shake her own addiction.
 Enter downstairs neighbor Syd (Radha Mitchell), a moon-eyed
editorial assistant at Frame magazine who meets Lucy by chance and tries to
engineer a comeback for her. Lucy, who freely admits she's irresponsible, is
less interested in resuming her career than she is in pursuing intimacy with
Syd. Director Lisa Cholodenko makes no attempt to romanticize the bohemian
squalor in which Lucy and Syd live, nor does the screenplay paint the bond
between the two as a positive first step toward a better future. Instead,
both women have serious issues they hope to bury in the relationship: for
Syd, a confused sexual identity; for Lucy, an existence built around
self-destructive behavior. "High Art" opts for a rather predictable finale,
but up until that point the movie works as a compelling, well-observed
character study, tinged with razor-sharp black humor. And Sheedy's incisive
work should guarantee she won't spend the next ten years hiding her light
under a bushel.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Last Days of Disco, The (1998)
THE LAST DAYS OF DISCO
Directed by Whit Stillman
 A younger friend recently told me how jealous he was of the people who were
in college in the early 1980s: "All those great clubs, all that great
music," he gushed. Yeah, I thought, and spiraling inflation, student-loan
cutbacks and the promise of an unfriendly job market when you got out of
school. Happy times, those.
 "The Last Days of Disco," set, according to its opening title in "the very
early 1980s," brings back the P.M. (Pre-Madonna) era in disturbing detail,
recalling the romantic glitziness of the disco years as well as the sleazy
drugginess that ultimately defined and destroyed the party. But rather than
focusing on disco's demise, writer-director Whit Stillman merely uses it as
a backdrop for a group portrait of a handful of young New Yorkers fresh out
of college and anxious for adventure and love. Because this is Stillman
("Barcelona," "Metropolitan") they spend much of their time discussing what
they want to do rather than actually doing it, but their intelligent, often
hilarious conversation turns out to be such a refreshing change from the
usual summer movie dialogue (which generally runs the gamut from "What do
you want from me?" to "Run!") you'll probably be content to let them ramble
on and on.
 The centerpieces of the ensemble are Charlotte (Kate Beckinsale) and Alice
(Chloe Sevigny, looking like a young and streetwise Meryl Streep), former
classmates who now work together as underpaid underlings in a publishing
house and spend their nights in The Club, a Studio 54-style disco. Charlotte
is the more forthright, brassy one, always offering such unsolicited advice
as "whenever you can, try to throw the word 'sexy' into your conversations."
The slightly more demure Alice not only tolerates her slightly overbearing
friend but seems to enjoy her company, at least that is until Charlotte
blurts out in front of Alice's date about the bottle of tetracycline on
Alice's dresser, then tries to smooth things over by telling Alice that
sometimes veneral disease "is not all bad, there are actually positive
aspects."
 Circling Charlotte and Alice are Dez (Christopher Eigemann), an assistant
Club manager who fears both responsibility and his own sexual urges; Jimmy
(Mackenzie Astin), an ad agency lackey whose idea of success is being able
to afford to send his shirts out to the laundry; and Josh (Matt Keeslar), a
genuinely nice guy who's also an assistant district attorney and a manic
depressive. Alice falls fo Josh anyway, prompting Charlotte to snipe, "From
the start, you know he's defective: You usually don't find that out until
much later."
 The performances by the entire ensemble are delightful, with Beckinsale and
Keeslar particularly impressive. Of course, it helps that they get most of
the sharpest lines. Josh's lengthy analysis of Disney's "Lady and the Tramp"
as the type of movie that "programs women to adore jerks" is genuinely
brilliant.
 Stillman also provides a hard-to-resist soundtrack pulsating with such
seductive oldies as Evelyn "Champagne" King's "I Don't Know If It's Right"
and Diana Ross' sizzling "I'm Coming Out" : Do you think she had any idea
what she was singing about back in 1980?. A-

Title
Review for Conspiracy Theory (1997)
         Recently on a call-in radio show the topic was ``Why aren't
there any real movie stars anymore? Where are today's Clark Gables,
John Waynes and Katharine Hepburns?'' griped the host, as some callers
attempted to make cases for Harrison Ford, Tom Cruise and Jodie
Foster.
  Oddly, no one brought up Mel Gibson, but after ``Conspiracy
Theory'' it's unlikely he'll be overlooked next time. If you've ever
questioned Gibson's appeal, this serio-comic thriller offers 135
minutes of persuasive evidence as to why he's become one of the
world's most reliable box-office draws.
  ``Conspiracy Theory'' is an unabashed Ode To Mel, written
specifically for him by Bryan Helgeland and directed by Richard
Donner, who previously led him through the ``Lethal Weapon'' trilogy
and ``Maverick.''
  Julia Roberts may share top billing, but this is not a duet:
Roberts' character isn't even properly introduced until 20 minutes
into the picture, and she doesn't fully figure into the action until
the second hour.
  Donner has always been able to bring out the full spectrum
of Gibson, especially the actor's wackier tendencies and his penchant
for calling up looks of little-boy innocence in the face of
love. ``Conspiracy Theory'' leans heavily on both of these resources,
as Gibson portrays spacey New York City cabbie Jerry Fletcher, who
sees deception and disinformation everywhere.
  Those silver threads in the new $100 bills? Jerry claims
they're a tracking device. And the Grateful Dead is always on tour
because ``they're British agents.''
  ``Conspiracy Theory'' spends a lot of time and energy
establishing Jerry's lunacy; as was the case in ``Maverick,'' Gibson
indulges his passion for ad-libbing and Donner is reluctant to cut
away. As a result, the story often comes to a halt so that its star
can do his thing.
  Not that Helgeland's tale is any ground-breaker itself. Of
course, nutty Jerry's homemade newsletter contains one far-fetched
theory that proves to be true, prompting chases by alleged CIA
psychiatrist Jonas (Patrick Stewart) and his henchmen.
  Justice Department investigator Alice Sutton (Roberts),
Jerry's secret love, is drawn into the whirlpool as mysterious pasts,
hidden identities and old coverups are exposed.
  For at least two-thirds of its length, the film is agreeably
lighthearted nonsense, with a few genuinely odd details: Jerry's
kitchen, for instance, is a paranoiac's dream. Improbabilities and
unanswered questions abound, but they're really moot points.
  What ``Conspiracy Theory'' is really about is Gibson's
talent for charming an audience, and this faux-Hitchcock yarn allows
him to play funny, frantic, edgy and infatuated. Though the story
abruptly turns serious in the last half-hour, Gibson is continuously
charismatic.
  Roberts is allotted a few moments to beam her patented smile
and even gets a couple of solid freak-out scenes near the end, but
she's simply a "special guest star" in Mel's showcase.
  Never a terrifically distinctive director, Donner does have
a gift for making his stars look dazzling and surrounding them with
well-choreographed chaos. He's also extraordinarily self-referential,
as he sends Jerry and his pursuers into a revival theater that's
presenting ``Ladyhawke,'' that 1985 sword-and-sorcery spectacular
directed by, yes, Richard Donner.

Title
Review for Detroit Rock City (1999)
         When it comes to rolling with the changes in the music world,
KISS runs a close second to Cher. The band originally coasted in on the
glam-rock movement of the early 1970s, worked a few ballads like "Beth"
into their repertoire to broaden their audience, went disco in 1979 with
"I Was Made For Lovin' You," tried their hands at Alan Parsons
Project-style pomp-rock with "Music From The Elder" and returned to
their roots just in time for the '70s nostalgia craze. The closing
credits of "Detroit Rock City" find lead singer Gene Simmons belting out
a power ballad penned by Diane Warren, whose "I Don't Want To Miss A
Thing" put Aerosmith back on the top of the charts last summer.
 The KISS story would undoubtedly make a fascinating film, but
"Detroit," despite taking its title from one of the group's early hits,
turns out to have very little to do with the band. Instead, it focuses
on a much less intriguing quartet, four Ohio teens (Giuseppe Andrews,
James Bellows, Edward Furlong and Sam Huntington) who go to extremes to
catch a KISS concert at Cobo Hall in 1978.
 That too might have been a potent topic for a movie if anyone
connected with "Detroit" had any first-hand knowledge of what 1978 was
like.
 No such luck. "Detroit" is so poorly researched it prominently
features David Naughton's "Makin' It" and Rupurt Holmes' "Escape (The
Pina Colada Song)" on the soundtrack despite the fact they were released
in 1979 and then includes a reference to the Weather Girls' "It's
Raining Men," which didn't come along until 1982. The slang in Carl V.
Dupre's shoddy excuse for a script is also alarmingly wrong for the
period.
 Then again, what more should be expected from a film by
director Adam Rifkin, whose previous credits include "Psycho Cop
Returns" and the pitifully bad Charlie Sheen vehicle "The Chase"?
Rifkin's style, to use the term in its loosest sense, consists of
shooting his actors in tight close-ups and having them shout their
lines, as if that somehow makes dumb dialogue funny. Every bit of
slapstick is photographed from multiple angles which only goes to prove
how awkwardly set up most of it is.
 "Detroit" is sorely in need of the authenticity and easy humor
of "Dazed and Confused," the 1994 Richard Linklater comedy it's
obviously trying hard to imitate. But "Dazed" had characters the
audience could actually feel something for; "Detroit" offers insipid
cartoons, including a perverted priest, a gang of John Travolta wannabes
and a witchy mom, ineptly played by Lin Shaye. Even its "heroes" are
interchangable and charmless.
 KISS itself only turns up in person at the very end, performing
for a few brief minutes before the end credits roll. Fans who want to
see the band in action would be better off tracking down a video of
"KISS Meets the Phantom of the Park," a deliciously campy made-for-TV
movie that shows what 1978 was really all about. James Sanford

Title
Review for Meet Joe Black (1998)
"Meet Joe Black" offers definitive proof that there is indeed such a thing
as too much of a good thing. Updating the venerable old chestnut "Death
Takes A Holiday" may have seemed like an inspired idea and casting Brad Pitt
as Death and Anthony Hopkins as his intended victim undoubtedly enhanced the
project's profile at Universal Pictures, badly in need of a marketable movie
after a disasterous year at the box office.
 Turning the movie over to director Martin Brest, however, was -- pardon the
pun -- the kiss of death. As he proved with his 1992 epic "Scent of a
Woman," Brest is a guy who doesn't know the meaning of the word "cut," and
while "Scent" at least offered an Oscar-winning Al Pacino performance to
hold the interest, "Joe" is so low-key it can't help but feel like a slender
little story stretched far beyond its limits. Brest lets scene after scene
ramble on and on, giving the picture a languid air that makes its three-hour
running time feel more like three weeks. For everyone except the most
fervent Pitt fans, this is Sominex Cinema.
 "Joe" gets off to a solid start, introducing Pitt as an effervescent young
lawyer who wows medical student Susan Parrish (Claire Forlani) in a
coffeeshop encounter. But when Susan meets what she thinks is the same man
later on, he seems to have had his personality stolen. Now he's reserved,
stiff and, in many ways, downright weird. That's because Death, curious
about life, is using the lawyer's body as a kind of luxurious vacation home.
 Speaking of luxury, Death has moved in with ultra-rich communications
magnate Bill Parrish (Anthony Hopkins) -- get it? Death and Parrish? --
whose upcoming 65th birthday is destined to be his last. A deal is struck
that as long as Parrish keeps Death amused and keeps his identity a secret,
Parrish can enjoy a little extra time on Earth; Death, in turn, can learn
what peanut butter tastes like and discover what love feels like.
 Most of "Joe" involves Death behaving like a child, slurping food, spinning
around in an office chair and weaving from side to side as he toddles
around. Seeing Pitt play infantilism is good for a few laughs at first, but
it's hard to believe someone as seemingly worldly as Susan finds these
traits sexy; when she begins to undress him during the big poolside love
scene you're uncertain if she's going to seduce him or check his diaper.
 Since no Pitt movie these days is complete without him doing a misguided
accent, he's allowed to tackle Jamaican patois this time out in a subplot
that could easily have been dropped. But then almost everything in "Joe" is
done to excess, including Thomas Newman's grandoise score, which vainly
tries to make this muddled drama seem important and exciting.
 If nothing else, the movie is extremely well-produced and easy to look at,
shot in a rich color scheme of ebony, amber and peach. And certainly there
are worse ways to waste 179 minutes than looking at Pitt and the sloe-eyed
Forlani, who makes Susan easily the most fascinating character in the film.
But as otherworldly romances go, "Joe" pales next to the far more compelling
"City of Angels," which actually had some points to make about the human
condition. "Joe," in contrast, has little to say and takes far too long to
say it.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Patch Adams (1998)

 If actors won Oscars purely for their ability to produce raging rivers of
tears on command, Robin Williams could start writing his acceptance speech
for next year's ceremony right now. Between "What Dreams May Come" and
"Patch Adams," he would have the prize locked up.
 Williams' routine goes something like this: First, there's a forlorn look,
followed by the wrinkling of the eyes. Then his lips begin to tremble, like
the ground around Yosemite moments before a geiser eruption. Finally --
boom! -- industrial-size drops of saline begin cascading down his cheeks,
accompanied by cracking in his voice or a heavy wheeze.
 It's an act that can be used to good effect when Williams is working with a
director such as Gus Van Sant ("Good Will Hunting"), who knows when to cut
away from the waterworks. But "Patch"'s Tom Shadyac is not one to say no to
his stars -- his previous films are the Eddie Murphy remake of "The Nutty
Professor" and Jim Carrey's "Liar Liar" -- so "Patch" pauses every 20
minutes or so to allow Williams a chance to drain his tearducts.
 The movie opens with a warning that what we're about to see is a true
story, perhaps because the filmmakers recognized Steve Oedekerk's script was
so corny it might otherwise have been mistaken for something written 60
years ago and just recovered from the vault. Williams plays Hunter "Patch"
Adams, who overcame clinical depression to become a physician dedicated to
treating patients like people and using humor to ease pain and suffering.
The real-life Adams (who looks more like Salvador Dali than Williams) is the
author of  the well-reviewed books "Gesundheit!" and "House Calls," and he's
also considerably more fascinating than the film gives him credit for being.
 The screenplay is so intent on turning Adams into a modern-day saint it
never offers any genuine insights into the man's background or psychological
makeup, concentrating instead on his clashes with cardboard authority
figures, such as a scheming dean (Bob Gunton) and institutional orderlies
who are too quick to restrain and subdue.
 The brightest patches in "Patch" are those that have little to do with the
basic story, such as a foray into a meat-packers' convention and a
ridiculously elaborate prank played by Adams on a group of visiting
gynecologists. Unfortunately, those moments come early in the film and are
followed by such bitter pills as a grueling scene in which Adams weeps his
way through a rendition of "Blue Skies" and a lengthy soliliquoy allowing
Adams to berate God for being so inefficient and distant. "You rested on the
seventh day," he bellows. "Maybe you should have spent that day on
compassion!"
 "Patch Adams" will probably sway those viewers who sigh whenever they see
that coffee commercial where "Peter" comes home unexpectedly and brightens
everyone's Christmas, but this attempted tribute to the human spirit more
often than not seems like it was written by a computer. All the cliched
characters fall into place -- the frosty/friendly colleague (Monica Potter,
doing her best Julia Roberts imitation), the uptight roommate (Philip
Seymour Hoffman), the adorably kook (Michael Jeter; tummy, be still) -- and
perform exactly as expected, while Williams does his best to moisturize
everyone in his vacinity. The real Patch Adams could have told all concerned
that laughter, not saccharin, is the best medicine, both for patients and
for moviegoers.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
         To that short list of things money can't buy, let's add
"fright." After all, as too many of us found out last week, the multiple
millions of dollars spent on "The Haunting" produced only a
great-looking, utterly ridiculous mess instead of a world-class shocker.
         On the other hand, "The Blair Witch Project," which cost a mere
$60,000, is a nerve-wracking study of the psychology of fear that's
doesn't need computer-generated special effects or digital stereo
screams to give viewers the shudders. Instead, "Witch" writer-directors
Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez have pulled off the trick of turning
their lack of resources into an asset. The movie's unfinished,
catch-as-catch-can look, complete with jiggly camerawork and sometimes
blurred imagery, is one of the primary reasons it's so disturbing and
creepy.
 "Witch" purports to be an assemblage of the film and video shot
by three student filmmakers who ventured deep into the Maryland woods in
1994 in search of material for a project they were planning about "the
Blair Witch," a legendary figure locals have blamed over the years for
mysterious disappearances and murders. The Witch is described by one
source as being uncommonly hairy, by another as "an old woman whose feet
never touch the ground."
 At first, the trio of young documentarians mock these theories
and spend a good deal of their time fooling around and teasing each
other. Even when they lose their way in the forest, Heather, the
unofficial leader of the group, assures her cohorts they'll "all look
back on this and laugh heartily."
 Instead, their circumstances become increasingly more serious,
even perilous. Mysterious piles of rocks appear around their campsite,
indecipherable noises surround them in the night, cryptic symbols are
found and the leafless tree branches begin to look like skeletal fingers
reaching out for the three intruders. What started off as a weekend of
fun begins to look like "Road Rules: The Death Trip."
 Myrick and Sanchez understand that what frightens audiences is
not what they see, but what they don't see. In its use of shadow, sound
and suggestion, "Witch" recalls the classic Val Lewton films of the
1940s, such as "Cat People," "Isle of the Dead" and "The Seventh
Victim." Myrick and Sanchez create a wholly believable atmosphere of
tension and bewilderment that proves to be much scarier than any amount
of blood or gore could be.
 In another offbeat move, Myrick and Sanchez have given their
characters the same names as the actors playing them -- Heather Donahue,
Joshua Leonard and Michael C. Williams -- and the stars' naturalistic
performances and seemingly improvised dialogue lend the tale an eerie
authenticity. Particularly chilling is Donahue's taped confession when
she realizes she doesn't know nearly as much as she thought she did.
It's a scene that's almost too wrenching to watch.
 Shot entirely on video and 16mm film, "Witch" is presented in a
constrained format that takes up only about half the total space on a
movie screen. That's a brilliant move on the part of the directors since
it makes us feel trapped right alongside the would-be filmmakers. We see
only what they see, -- and it becomes clear why they're terrified. James
Sanford

Title
Review for Waking Ned Devine (1998)
        In a year that has seen farces featuring foul-mouthed animals
("Doctor Dolittle") and unique uses for bodily fluids ("There's Something
About Mary") it's a relief to find a relatively wholesome,
out-of-the-mainstream farce you can watch without blushing. "Waking Ned
Devine," a whiskey-soaked slice of Irish whimsy, has already drawn
comparisons to last year's surprise hit "The Full Monty," but don't go
expecting more of the good-natured raunch of that movie. Instead "Ned" has
the gentleness and unforced humor of Scottish director Bill Forsythe's work
("Local Hero," "The Girl in the Picture") with just a sprinkling of the kind
of  black comedy so often found in movies from the Emerald Isle. There's no
particular message or great meaning to be found in writer-director Kirk
Jones' film, just some good fun and a few hearty laughs.
 You don't have to hail from the United Kingdom to relate to the
money-mad residents of Tullymore, a tiny hamlet seized by lottery mania.
Jackie O'Shea (Ian Bannen) and his best friend Michael O' Sullivan (David
Kelly) are particularly crazed. They've learned one of Tullymore's 52
residents has won the jackpot, and Jackie and Michael are eager to buddy up
to whomever the winner turns out to be. Unfortunately, elderly Ned Devine
(Jimmy Keogh) was simultaneously lucky and unlucky: Jackie finds him
clutching the magic ticket, literally thrilled to death by the shock of it
all. What a shame, notes Jackie's long-suffering wife Annie (Fionnula
Flanagan) since "Ned carried a heart the size of his head in his chest."
 But Jackie isn't about to let a little thing like that stand in the
way of collecting a purse of over seven million pounds ($11,200,000). He
first coerces Michael into masquerading as Ned to fool a lottery
investigator from Dublin, then faces the task of convincing the entire town
to go along with the scheme. The result is a breezy mix of slapstick and
subtle character-driven humor. One subplot involves romantic neighbor Finn
(James Nesbitt) and his attempts to win back former flame Maggie (Susan
Lynch) who loves the guy but can't tolerate his smell -- Finn is a pig
farmer -- even after he bathes repeatedly with an assortment of "fruity
soaps."
 "Waking Ned Devine" doesn't always hit the mark and several scenes
seem to be missing their punchlines. But the people Jones has created are so
sweet-natured and the performances by all concerned so endearing the movie's
missteps are easy to forgive. Besides, with its lush green hills, gorgeous
seascape and formidable community spirit, Tullymore is the kind of place
many will enjoy spending time in.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Isn't She Great (2000)
         The biggest problem with "Isn't She Great," an otherwise
entertaining glimpse into the world of author Jacqueline Susann, is that
Paul Rudnick's screenplay omits some of the best bits about its subject.
         For instance, in 1963 Susann published "Every Night,
Josephine," a book about the adventures of her poodle in Manhattan (both
owner and pet frequently went out on the town in matching outfits, to
give you some idea of where Jackie's head was at). During Susann's tour
to promote "Josephine," President John F. Kennedy was assassinated in
Dallas, plunging the country into a week of chaos and mourning. But not
Jackie: She fumed to her friends about how unfair it was that the
Kennedy family was getting all kinds of media coverage. After all,
they'd only experienced a death in the family; she had a book to sell.
 There's another story about how Susann became obsessed with the
ancient Egyptian symbol of the ankh while on the road to promote her
novel "The Love Machine." She insisted on passing out silver and gold
ankhs to almost everyone she met, including the people in her publishing
house, all of whom accepted the gifts and thanked her for her
generosity. It wasn't until later that the recipients learned Susann had
billed all those pricey charms on her expense account and had been
buying the publishers presents with their own money.
 That kind of behind-the-scenes dirt is conspicuously absent
from "Isn't She Great," which gives its heroine all the rough edges of a
throw pillow, but manages to be frequently funny nevertheless.
Impersonating the queen of the pantsuits is Bette Midler, who has
Susann's chutzpah and charm, if not her strikingly offbeat looks. Nathan
Lane plays Irving Mansfield, Susann's devoted husband and partner in
crime.
 When it comes to the facts about Susann's life, Rudnick's
screenplay couldn't care less, and perhaps that's how it should be:
Certainly Susann would never have had a problem with twisting and
tweaking the truth if it made for a better story. She would, however,
almost certainly have trimmed the movie's slightly sticky sequences
about Irving and Jackie's autistic son and Jackie's battle with cancer.
Susann couldn't write sentiment convincingly and neither can Rudnick.
 Most of "Great" centers on the creation and promotion of
Susan's most enduring work, "Valley of the Dolls," a tawdry tale of
three young women who ricochet from bed to bed and coast to coast in
between bouts of alcoholism, pill-popping and cosmetic surgery. Although
Susann's prose could best be described as overripe ("Come here, you
beautiful golden wench!" her hero Lyon Burke cries just before bedding
the virginal Anne in the book), "Dolls" was a mind-bogglingly huge
success upon its publication in 1966 because of Susann's skills as both
a storyteller and a provocateur. The heroines of her novel indulged in
malicious backstabbing, performed unspeakable sexual acts, destroyed
their bodies and slept around in the hopes of scoring fur coats or
wedding rings. It may have been "chocolate-covered trash," as one
character in "Great" calls it, but millions upon millions of readers
gleefully ate it up.
 But writing was only part of what Jacqueline Susann was all
about. She never forgot her real product was herself. From the mid-1960s
until her death in 1974, Susann was a staple on TV talk shows, always
bedecked in a flashy frock and equipped with a few choice wisecracks.
Mansfield, a successful producer and press agent who eventually gave up
his own career to coordinate hers, was her one-man pep squad, constantly
urging her on.
 Midler and Lane both seem to have quite a bit of fun as these
larger than life lovers, as do Stockard Channing as Flo, Jackie's
gin-guzzling confidante (on the subject of authors, she says, "You think
about Hemingway and Dickens and, well, I'm sure there are others") and
John Cleese in an all too brief appearance as the so-hip-it-hurts
publisher who takes a chance on "Dolls." The production design team has
done a groovy job of recreating the Age of Aquarius, particularly Julie
Weiss' suitably loud and showy costumes, and the whipped creamy Burt
Bacharach score, featuring blissful voices murmuring over the melodies
and the ageless Dionne Warwick delivering the theme song, will make you
feel as if 1966 never really ended. James Sanford

Title
Review for Universal Soldier: The Return (1999)
         Sometimes you can actually visualize precious minutes of your
life slipping away as you sit back and do nothing. You want to reach out
and grab those fleeting moments and pull them back, but you can't.
They're gone forever.
 Let's say, for example, you make the mistake of going to see
"Universal Solider: The Return," Jean-Claude Van Damme's latest feeble
attempt to resurrect his career. In addition to watching a thoroughly
lousy movie, you'll also be awarded the chance to lose an hour and a
half of your life you might otherwise spend on considerably more
pleasant endeavors, such as having your feet scraped by a podiatrist's
scapel, or taking a leisurely tour of a local toxic waste dump.
 Van Damme reportedly thinks this squalid sequel to 1992's
"Universal Soldier" (itself only a modest box office success) is going
to put him on the comeback trail. He's leading himself down the primrose
path.
 Misdirected by Mic Rodgers, "Return" manages to take a good
many sure-fire ingredients and combine them into an almost unwatchable
fiasco. Speaking of unwatchable, Van Damme, who's gotten more attention
lately for his seamy personal life than for his screen appearances,
looks prematurely aged and unsteady throughout the movie; obviously,
those recent scandals have taken a toll. His dialogue sounds even more
garbled than usual: As he's trying to evacuate a building under attack,
he reminds someone "diss ees nut uh kiss-miss puh-rad," and it might
take you several minutes to decipher what he's actually trying to say.
 Then again, most of the lines in "Return" are so ridiculous
you'll wish you couldn't understand them. The most absurd go to intrepid
TV reporter Erin Young (the uncharismatic Heidi Schanz), who tags along
with deathless tough guy Luc Deveraux (Van Damme) to cover what happens
when a supercomputer begins giving orders to the Universal Soldiers, the
elite secret army of recycled fighters of which Deveraux was once a
member.
 How dedicated is Erin to her work? So dedicated she assures
Deveraux "I'm not getting killed until I get my story in." So dedicated
she stands up to a bossy general who tries to shoo her away by reminding
him "you can't just throw the media around like we're cattle!". Yeah,
take that, you military fascists!
 The appalling script might be forgivable if the movie had any
creative action sequences or anything original to offer. But aside from
a bewildering scene in which Deveraux and Erin have to infiltrate a
strip joint to use the establishment's computer (!), fresh ideas are
hard to come by in "Return" and the fight choreography is laughably bad.
The big showdown between Deveraux and his nemesis S.E.T.H. (Michael Jai
White, of "Spawn") is confusingly photographed and surprisingly
unexciting, especially given the lengthy build-up to it, and having a
musclebound type make wisecracks after each brush with danger -- for
example, chuckling "I'm just warming up" when he's set on fire -- was a
whole lot funnier 15 years ago in "The Terminator."
 At least "Return" gets the soundtrack it deserves as each brawl
or chase is accompanied by anonymous heavy metal numbers, most of which
sound like somebody's little brother trying out his imitation of Eddie
Van Halen.
 The cherry on top of this rancid cake comes before the movie
even starts, as we're presented with an enormously unappealing trailer
for "Simon Sez," some kind of action flick starring Dennis Rodman (!!)
as some kind of hero who goes around pushing street punks up against
walls and growling "tell me what's going on, before I go Picasso on your
ass and rearrange your face." It's almost enough to make you want to
cry, "Hey! We're moviegoers! You can't just throw us around like we're
cattle!". James Sanford

Title
Review for Avengers, The (1998)
THE AVENGERS (Warner Brothers)
The ill-advised decision by Warner Brothers not to screen "The
Avengers" for critics prior to its release has led to rampant speculation on
exactly how bad the $80 million film must be. At the same time, the numerous
clips from the movie in the HBO "First Look: The Avengers" special that's
been airing for the past couple of weeks make the picture appear pretty
intriguing, and the allure of Ralph Fiennes in a Saville Row wardrobe and
Uma Thurman poured into a leather catsuit is pretty potent in and of itself.
So what's the verdict? Well, suffice to say there have certainly
been much worse films screened this week: "The Avengers" is certainly easier
to sit through than "Air Bud 2: Golden Receiver." Early reports hinting that
WB cut out crucial scenes in a last-ditch effort to make this wildly offbeat
spectacle palatable to the masses appear to be true -- the film plays like
some sort of feverish hallucination with no real logic or continuity. A mess
"The Avengers" may be, but it's infinitely more interesting and imaginative
than such numbing crowdpleasers as "Armageddon" and "Lethal Weapon 4."
Don Macpherson's screenplay emphasizes style over story to such a
point that you'll be hard-pressed at the end of the movie to recall exactly
how it all began. Still there are some mighty amusing moments along the way,
including a wonderful sequence set in a maze of marble halls and stairways,
a chase scene involving a fleet of robotic killer bees, the gorgeously dark
image of Fiennes and Thurman moving serenely across a river inside giant
plastic bubbles, and your only chance this week to see Thurman attacked by a
giant teddy bear. The chemistry between Fiennes (as the relentlessly dapper
secret agent John Steed) and Thurman (as both Dr. Emma Peel and her
malevolent, silent clone) never quite reaches the boiling point, although
the pair seem to enjoy bouncing Macpherson's quirky dialogue off of each
other and both stars look simply smashing throughout.
As Sir August DeWynter, the villain of the piece, Sean Connery
fares somewhat less well. Not only does he have very little to do -- his
role appears to have been truncated somewhere along the line -- but he seems
uncertain of exactly how to play the few scenes he's in. It looks like
Connery was on his way to camp it up like a "Batman" baddie and director
Jeremiah Chechik toned him down. Better to have allowed the actor to follow
his instincts; if anyone should be given leeway to go over the top, it's
someone portraying a madman plotting to blackmail the nations of the world
with a weather-controlling device.
Aside from its defiantly oddball sets, characters and situations,
"The Avengers" sets itself apart from the summer-blockbuster herd by
striving for an intentionally artificial look that calls to mind the
cheapish TV show. For example, the special effects make no attempt to
convince you that that's really a twister in the middle of the Thames River
or that the sudden blizzard enveloping London actually came from the sky.
Instead these visuals simply say, "Of course this is fakery, just like
everything else you're looking at," and it's hard not to be charmed on a
certain level. "The Avengers" is flawed on any number of levels and will
almost certainly prove to be a box-office disaster, but if approached with
an open mind and suspended disbelief it has its share of small delights.
James Sanford

Title
Review for BASEketball (1998)
        If Universal Pictures really wanted viewers to properly
appreciate ``BASEketball'' the studio should have furnished each
ticket-buyer with a free six-pack. This proud-to-be-stupid comedy,
which unites the creators of ``South Park'' and one of the men behind
the ``Naked Gun'' series, is is the type of movie designed to be
watched in a bar, at a frat house, or after a party.  Putting it in an
alcohol-free theatrical setting makes about as much sense as packing a
suitcase for your trip to Nudestock.
  With its consistently raunchy tone ``BASEketball'' can't
help but invite comparisons to ``There's Something About Mary,'' the
hit that's taken low-brow humor to new heights. Though ``BASEketball''
cheerfully pours on one gross-out after another - a guy drinks from a
bidet, clueless heroes Coop (Trey Parker) and Remer (Matt Stone) knock
back tequila with an 8-year-old boy, a character discovers a woman's
hair stuck between his teeth - nothing here approaches the sick genius
of the ``hair gel'' scene in ``Mary.''
  But two points for trying. Stone and Parker may not be
actors, but they'll do anything to get a reaction or to spice up the
movie's so-called plot. The story involves Coop and Remer's attempts
to save their newly created sport from the clutches of villains Cain
(Robert Vaughn) and curvy black-widow Yvette (Jenny McCarthy, who has
very little screen time and almost nothing to do).
  Unsurprisingly, the best laughs in ``BASEketball'' have
nothing to do with the central story, such as when earnest Yasmine
Bleeth asks that the kids she cares for be referred to as
``health-challenged or life-impaired'' rather than terminally ill.
  Writer-director David Zucker crams as much verbal and visual
humor in each shot as possible - watch the background action carefully
- in an effort to amuse or offend as frequently as possible. The
biggest joke of all, however, may be Zucker's claim in the press
information that the film is based on a true story. Now that is funny.

Title
Review for Addicted to Love (1997)
        Although generally thought of as the sweetly romantic type,
Meg Ryan has actually done an impressive amount of dramatic stretching
throughout her career. Those who know her only from hits such as
``When Harry Met Sally'' and ``Sleepless in Seattle'' might not
suspect she's also played an Irish asylum inmate (in ``Restoration''),
a tattooed teen-aged hellraiser (``Promised Land''), and, in her
sharpest performance to date, an alcoholic mother in ``When A Man
Loves A Woman.''
  Ryan is back on the edge in ``Addicted To Love,'' although
you'd never guess it from the film's adorable poster, which shows her,
Matthew Broderick, Tcheky Karyo and Kelly Preston cuddling and
grinning. It looks like a typical box of Hollywood candy, but
``Addicted To Love'' is full of baker's chocolate.
  Ryan is cast as a borderline psychotic named Maggie for whom
love means never having to cry ``uncle.'' Wearing a battered bomber
jacket, aviator goggles, a knowing sneer, and eyeshadow that might
have been applied with a pushbroom, she's the perfect Greenwich
Village vision of a woman scorned.  Cuddling and grinning are not on
her agenda.
  Jilted by her elitist French fiance Anton (Karyo), Maggie
vows to strip him of his dignity. ``When I'm done with him, he'll be a
twitching stain on the floor,'' she tells her timid partner Sam
(Broderick). Sam, a moony astronomer, has hooked up with Maggie
because his dreamy former girlfriend Linda (Preston) is now living
with Anton.
  Setting up shop in the collapsing hovel across the street,
Sam has trained a camera obscura on Linda and Anton's apartment. When
they're not concocting bizarre revenge schemes, involving
lipstick-wearing monkeys and children with perfume-filled squirt guns,
Sam and Maggie are couch potatoes, spellbound by the cinema-verite
sitcom of their ex-lovers' lives.
  ``Addicted To Love'' was directed by Griffin Dunne, star of
Martin Scorsese's harrowing 1985 comedy ``After Hours,'' the story of
an extraordinarily unlucky yuppie trying to survive a night in New
York.  ``Addicted'' is similarly dark. Fans who loved Ryan's
milquetoast persona in ``I.Q.'' and ``French Kiss'' may slip into
shock when they hear Maggie tell the story of her father's unnatural
devotion to his aging dog.
  While it's consistently amusing, the movie falls just short
of blossoming into a genuinely twisted tale. Screenwriter Robert
Gordon develops popsicle toes in the last act, slightly diluting his
astringent humor.
  Karyo, best known for playing stolid types in art-house hits
such as ``La Femme Nikita'' (1991), displays a surprising gift for
physical farce and manages the English language with finesse. ``Why
would I have sex with a hamburger when I can make love to a steak?''
he tells a suspicious Linda, trying to assure her he's not unfaithful.
  Sam may be a bit on the sappy side, but Broderick finds the
guy's naive charm. His understated style blends nicely with Ryan's
edgy chutzpah, and kudos to whoever put Ryan in those tie-dyed
dresses: They definitely become her. Of course, the downside of
Maggie's charisma is that it throws the story's logic out of whack,
making one wonder why Sam is pining away for the wan, colorless Linda
across the street when he's got someone much more exciting in the
house.

Title
Review for One False Move (1991)
ONE FALSE MOVE
(IRS)
 Originally given a brief theatrical run in 1992 --just long enough to
attract the attention of some major critics-- and quickly shuttled to video,
director Carl Franklin's "One False Move" is a tight, tense little thriller
that's most notable today as a launching pad for the careers of Bill Paxton
and Billy Bob Thornton. Thornton co-scripted (with Tom Epperson) this tale
of three drug-dealing killers who cut a bloody path from Los Angeles to the
sleepy hamlet of Star City, Arkansas, the hometown of Fantasia (Cynda
Williams), the least psychotic of the trio. Keeping the peace in Star City
is Dale "Hurricane" Dixon (Paxton), an underworked police chief with dreams
of someday being a supercop. Dale wants very badly to impress the two L.A.
officers (Jim Metzler and Earl Billings) who've arrived in town, unaware of
the fact that his idols ridicule him behind his back. Even though Dale never
seems to listen to anyone but himself, when he accidentally eavesdrops on
the big-city cops making fun of his ambitions, his face all but cracks from
the silent pain surging through it.
 It's this kind of attention to character that sets "One False Move" apart
from the usual crime drama as Thornton and Epperson somehow manage to offset
the story's gorier moments --including a savage opening sequence featuring a
multiple murder-- with some smart twists. There's a terrific backstory
between two of the main characters that turns out to be a crucial plot
pivot, and Dale ultimately reveals himself to be much more than just a
high-energy hick in a violent, well-handled climax.
 "One False Move" has too many flaws to qualify as any sort of classic:
Franklin routinely oversells the comic relief, and Thornton was a better
writer than he was an actor at this point. Paxton's outstanding work is
something to see however, Michael Beach is truly scary as Thornton's quietly
menacing partner, and Williams shows she's a talent whose potential has not
been tapped as effectively in the movies she's done since. "One False Move"
is also historically important as a film that helped pave the way for such
later independent filmmaking triumphs as Quentin Tarantino's "Reservoir
Dogs" and "Pulp Fiction": Like those creations, this was a picture that
dared to veer outside the boundaries of traditional cinema and to take its
audience along for a dizzying ride. James Sanford

Title
Review for Horse Whisperer, The (1998)
As a novel, Nicholas Evans' "The Horse Whisperer" prompted snickers from a
lot of neigh-sayers who complained about the novel's melodramatic elements
and unconvincing characters. But it proved to be a surprise best seller
anyway, and all of Hollywood went after the film rights with a vengeance.
Thankfully, Robert Redford won out, and even better, he had the good sense
(horse sense, perhaps?) to hire Richard La Gravenese to do the screenplay.
La Gravenese was the man who managed to drain the sap out of "The Bridges of
Madison County" a few years ago and turn it into a classy, earthy romance.
He and fellow scribe Eric Roth perform similar good work here, turning what
could have been a tiresome round-up of stereotypes into a genuinely
involving story of two people struggling to bridge the gap between their
very different worlds.
For Tom Booker (Redford), life is simple and unadorned. He's a "horse
whisperer," a man who claims to "help horses with people problems" through a
variety of odd but effective therapies. New Yorkers Annie (Kristin Scott
Thomas) McLean and her teenage daughter Grace (Scarlett Johansson) are
sorely in need of his help. Not long ago, Grace and her horse Pilgrim were
almost killed in a horrible accident that took the lives of Grace's best
friend and her pony. The aftershocks of the tragedy still linger: Grace has
lost a leg, and Pilgrim is maimed and mad.
Desperate to shake her child out of what seems like an unceasing funk, Annie
leaves behind the glossy magazine she edits and loads up Grace and Pilgrim
for a cross-country journey to Montana to consult with Booker.
Of course, results do not come quickly or easily. And, of course, because
this is after all a movie starring Robert Redford, the city gal slowly comes
to understand and even to relish country ways.
Thematically, "The Horse Whisperer" has much in common with "The Electric
Horseman," Redford's popular 1979 vehicle that cast Jane Fonda as the career
woman who thaws out once she leaves her glitzy landscape behind. There's
even a direct allusion to the film in the name of the horse Booker gives to
Annie. But while "Electric Horseman" was a feel-good formula picture, "Horse
Whisperer" is aiming for something much deeper and truer.
Under Redford's beautifully understated direction, it finds its target.
Few directors are as attentive to performances as Redford, and the evidence
is all over this leisurely but never dull tale. Watch how Annie's hand
hurries to straighten out a tablecloth Grace has wrinkled or how Redford
inserts a shot of Annie cracking open a window in her sumptuous Manhattan
digs to breathe in the city air after a confrontation with Grace. These are
the kinds of moments that define characters - and they're exactly the sort
of thing generally snipped out of a film if it threatens to run over two
hours.
Redford allows "The Horse Whisperer" to go on for well over that, and, in
truth, trimming about 15 minutes out of the picture wouldn't have done much
harm. But what he's presented us with is an embarrassment of riches. He's
generously allowed Thomas to occupy the spotlight for most of the story, and
this magnificent actress more than rises to the challenge. She's smart
enough never to allow Annie to come off solely as either a cold, crabby
urbanite or a strident mom: There's always something else lurking just
beneath the surface. In one of the film's most telling scenes, Annie rushes
up to a corral and jumps up to stand on the fence, then slowly slinks back
from it when she realizes she's doing something her daughter no longer can.
There's no explanation, no apology, just a thoughtful little action.
Sam Neill, as her husband, takes what could have been a throwaway role and
makes it valid by never permitting his character to fall into the usual
blustery recriminations we've come to expect from such a third wheel.
Johansson has a difficult time keeping up with them, both literally and
figuratively, but she manages to get in touch with Grace's darkness and
self-pity.
And Redford's performance? What can be said? In a role of this type, he's
simply beyond criticism. It's difficult to imagine the film working nearly
as well without such a charismatic star. Or, for that matter, without such a
gifted director calling the shots.

Title
Review for Fight Club (1999)
         "The first rule of Fight Club is you do not talk about Fight
Club," says ringmaster Tyler Durden (Brad Pitt), addressing a group of
eager young men who've assembled in the basement of a seedy bar to beat
each other senseless. "The second rule of Fight Club is you do not talk
about Fight Club."
 Ah, but rules were made to be broken, and it's a safe bet
everyone who sees director David Fincher's brutal, stylistically
brilliant "Fight Club" will have something to say about it. Given the
current climate of political correctness, most of those comments will be
negative, denouncing the movie for glamorizing violence and terrorism or
shaming the script's anti-everything stance.
 Those with long memories will recall there was once another
picture which earned the same kinds of criticisms when it was first
released: Stanley Kubrick's 1971 masterpiece "A Clockwork Orange." If
"Orange" was a bitter answer to the "all you need is love" message of
the late 1960s, "Club" is a brass-knuckled slap in the face to yuppiedom
and its "greed is good" mantra.
 Chuck Palahniuk's 1996 novel was compared in some critical
quarters to J.G. Ballard's "Crash" in its depiction of outsiders brought
together by shared passions for pain. But Ballard's characters were
cryptic and mostly voyeuristic, while "Fight Club" is made up of
everyday people, the same kinds of educated, mildly successful guys
you'd find in any office building or apartment complex.
 One of them is our nameless narrator (Edward Norton), a recall
coordinator for a major car company. He's a drab, joyless, constantly
exhausted drone who finds his only fulfillment in life comes from
crashing support group meetings, such as those for victims of testicular
cancer or "incest survivors."
 When he crosses pathes first with chain-smoking "tourist" Marla
Singer (Helena Bonham Carter) and then with the mysterious soap salesman
Tyler Durden, our hero begins to rethink his entire life and to wonder
why he's let himself be defined by the IKEA and Crate and Barrel
furnishings decorating his condo. "The things you own end up owning
you," Tyler tells him.
 Fight Club, the new outlet for the narrator's built-up
hostility, is an exclusive society in which the members pummel each
other with their bare fists; black eyes, shattered jaws and broken teeth
are this club's equivalent of the secret handshake. But what begins as a
bloody good time eventually mutates into something bigger and more
dangerous as Fight Club organizer Tyler becomes increasingly messianic
and starts giving out "homework assignments" to his devotees.
 "We have no Great War, no Great Depression," insists Tyler.
"Our great war is a spiritual war, our great depression is our lives."
The sermonette resounds with the Fight Club followers, and it's likely
to ring a familiar bell with many of the twenty- and thirtysomethings in
the audience. The movie is quite astute in recognizing and capitalizing
on the resentment felt by a large portion of our blue-collar and
white-collar workforce, the people who live paycheck to paycheck and
badly want to believe that a new car or a larger wardrobe will magically
change their circumstances.
 Even if you can't accept its message, "Fight Club" may still
draw you in through Fincher's spellbinding scene compositions and clever
use of digital animation and extreme close-ups. Like all his work, the
film is dark and moody -- the actors are almost always seen in
half-light or shadows or varying shades of black -- but at the same time
there's a feverish urgency in the storytelling. Although the movie is
almost two and a half hours long, it seems to whiz past your eyes like a
graffiti-covered subway train.
 After seriously damaging his credibility with wooden
performances in "The Devil's Own," "Seven Years in Tibet" and the
sleep-inducing "Meet Joe Black," Pitt rebounds spectacularly here,
turning Tyler into a hustler who's equal parts smarm and charm. Carter,
speaking in a brittle accent reminiscent of Judy Davis, is engagingly
batty; listen for the song she sings on her way out of Tyler's
dilapidated house.
 Norton, however, is flat-out amazing in the kind of part most
actors would dismiss as being unplayable. He's required to be the
movie's moral center, as well as milk humor out of bizarre situations
(such as a soon-to-be classic moment in his boss' office) and undergo a
near-complete personality transformation in the course of the action.
Norton does it all, and much more, subtly conveying his attraction to
Tyler and his disillusionment with what he sees as the perversion of his
dream.
 That's important because anyone who pays attention will see the
movie is not an endorsement of anarchy, but a warning about what can
happen in a world full of confused, angry men without any positive role
models to follow. Yet Fincher's film will probably be condemned by many
of the same moviegoers who turned mindless schlock like "Double
Jeopardy" (in which we're asked to root for Ashley Judd's character to
track down and kill her husband) and "The General's Daughter" (which
turns a rape victim into a dominatrix before giving us a lengthy
depiction of her murder) into major box office hits. If it does nothing
else, "Fight Club" should serve to point out the hypocracy of the
general public, which begs for gun control and stricter enforcement of
movie ratings one moment and drops its kids off at the video store to
pick up "The Matrix" the next. James Sanford

Title
Review for Mermaids (1990)
         "Mermaids" could well be a Cher fan's dream come true, a lively
tale that allows her to play the kind of free-loving free spirit she
used to sing about in 1970s numbers like "Dixie Girl" ("waitin' on
tables and passin' myself around" went the lyric) and "He'll Never Know"
(in which she vowed never to let her husband find out "his son's only
mine").
 As the flashy, uninhibited Rachel Flax, a single mom in 1963
who has some very 1983 ideas about how to handle both her kids and her
men, Cher is playing, if not exactly close to the bone, very close to
her public persona. It's the sort of star turn that could have added up
to one long in-joke, but the actress sells the character and Rachel is
far more likable onscreen than she was in Patty Dann's delightful novel.
By always staying just a little bit ahead of her audience, Cher manages
to cash in on her image and transcend it at the same time.
 Matching her every step of the way is the ever-endearing Winona
Ryder, who brings a heartbreaking sincerity and magnificent comic timing
to Charlotte, Rachel's pious daughter who finds herself alternately
tormented by the flames of Hell and the fires of adolescent lust.
Charlotte is so desperate to become a saint -- or at the very least, a
nun -- she's immersed herself in the lore of the church, forcing Rachel
to remind her, in a snide voice, "Charlotte, we're Jewish." Everything
Rachel does seems to embarrass Charlotte, whether it's flirting
outrageously with a kindly shoe salesman (Bob Hoskins) or using cookie
cutters to trim the corners off sandwiches.
 The only common ground between the two women is their affection
for baby Kate (Christina Ricci), the product of Rachel's one-night-stand
with an Olympic swimmer. Small surprise that Kate is as obsessed with
water sports as Charlotte is with Catholicism. Adorable without being
for a moment self-conscious or sticky-sweet, Ricci is a child star worth
celebrating.
 "Mermaids" is loose and funky, drifting from episode to episode
as casually as Rachel swings from man to man. But while there's not a
surplus of plot, the movie is brimming with warmth, pure eccentricity
and good humor. Most importantly, it allows Ryder and Cher to play off
each other and the vivid, often hilarious clashes that ensue make this a
delight. James Sanford

Title
Review for Prince of Egypt, The (1998)

 If you cringe at the notion of an animated musical version of the story of
Moses, you might be tempted to steer clear of "The Prince of Egypt."
 Don't.
 Unless, of course, you don't mind missing out on one of the year's most
distinctive, lovingly made movies, a picture that turns a familiar story
into something suprisingly exciting, moving and -- yes -- even funny. In a
word, "Prince" rules.
 Put aside pre-conceived notions about what Biblical dramas should look like
onscreen; though elephantine spectacles like "The Ten Commandments" may have
dazzled audiences 40 years ago, the legions of animators behind "Prince"
have conjured up richly imaginative visions of the Burning Bush, the exodus
of the Hebrews and, most astonishingly, the parting of the Red Sea that must
have Cecil B. DeMille seething with envy in his grave.
 Though the push in animation in recent years has been toward achieving
either stunningly life-like movement (as in Disney's "Lion King" and
"Pocahontas") or using computers to dream up almost three-dimensional
fantasy worlds ("Toy Story," "Antz"), the people behind "Prince" have
intentionally opted for more expressionistic figures and for opulence and
texture over precise detail, and have succeeded; you can almost feel the
rippling blue waters of the Nile and the gritty walls of the Pyramids. Even
the less-than-religious in the audience will find plenty to appreciate, both
in the visuals and in the sprinklings of humor throughout the film -- the
joke about the Sphinx's missing nose is genuinely smart.
 Viewers may be so swept away by the elegance of the production they won't
automatically recognize the phenomenal array of talent providing the voices
for the characters. If it's possible to earn an Oscar nomination for an
offscreen performance, Ralph Fiennes certainly deserves one for his
magnificent reading of the proud but troubled Rameses, one of the most
striking figures ever to appear in an animated film.
 But the rest of the cast do not fade into Fiennes' shadow. Val Kilmer's
Moses sounds properly impassioned, Michelle Pfeiffer lends her edgy warmth
to Moses' spirited wife Tzipporah, and even Sandra Bullock hits the right
defiant notes as Moses' older sister Miriam.
 The only performers who seem out of place are Steve Martin and Martin Short
as daffy high priests, and that's due less to the actors than to the script,
which can't find a way to work them into the story's flow. Their musical
number "Playin' With the Big Boys" is a show-stopper in the wrong sense of
the term.
 The other songs do an admirable job of advancing the plot, especially the
rousing "Through Heaven's Eyes," which condenses Moses and Tzipporah's
meeting, courtship and wedding into four lively minutes, and "When You
Believe," which sets in motion the movie's stunningly beautiful finale.
Animation fans have been blessed with a bumper crop of outstanding works to
choose from this year -- "Mulan," "Antz," "A Bug's Life" -- but this regal,
sensational "Prince" is in a class by itself.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Eye of the Beholder (1999)
         If you took five different jigsaw puzzles, threw the pieces
together on a table top and spent two hours trying to make a cohesive
picture out of the various bits, you might end up with something along
the lines of "Eye of the Beholder." Made in 1998, this maddening mess
features a pre-"Double Jeopardy" Ashley Judd and a pre-"Phantom Menace"
Ewan McGregor alongside a peroxide-dipped Jason Priestley, an
unflatteringly photographed Genevieve Bujold and, for reasons known only
to her agent and God, songstress k.d. lang. All concerned have seen
better days -- and been in much better movies -- than this one.
 McGregor plays Stephen Wilson, a.k.a. "The Eye," a surveillance
expert who bolts from his job at the British Consulate to follow mystery
woman Joanna Eris (Judd) all over North America. Ostensibly a wig-maker
(and she does seem to have enough fake hairpieces at hand to shame even
Cher), Joanna is also deeply disturbed and has a habit of slaying every
man who tries to get close to her. For most guys, this would not be a
turn-on, but Stephen is prodded into pursuing Joanna by visions of his
long-lost daughter, who tells him Joanna is really "just a little girl."
        A little girl who likes to blindfold her lovers shortly before
she stabs them to death perhaps, but a little girl nevertheless. Aside
from having been abandoned by her own daddy one memorably miserable
Christmas night, Joanna also received counseling from a probation
officer (Bujold) who may or may not have helped to make her what she is
today.
 In its first half-hour, "Eye" is baffling but weirdly absorbing
as well. The rest of the film, however, is just plain weird, jumping
from Pittsburgh to San Francisco to Chicago to "The Cafe at the End of
the World," a flapjack shack located somewhere on the Alaskan tundra
where Joanna becomes the world's most unlikely waitress and Stephen her
most devoted customer.
 How Stephen and Joanna have the money for all this traveling
and where Joanna comes up with all the disposable disguises she sports
are questions left unanswered. This is not a story in which logic ever
intrudes on the action. As in a dream, things seem to happen simply
because the characters want them to happen. Or perhaps, given Joanna's
obsession with astrology, because it was written in the stars.
 Director Stephan Elliott labors long and hard to make this
nonsense look as slick as possible and manages to come up with a handful
of effective scenes, such as a split-screen image of Joanna in a bubble
bath and Stephen looking longingly at the wall that separates him from
her. But after nearly two hours of portentous close-ups of French
cigarettes and glasses of cognac, voyeurism, ghosts, sight-seeing and
chases, Elliott untidily wraps everything up with an extremely abrupt
finale, leaving "Eye" just like that mass of scattered jigsaw puzzle
pieces: Sure, there might possibly be a picture there, but who wants to
waste their time trying to put it all together? James Sanford

Title
Review for Excess Baggage (1997)
         Two years ago Sony Pictures signed Alicia Silverstone to a
two-picture deal reportedly worth $10 million. If you haven't heard
much about that coup lately, it's because ``Excess Baggage'' - their
seemingly jinxed first collaboration - has gone through numerous
re-shoots and been shuttled in and out of editing rooms for well over
a year now.
  All in vain, unfortunately: ``Excess Baggage'' still amounts
to a series of flaccid, go-nowhere scenes featuring a sullen
Silverstone and the inarticulate Benicio Del Toro (the least memorable
of ``The Usual Suspects''), an actor almost as alluring as a bowl of
rotting fruit.  Though Christopher Walken and Harry Connick Jr. turn
up occasionally along the way, they fail to relieve the general
dreariness.
  The threadbare story offers up Silverstone as Emily, a poor
little heiress who stages her own kidnapping to get the attention of
her business-minded daddy. Del Toro's Vincent is a master car thief
who inadvertently takes Emily for a ride, then can't shake her.
  Executive producer Silverstone may have seen this film as a
chance to segue from ``Clueless'' to ``Breathless,'' but what could
have been a rowdy romantic caper turns out to be a lethargic slog
across Washington State with two abrasive bores. As Emily and Vincent
vacantly snipe at each other, ``Excess'' has the feel of a
misconceived improvisation-comedy sketch that goes on interminably
without ever coming close to being funny.
  Del Toro's slurred speech and blurry eyes make him seem more
like Cheech and Chong's lost cousin than a hunky bad boy. And
``Excess'' is irrefutable evidence Silverstone needs a strong director
to bring out her effervescence, since it's nowhere to be found here.
  The movie's patchwork production is betrayed by the obvious
fluctuations in Silverstone's figure from scene to scene. ``Do you
like my tummy?''  Emily asks Vincent at one point, and you half-expect
him to answer, ``Which one?''.

Title
Review for Little Mermaid, The (1989)
         In 1988, Disney had enjoyed some degree of success luring
adults into seeing the animated feature "Oliver and Company" by hiring
Bette Midler, Billy Joel and Cheech Marin to provide character voices.
The following year, the company decided to aggressively market "The
Little Mermaid" to the over-18 audience, a group that generally shied
away from G-rated entertainment. Special screenings of the picture were
held in the evenings for adult audiences and an ad campaign was
developed to sell the film as a romantic fantasy rather than as a
children's picture.
 The strategy worked beyond anyone's expectations. "Mermaid"
grossed $85 million in the U.S. alone, making it the most successful
animated feature up to that time and paving the way for such future
smashes as "Aladdin," "Beauty and the Beast," "The Lion King" and
"Pocahontas," all of which would bring in grown-ups as well as
youngsters.
 Seen today, "Mermaid" lacks the visual splendor of those films,
although its best moments are certainly as delightful as anything the
Mouse Factory has ever produced. The movie's biggest flaw is its
tendency to lay on both the humor and the terror a little thick,
although the frequent musical numbers are so well-executed it's easy to
overlook the plot's missteps.
 As written by Hans Christian Andersen, "The Little Mermaid" was
a gloomy fable about the dangers of not knowing your place in society.
Disney's retelling turns that message inside out: The film heartily
advocates exploring new worlds, defying expectations and risking
everything in pursuit of your dreams. The title character Ariel (voice
of Jodi Benson) is a high-spirited 16-year-old sea princess who longs to
explore dry land, an idea her father King Triton (Kenneth Mars)
expressly forbids. "As long as you live under my ocean, you'll obey my
rules," he bellows when he learns she's been sneaking peeks at the
coastline.
 Since this is a Disney film, Ariel is required to sing about
her yearning, in this case the gorgeous anthem "Part of Your World," in
which she wonders "what would I give if I could live out of these
waters? What would I pay for just one day, warm on the sand?"
 That's what Ursula (Pat Carroll), a meddling sea witch, would
like to know. Part Cruella DeVil and part squid, she's willing to turn
Ariel into a human so that the girl can find the mortal prince she's
fallen in love with. But the witch's terms are severe: To pay for the
transformation, Ariel must give up her voice, and if she can't win her
sweetheart over within three days, she'll have to take her place in
Ursula's super-creepy garden of withered, lifeless "poor, unfortunate
souls."
 The Oscar-winning score by Alan Menken and Howard Ashman could
not be any better, featuring the delirious "Under the Sea" (later to be
spoofed in an unforgettable "Simpsons" episode) and the calypso-flavored
"Kiss the Girl," both of which develop into full-blown production
numbers. And "Les Poissons," sung by a demented chef as he tries to get
the unwilling crab Sebastian (Samuel E. Wright) onto the dinner table,
must be one of the strangest musical moments in Disney history.
 But what truly set "Mermaid" apart from its predecessors was
Ariel herself, a strong-willed young woman who set her own course in
life, unlike Cinderella and Snow White, whose destinies were determined
more by fate and chance than by their actions. In contrast, Ariel is the
kind of heroine certain to inspire little girls in the audience to think
for themselves -- and the little boys to spend a lot more time fishing.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Felicia's Journey (1999)
         Director Atom Egoyan specializes in movies that create slightly
unsettling atmospheres, and "Felicia's Journey" is no exception. As the
story (adapted from William Trevor's novel) gently unfolds, it's like
having one of those disturbing dreams in which everything seems normal
but feels a little askew, almost if as some horrible tragedy is lurking
just around the corner. "Journey" is very much the work of the same man
who previously gave us the jarring "The Sweet Hereafter" and "Exotica."
 In the film, Bob Hoskins plays a quiet, cultured little man
named Joseph Hilditch, who lives by himself in a sprawling old house and
works in a factory, overseeing a staff of cooks who prepare lavish
lunches for the workers. Hilditch's mother Gala (played by the dirctor's
wife Arsinee Khanjian) was a popular French chef back in the age of
black-and-white broadcasts and she sometimes invited her little boy on
the program to serve as comic relief. It appears he's still mired in the
1950s, if his choice of home decor and music are any indication. When
his ancient food processor finally gives out, Hilditch simply walks into
a spare room and pulls out another identical model from among the dozens
he's stockpiled.
 "Food must be served by caring hands, not by machines,"
Hilditch tells a salesman trying to pitch him a line of vending machines
that would put his culinary team out of work. "It makes us feel loved."
At home, he creates elaborate gourmet meals for himself, while watching
tapes of his mother's show.
 Felicia (Elaine Cassidy) is also alone in the world, having
been shunned by her self-righteous father after becoming pregnant by
Johnny (Peter McDonald), a young man who left their depressed Irish town
to look for work in England. Utterly guileless and unaware she's
probably been used, Felicia follows him.
 Both characters experience flashbacks in which they suffer at
the hands of domineering parents -- Felicia's dad calls her a whore in
public and Johnny's aloof mother (Brid Brennan) ignores her pleas for
information on where Johnny went, while Hilditch reflects on being
treated like a prop on the set of Gala's show --  although their methods
of processing this abuse are completely dissimilar.
 You may correctly suspect the lives of Hilditch and Felicia are
destined to intersect, but the beauty of "Felicia's Journey" lies in its
refusal to adhere to a predictable path. Every time we think we know
what's going to happen, the story spins off in a curious new direction;
only in its unconvincing climax does it go wrong.
 Speaking in a deliberate, understated voice and using a minimum
of gestures (when he's not cooking, his hands are often buried in his
pockets), Hoskins makes Hilditch a truly unnerving character, someone
who's outwardly sedate yet seems to have ugly secrets drifting around in
the back of his mind. Although Felicia's naive and unquestioning nature
might have made her a fairly drab heroine in the hands of a less
talented actress, Cassidy brings her tenderly to life and makes her
plight heart-wrenching. James Sanford

Title
Review for Deconstructing Harry (1997)
DECONSTRUCTING HARRY
(Fine Line Features)
Directed by Woody Allen
 After such recent frothy forays as "Everyone Says I Love You" and "Mighty
Aphrodite," it comes as a shock to see Woody Allen deliver "Deconstructing
Harry," a vicious black comedy that calls to mind such earlier Allen as
"Crimes and Misdemeanors" and "Stardust Memories." Set against those two,
"Harry" has a more singular focus than "Crimes" and is a much more
successful examination of a writer's psyche than "Stardust." By turns
clever, devestating, bitter and delightful, this challenging piece of work
is easily one of Allen's most mature efforts to date.
 It also offers him an opportunity to play one of his least sympathetic
characters. Harry Block is a self-loathing post-middle-age novelist whose
fiction recalls the work of Philip Roth. But Harry has also written a savage
roman a clef about the faithless, superficial types in his life. "You take
everyone's suffering and turn it into gold!" accuses Lucy (Judy Davis), one
of Harry's several neurotic ex-lovers. Unable to cope with the demands of
loving relationships any longer, Harry now hires prostitutes, such as the
streetwise Cookie Williams (the delightful Hazelle Goodman), a weary vixen
in pink spandex cut-offs and a tie-dyed tank-top who Harry recruits as his
date for a ceremony his former college --he was thrown out before
graduation, so it's not technically his alma mater-- is holding to honor
him.
 Harry doesn't feel much like celebrating, however, since he's suffering
from crippling writer's block. During the course of the film, often at
unexpected moments, Harry's stories come to life and we can see for
ourselves how Harry combined personality traits from both a chilly ex-wife
(a knockout Kirstie Alley) and his rigidly religious sister (Caroline Aaron)
to create the character of Helen, who describes herself as "the shrewish
Jewish hybrid," and is marvelously played by an imaginatively cast Demi
Moore. Harry's isolationism also comes through in his tale of a movie actor
(Robin Williams) who realizes he's somehow become permanently out-of-focus,
and is destined to drift through life as a blur. "Deconstructing Harry"
features many such inspired bits.
 It also continues Allen's experimentation with offbeat camerawork and
editing. He's previously utilized a weaving hand-held camera in "Husbands
and Wives" and attempted Bergmanesque imagery in "Interiors" and
"September," and in "Harry," he tries out the kind of jump-cut editing
popularized by Godard and Truffaut in such films as "Breathless" and "Shoot
The Piano Player." Though the technique sometimes comes off as slightly
self-conscious, it effectively points up Harry's fragmented, chaotic world.
 More off-putting to some of Allen's fans may be the harshness of the
language used by many of the characters, although again, it's perfectly in
keeping with the rage most of these people are feeling. In previous films,
Allen concentrated on the lighter side of divorce: When Meryl Streep left
him and wrote a tell-all book about their failed marriage in "Manhattan,"
Allen played the idea for easy laughs. But Harry's thinly veiled portraits
of his friends and family do some real damage and almost inspire one of his
subjects to kill him. The humor cuts deeper and the laughter is sometimes
tinged with a gasp of disbelief. The brilliance of  "Deconstructing Harry"
lies in Allen's deft blending of its many tones: sardonic,  sarcastic and
sentimental.

Title
Review for Jane Austen's Mafia! (1998)
A well-written spoof can stand on its own. You don't have to know
"Mildred Pierce" and "Gone With the Wind" by heart, for example, to find
Carol Burnett's take-offs on these classics hysterically funny.
On the other hand, you would need to be intimately acquainted with
Francis Ford Coppola's "Godfather" trilogy and Martin Scorsese's "Casino" to
even begin to appreciate most of the gags in "Mafia!" the latest entry in
the anything-for-a-laugh school of filmmaking. Even if you knew the Coppola
and Scorsese works inside out, you still might find this attempted send-up
more curious than it is funny; if you have only a passing familiarity with
the films "Mafia!" tries to satirize, you'll be snoozing instead of
snickering.
The only thing that sets "Mafia!" (still identified in the opening
credits by its pre-release title, "Jane Austen's Mafia!") apart from most of
the other pictures like it is the absence of Leslie Nielsen from the cast.
Otherwise, the picture is business as usual for director Jim Abrahams, one
of the original members of the teams behind "Airplane!" and "Naked Gun." But
doing too many of these joke-athons apparently has drained Abrahams of the
boundless energy that is his usual trademark. "Mafia!" lopes along
aimlessly, squandering most of its best ideas in its first half-hour.
Though he's up to the challenge of alternately parodying Al Pacino and
Robert DeNiro, Jay Mohr doesn't quite have the comic chops to pull it off.
An uproariously funny stand-up comedian, Mohr hasn't yet found a big-screen
role to match his talents. At least Mohr escapes "Mafia!" without undue
shame. Lloyd Bridges, in his last role, is not so fortunate.
Mohr and Bridges play the heads of the Cartino crime family, which
operates Las Vegas' shady Peppermill Casino, an establishment notable for
its high-stakes games of Candy Land and Chutes and Ladders. A brush with
death causes amoral Anthony (Mohr) to reflect back on his people's checkered
history, which includes an escape from the Sicilian town of Salmonella, a
long climb to the top of the olive oil trade, and a move into New York's
seedy underworld.
Typical of the level of "Mafia!'s" humor is a scene on Ellis Island
with American Indians protesting being made to wait because "we had
reservations" and numerous gags about the flatulence of the family matriarch
(Olympia Dukakis, what were you thinking?).
Every so often there's a genuinely clever bit or a bright non
sequitur - Anthony introduces his friends to his new bride Diane (Christina
Applegate) by explaining "we went to Vassar together" - although much of the
material is as dated as those "Evening At the Improv" repeats that turn up
on A&E late at night. Jokes about movies like "Cocktail" and "Child's Play"
might have gone over big in the early days of the Bush administration, but a
decade later they're a solid indicator of "Mafia!'s" humor recession.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Sixth Sense, The (1999)
         Although Bruce Willis has starred in some of the biggest hits
of the past 15 years, his best performances are usually found in movies
that turn out to be relatively uncommercial. In blockbusters such as
"Armageddon" or "Die Hard With a Vengeance," Willis seems to be going
through his paces with a minimum of enthusiasm, but he was unforgettably
creepy in director Alan Rudolph's "Mortal Thoughts" and did a superb job
playing a shattered Vietnam vet in "In Country," both of which are
currently languishing on a dusty shelf at a video store near you.
 The fact that Willis is exceptionally good in "The Sixth Sense"
cannot bode well for the film's prospects at the box office. Neither
does the picture's deceptive ad campaign, which seems to promise a
gruesome thriller. Instead, "Sense" is a slow-building drama with some
sharp acting, a few shocks and a devilishly clever final twist.
 In "Sense," Willis is cast as Dr. Malcolm Crowe, a
Philadelphia-based child psychiatrist with "a gift for teaching children
how to be strong," according to his wife Anna (Olivia Williams of
"Rushmore"). His skills are put to the test when he takes on the case of
Cole Sear (Haley Joel Osment), a 9-year-old social outcast suffering
from acute anxiety and symptoms of schizophrenia.
 After some gentle prodding from Crowe, Cole finally reveals the
reasons behind his bizarre behavior: He's an unwilling medium who can
see and hear troubled spirits. The apartment Cole shares with his slowly
unravelling mom Lynn (Toni Collette) is frequently visited by the
spectres of people whose lives ended tragically, such as a little girl
who was poisoned by her mom and an abused wife whose husband drove her
to suicide.
 Unlike the psychic hero of "The Shining" however, Cole is not
being threatened by these visions. In fact, one of the flaws of
writer-director M. Night Shyamalan's screenplay is its inability to
decide exactly what Cole's ethereal friends want or why they've come to
him. Even the author doesn't seem to have an answer.
 What Shyamalan can offer instead is a quietly unsettling
atmosphere, which sets "Sense" apart from most contemporary suspense
films. That the movie works as well as it does is due primarily to
Willis and Osment, an exceptionally expressive young actor who never
resorts to cuteness. Willis effectively underplays Crowe's trepidations
and dwindling self-confidence while Collette, the heroine of "Muriel's
Wedding," is convincingly distraught in what turns out to be a rather
underwritten role.
 "Sense" is also extremely well-produced, using its City of
Brotherly Love setting, an elegiac score by James Newton Howard and
excellent editing to enhance its somber mood. Shyamalan's film proves
sometimes silence can create a much more powerful impact than a steady
bombardment of crashes and booms. James Sanford

Title
Review for Mod Squad, The (1999)
It's clear Hollywood is scraping the bottom of the old TV barrel when
filmmakers start adapting things like "The Mod Squad," which left the
airwaves more than 25 years ago and has rarely been seen since. The
movie, which is louder, racier and more profane than the show ever
could have been, retains the concept of the serieswithout managing to
have much fun with it. This is a movie awash in dazzling trimmings but
devoid of ideas.
For awhile, "The Mod Squad" looks like it may get by on flash
alone. Director Scott Silver, cinematographer Ellen Kuras and editor
Dorian Harris use every possible film school trick (high-speed zooms,
time-lapse photography, arty out-of-focus shots, jump cuts, etc.) to
jump-start the film, and the images are backed up by a scorching
soundtrack mixing vintage R&B and new tunes by Lauryn Hill, Bjork and
Everlast. The score by BC Smith is ripe with the cheesy organs and
blaring horns of classic 1970s TV music.
But like last year's "The Avengers," "Mod Squad" eventually dissolves
into stylish chaos. It's as if the production team dressed up the
stage, lined up all the right people and then lost interest in the
project once the cameras started to roll.
The script, which vacillates between confusion and tedium, sets up
young troublemakers Julie (Claire Danes), Lincoln (Omar Epps) and Pete
(Giovanni Ribisi) as novice cops under the wing of Captain Greer
(Dennis Farina), who realizes the three can effectively infiltrate
places and organizations the boys in blue never could. When Greer
turns up dead, the trio realizes the force was against him, and they
scramble to uncover the corruption within the police department.
Perhaps because of the scattershot screenplay, the cast members
frequently seem to be at a loss as to how to play their roles. Danes'
performance as a recovering alcoholic and drug addict is not one of
her strongest, although she does come up with a convincingly grungy
look for Julie. Aside from occasionally glowering and looking
concerned, Epps has absolutely nothing to do.
Only the doughy, slack-jawed Ribisi ("The Other Sister," "Saving
Private Ryan") appears to have a solid grasp on his characterization
of Pete as a would-be fly guy who generally ends up looking like a
dweeb.
For a movie that seems to know exactly how silly it is - at one point,
Pete and Julie make "Scream"-style cracks about how the big finale had
better not take place in an abandoned warehouse - "The Mod Squad"
keeps a straight, sometimes even sullen face too much of the
time. Hopefully the promised/threatened film version of "Charlie's
Angels" won't make the same mistake.

Title
Review for Marius et Jeannette (1997)
"Marius and Jeannette" is one of those movies that succeeds or falls flat
depending on your response to the quirky characters screenwriters Robert
Guediguian and Jean-Louis Milesi have cooked up. If you're easily charmed by
stories featuring nutty folks playing Cupid for troubled lovers, you may
find this French comedy enchanting. If eccentricity alone doesn't usually
persuade you to buy a ticket, "Marius" is 102 missable minutes.
 The movie's saving grace is the luminous Ariane Ascaride, whose performance
here may remind you of the legendary Anna Magnani. Like Magnani, Ascaride
has an earthiness and warmth that makes her instantly endearing.
 Ascaride plays Jeannette, a mother of two who's had an inordinate amount of
bad luck with men and is barely scraping by in the depressed city of
Marseilles. When she tries to steal some paint from an abandoned cement
factory in the hopes of sprucing up her house, Jeannette runs into guard
Marius (Gerard Meylan) and before you can say "la vie en rose," a
relationship is blooming.
 Not counting on Ascaride's charm to carry the film, director Guediguian
keeps shifting away from the love story to introduce considerably less
beguiling characters, most of whom seem like refugees from some European
sitcom. Particularly disorienting is middle-aged Communist Caroline (Pascale
Roberts): One minute, she's Sophie Zawistowska, dredging up memories of her
imprisonment in a concentration camp, and the next she's Mrs. Roper, trying
to put the make on an elderly beau.
 These lovable kooks, who spend all their considerable spare time hashing
out left-wing politics, finally pool their resources to get Marius and
Jeannette together. Neighbors like these would be a strong incentive for
escaping the low-rent district and Guediguian's heavy-handedness as both
writer and director doesn't make them any easier to stomach.
 Aside from Ascaride, the only flashes of interest in "Marius and Jeannette"
are the film's observations about the French economy, in which a worker can
slip down the ladder of success much more easily than he or she can ascend.
The movie's strongest image is a tracking shot that follows Jeannette as she
makes her way to the back of a seemingly endless line of job interviewees.
That moment has a good deal more truth than anything else in this contrived
tale.
James Sanford

Title
Review for 10 Things I Hate About You (1999)
"10 Things I Hate About You," a movie almost as warm and witty as its
title suggests, is the latest attempt to dress up Shakespeare in hip
garb.  Taking its inspiration from "Taming of the Shrew," "10 Things"
also throws in some slightly more contemporary ingredients - 1980s New
Wave hits, 1990s sexual frankness, etc. - and whips them into a bland
concoction that's a lot closer to sludge than it is to froth.  The
result seems to go on for weeks rather than hours; suffice it to say
there are a lot more than 10 things wrong with this film.
There's also one thing very right about it, the casting of Julia
Stiles as Kat Stratford, a high school student who drives around
listening to Joan Jett's "Bad Reputation" and who is denounced by her
classmates as a "bitter, self-righteous hag," even though she's quite
lovely in the rare moments when she's smiling instead of snarling. Kat
prefers reading Sylvia Plath and mailing out college applications to
socializing with the gang at Padua High, much to the dismay of her
younger, peppier and far more popular sister Bianca (Larisa Oleynik),
who prowls the campus in sundresses she apparently has been sewn into.
That makes Bianca prime date-bait, but Dad (Larry Miller), an
obstetrician who spends his days "up to my elbows in placenta" thanks
to teen pregnancies, has forbidden Bianca to go out until Kat finds a
guy, something that seems about as likely as Puff Daddy writing one of
his own songs. It's up to Cameron (Joseph Gordon-Levitt), Bianca's
would-be beau, to contrive a solution that will get Kat out of the
house and put Bianca by his side.
The pleasingly acerbic Stiles, one of the few redeeming factors about
the recent mini-series "The '60s," gives it her all, and if the script
of "10 Things" had had one-tenth the zest of the now-classic
"AtomicShakespeare" episode of the TV series "Moonlighting" (which
also used "Shrew" as its springboard) she might have managed to make
something of the vehicle.  Unfortunately, as "10 Things" turns into
another guy-makes-bet-about-girl story, it ends up covering much of
the same territory as "She's All That," and with much less charm and
wit.
The dialogue is resolutely flat - "where did you come from? The planet
Loser?" Bianca asks Kat in one typical crack -and by the time
screenwriters Karen McCullah Lutz and Kirsten Smith drop in the
inevitable "you're sooo not who I thought you were" scene, the film is
a lost cause.
It is worth mentioning, however, that Lutz and Smith are kind enough
to put in some bits that the Bard forgot to write, such as a
rollicking teen beer bash and a finale set at a prom that features not
one, but two second-rate bands. So much for the evolution of art in
the last 400-odd years.

Title
Review for Why Do Fools Fall In Love (1998)
        Groupies, take heed: Marrying a musician may ultimately
benefit your lawyer more than it will you. That's the message of ``Why
Do Fools Fall In Love?''  about the three-way battle for the estate of
singer Frankie Lymon, who died at the age of 25 in 1968 from a heroin
overdose.
  In his wake, Lymon left behind a trio of women all claiming
to be his legitimate widow: Zola Taylor (Halle Berry), a singer with
the Platters; Elizabeth Waters (Vivica A. Fox), a good girl gone
wrong; and Emira Eagle (Lela Rochon), a strait-laced schoolteacher
from Georgia. Certainly, considering what each lady had to put up with
while being around the former teen idol, each was entitled to some
kind of monetary compensation.
  The picture ``Fools'' paints of Lymon is woefully incomplete
- writer Tina Andrews can't seem to put her finger on exactly what led
to Lymon's heroin addiction, for instance - but what's shown is
unflattering and sad.  An overnight success with his racially mixed
group The Teenagers in the late 1950s, the sweet-voiced Lymon fell out
of favor with the public almost as quickly, thanks to his forbidden
dance with a white girl on national TV and his ill-fated attempt to go
solo. Like many teen idols, he was effectively washed-up before age
20.
  In what can only be read as an attempt to spice up his
otherwise dreary life, Lymon first romanced Taylor, then married
Waters before setting his sights on wholesome Eagle. All were won over
by Lymon's charm and attentiveness. Taylor and Waters would later
suffer greatly for their association with him. While Lymon once sang
``I'm Not A Juvenile Delinquent,'' offstage he was a junkie, a thief
and a user.
  Berry, Rochon and Fox are all far more believable as young
women than they are in the sequences set in the mid-1980s in which
director Gregory Nava allows each to ham it up disconcertingly. As
Lymon, Larenz Tate capably handles a difficult character whose
behavior ranges from beguiling to bizarre, but the true highlight of
the cast is the incomparable Little Richard, playing himself with
panache.
  ``Fools'' turns up the occasional insight into how this
irresponsible man wormed his way into the hearts of three very
different women, but more often than not Andrews' screenplay can't
decide if it's a cautionary tale about the perils of marrying a
has-been or a rowdy ``you go, girl'' celebration of sisterhood. The
movie's timeline is pitifully tangled from the very start, when Waters
hears Diana Ross' ``new'' cover of the Lymon-penned ``Why Do Fools
Fall In Love?'' in 1985 - four years after the record went gold. In a
scene set in 1964, Waters and Lymon listen to Otis Redding's ``Try A
Little Tenderness'' on the radio; an astonishing feat considering the
song wasn't recorded until 1966.
  When it comes to recreating the Alan Freed rock-n-roll shows
of the 1950s and the deliciously tacky go-go look of TV's
``Hullabaloo,'' the movie scores. But the courtroom battle that forms
the dramatic centerpiece of the film is not exactly a nail-biter; it's
a clear case of ``Smart-Mouthed Women, Foolish Choices.''

Title
Review for Bug's Life, A (1998)

 If you could be a fly on the wall at Disney these days, you'd probably
overhear more than a few conversations about that cursed Dreamworks and
their lousy "Antz" movie. It's bad enough that "Antz" has become the
highest-grossing non-Disney animated feature ever, but on top of that it's
stolen a considerable amount of the thunder from "A Bug's Life," the latest
collaboration between Disney and the cutting-edge computer-animation studio
Pixar, which produced the enormously successful "Toy Story" in 1995.
 What made "Toy Story" click with grown-up audiences was its hipness, both
in its humor and in its casting of such diverse talents as Tom Hanks, Tim
Allen and Don Rickles as the primary voices. Kids who had no clue who
Rickles was or why their parents were laughing at some of the in-jokes
appreciated the movie for its rambunctious action and lovable characters.
And certainly everyone was wowed by the movie's brilliant graphics.
 Indeed, "Toy Story" was a tough act to follow, and while "A Bug's Life" is
never less than pleasant and full of luscious Cinemascope visuals, coming on
the heels of "Antz" it can't help but suffer in comparison; voices like
"Bug's" Dave Foley, Phyllis Diller and Denis Leary can't hold a candle to
the talents of Woody Allen, Christopher Walken and Gene Hackman in "Antz."
Though most adults who've seen the Dreamworks picture will feel a bit of
deja vu sitting through this one, "Life" is simpler and less witty than
"Antz," which should make it more attractive to very young viewers.
 Like "Toy Story," "A Bug's Life" has been directed by John Lasseter, who
keeps the pace sprightly in the hopes of concealing an extremely wispy
story. Ant Island is annually raided by greedy grasshoppers led by the
bullying Hopper (given a distinctively nasty voice by Kevin Spacey), who
insists the ants slave away for months gathering food for these unwanted
guests. Ambitious Fleck (Foley) volunteers to seek out some ant-friendly
"warrior bugs" who'll send Hopper and friends scrurrying, but what he
believes is a gang of wandering mercenaries turns out to be nothing more
than the unemployed performers from a failed flea circus; they go home with
Fleck under the mistaken assumption they've been hired to do a show.
 Since this is a Disney picture you need not worry that it all ends in a
squishy bug massacre, although in all frankness "A Bug's Life" often seems
to cry out for a little more irreverence, a dash more danger. The memorable
villain in "Toy Story" was a psychotic kid named Sid who liked to mutilate
dolls and action figures; he gave the story a black-comic edge. In contrast,
Hopper and his crew are one-dimensional baddies who don't provide much
genuine menace or excitement.
 Nor is the amiable Fleck a particularly colorful hero in the tradition of
Buzz Lightyear or Woody. The best-written characters here are the macho
ladybug Francis (Leary), a pretentious stick-bug with the haughty tone of
David Hyde Pierce, and a pair of mumbling, hyperactive pill-bugs named Tuck
and Roll who take their love of performing to extremes. Should you brave the
holiday crowds to see the film this weekend, don't head up the aisles when
the end credits begin to roll, or you'll miss some extremely funny
mock-outtakes; they're well-worth sticking around for.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Major League: Back to the Minors (1998)
        Perhaps having an easily identifiable title is all it takes to
get a movie these days. How else to explain the rash of unnecessary
and unappealing sequels - ``Odd Couple II,'' ``Species 2,'' ``Home
Alone 3,'' etc. - currently congesting marquees?
Add ``Major League 3: Back To The Minors'' to that list.
Granted, it's not as excruiating as ``Major League 2,'' but why
continue this franchise, especially since Charlie Sheen, Tom Berenger
and Wesley Snipes, the guys who made the 1989 original work, have long
since fled? In their place is a trio of tired-looking ex-TV stars:
Scott Bakula (``Quantum Leap''), Ted McGinley (``Married With
Children'') and Corbin Bernsen (``L.A. Law''), whose wardrobe of
oversize jackets and baggy sweaters can't hide the fact the
once-upon-a-time hunk should now be sporting an ``I'm Not Fat, I'm
Fluffy'' bumper sticker.
The drabness of the leads sets the tone for the picture, which
is not so much awful as it is awfully dull. Movies like ``Titanic''
weave vibrant, colorful tapestries; movies like ``Major League 3'' are
as invigorating as watching Saran Wrap unroll.
Writer-director John Warren has torn several pages from ``Bull
Durham'' without appropriating any of its humor, sexiness or human
interest.  Former major leaguer Gus Cantrell (Bakula) is talked into
managing the Buzz, a very minor league team made up of quirky souls,
such as an ex-ballet star who does arabesques on the field, a
hoity-toity pitcher who laments the fact that backwoods diners don't
serve balsamic vinegar, and one genuine talent in the form of
``Downtown'' Anderson (Walton Goggins, looking like Jim Carrey's rabid
brother). You need not call the Psychic Friends to figure out Cantrell
succeeds in turning this motley crew into a ball team to be reckoned
with.
McGinley, in one of the most grating comic performances since
Chris Tucker in ``Money Talks,'' plays Huff, the snobbish manager of
the Minnesota Twins, a dork whose grudge against Cantrell leads to a
showdown between the Twins and the Buzz in Minneapolis. Indicative of
``League 3'' 's skimpy budget, the ``crowd'' at the big game seems to
number only a few hundred, barely enough to fill one section of seats
in the stadium.
Those sad souls who can never get their fill of Bob Uecker
will delight in his frequent appearances throughout the film, dropping
such knee-slappers as ``they timed this kid's fastball with an
hourglass'' and ``I've seen better hands on a clock.'' But the movie's
sharpest insight goes to Huff: ``When you get major talent, you get
major personalities.'' To elaborate on that line, you could say when
you get major talent, you get ``Major League,'' and when you get major
has-beens, you get ``Major League 3.''

Title
Review for Lost Horizon (1937)
        When the pressures of the world become too much, we all wish we
could escape to a place of peace, and there's no better spot for rest
and meditation than Shangri-La, the utopia conjured up by author James
Hilton in his best-selling novel "Lost Horizon."
 The book has been adapted for the screen twice, first in 1937
by director Frank Capra and again in 1973 by director Ross Hunter.
Hunter's version, one of the great fiascoes of its time -- it was
renamed "Lost Investment" by Columbia Pictures executives after they got
a look at its balance sheet -- has become a campy curio, but Capra's
epic still holds up some 60 years after its debut. It's just been
reissued on DVD, with plenty of extra features certain to delight, such
as a documentary on the painstaking restoration process on the picture
and previously unseen sequences featuring stars Ronald Colman, Jane
Wyatt and Isabel Jewell.
 In the mid-1930s, Columbia was a studio still trying to shake
off its small-time reputation. "Lost Horizon," which cost a
then-staggering $2.5 million and was promoted as "The Mightiest of All
Motion Pictures," represented a major risk for the company. Much of the
budget was spent on production values: "Horizon" is played out on a
series of exquisite sets, many of them obviously influenced by the
designs of Frank Lloyd Wright.
 Despite deservedly earning an Oscar for Best Art Direction and
a nomination for Best Picture, the film did not recoup its cost on its
first go-around. By the time it was re-released a few years later, WWII
was raging and the pacifist message of "Horizon" was no longer in vogue,
which led Columbia to re-edit the 132-minute film. It took film
historian Robert Gitt 25 years to reassemble Capra's original vision, in
some cases using still photographs and the surviving soundtrack to
represent sequences which have not survived.
 Although Hilton's story of a crew of refugees discovering a
blissful secret society in the hidden Valley of the Blue Moon is still a
potent fantasy, what makes "Horizon" truly fascinating today is noting
some of the more offbeat aspects of the picture. Although no one in
Shangri-La has any use for money or property, Capra takes pains to
inject a less-than-subtle anti-Communist message by including a crabby
Russian (Margo) who insists on leaving paradise and suffers greatly as a
result.
 The various relationships detailed in the story are also rather
provocative. Certainly the combative friendship between Barnard (Thomas
Mitchell) and Lovett (Edward Everett Horton) can be read more than one
way, especially when Barnard insists on calling his buddy "Lovey" and
suggests they play games of "honeymoon bridge" and "double solitaire."
 In the book, the heroic Conway (Colman) falls for a Tibetan
woman named Lo-Tsen. But since onscreen interracial attraction was still
a major taboo in the 1930s, his love interest here is a schoolteacher
named Sandra, played by the radiant Wyatt. Although their affair appears
to be mostly platonic, there's an attention-grabbing scene in which
Conway spies on a skinnydipping Sandra.
 "She," adapted from H. Rider Haggard's timeless tale, is
another story of perils and passion in a forgotten land. Like "Horizon,"
it's been produced multiple times, although never as lavishly and
entertainingly as the 1935 version (available on both VHS and DVD),
starring the imposing Helen Gahagan as She-Who-Must-Be-Obeyed, the
eternally beautiful ruler of the lost kingdom of Kor.
 This would be the only film appearance of Gahagan, a noted stage and
opera star who later entered the political arena as Helen Gahagan
Douglas. Reportedly, Gahagan was embarrassed by the movie and vowed
never to heed Hollywood's call again. But perhaps she was her own
severest critic: "She" represents Depression Era escapism at its very
peak.
 The movie was produced by Merian  C. Cooper, who'd struck it
rich two years earlier with "King Kong." Those with sharp eyes will note
that the enormous gate cutting Kor off from the outside world is the
same one which served -- for awhile -- to hold Kong in his natural
habitat on Skull Island. A box office failure in its day, "She" all but
vanished into the RKO vaults for the next 40 years, not even showing up
on the Late, Late Show.
 What a loss. This outrageously opulent adventure tale stars the
stoic Randolph Scott as American explorer John Vincey, who ventures into
the Arctic to find the story behind a cryptic 500-year-old letter.
Accompanying him are the jolly Holly (Nigel Bruce, later to become a
familiar face as Dr. Watson in the Nigel Rathbone "Sherlock Holmes"
movies) and the feisty Tanya (Helen Mack), who's secretly attracted to
John. After surviving an avalanche and battling cave-dwelling cannibals,
the intrepid trio come face to face with a much greater danger, the
imperious She, who has been bathing in a flame of eternal life and
biding her time for centuries, looking for true love. "I am yesterday
and today and tomorrow," She muses, shortly before deciding John is the
man worth waiting half a millennium for. Tanya, however, has other
ideas.
 Thrillingly scored by Max Steiner and featuring backdrops you
won't believe (check out the patio of Holly and Tanya's apartment),
"She" climaxes with a dazzling ceremony in the Hall of Kings, featuring
hundreds of extras performing some of the most bizarre choreography ever
filmed. That sequence alone would make the movie worthwhile, but it
turns out to be only one of the many treasures of "She." James Sanford

Title
Review for Mike's Murder (1984)
    Mike Chuhutsky is a good-looking, fairly bright guy trying to get by in
Los Angeles. Sometimes he teaches tennis to wealthy matrons. Sometimes he
lays carpet. Sometimes he deals drugs.
It's only in this last enterprise that he loses his wits. He and his
unstable friend Pete pick up a stash of cocaine to deliver to a major
dealer; when the kingpin's back is turned, the duo steal some of the product
to sell themselves. The plan goes awry, Pete escapes and Mike is left to
learn the hard way that small-time hustlers have less to fear from the
police than they do from the higher-ups in their own line of work.
"Mike's Murder" is an unorthodox thriller that's less concerned with
scaring viewers than it is with building a carefully controlled atmosphere
of menace. Despite the movie's lurid-sounding title, director James Bridges
is less concerned with the crime than with the repercussions it has on
Mike's on-again, off-again lover, a bank teller named Betty Ann Parrish
(Debra Winger).
Aside from a mutually satisfying one-night-stand and some half-hearted
phone sex, Betty and Mike's relationship barely exists. Multiple months pass
between their few encounters. But when Mike is slain in what his cohorts
call an "enforcement killing," the usually unadventurous Betty finds herself
drawn into an L.A. subculture where appearances mean a lot and money means
everything. Mike's associates chop up their cocaine with gold razor blades
and lounge around beside Olympic-size swimming pools ringed by Roman
sculptures when they're not racing from deal to deal in pricey sportscars.
Everyone -- Betty included -- seems to build their lives around their
car and their phone. An answering machine becomes Betty's primary link to
the outside world, and when she's not at home listening to messages or
waiting for calls, Betty is on the road, looking for people she's talked to
on the phone. The characters in "Mike's Murder" often seem to be
half-sleepwalking, drifting aimlessly until the rare times they bump into
something that excites or arouses them. It's as if most of the movie was
taking place during those  early-evening/after-work hours when you're almost
running on empty, unsure of whether to take a nap or to start dinner.
Winger, saddled with playing a woman who's more often reactive than
active, does everything she can to bring Betty to life and to uncover some
glimmers of personality in a shallowly written part. The strongest
performance in the movie, however, comes from Darryl Larson as the jittery
cokehead Pete. His is a truly eerie portrait of a man barely living on the
edge.  As Mike, Mark Keyloun doesn't exert the kind of magnetism that would
make Betty a slave to his charms, a flaw which leaves the movie with a
hollow center.
What does come across in "Mike's Murder" is a beautifully evoked,
vaguely creepy atmosphere that hangs over every scene. The crime that sets
the story in motion remains unsolved at the end, and perhaps that's how it
should be. It's not important who really killed Mike Chuhutsky, Bridges
seems to be saying. Not when it's so obvious what killed him.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Fire Down Below (1997)
           Steven, Steven, Steven. Your movies used to be fun to
watch.  ``Hard To Kill,'' ``Marked For Death,'' the first ``Under
Siege'': terrific stuff.
  But somewhere along the line Mr. Seagal changed and so did
his films.  It's not enough for them to be simple entertainment now;
these days, they have to carry foreboding messages about social
responsibility and ecology.
  They also have to carry Seagal himself, which is too much
for any movie to bear. Early in his career, Seagal seemed to have a
sense of humor about himself: Recently, he's become a vainglorious
joke.
Barbra Streisand is often accused of admiring herself too much
but she's got nothing on Seagal, whose latest epics devote substantial
portions of their footage to lovingly lit close-ups of their star.
  At least Streisand has reasonably reliable taste in scripts.
Seagal chooses projects like ``Fire Down Below,'' which, despite its
title, has nothing to do with Bob Seger or sailors on shore
leave. Unfortunately, it has nothing to do with entertainment either.
  Instead, ``Fire'' relies on the timeworn tale of
tight-lipped country folk hiding a dirty secret, in this case an
underground stockpile of toxic chemicals. Some of these poisons have
been leaking into the water supply, killing fish and giving some of
the young'uns powerful rashes.
  So EPA investigator Jack Taggart (guess who) goes undercover
in the rural hamlet of Jackson, Ky., as a minister's assistant. To
make sure he blends in with the locals, Jack packs a dazzling array of
expensive custom leather jackets, sporting everything from fringe to
candy-stripes, and to get maximum use from this wardrobe he changes
coats at least a couple of times a day.
  That's typical of the foolishness that runs throughout
``Fire Down Below,'' even behind the scenes. While Seagal poses and
preens, he warbles several country-fried tunes offscreen, and suffice
to say there won't be a run on the soundtrack album.
  Marg Helgenberger takes her best stab at playing Jack's love
interest, the kind of tormented backwoodsy recluse Helen Reddy used to
sing songs about. The stultifying aw-shucks courtship between the two
is like a nightmarish version of ``The Bridges of Madison County,''
and an incest subplot involving Helgenberger and her wild-eyed brother
(Stephen Lang) is laughably mishandled.
  A slumming Kris Kristofferson drops by a few times as a
generic corporate meanie, a sleazy casino owner who has a bedroom
adjacent to his business office. His redneck henchmen seem to exist
solely so that Jack can snap their bones and they can sing his praises
afterward, noting ``I've never been hit so hard in my life!'' and ``I
think he broke my jaw!''
  Like his earlier turkey ``On Deadly Ground,'' ``Fire Down
Below'' also makes time for Seagal to - quite literally - take the
pulpit and sermonize on the evil that rich people do to the
environment for the love of money.  The speech is so heavy-handed it
would make Jane Fonda squirm, and it somehow never mentions the
pollution wealthy Steven Seagal has dumped in our theaters in the form
of ``Fire Down Below.''

Title
Review for Dinosaur (2000)
 That phrase used to be fairly commonplace in movie promotion,
but with the truth-in-advertising laws, it's rarely applied to anything
these days. The fact is, after enduring decades of 3-D films,
Sensurround epics, Cinemascope, gigantic IMAX visuals, digital stereo
and even the short-lived Smell-A-Vision, most audiences can't imagine
there's anything new under the sun.
 But "Dinosaur" is truly like nothing you've ever seen before.
 If your primary experiences with computer animation were "Antz"
and the "Toy Story" movies, you owe it to yourself to take a look at
"Dinosaur," just to appreciate how far this relatively new art has
already progressed. You'll find a styrachosaur with skin that ripples,
lemurs with fur that ruffles in the breeze and bloodthirsty raptors that
move with an almost alarming dexterity. The action takes place against
rich, vividly detailed backgrounds and it's followed closely by cameras
that can effortlessly zoom along the ground, swoop into the sky and
plunge into a river.
 The fluidity and gracefulness of this work makes the similar
effects in "Jurassic Park" and "The Lost World" seem almost clunky by
comparison; there's even a none-too-subtle jab at Steven Spielberg's
epics about two-thirds of the way through the movie. By the time
"Dinosaur" offers us the sight of seemingly hundreds of homeless
dinosaurs moving wearily across the desert in search of water and food,
it's likely you will have forgotten the creations you're watching are
not real, living, breathing creatures. The five years of work producer
Pam Marsden (a Kalamazoo College graduate) and her team of animators
have put into the film pay off magnificently: The illusion captivates us
completely.
 Like "Titanic," "Dinosaur" is basically a very simple tale made
compelling by astounding technology. Since this is, after all, a Disney
film, there's a hero who doesn't fit in with his peers (see "Tarzan,"
"Hercules," etc.), a character-building journey toward self-discovery
(as in "Mulan," "Pocahontas," "The Hunchback of Notre Dame") and a
climactic face-off with a terrifying villain, in this case, a savage
carnotaur with a theater-rattling roar.
 The carnotaurs and the raptors don't speak, but everyone else
does, and the script sometimes strains to be reassuringly jokey, one of
the film's few real weaknesses. On the plus side, we are spared any
musical interludes. There's not even an anthem slapped on the end
credits -- hurrah!
 The plot of "Dinosaur" revolves around Aladar (voice by D.B.
Sweeney), a compassionate young iguanodon who grows up among a playful
family of lemurs after being stolen from his crib and deposited by a
pterodactyl on a remote island. When his home is destroyed by a
spectacularly rendered meteor shower, Aladar and the surviving lemurs
make their way to the mainland and join up with scores of fellow
refugees being led to a new nesting ground by the surly Kron (Samuel E.
Wright) and his gruff partner Bruton (Peter Siragusa). Like some sort of
prehistoric cult leader, Kron drives his troops mercilessly and demands
complete loyalty, although his sister Neera (Julianna Margulies)
eventually tires of his stern single-mindedness and opts to follow the
more compassionate Aladar.
 With less than 90 minutes in which to tell its story,
"Dinosaur" zooms along, maintaining a relatively high level of intensity
for a Disney drama. The vicious attacks by the carnotaurs and the
raptors are guaranteed to get viewers on the edges of their seats and
parents should be warned they are not entirely bloodless. Although
"Dinosaur" isn't the relentlessly scary experience the last half of
"Jurassic Park" was, the movie's PG rating is well-deserved.
 The movie cushions the shocks somewhat with the comforting
presence of grandmotherly brachiosaur Baylene, who speaks in the
beguiling British tones of Joan Plowright, and her friend Eema, a
styrachosaur with the earth-mama voice of Della Reese. When one of the
lemurs hitches on a ride on top of Eema, she bellows, "That's just what
I need -- a monkey on my back," and Reese's reading makes the pun much
funnier than it should be.
 What will rope most viewers -- especially kids -- into seeing
"Dinosaur" more than once is not the humor, however. It will be the
sheer spectacle of the film, the brilliance of the animation, the
glorious, all-encompassing sound and the thrill of sitting spellbound in
the dark alongside hundreds of other moviegoers while you discover a
wondrous new frontier of filmmaking. Even with the best home theater
system money can buy, that kind of excitement is impossible to recreate
in your living room, and that's why millions will be lining up at their
local theater to savor the "Dinosaur" experience this weekend. James
Sanford

Title
Review for Haunting, The (1999)
     If you've been wondering what could have prompted that recent
declaration from Liam Neeson that he's ready to give up movies
altogether, the answer is now playing at a cineplex near you. It's
called "The Haunting," and it's so thoroughly misguided and muddled
Dreamworks, the studio foisting this bomb on the public, ought to hire a
special corps of ushers to hand out sympathy cards to patrons as they
exit the theater.
This is the second time Hollywood has tackled Shirley Jackson's
book "The Haunting of Hill House." It was previously filmed by director
Robert Wise in 1963 -- that version was also titled "The Haunting" --
with Julie Harris, Claire Bloom and Richard Johnson. The 1963 "Haunting"
remains one of the eeriest ghost stories ever filmed; though Wise never
showed a single spirit, he and his cast created such an overpowering
atmosphere of menace the movie is still potent today.
The current "Haunting" comes from director Jan de Bont ("Twister,"
"Speed"), who is better known as a master of disaster and an
orchestrator of special effects than as a craftsman capable of creating
a mood piece. Thus, this version is chock-full of computer-generated
ghouls and bone-shaking digital stereo cacophony, none of which makes
the movie in any way frightening or even particularly interesting.
The difference between the two "Haunting"s is literally spelled
out. In the Wise film, a creepy message is found scrawled across a wall
in chalk. In de Bont's film, a similiar sentiment is painted in blood.
Everything in this "Haunting" is louder, more elaborate and far sillier
than anything in the original.
David Self's choppy screenplay introduces Dr. Marrow (Neeson) who
has recruited a trio of subjects for a little experiment in terror,
scheduled to take place in Hill House, a cavernous estate full of dark
secrets. Eleanor (Lili Taylor) has spent a large portion of her life
waiting on her invalid mother; Theo (Catherine Zeta Jones) is a
free-loving jet-setter; Luke (Owen Wilson) is basically just horny. The
only thing these three have in common is insomnia, and they've been
lured to Dr. Marrow by the promise of big bucks for participating in a
research study.
But Dr. Marrow is more concerned with observing the mechanics of
fear than in finding a cure for sleeplessness, and certainly no one gets
much shut-eye when the unseen inhabitants of Hill House begin treating
their guests to a series of bizarre visions and increasingly violent
bursts of mayhem.
The story's original subtext -- that most of the calamity was
springing from the virginal Eleanor's long-repressed libido -- vanishes
under Self's heavy hand. In the 1963 film, Harris' Eleanor was torn
between returning the affections of Bloom's Theo, who was openly
lesbian, and Johnson's Dr. Markway. Here, Self introduces Theo as a
bisexual, only to promptly drop the matter altogether; hard to believe
filmmakers could be more frank about sexuality 36 years ago than they
can be today.
But this "Haunting" isn't about people anyway. It's about
technology. But despite the millions that must have been spent on the
various creations the fact remains that they simply aren't scary. In
some cases, they're even ludicrous: When a chorus of carved cherubs
comes screamingly to life, it's hard not to think of the Pop N Fresh
doughboy being threatened with a trip to the oven.
What's more disturbing is the amateurishness of the performances,
given the reputations of those involved. Neeson and Jones seem
completely uninspired, Wilson is just plain awful and the ordinarily
wonderful Taylor proves here that she can't scream convincingly to save
her life. While she barely manages to retain her dignity in scenes that
call for her to have conversations with curtains, even Taylor can't rise
above a ridiculous climactic speech full of pop psychology and jibberish
about family values.
Yes, Mr. Neeson, you're right. "The Haunting" is awful enough to
make anyone reconsider their career choice. Especially film critics.

Title
Review for Bug's Life, A (1998)

 If you could be a fly on the wall at Disney these days, you'd probably
overhear more than a few conversations about that cursed Dreamworks and
their lousy "Antz" movie. It's bad enough that "Antz" has become the
highest-grossing non-Disney animated feature ever, but on top of that it's
stolen a considerable amount of the thunder from "A Bug's Life," the latest
collaboration between Disney and the cutting-edge computer-animation studio
Pixar, who produced the enormously successful "Toy Story" in 1995.
 What made "Toy Story" click with grown-up audiences was its hipness, both
in its humor and in its casting of such diverse talents as Tom Hanks, Tim
Allen and Don Rickles as the primary voices. Kids who had no clue who
Rickles was or why their parents were laughing at some of the in-jokes
appreciated the movie for its rambunctious action and lovable characters.
And certainly everyone was wowed by the movie's brilliant graphics.
 Indeed, "Toy Story" was a tough act to follow, and while "A Bug's Life" is
never less than pleasant and full of luscious Cinemascope visuals, coming on
the heels of "Antz" it can't help but suffer in comparison; voices like
"Bug's" Dave Foley, Phyllis Diller and Denis Leary can't hold a candle to
the talents of Woody Allen, Christopher Walken and Gene Hackman in "Antz."
Though most adults who've seen the Dreamworks picture will feel a bit of
deja vu sitting through this one, "Life" is simpler and less witty than
"Antz," which should make it more attractive to very young viewers.
 Like "Toy Story," "A Bug's Life" has been directed by John Lasseter, who
keeps the pace sprightly in the hopes of concealing an extremely wispy
story. Ant Island is annually raided by greedy grasshoppers led by the
bullying Hopper (given a distinctively nasty voice by Kevin Spacey), who
insists the ants slave away for months gathering food for these unwanted
guests. Ambitious Fleck (Foley) volunteers to seek out some ant-friendly
"warrior bugs" who'll send Hopper and friends scrurrying, but what he
believes is a gang of wandering mercenaries turns out to be nothing more
than the unemployed performers from a failed flea circus; they go home with
Fleck under the mistaken assumption they've been hired to do a show.
 Since this is a Disney picture you need not worry that it all ends in a
squishy bug massacre, although in all frankness "A Bug's Life" often seems
to cry out for a little more irreverence, a dash more danger. The memorable
villain in "Toy Story" was a psychotic kid named Sid who liked to mutilate
dolls and action figures; he gave the story a black-comic edge. In contrast,
Hopper and his crew are one-dimensional baddies who don't provide much
genuine menace or excitement.
 Nor is the amiable Fleck a particularly colorful hero in the tradition of
Buzz Lightyear or Woody. The best-written characters here are the macho
ladybug Francis (Leary), a pretentious stick-bug with the haughty tone of
David Hyde Pierce, and a pair of mumbling, hyperactive pill-bugs named Tuck
and Roll who take their love of performing to extremes. Should you brave the
holiday crowds to see the film this weekend, don't head up the aisles when
the end credits begin to roll, or you'll miss some extremely funny
mock-outtakes; they're well-worth sticking around for.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil (1997)
The last time he directed a screen adaptation of a best-selling book -
Robert James Waller's "The Bridges of Madison County" - Clint Eastwood was
working with a slender piece of fiction that required extensive reworking
and fleshing-out. With John Berendt's "Midnight In The Garden Of Good and
Evil," he faces exactly the opposite dilemma: You need not have read the
book to suspect that, even with its generous two-and-a-half hour running
time, the movie is a severely abridged version of a longer, richer story.
That said, it should also be noted that much of what Eastwood has managed to
capture is deliciously decadent, and it's crowned by a smashing performance
by the always-mesmerizing Kevin Spacey as Jim Williams, the story's pivotal
figure.
Even amongst the numerous eccentrics who populate sultry Savannah, Williams
is a true character, a suave antiques dealer who's amassed a fortune in the
past decade and isn't shy about showing off his money. "I'm nouveau-riche,"
he tells Town & Country magazine reporter John Kelso (John Cusack), "but
then, it's the riche that counts."
But in the shadows of his lavish lifestyle lurks a slightly sordid secret
life involving young hustlers and drugs. When Williams wraps up one of his
sumptuous Christmas parties by shooting a young man he's been arguing with,
he simultaneously blows off the door of his closet as well, and the
skeletons come tumbling out.
New Yorker Kelso, who's in town to cover the annual holiday bash, finds
himself perversely enchanted by Williams and the sundry other locals he
encounters in the Georgia town. "It's like "Gone With The Wind" on
mescaline!" he enthuses to his editor.
That proves to be only a slight exaggeration, what with a voodoo priestess,
a local lunatic who keeps horseflies tied to his shirt, and a devoted
servant who still tends to the ghost of a long-dead dog, all walking the
streets. Topping them all is The Lady Chablis (played by, uh, herself), a
showgirl who looks like Mary Wilson, talks like Cher, and behaves like a
less-inhibited Madonna.
Each of these people is intriguing, but "Midnight" can't find the time to
give each his/her due. Remember those "Want to know more?" buttons that
surfaced throughout "Starship Troopers"? You'll be wishing they'd pop up
here.
Eastwood packs many amusing and eerie moments into "Midnight," elegantly
evoking both the wearying heat and the wild heart of Savannah, and treating
his cast of eccentrics with a certain degree of dignity. By this time
though, he ought to have learned that nepotism doesn't pay: Casting his son
Kyle in "Honkytonk Man" handicapped that film, and putting daughter Alison
in "Midnight" is a similar mistake.
While by no means a disaster along the lines of Sofia Coppola in "The
Godfather III," Ms. Eastwood doesn't demonstrate much allure as the siren
who puts the make on Kelso; the part seems to cry out for an Ashley Judd or
a Mira Sorvino instead.

Title
Review for Wishmaster (1997)
As if there weren't already enough good reasons not to do drugs on
the job, "Wishmaster" offers one more; You might get loaded and shatter a
priceless Persian statue, thereby releasing an evil genie on the world.
Wouldn't want that on your conscience now, would you?
True, "Wishmaster" may run into trouble qualifying for any Oscars,
but rest assured it's a shoo-in to win in the Goriest Feature-Length Public
Service Announcement category -- should anyone see fit to create one. This
utterly pointless foray into idiocy begins when a malevolent "Djinn" is
accidentally freed from the opal he's been locked inside for centuries, by
the manner described earlier. Thankfully, for the Djinn's purposes, he's
been unleashed in a part of California inhabited solely by greedy morons, so
this genie-meanie has no trouble finding suckers willing to trade their
immortal souls in exchange for some flashy material rewards.
Only jewel expert Alex (former child star Tammy Lauren) knows the
Djinn's little secret, leading -- after multiple murders and scores of lame
jokes -- to a showdown in a red crepe-paper Hell that looks like it was
built for the school play, followed shortly thereafter by an unintentionally
uproarious finale in which sculptures magically spring to life and
disembowel snooty guests at a swanky cocktail party.
Trying her best to show dread and anxiety at every opportunity
Lauren contorts her face into a variety of grotesque expressions that should
make Jim Carrey jealous, and to give the movie some glimmer of horror-film
credibility "Nightmare On Elm Street" veteran Robert Englund hangs around
just long enough to cough up a slimy demon, once again putting to use all
those years of classical theater training he often spotlights in his
biographies.
Makeup artist-turned-director Robert Kurtzman's idea of a good scare
is a phone that rings ridiculously loudly or a masked actor who pops in out
of nowhere to startle someone. When in doubt, he splashes around as much
blood as possible to cover up the fact that "Wishmaster"'s script is about
as consistently terrifying as "Pocahontas."
"Forget Barbara Eden! Forget Robin Williams!" warns a genie expert
midway through the madness. She forgot to add you should forget about seeing
"Wishmaster" while you're at it. James Sanford

Title
Review for Virgin Suicides, The (1999)
         In the same way the muses inspired the artists of ancient
Greece, the five Lisbon sisters haunt the dreams of the adolescent boys
of Grosse Pointe in "The Virgin Suicides," director Sofia Coppola's
lyrical, chilling adaptation of Jeffrey Eugenides' novel about sexual
repression and promiscuity in the 1970s. Like those muses, the Lisbons
float out of reach of mere mortals and when they briefly descend to
Earth, they leave broken hearts and poetry in their wake.
 Coppola follows the book almost to the letter, using dialogue
sparingly and letting a narration by Giovanni Ribisi carry her film to
its tragic conclusion. But "Virgin Suicides" cloaks the story in layers
of mystery and fantastic imagery, tantalizing its viewers as easily as
the wise-beyond-her-years Lux (Kirsten Dunst) commands the attention of
every young man who crosses her path. No detail is too minor to escape
Coppola's attention: The thump of a needle hitting a record, the ticking
of a clock and the drip from a leaking roof are just as important in
setting the scene here as the Styx anthems, peasant skirts and shaggy
haircuts. Instead of laughing at 1975, Coppola weaves a sensuous
suburban myth that seduces you completely.
 "Suicides" is a work of fiction, although, like Eugenides'
prose, it's so believable you half-expect to find a "based on a true
story" label in its credits. The Lisbons are a quietly dysfunctional
family headed up by a do-nothing dad (an amazingly low-key and effective
James Woods) and a religious-fanatic mom (Kathleen Turner) who is so
obsessed with keeping her daughters hidden from the evils of society,
she inadvertently smothers them. Lux, the middle child, is the only one
who escapes her mother's grasp and when she does, she recklessly
searches for some kind of acceptance from the outside world.
 With a come-hither smile and relaxed body language, Dunst
magically and vibrantly brings Lux to life. Watching this hopelessly
confused girl give herself up first to a dopey jock named Trip (Josh
Hartnett), then to a parade of anonymous lovers, results in the saddest
and most heart-wrenching sex scenes since Jennifer Jason Leigh's
similarly misguided character lost her virginity in "Fast Times at
Ridgemont High."
 Coppola's screenplay doesn't throw out the humor of the novel
either. Far from the little sophisticates we've gotten used to seeing in
teen comedies such as "Down To You" and "Drive Me Crazy," the characters
here are just as awkward and fumbling as most high-schoolers. Since they
can't express their feelings in their own words, the boys call the
Lisbons up and play records over the phone for them. Songs such as
Carole King's "So Far Away" and the Bee Gees' "Run To Me" take on
enormous poignancy as they become the lifeline that keeps the girls
anchored to the outside world.
 Even Trip, perceived by all as a dreamy stud, is overwhelmed
when confronted by the love-hungry Lux. It's easy to see why: Dunst,
perhaps best-remembered as the eerily wise little blood-drinker in
"Interview With the Vampire," is now outfitted with a combination of sex
appeal and vulnerability reminiscent of what we saw when the then
teen-aged Uma Thurman slithered through "Henry and June" and "Dangerous
Liaisons." No wonder Mama Lisbon is so worried about keeping her at
home.
 The casting of former glamor girl Turner as the plump, pristine
matriarch works exceptionally well. Behind her facade of anxiety you can
glimpse the teasing siren she once was and see that somewhere along the
way Mrs. Lisbon buried her past under heaps of shame and
self-righteousness.
 Her daughters refuse to go down that path, however, and instead
find a way to remain forever young and free from their mother's
influence. What's worse, Coppola asks, having children who don't always
behave as we'd like them to, or not having children at all? James
Sanford

Title
Review for Misérables, Les (1998)
        Given all the liberties Hollywood has taken with the classics
lately - spicing up ``The Man in the Iron Mask'' with scatological
jokes; a ``Romeo & Juliet'' boasting a disco-belting drag queen;
Indian attacks and a happy ending for Hester Prynne in the Demi Moore
version of ``The Scarlet Letter,'' etc. - it comes as a surprise to
see director Bille August offering up a perfectly straightforward and
decidedly nonmusical version of ``Les Miserables.'' But while there's
something to be said for reverence, nobody said it had to come at the
expense of passion or imagination, and, sadly, ``Miserables'' comes up
short in both those departments.
  Aside from being shot on somewhat stagy-looking sets and
with sometimes inappropriate lighting levels, there's nothing
glaringly wrong with August's film, and several of the performances
are terrific. Why then does it seem about as engaging as a
well-written book report?
  It's tempting to blame August himself. Since his
Oscar-winning ``Pelle the Conqueror,'' August has floundered,
directing the dismal ``House of the Spirits,'' which somehow managed
to squander the talents of Meryl Streep, Glenn Close, Jeremy Irons and
Winona Ryder, and ``Smilla's Sense of Snow,'' a silly attempt to film
the complex best-seller. By the low standards set by that pair, ``Les
Miserables'' looks almost like a comeback.
  In paring down Hugo's epic melodrama to its basics,
screenwriter Rafael Yglesias has chosen to focus on the novel's
mid-section, beginning with the parole of Jean Valjean (Liam Neeson)
after two decades of serving hard time in the quarries for stealing
bread. In later years Valjean will end up as mayor of the village of
Vigau, where he oversees a tile factory.
  One of his workers is Fantine (Uma Thurman), a young beauty
struggling to make ends meet. When it's revealed that the unwed
Fantine has had a baby, Valjean's underlings fire her, sending her on
a downward spiral into prostitution and poverty.
  Around the same time, Vigau gets a new prefect of police,
Javert (Geoffrey Rush), formerly a guard in the prison where Valjean
was incarcerated. Javert eventually recognizes Valjean and does
everything he can to ruin the lives of Valjean, Fantine - who Valjean
tries to help - and later Fantine's child Cosette (Claire Danes), whom
Valjean adopts.
  ``Reform is a discredited fantasy,'' Javert tells his
partners when they try to suggest Valjean's nature has changed over
the years. The always subtle and detail-oriented Neeson reads Valjean
as a brute trying to reclaim his humanity, while Rush plays up
Javert's cold detachment from the same world Valjean is reaching out
to. Both actors are outstanding.
  Thurman strains to deglamorize herself, but even when she's
coughing up blood at death's door she can't help looking
seductive. Still, she's a sympathetic Fantine, and Danes, despite a
sometimes wavering accent, sparkles as the noble, devoted Cosette.
  If only the director had the same commitment to the material
as his cast.  Unfortunately, August's mind seems to have been
elsewhere, which accounts for why ``Les Miserables'' often has a
perfunctory feel.

Title
Review for You've Got Mail (1998)

 In the world of writer-director Nora Ephron, everyone is witty, well-read,
well-educated about movies, and a hopeless romantic ... everyone who matters
anyhow. Characters who don't meet those qualifications are almost certain to
end up on the sidelines.
 So it is with "You've Got Mail," in which Meg Ryan and Tom Hanks play
E-mail correspondents who share an intimate, anonymous relationship on-line,
punctuated by references to "Pride and Prejudice" (from her) and "The
Godfather" (from him). In cyberspace, they're Shopgirl and NY152; in
business, they're Kathleen Kelly and Joe Fox, rival bookstore owners who
begin feuding when Joe builds one of his Fox Books megastores steps away
from Kathleen's childrens' literature emporium The Shop Around The Corner, a
New York staple for 42 years.
 Neither Joe nor Kathleen knows who they're writing to, since they met in a
chatroom and have been intentionally vague about their identities. Thus,
they have no clue they're spilling their deepest secrets to someone they
regard as an enemy.
 If you thought Hanks and Ryan were endearing in their previous teamings in
"Sleepless In Seattle" and "Joe Versus the Volcano," you ain't seen nothing
yet. "Mail" allows them to work up a bit of friction and to hurl a few
zingers at each other, yet neither star has ever seemed more appealing. Even
when he's being snide, Hanks manages to retain his cuddliness, and though
Ephron pushes the "cute" button a bit vigorously with too many shots of
Ryan's shadowboxing -- she looks about as tough as the Robber Kitten --  no
director makes Ryan look lovelier than Ephron.
 The dialogue is predictably punchy, with the best lines charitably divided
amongst all the movie's major players, including Parker Posey as Joe's
girlfriend, a power-mad publisher who notes when an associate dies, it
"makes one less person I'm not speaking to," and Greg Kinnear as Kathleen's
beau, a columnist whose language can be best described as over the top.
"You're a lone reed, standing tall, waving boldly in the corrupt sands of
commerce," he gushes as Kathleen organizes her crusade against Fox.
 Although one of the biggest laughs from the audience came when they saw how
easily and quickly Kathleen and Joe accessed America On-Line, "Mail" also
features a wonderfully weird joke about Joe's relatives, a welcome
appearance by Steve Zahn as one of Kathleen's slightly daft employees, and a
terrific set-piece involving Kathleen's embarassment in a check-out line;
it's easily the sharpest scene of this type since Debra Winger's similar
run-in with a haughty clerk in "Terms of Endearment." So smooth and engaging
is "Mail" that even when its plot stalls it doesn't seem like time is being
wasted. If everyone on the Internet were this much fun to spend time with as
these characters, no one would ever log off.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Stepmom (1998)

 Perhaps there really are jobless, single women in this world who can
somehow afford to maintain magnificent Victorian mansions in upstate New
York, complete with a stable full of horses in case they decide to take a
moonlit ride through the countryside. Maybe somewhere you could find a
couple of kids who'd bristle at the thought of having a hip, vivacious and
eager-to-please young woman like Julia Roberts in their lives. Possibly, if
you searched far and wide enough, you might track down a fashion
photographer with the power to call all the shots on her shoots, even
changing entire ad campaigns on a whim.
 In lovelier-than-life movies like "Stepmom," such things happen everyday,
along with junior-high Thanksgiving pageants that look like mini-Broadway
musicals and lunches packed in Bloomingdales bags. But underneath the
picture's glossy surface lies a hornets' nest of painful emotions -- fear,
jealousy, shame, self-loathing -- the likes of which are not hard to find in
the real world, especially in divided families.
 "Stepmom" is the story of how fate dictates that fortysomething Jackie
(Susan Sarandon), the divorced mother of two, and Isabel (Julia Roberts), a
twentysomething career woman, learn to respect each other for the good of
the other people in their lives, and the film makes the valid point that
when children are listening, parental figures have an obligation to behave
maturely, rather than resorting to catty games and backstabbing to settle
old scores.
 Isabel is now living with Luke (Ed Harris), Jackie's ex, with kids Anna
(Jena Malone) and Ben (Liam Aiken) shuttling back and forth between Luke's
sprawling Manhattan loft and Jackie's enormous country home, a showplace of
quilts, flowers and antiques which makes Martha Stewart's digs look
hard-scrabble by comparison. Though Jackie prides herself on being the kind
of mother who'd rather set herself on fire than be late in picking up the
young ones from school, her barely disguised disgust with Luke's new love
cues Anna and Ben to do their best to make Isabel feel lousy. Jackie may be
a terrific mom, but as a role model she's no better than the hapless Isabel.
 "Stepmom" doesn't come close to delivering the punch of director Alan
Parker's "Shoot The Moon," a much sturdier movie on a similar subject, but
nevertheless Roberts and particularly Sarandon work overtime to make this
hit-and-miss script click. Theirs is an intriguing match-up of acting
styles, too: Sarandon relies on her expressive eyes to show us Jackie's
emotions, while Roberts conveys Isabel's uneasiness mostly through her
unsteady voice and slightly awkward body language. A scene near the end in
which the two meet in a tavern to discuss their situation becomes a
wrenching tour de force for both actresses.
 In the end, the well-rounded characterizations are what sell the film;
everyone involved has their own strengths and weaknesses, unlike "Patch
Adams," which is dominated by one-dimensional caricatures that seem to have
come straight off the assembly line at the stereotype factory. Though it has
just as many corny moments as "Patch," as a drama "Stepmom" is considerably
more successful, mostly because Sarandon and Roberts play the material
gently, rather than aiming straight for the tearducts at every opportunity.
The movie's setting may be superficial and dreamy, but its stars make
"Stepmom" hit home.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Out of Sight (1998)
Maybe there's some kind of secret universal law that says if you bring
together several unlucky people and make them work together they'll each be
blessed with a happy reversal of fortune.
Certainly the film careers of George Clooney ("Batman and Robin," "The
Peacemaker"), and Jennifer Lopez ("Anaconda," "U-Turn") could safely be
called unspectacular, and director Steven Soderbergh has mostly floundered
since his "sex, lies and videotape" took the world by storm nine years ago.
"Out of Sight," a sensational crime drama and black comedy, should go a long
way toward cleaning up the soiled reputations of everyone involved.
Never has Clooney seemed more alive and appealing than he does here as bank
robber Jack Foley, perhaps because Soderbergh managed to keep him from doing
that irritating chin-drop which has become his much-parodied trademark.
Lopez, who has often seemed like she was operating well below full power in
trash like "Money Train," finally gets a part worthy of her as Karen Cisco,
a sharp U.S. marshal who gets her man in more ways than one. For his part,
Soderbergh incorporates his usual bag of tricks - freeze-frames, zooms, jump
cuts - into an engrossing storyline with the same kind of pretzel logic
"Pulp Fiction" had.
Like last Christmas' "Jackie Brown," "Sight" is based on a novel by Elmore
Leonard. The films share at least one principal in common, and, in a bright
touch, he's played (uncredited) by the same actor who originated the role in
"Jackie." While "Jackie" writer-director Quentin Tarantino seemed
hard-pressed to capture the zestiness of Leonard's characters and still keep
up with his outwardly spiraling plot, Soderbergh, working from Scott Frank's
lightning-fast screenplay, pulls off the trick with ease.
At heart, "Sight" is an unorthodox romance between prison escapee Foley and
Cisco, who pursues him from Miami to Detroit. Both Foley and Cisco take a
secret pleasure in playing with fire - he's constantly fooling around with a
Zippo lighter, while she's had past flings with dangerous guys - and their
mutual obsession creates sparks galore.
Surrounding this potentially fatal attraction is a plot by a crew of Foley's
associates to shakedown ultrawealthy ex-con "Dick the Ripper" (Albert
Brooks) at his Bloomfield Hills estate. Snoop (Don Cheadle) is the
mastermind of the operation, since cohorts Glenn (Steve Zahn) and White Boy
Bob (Keith Loneker) are perilously low on brain-power. Meanwhile, Foley's
loyal partner Buddy (Ving Rhames) feels compelled to confess his sins by
phone to his God-fearing sister, a dangerous habit for a career criminal.
With a savory score by Cliff Martinez complementing its every move, "Sight"
serves up a cornucopia of great moments, lines and performances. Brooks and
Rhames once again prove they can do no wrong, and if the hysterically funny
Zahn doesn't move up to star status after this, you'll know Hollywood has
lost its wits. The movie also has genuine sizzle, as Clooney and Lopez flirt
with an intensity most screen couples can only dream of. A wonderfully
edited encounter between the two in a lounge high above the Motor City may
turn out to be the single sexiest scene of the year.
In short, "Out of Sight" more than lives up to its title. Who says there's
no truth in advertising?

Title
Review for Anna and the King (1999)
         Last year, director Andy Tennant transformed the tale of
Cinderella into "Ever After," one of 1998's most endearing sleeper hits.
For his follow-up, he's tackled the culture clash between British
governess Anna Leonowens and King Mongkut of Siam, the same material
that's previously been dramatized in the 1946 film "Anna and the King of
Siam" and musicalized as Rodgers and Hammerstein's "The King and I."
 Was another telling of this story absolutely necessary? Perhaps
not, although "Anna and the King," like "Ever After," puts forth some
intriguing new ideas about its characters while providing a banquet for
the eyes and ears. This is precisely the kind of "cast of thousands"
extravaganza Hollywood rarely produces anymore and the movie's seductive
visuals, charismatic performances and glorious scenery make for two and
a half hours of immensely pleasurable viewing.
 For those who grew up with the 1955 Yul Brynner/Deborah Kerr
version of "The King and I," "Anna" comes across as slightly
disorienting at first. It feels slightly strange not to hear "Getting to
Know You" when Anna is introduced to her scores of Siamese pupils and
though the screenplay retains the famous scene in which Anna is
literally swept off her feet by the king at a ball, "Shall We Dance" is
conspicuously absent from the soundtrack. Accept Tennant's film on its
own terms, however, and you'll be rewarded.
 Thematically, the biggest difference between the screenplays of
the two movies is found in their approach to the king.
 In "The King and I," Mongkut is portrayed as a steely but
slightly goofy monarch whose fascination with science and English
customs is often played for laughs. Anna, on the other hand, is the
walking embodiment of all the glorious traits Britain once attached to
its policies of Colonialism: She's single-minded but proper to a fault
and knowledgeable but not overbearing. She handles Mongkut with the same
firm hand and gentle manner a well-bred mother in 1862 might have used
to control a temperamental child.
 There's never any doubt in "The King and I" that Western ways
are superior to the mysticism and superstition that rule the East, and
those attitudes have led some contemporary critics to label the musical
as an example of benign racism.
 "Anna and the King" offers a more balanced picture of the two
worlds. As portrayed by Hong Kong action star Chow Yun-Fat, Mongkut is
exceedingly intelligent and powerfully sexy, a man who's not about to
let an outsider rearrange his traditions. Jodie Foster's Anna is a
strong-willed widow with backbone and determination, who announces upon
her arrival in the Orient that "the ways of England are the ways of the
world," but slowly begins to find value in certain aspects of the
Siamese approach to life.
 "Anna and the King" is drawn from the diaries Leonowens kept
during the six years she spent in the palace and the later part of the
story diverges markedly from "The King and I," as Mongkut and his family
fend off a plot to seize the throne and venture into the jungle to
escape a rebel army. Whether this is ultimately more accurate than
Rodgers and Hammerstein's version of the story is hard to say since
historians continue to argue over how much of Leonowens' writing was a
romanticized embellishment of life in the royal court.
 Regardless, it makes for exciting viewing, with cinematographer
Caleb Deschanel providing some of the richest on-location photography
since David Lean's "A Passage to India" and Sydney Pollack's "Out of
Africa." Unlike "Africa" author Isak Dinesen, the Victorian Leonowens
was not bold enough to reinvent her love life in the name of a good
story so the romance between Anna and Mongkut remains strictly platonic
-- even though the heat between Foster and Chow is all but palpable.
James Sanford

Title
Review for For Love of the Game (1999)
         Over a decade ago, Kevin Costner cemented his star status by
appearing in two of the best movies ever made about baseball, "Bull
Durham" and "Field of Dreams." So "For Love of the Game," which finds
Costner returning to the ballpark, arrives with considerable baggage.
Will it be a sexy comedy like "Durham" or a world-class tearjerker like
"Dreams"? Neither, as it turns out, although the film dabbles somewhat
shyly in both genres.
 Instead, "Game," which features some of the glossiest
photography since Doris Day retired from the screen, is one of those
stories in which an aging pro has to decide whether to bow out with some
degree of dignity or keep on fighting in the hope of recapturing his
glory days. Billy Chapel (Costner) has been a Detroit Tigers pitcher for
19 years and his perpetually aching body is telling him it may be time
to hang up his glove for good. Just prior to a game in New York against
the Yankees, Billy gets the word the Tigers have been sold and he's
about to be traded, prompting plenty of soul-searching on the mound and
at least one flashback per inning.
 But rather than reflecting on his career, Billy spends the
afternoon pondering his l-e-n-g-t-h-y relationship with journalist Jane
(Kelly Preston). Though the movie insists theirs is an affair to
remember, the evidence presented onscreen is wholly unconvincing. For
the past five years it seems these two have been engaged in some games
of their own, dropping in on each other with no advance notice so they
can feel awful when they get rebuffed, carrying on going-nowhere phone
conversations and spending a few fleeting moments in bed together
whenever their schedules allow. Oh yeah, and they also apologize -- a
lot: "I'm sorry about what I said that day at the condo," "I'm sorry I
didn't call," etc.
 Last week's episode of HBO's "Sex in the City" offered a
perfectly accurate (and unprintable) name for this kind of arrangement;
suffice to say it had nothing to do with love. The copious footage
devoted to Billy and Jane's encounters might have been easier to sit
through is there was any magic between Costner and Preston, but they're
acting in two different films.
 Like Robert Redford, Costner is a romantic who only truly comes
to life opposite a strong female co-star. Pair him with the saucy Susan
Sarandon in "Durham," feisty Amy Madigan in "Dreams" or the jittery Rene
Russo in "Tin Cup," and he's motivated to work to keep up. With a less
secure leading lady such as Olivia Williams in "The Postman" or Jeanne
Tripplehorn in "Waterworld," Costner can barely even feign interest.
 That's exactly what happens in "Game." Preston, a genuine ball
of fire back in the days of "Drugstore Cowboy," has since become a
curiously affected actress who always seems to be imitating someone
else. In this case, she's doing her best faux Meg Ryan and she's so
caught up in determining the proper way to wrinkle her nose she seems to
forget who she's sharing the screen with. Consequently, Costner fades
out.
 Not for a moment do you believe Billy and Jane belong together
anywhere outside a hotel suite. Costner actually turns out to have more
chemistry with John C. Reilly, playing catcher/confidante Gus. "Game"
improves substantially when it concentrates on the friendship between
these two veterans who can still remember when baseball was about more
than salary caps, TV rights and corporate sponsorship.
 Occasionally, writer Dana Stevens' ("City of Angels") dialogue
has some of the zing of Ron Shelton's smart-mouthed "Durham" script and
there are a few genuinely intriguing passages in which Billy does
something called "clearing the mechanism," a mental process that shuts
out all the chaos around him and allows him to focus solely on his
pitching. These scenes are also the only parts of the movie that seem to
have engaged director Sam Raimi's interest; there's very little evidence
of his generally audacious style anywhere else. James Sanford

Title
Review for Starship Troopers (1997)
STARSHIP TROOPERS
Directed by Paul Verhoeven
 You could call it "Teenage Nazi Power Rangers" and youngsters would still
probably be trying to sneak into this very R-rated gorefest that pits
beautiful, vacant-eyed young freedom-fighters against gigantic space bugs
who spit flaming meterorites out of their backsides and, when they're not
shredding their human victims, go to the trouble of sucking their brains
out.
 There's a surplus of brainlessness in director Paul Verhoeven's ("Basic
Instinct," "Showgirls") lavish sci-fi spectacular which often seems to be
just on the verge of self-satire. Too bad it didn't have the courage to make
that leap, since it's certainly it's hard not to laugh at the movie's
plodding first hour, a sort of semi-futuristic "90210" episode in which
recent high school graduates rebel against their parents and suffer the
pains of unrequieted love while planning to join the Federation Alliance, a
space corps whose uniforms and symbols carry eerie echoes of the Third
Reich. Finally, after several reels of yawn-inducing soap-opera, the kids
get to see some combat action as the irritable insects bomb Buenos Aires
(which looks a lot more like Pasadena), setting the stage for all-out war.
 The special-effects are a mixed bag, with some cheesy-looking blue-screen
and model work giving way to the genuinely impressive computer-generated
monsters. Unfortunately, despite a lot of talk about how smart the bugs are,
all they seem to do is kill: Soldiers are cut in half, impaled on spiky
legs, set aflame, beheaded, etc. Verhoeven relishes dishing out the gore (he
also directed "Robocop" and "Total Recall," remember), even though all but
the most bloodthirsty in the crowd will have had their fill long before the
movie's messy --and anti-climactic-- finale. The acting by all concerned
makes the cast of "Melrose Place" look like the Royal Shakespeare Company,
as statuesque model-types bark out lines like "Everyone fights, no one
quits!" and "Kill 'em! Kill 'em all!" with clueless conviction. Only in the
big co-ed shower scene do you finally realize why these no-name thespians
were hired. Hint: It had nothing whatsoever to do with their line-readings.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Dick (1999)
         In Woody Allen's "Crimes and Misdemeanors," a pompous filmmaker
notes that "comedy is tragedy plus time." Arriving only days before the
25th anniversary of President Richard M. Nixon's resignation, "Dick"
attempts to mine humor from the Watergate scandal, an event most of us
who lived through it do not remember as being particularly uproarious.
Although it eventually suffers a typically 1970s energy crisis, this
satire of the early Seventies has its moments, thanks to the
considerably charms of Michelle Williams and Kirsten Dunst as a pair of
airheads who become unlikely White House insiders.
 Although Dunst has proven her mettle as a comedienne before --
she was one of the few assets of the woebegone "Drop Dead Gorgeous" --
Williams' knack for getting laughs is a minor revelation since she
certainly hasn't had many chances to show it off as the hard-partying
Jen on TV's "Dawson's Creek." But she's thoroughly delightful here as
Arlene, a nerdy 15-year-old who abandons her crush on Bobby Sherman ("he
cares about people, but also about nature and ecology") to devote all
her time to worshipping the President. Eventually, this
Monica-in-training will go so far as to croon a tuneless cover of Olivia
Newton-John's "I Honestly Love You" into one of Nixon's many hidden tape
recorders. Betsy (Dunst) is slightly brainier, although you wouldn't
want to live on the difference.
 During a field trip to the White House, the duo accidentally
stumbles upon evidence of the bumbled Watergate burglary and are grilled
by the paranoid H.R. Haldeman (Dave Foley), who asks them if they think
"friendly thoughts" when they think of Nixon. After assuring him of
their loyalty, Betsy and Arlene are appointed Presidential dog walkers,
which gives them the chance to share their views on foreign policy with
Nixon (Dan Hedaya) and Henry Kissinger (Saul Rubinek). "I just think
people would like you better if you stopped the war," Arlene tells
Nixon, who decides to heed her good advice.
 The first two-thirds of "Dick" are often clever, with oodles of
great background music (Hot Butter's "Popcorn," Stories' "Brother
Louie," etc.) and amusing clips from TV of the period, including Alka
Seltzer's classic "I Can't Believe I Ate the Whole Thing" spot. The
wardrobe department obviously had a field day putting Dunst and Williams
into a series of polyester nightmares, most of which look like a cross
between K-Mart and the counterculture.
 Unfortunately, around the time our heroines realize they've
been betrayed by Tricky Dick and his associates, the movie begins to
seem more silly than funny. A gag about marijuana-laced cookies is run
into the ground, an attempt to make fun of Bob Woodward and Carl
Bernstein never really works and the story comes to a disappointingly
feeble finale. Williams and Dunst, however, remain bubbly and beguiling
throughout, adding some much needed zest to what turns out to be a
rather half-baked comedy. James Sanford

Title
Review for In & Out (1997)
IN & OUT
(Paramount Pictures)
Like a senior citizen with a nose-ring, "In & Out" wears its hipness
rather uncomfortably. A comedy that makes a half-hearted attempt to
address the currently trendy subject of "coming out," "In & Out" has
many funny moments, a typically charming performance by Kevin Kline and
a boatload of good intentions. Why then does it feel so curiously
hollow?
Part of the problem lies in the screenplay by Paul Rudnick, a bright,
sassy writer (he penned "Jeffrey" and ghostwrites the "If You Ask Me"
column by Libby Gelman-Waxner in Premiere). Rudnick's central idea is a
takeoff on Tom Hanks' famous acceptance speech at the Oscars in 1993,
when he thanked his high-school teacher for inspiration in creating the
character of the gay attorney in "Philadelphia."
In "In & Out," Matt Dillon (cleverly sending up Ethan Hawke and similar
high-minded young actors) is cast as Cameron Drake, who wins an Oscar
for his performance as a gay soldier in something called "To Serve and
Protect"; in the process, he beats out Steven Seagal, nominated for
"Snowball In Hell." Picking up the prize, Drake gives credit to his
high-school English teacher Howard Brackett (Kline),  which thrills
Brackett, his fiancee Emily (Joan Cusack) and Brackett's parents (Debbie
Reynolds and Wilford Brimley), all watching back home in Greenleaf,
Indiana. Not so thrilling however are the three little words that
follow: "And he's gay." That turns out to be news to everyone, even, it
appears, Howard, who's been planning to wed Emily that Sunday after a
three-year engagement.
It's no time at all before the tiny town is buzzing with local gossip
and reporters anxious for details. Among the newshounds is Peter Malloy
(Tom Selleck, looking like he's seen better days), who dogs Brackett,
determined to get a career-saving exclusive. The rest of the story
follows Brackett's desperate attempts to assert his masculinity and
heterosexuality, his mom's efforts to keep the wedding on track, and the
town's struggle to determine exactly what to think about this bombshell.
Amusing moments abound in the film, as Brackett has to fend off
questions like "do you know Ellen?", and has to defend the honor of
Barbra Streisand against a lout who claims "she was too old for
"Yentl"." But Rudnick seems to be reining himself in: Every time the
movie seems on the verge of taking off into something truly wild and
edgy, it quickly retreats, almost apologetically. The big moment in "In
& Out," a lingering kiss between Brackett and Malloy, is not exactly
going to rock anybody's world in 1997, and that image is as far out as
the film is willing to go. Rudnick's maudlin tendencies emerge in the
final reel, in the form of a lengthy "Dead Poets Society"-style scene
that falls resoundingly flat.
Director Frank Oz doesn't help matters. Though he did a terrific job
with the Steve Martin-Michael Caine vehicle "Dirty Rotten Scoundrels"
years ago, Oz never finds a rhythm here. Many scenes in "In & Out"
either end abruptly or wind down without much of a punch. Everyone seems
to be taking their best shot at keeping things lively, but there's a
stifling inertia that seems to hang over the whole film like heavy
humidity, and the comic sparks never fly. James Sanford

Title
Review for Wild Man Blues (1998)
Most documentaries that purport to show you the person behind a celebrity's
image don't work, for the simple fact that most celebrities are so keenly
aware of a camera's presence they're never truly "real" as long as the
lights are on and the microphones are open. Director Barbara Kopple runs
into this wall several times in the course of "Wild Man Blues," a
documentary tracking writer/director/clarinetist Woody Allen on his swing
through Europe with a New Orleans jazz band. After more than 30 years of
being interviewed, Allen is too self-aware to let down his guard, and much
of Kopple's footage shows us the lovable/irritating New York neurotic we've
become accustomed to seeing in movies like "Hannah and Her Sisters" and
"Annie Hall," dropping one-liners and stammering like crazy.
 But every once in a while Allen slips a bit, revealing a more sarcastic and
slightly nastier person than we're used to, someone more along the lines of
the bitter anti-hero he played in "Deconstructing Harry." In these moments,
"Wild Man Blues" is genuinely fascinating; the rest of the time it's
intermittently funny and observant, although in terms of revelations about
its subject it can't hold a candle to D.A. Pennebaker's "Don't Look Back," a
scathing portrait of a young Bob Dylan, or Alex Keshishian's mesmerizing
exploration of the Madonna phenomenona, "Truth Or Dare."
 What will likely intrigue most viewers -- especially those who hunger for
good gossip -- is the film's portrayal of Allen's relationship with his
youthful wife and former ward whom he introduces as "the notorious Soon Yi
Previn." Previn is anything but a groupie, freely admitting she's never seen
"Annie Hall" or read any of Allen's writing. She does, however, have a
favorite among his films, "Manhattan," in which Allen shares his bed with
high school student Mariel Hemingway.
 To judge from the evidence Kopple presents, the Allen-Previn marriage is
one of near-opposites, with Previn emphasizing practicality while Allen
pursues artistic pie in the sky. When he tells her he's planning on
presenting a challenging concert full of hardcore jazz and "esoteric tunes"
to an audience he suspects of being sycophants, she warns him frankly "you
don't want them to get up and leave, do you?". Previn also gently chastises
Allen for only speaking to the bandleader during meetings and shutting the
other musicians out; Kopple doesn't get much feedback from the band,
although we do find out they're amused to learn that Allen actually does
know everyone's name.
 Allen, long a bigger box office draw in Europe than he is in America,
attracts fervent fans everywhere he goes and fills concert halls in Paris,
Turin and London, although it's doubtful most of the patrons are there
solely because of their appreciation for jazz anymore so than theatergoers
lined up to see Madonna in "Speed-the-Plow" expecting to see a virtuoso
performance. As a clarinetist Allen would probably rank as a modestly gifted
amateur, although the conviction he brings to his playing comes through loud
and clear.
 So does his impatience with the paparazzi, especially when they disrupt a
quiet cruise through Venice with Previn. Through a pained grin Allen snarls
to Previn of the photo-snappers, "they won't pay ten cents to see one of my
movies, but passing in a gondola they love it." It's one of those rare,
slightly shocking scenes in which Kopple's eye penetrates the comic mask and
finds the not-so-cuddly guy inside.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Other Sister, The (1999)
"I'm the mother of a dedicated underachiever, a gay workaholic and
Carla," says Elizabeth Tate (Diane Keaton) as she and her husband
Radley (Tom Skerritt) prepare for an afternoon on their boat.
Despite their wealth, life for the Tates has not always been smooth
sailing.
Radley is a now-sober alcoholic, while Carla (Juliette Lewis), their
youngest child, has just returned home after eight years at a "special
school." She's decided she wants to further her education and get her
own apartment, ideas that jolt her mother, who does her best to
quickly squelch any talk of Carla leaving home again. Elizabeth would
rather see Carla take origami and calligraphy classes.
The stage is set for a major throwdown, but if "The Other Sister"
sounds like it might develop into a message movie about the rights of
the mentally challenged, be forewarned that the film comes from
director Garry Marshall ("Pretty Woman," "Frankie and Johnny"). In his
world, street corner hookers look like Julia Roberts and the dumpy
waitress in a greasy spoon turns out to be Michelle Pfeiffer.
So instead of frank talk about real issues, "Sister" stubbornly
accentuates the positive, offering up gorgeous houses, chic San
Francisco apartments, frighteningly green lawns and a sweeping pop
soundtrack instead of any sort of insight into the problems a woman in
Carla's situation might face.  Even the story's major complication, a
crisis involving Carla's new boyfriend Daniel(Giovanni Ribisi), feels
wholly manufactured and unconvincing.
In the midst of all this artifice though, stands Keaton, who couldn't
be synthetic even if she tried. Elizabeth says things like "it would
behoove us to suppress the minutia," but Keaton undercuts the woman's
high-handedness with a few quirks - reading magazines backwards, for
instance - that bring surprising warmth to a character many actresses
would have written off as simply another chilly mom.
Lewis and Ribisi are also fine, if a bit studied.  Marshall regular
Hector Elizondo makes a token appearance as Daniel's understanding
landlord, and fans of 1960s TV may be amused to see Juliet Mills of
"Nanny and the Professor" fame in the role of the Tates'
trouble-shooting housekeeper.
Though slightly long at almost two anda half hours, "Sister" is
pleasant enough and occasionally even tickles the funnybone.  But
there's no real heart to the story, no emotional core. Marshall has
whipped up a glittery, lighter-than-air confection that sends you home
feeling like you missed dinner.

Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
There's a famous story director Alfred Hitchcock once told about
working with Ingrid Bergman in the 1940s. Bergman, Hitchcock said,
wanted only to appear in masterpieces and feared starring in a film
that wouldn't live up to her lofty standards.  Hitchcock couldn't
understand why she spent so much time fretting over every single
aspect of her work.
"Ingrid," he told her, "it's only a movie."
Those words could also apply to the fanatics who have camped out in
theater parking lots, traded bits of trivia on the Internet and
counted down the days until the opening of "Star Wars: Episode I - The
Phantom Menace," the first of writer-director George Lucas' "Star
Wars" prequels.
It turns out it is, after all, only a movie, and nothing ever
committed to celluloid could possibly live up to the astonishing
amount of hype surrounding this one.  "Episode I" doesn't even come
close. It's merely a two-hour parade of mesmerizing images, set to a
stirring John Williams score and featuring an assortment of faces old
and new.
Is it fun? For the most part, yes. Is it a life-changing experience?
Only if you reach puberty, give birth or die while watching it. Set
alongside the previous installments, "Episode I" has considerably
fewer cliffhangers than "Star Wars" and none of the complexity or
terror of "The Empire Strikes Back," and shares with "Return of the
Jedi" a fondness for the kinds of cuddly creatures only a toy vendor
could love.
What makes the movie a worthy addition to the series is its visual
sense. Practically every frame of the film is drenched in bold colors
and even the backdrops - such as an underwater city made of shining
golden bubbles, or a planet entirely consumed by urban sprawl - are
fascinating to study. Those who see "Episode I" more than once will
want to take a closer look at the extraordinary details packed
intoevery scene.
Several of those scenes are exceptionally fine.  "Episode I" kicks off
with an exciting escape, follows that up with a dazzling invasion
sequence then moves on to a nail-biting episode involving fish
monsters and gigantic mutant eels. A "pod race" on the desert planet
Tattooine is also smashingly well-crafted and a climactic, multi-level
battle between Jedi Knights and a bloodthirsty Sith Lord provides a
much-needed kick to the story's third act.
"Episode I" introduces some memorable characters, a few of whom will
figure prominently in the next two chapters: Amidala (Natalie
Portman), the youthful queen who dresses like a supergeisha and fights
like Princess Leia; Qui-Gon (a suitably heroic Liam Neeson), the
stalwart Jedi mentor of Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor, who does a
perfect vocal imitation of the young Alec Guinness); and Darth Maul
(Ray Park), a merciless assassin in Kabuki makeup who brandishes a
lethal double light saber and whose head is crowned by a ring of
horns.
Unfortunately for those over the age of 10, "Episode I" also brings in
an asinine amphibian named Jar Jar Binks who speaks in mock
Rastafarian tones and appears to have been inserted in the story by
the merchandising arm of Lucasfilms. He's irritating from the moment
he first appears and goes a long way toward bogging down the action.
The movie further caters to the kiddie audience by casting the
button-nosed Jake Lloyd as Anakin Skywalker, the fledgling warrior
whowill someday grow up to be Darth Vader. Cute he may be, but an
actor he is not.
Then again, many of the performances here seem underdirected, even
that of the generally on-target Portman, who has some initial
difficulty bringing Amidala to life. A similar problem keeps Pernilla
August from making Anakin's mom into anything but a smiling
cipher. The movie's dramatic sequences are frequently tepid and
overlong, perfectly designed for trips to the concession stand.
They're also indicative of the film's greatest failing, its inability
to exert any sort of emotional power whatsoever. This might be
partially due to the nature of the material itself; after all, this is
basically a lengthy backstory for the intrigue and romance yet to
come.
But as a director, Lucas seems more caught up in dishing out digital
magic than in working with flesh and blood. "Episode I" routinely
dazzles the eye without ever engaging the other senses.
Those expecting to stand up and cheer at regular intervals might be
taken aback by the movie's almost weird restraint. Imagine taking a
roller coaster ride after swallowing a handful of Valium and you get
some idea of the tone.
Awash in state-of-the-art sound and fury and devoid of feeling,
"Episode I" is a technical triumph that seems untouched by human
hands. In manufacturing, that's a plus. In filmmaking, however, that's
not a good thing.  James Sanford

Title
Review for End of the Affair, The (1999)
     There's an old British saying, "in for a penny, in for a pound,"
which applies perfectly to "The End of the Affair," a demanding,
thought-provoking film adapted from Graham Greene's novel of the same
name. It's a movie built around a theme many will find difficult to
accept, that miracles can happen to perfectly ordinary, non-religious
people.
If you can believe that, you're well on your way to being drawn in
by this story of an illicit WWII liaison between novelist Maurice
Bendrix (Ralph Fiennes) and Sarah Miles (Julianne Moore), the wife of a
perpetually glum diplomat. Sarah is in the tenth year of a joyless
marriage to Henry (Stephen Rea) and if there was ever any fire in the
relationship, it's long since died. "I'm the shadow he walks around,"
she says. Henry, for his part, tries to hold on to her by promising her
a life in the highest circles of London society. "Wouldn't you like to
be Lady Miles?" he asks, trying to get her excited about future
possibilities.
But Sarah would take passion over prestige any day, and that's what
she finds during her stolen afternoons and evenings with Maurice. That
is, until a disaster that comes literally out of the clear blue forces
her to make a dramatic and mystifying change in her life, one which
brings sorrow to all involved.
"Affair" has surface similarities to "The English Patient," the
Oscar-winning 1996 hit that cemented Fiennes' place among contemporary
matinee idols, and director Neil Jordan (who also penned the screenplay)
doesn't skimp on scenes of Fiennes and Moore working up a sweat as they
wrinkle the sheets together to the strains of Michael Nyman's ravishing
score. But in many ways, this is a much more daring and challenging
piece. Sarah's climactic decision and her determination to abide by it
regardless of the pain it causes her make this less a romance than a
study of a woman's capacity for sacrifice. Sarah metamorphoses before
our eyes from a bored, chic housewife into an astonishingly complex and
troubled individual desperate to figure out exactly what she's doing and
why she's doing it.
In short, it's the kind of role actresses dream of tackling, and
Moore runs with it, eagerly trying to sort out the secrets of Sarah's
heart. It's a spellbinding performance, one that's very nearly matched
by Fiennes, who's piercing blue eyes serve as windows into Maurice's
mind. What makes Fiennes such a riveting actor to watch, however, is
what he doesn't reveal. We can always feel him holding just a little bit
back, silently challenging us to pay closer attention to his words and
behavior. As the outsider whose love for his wife is reawakened when he
realizes she's lost to him, Rea conveys fully what it's like to be in
Henry's lusterless shoes. The trio is superbly supported by Ian Hart and
Sam Bould as a father-son detective team caught between the three sides
of the triangle.
"Affair" marks a solid comeback for Jordan, whose last film was
the almost unwatchable "In Dreams," a cartoonish melodrama about a
serial killer (Robert Downey Jr.) and a psychic (Annette Bening). This
film returns him to the kind of character-based drama of his best work,
such as "Mona Lisa" and "The Crying Game." He cloaks the bodies of his
lovers in shadows and rain while exposing their souls. James Sanford

Title
Review for Living Out Loud (1998)
Like its heroine, "Living Out Loud," the directorial debut of screenwriter
Richard LaGravenese ("The Fisher King," "The Mirror Has Two Faces"), is
something of a mess, but it's an often likable, intriguing one. It's the
story of Judith (Holly Hunter), a fortysomething New Yorker who's looking
for a new life now that her cardiologist husband Bob (Martin Donovan) has
left her high and dry in the sumptuous apartment they once shared. If the
story sounds a trifle familiar, think "An Unmarried Woman."
 In fact, "Living Out Loud" is the kind of movie that hasn't been produced
very often since Jill Clayburgh retired from the screen almost 20 years ago.
Hunter, it should be said, fills Clayburgh's high heels quite nicely,
convincingly veering from neurotic to erotic and back again whenever the
spirit moves her.
 Early on, Judith turns on the TV and finds herself bombarded by bad news
about terrorist bombings and crack babies. This sets off a wonderful,
rapid-fire internal monologue in which she wishes those terrorists "would
just get over it" and wonders if she should adopt a crack baby. Seconds
later she realizes her snotty Fifth Avenue neighbors would never cotton to
that idea and that "my crack baby would never have any playdates."
 It's a moment that establishes "Living" as a writer's movie and an actor's
movie, and it turns out to be exactly that. Although it often veers into
surrealism, "Living" has much more in common with a good play or a novella
than it does with your typical film, and LaGravenese's inexperience behind
the camera occasionally shows, as several scenes consist of nothing more
than talking heads going on at length about this or that. It doesn't exactly
make optimum use of the Cinemascope frame.
 But "Living" does have a certain charm and color as well, through the
bright casting of Danny DeVito as the unlikely knight in a shining elevator
who helps Judith to see a life beyond her high-rise tower, and Queen
Latifah, who's warm and winning as the jazz singer Judith idolizes and
befriends.
 Although the story is mostly anecdotal and doesn't build to any sort of
major point, "Living" has much to offer, including Queen Latifah's easy
renditions of such standards as "Lush Life," a delightfully weird suicide
fantasy sequence, a fairly hot dance number involving Judith and the patrons
of a lesbian bar, and an unexpected but satisfying finale reminiscent of --
surprise -- "An Unmarried Woman." Well, if we've got to have '70s nostalgia,
at least that's an oldie worth looking back on.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Unagi (1997)
 In many cases, you can guess the ending of a movie without even seeing
it. From the commercials alone you can deduce the teen lovers in "She's
All That" will probably wind up in each other's arms, or that the finale
of "Gloria" will find hard-hearted Sharon Stone becoming a mother figure
to the orphaned kid she's looking after.
 Then there are films like "The Eel," which constantly catch you
off-guard with more plot twists and surprises than most thrillers would
dare to utilize. "The Eel" begins with an illicit affair, followed by a
savage murder, then changes courses to become a generally quiet,
contemplative study of Takuro Yamashita, the man responsible for the
crime.
 Yamashita is played by Koji Yakusho, best-known in this country for his
role as the uptight "salaryman" who discovers the joy of the rhumba in
"Shall We Dance?". Again Yakusho has been cast as a sedate type, but
Yamashita isn't looking for an escape from the drabness of his life. In
fact, he quite prefers being alone and silent, much like the pet eel he
keeps in a tank in his barber shop.
 The eel is a souvenir of the eight years he spent in jail for killing
his wife, whom he caught in bed with another man. Now out on parole,
Yamashita finds himself haunted by his moment of madness and unable to
fit into his new surroundings. Then along comes Keiko (Misa Shimizu), a
young beauty who has fled her out-of-control life in Tokyo to hide out
in the small coastal town Yamashita is now living in.
 Just when it seems like "The Eel" is going to settle into a standard
love-conquers-fear tale, the writers begin coloring in the characters,
revealing their secrets and insecurities. The results are sometimes
shocking and sometimes funny, but there's nothing in the movie that
feels out of place. Although it flips from drama to thriller to comedy,
"The Eel" manages to make its tonal shifts effortlessly; Shohei
Imamura's direction is a model of quiet complexity.
 "The Eel" deservedly received the Palme D'Or -- the top prize -- at the
1997 Cannes Film Festival and though some Cannes winners are so esoteric
even the filmmakers might be hard-pressed to explain what their movies
are about, this one is surprisingly straightforward and unpretentious.
Imamura even manages to blend surrealistic fantasy sequences into the
storyline without going overboard, and the performances of Shimizu and
Yakusho could not be any better.
 Best of all, the film keeps you guessing what Yamashita and Keiko's
fates will be, up until the final scene. Though "The Eel" is as sinuous
and slippery as its namesake, it's a good deal more interesting to
watch. James Sanford

Title
Review for Where the Heart Is (1990)
         It's a rare film that looks as gorgeous as director John
Boorman's "Where the Heart Is." The vibrant colors and clever art
direction are delicious eye candy. Unfortunately, Boorman and his
daughter Telsch wrote a script to accompany these plush visuals, and
it's positively atrocious. The end result is like trying to tour an art
gallery during a fire drill: Sure, there's plenty to look at, but you
still just want to get out of there. Fast.
 Dabney Coleman, not exactly breaking any new ground for
himself, plays a grouchy, unenlightened demolition magnate who's
convinced his artsy children (Uma Thurman, Suzy Amis and David Hewlett)
will never make it in the real world. So he throws them out of the
mansion and puts them up in a ramshackle house in one of New York's less
attractive neighborhoods. But a cruel twist of fate throws the family
back together again, with no money, but now equipped with the greater
happiness that comes from love and understanding.
 The screenplay could have been lifted from any random night of
idiotic TV sitcoms and the Boormans dress it up with some of the most
precious and highfalutin dialogue this side of a college theater party.
It's a groan a minute.
 The varied cast members behave as if they were all acting in
different movies. Joanna Cassidy screeches and flutters annoyingly as
Coleman's flighty wife, while Crispin Glover does his usual
beyond-the-fringe number as a fashion designer who pretends to be gay in
the hopes of getting ahead. Only Thurman makes a pleasant impression,
imparting an ethereal air to her Stevie Nicks-ish character. Almost
everyone else, like the film itself, makes you wish you'd just stayed
home. James Sanford

Title
Review for Green Mile, The (1999)
         The last time director Frank Darabont tackled a story by
Stephen King, the result was 1994's "The Shawshank Redemption," a
glorious emotional rollercoaster of a movie that never got its due at
the Oscars or at the box office; "Forrest Gump" was all the rage that
year.
 "The Green Mile," adapted from King's hugely popular serialized novel,
returns Darabont to the prison milieu of "Shawshank" and, as a ticket
selling incentive, he has managed to land "Gump" star Tom Hanks for the
role of Paul Edgecomb, the conscientious guard who learns a priceless
lesson about life while working on death-row. The mostly first-rate
supporting cast includes David Morse, James Cromwell, Bonnie Hunt and
Michael Clarke Duncan.
 Judged purely on its own merits, "Mile" is an entertaining,
extremely well-produced drama. It's also a film that's likely to be
enormously overrated by the millions of members of the Cult of Tom, that
sect which refused to admit "Saving Private Ryan" had some serious
flaws. Like "Ryan," "Mile" has dozens of shots of Hanks looking earnest
or mildly dismayed, a similarly clunky flashback structure (lifted
directed from King's pages), a tendency toward lengthiness, and too many
characters who never truly come to life. Michael Jeter's fey Eduard
Delacroix, for example, is taken straight from the actor's well-worn bag
of tics, while Doug Hutchison's Percy never evolves beyond a spoiled,
malevolent rich kid.
 "Mile" also displays a borderline-irritating tendency toward
clearly spelling out what emotion we're meant to feel at any given time,
particularly in the scenes involving Duncan's John Coffy, a towering
child-man whose dialogue and behavior sometimes veer dangerously close
to parody. Long before darabont gets around to having Coffey bathed in
the pure white light of a movie projector bulb you're likely to have
tired of the director and author's strenous attempts to turn this
mountain of innocence into a stand-in for Jesus Christ.
 Curiously, although Coffy becomes the focal point of "Mile,"
the film's most fascinating sections have little to do with him.
Darabont seems to have been much more intrigued by the day-to-day
operations of Edgecomb and his co-workers on "the green mile" (so named
because the prison floor is "the color of faded limes") than by the
supernatural twist the story ultimately takes.
 The sequences of Edgecomb supervising the rehearsals for an execution
and polishing "Old Sparky," the workers' nickname for the electric
chair, are quietly arresting, whereas the scenes showing a man expelling
disease from his body (he looks unfortunately like a backfiring
Dustbuster) or generating so much power he causes the lightbulbs in his
vicinity to shatter come off as overwrought.
 Despite the movie's numerous missteps, however, "Mile" has a
number of scenes in which you feel you've been transported back to
Depression-era Georgia. Edgecomb's relationships with his understanding
wife (a sweetly understated Hunt), his best friend Brutus (Morse,
uniformly superb)  and his deeply troubled boss (Cromwell) feel genuine.
And, as he did in "Shawshank," Darabont exquisitely captures the
claustrophobia of prison life. You can almost feel the unspoken sorrow
and resignation hanging in the air. James Sanford

Title
Review for Soldier (1998)
Every star has their good and bad moments, but few can match the
rollercoaster ride that Kurt Russell's career has been on during the past 10
years. When he's hot ("Overboard," "Executive Decision"), look out; when
he's not ("Captain Ron," "Escape From L.A."), duck and cover.
 Russell must have been laughing all the way to the bank after netting
multiple millions for "Soldier," a science-fiction tale as generic as its
title, which requires him to deliver a total of perhaps 12 words -- and
considerably fewer facial expressions -- in between running around and
gunning down countless extras. But viewers may be excused if they find it's
more fun to play shoot-'em-up yourself than to watch others do it,
particularly in a movie as alarmingly shoddy and poorly written as
"Soldier."
 In several eerie ways "Soldier" echoes "The Postman," the collossal Kevin
Costner turkey the kind people at Warner Bros. dumped in cinemas last
Christmas, and anyone who feels any nostalgia for that excruciating opus
should be in a mental-health clinic rather than a movie theater. Once again,
we're treated to that hoary old tale about the lone renegade -- in this case
a genetically engineered fighting machine known as Sgt. Todd (Russell) --
who sticks up for the poor, peace-lovin' folk when their frontier settlement
is attacked by the forces of evil.
 Imaginatively, screenwriter David Webb Peoples dresses the villianous
militants in pseudo-Nazi attire, which definitely sets them apart from the
heroes, most of whom are clad in jumble-sale rags. But while the mellow
residents of the Arcadia 234 Waste Disposal Area can't seem to find a decent
clothing store, they obviously have some sort of state-of-the-art hair salon
nearby since a large percentage of the population seems to sport frosted
tips, two-tone dye jobs and carefully crinkled tresses. All Sgt. Todd sports
is a crew cut, multiple scars and an unwavering scowl, although back in the
days of the War of the Six Cities he used to coat his face in patriotic red,
white and blue greasepaint.
 If all this talk about the movie's fashion sense seems beside the point,
you should understand it's by far the most fascinating aspect of "Soldier,"
which throws buckets of blood around in an attempt to perk up a deadwood
plot. Director Paul Anderson never met a cliche he couldn't appropriate, so
the film also includes numerous scenes of bodies hurtling through the air in
slow-motion, several instances of people scurrying away from fireballs and a
handful of moments in which shadowy characters are illuminated by flashes of
lightning.
 At least "Soldier" might have had the courtesy to whip up some snazzy
visuals, but the none-too-special-effects on view here look like they were
taken from some Saturday morning kids' show; they're laughably cheap. As in
"The Postman," there's a busty babe and some lovable moppets on hand to put
our unemotional hero back in touch with his heart, so we can sit through a
sequence in which Sgt. Todd weeps -- in slow-motion, naturally. Anyone who
pays good money to sit through "Soldier" will feel like joining in the pity
party.
James Sanford

Title
Review for At First Sight (1999)
 Near the beginning of "At First Sight" there's a scene guaranteed to
make almost every female viewer very, very jealous of Mira Sorvino, who
plays Amy Benic, a worn-out yet still somewhat glamorous New York
architect who's come to a mountain spa for a bit of rest. And what
better treatment to start with than a full-body massage from the magic
fingers of Virgil Adams, who is played by -- breathe deeply, ladies --
Val Kilmer?
 Minutes after he touches her, Amy is so relaxed, she bursts into tears.
"Oh no," Virgil apologizes. "Did I go too deep?".
 Like Virgil, the slickly produced "At First Sight" tends to shy away
from depth as well. Sad, since there's certainly the potential for a
fascinating picture here as Virgil, blind since early childhood, is
persuaded by Amy to participate in an experimental surgery program that
may restore his vision. The movie's most intriguing stretch begins
immediately after the operation, as Virgil struggles to reintrepret his
world visually, instead of through his other senses.
 But after paying lip service to the challenges of adjusting to being
able to see again, the Steve Levitt screenplay backpedals into the safer
ground of conventional romance, as long-suffering Amy does her best to
be patient while Virgil rants about how "seeing sucks." Though derived
from a true story chronicled by Dr. Oliver Sacks in his 1996 book "An
Anthropologist On Mars," "Sight" always seems closer to soap opera than
case study.
 All the usual suspects are brought in, including Virgil's
overprotective scold of a sister (Kelly McGillis), the hand-wringing
research scientist (Bruce Davidson) and Amy's cynical ex-husband (Steven
Weber), who's certain she'll come back to him on the rebound. The most
enjoyable of these walking cliches, a smart-mouthed therapist played by
Nathan Lane, ends up getting short shrift after a promising build-up.
 As for Kilmer and Sorvino, suffice to say the sparks don't exactly fly
between them. Speaking in a slowed-down, slightly thick voice, Kilmer
gives a performance that seems technically accurate but strangely
chilly, while the generally bubbly Sorvino seems to be trying to channel
the spirit of Justine Bateman here; she's all goofy looks, curled lips
and "ohmigod" flutteriness.
 Though the movie is not particularly insightful as either a medical
drama or a love story, director Irwin Winkler knows how to make a pretty
picture, and "Sight" even works in a couple of creative touches, such as
a distorted, disorienting double-exposure technique used to express
Virgil's first visions of the people around him. The soundtrack,
featuring two scintillating new songs from jazz pianist Diana Krall and
a host of standards, is also highly agreeable, even though the sluggish
plot it accompanies could inspire most viewers to close their eyes for a
long winter's nap. James Sanford

Title
Review for Erin Brockovich (2000)
           Julia Roberts may not be a great actress, but she is a
genuine star, a presence that captivates an audience. Likewise, "Erin
Brockovich" may not be a great drama, but it is a first-rate
button-pusher, a contemporary David and Goliath story guaranteed to get
viewers cheering. Put Julia and "Erin" together, and you've got a movie
to reckon with.
  "Erin" comes from a most unlikely source, director Steven
Soderbergh, whose interests tend to run to either crime dramas ("Out of
Sight," "The Limey") or semi-arty explorations of human psychology
("sex, lies and videotape," "King of the Hill"). But despite having
Roberts in the leading role, "Erin" doesn't represent Soderbergh selling
out. Quite the contrary, in fact, since the film is full of Soderbergh's
trademark jump-cuts, hand-held camera shots and utterly off-the-wall
humor.
   Best of all, "Erin" represents that rare mainstream Hollywood
crowdpleaser with substance as well as style. Susannah Grant's snappy
screenplay lays out the saga of Brockovich (Roberts), a twice-divorced
mother of three with a smart mouth, marginal work experience, and a
clinging, cleavage-revealing wardrobe she apparently picked up at
Samantha Fox's garage sale.
    Yet somehow Erin manages to land a position as a clerk in
the law offices of Ed Masry (Albert Finney), and when some suspicious
documents in real estate files arouse her curiosity, Erin gets
permission to investigate. Her research eventually pits Masry's tiny
practice against Pacific Gas and Electric, a $28 billion monster that
doesn't want its dirty laundry hung out in public.
    The plot conjures up memories of "The China Syndrome" and
"Norma Rae," in which Jane Fonda and Sally Field respectively locked
horns with callous corporations that put profit and public relations
ahead of safety. But with its bold, ill-tempered central figure, "Erin
Brockovich" is actually closer to the story of Karen Silkwood, another
working-class woman who became a most unlikely crusader for justice.
    However, in contrast to director Mike Nichols' deliberately
paced 1983 film "Silkwood," "Erin" moves at the same speed as its
no-nonsense heroine, brought winningly to life by a surprisingly sassy
Roberts. She's just plain wonderful in the role, whether clashing with
her boss, flirting with her neighbor/babysitter George (Aaron Eckhart)
or bombarding highfalutin lawyers with the details of her work. While
Erin's salty tongue and borderline-slutty clothing initially provoke
laughs, Roberts slowly turns this prickly woman into someone we can
admire and root for.
   Her run-ins with Masry are particularly amusing, as she
bulldozes her way through the legal process and fends off those who want
to take over her project. "Excuse me for not going to law school," the
tempestuous Erin snaps. "Law school?" Masry replies. "At this point, I'd
settle for charm school!"
   Finney, who's kept a fairly low profile recently, is also
fine and often funny as he tries without much success to rein in this
hellion in a halter top, and while Eckhart ("In the Company of Men")
seems a wee bit uncomfortable in grease-stained biker garb, he and
Roberts trade zingers quite well. The supporting cast is also ripe with
top-flight character actors, including Cherry Jones as a strong-willed
woman who's unsure of Erin's motives, Tracey Walter as a creepy stalker
and Conchata Farrell as an envious office manager who delights in giving
Erin a hard time.
  Admittedly, there's a certain degree of calculation in Grant's
script, especially when Erin tangles with the sharp-dressed lawyers for
hire Masry brings on board to help build the case. But the dialogue is
funny enough and the acting so on-target, it's hard to complain. "Erin
Brockovich" was designed to be a crowdpleaser, and that's exactly what
it is. No apologies are necessary. James Sanford

Title
Review for Rules of Engagement (2000)
         We've often heard the Marines are looking for a few good men,
and director William Friedkin seems intent on creating another "A Few
Good Men" in "Rules of Engagement," another drama about the terrible
consequences that can result when military officers make the wrong
choices in the heat of the moment. In "Rules," that officer is Col.
Terry Childers (Samuel L. Jackson), a 30-year veteran of the Marine
Corps who oversees the evacuation of the U.S. Embassy in Yemen. By the
time it's all over, 83 Yemenis are dead and more than 100 are wounded.
 Everyone agrees there was a demonstration outside the building,
that the protesters got a little rowdy and that snipers took a few
potshots at the Marines. But there's controversy over whether or not
Childers was justified in ordering his troops to fire on the crowd. Some
observers insist the Marines were gunning down unarmed civilians;
Childers thinks he saw weapons in the hands of some of the women and
children.
 With an international scandal brewing, the stage is set for a
court-martial, and Childers turns to his old friend Col. Hayes Hodges
(Tommy Lee Jones) to defend him. Since National Security Advisor William
Sokal (Bruce Greenwood) has secretly destroyed the videotape that would
back up Childers' charges -- "Why should the United States be held
responsible for the actions of one man?" Sokal argues -- Hodges and
Childers face an uphill battle.
 "Rules of Engagement" has some points of interest, not the
least of which are the performances of Jones and Jackson. Jackson pours
so much barely contained intensity into Childers the audience can't
always be sure he was thinking clearly during the incident, and that
keeps the interest percolating. After sleepwalking through so many of
his recent films ("U.S. Marshals" and "Double Jeopardy" immediately come
to mind), Jones again reminds us here what a resourceful, exciting actor
he can be. There's entertaining work from the prosecution as well, with
Guy Pearce ("L.A. Confidential") contributing an attention-grabbing turn
as a showboating lawyer anxious to send Childers to prison.
 The acting can only go so far, however, in camouflaging the
movie's dullish screenplay. Writer Stephen Gaghan, who trained in
television, tends to sacrifice depth and characterization in the name of
narrative, meaning we're served copious flashbacks to Childers'
experiences in Vietnam but few meaningful details about his personal
life. As for Sokal and the weak-willed ambassador (Ben Kingsley)
Childers saved, they're pure cardboard, just another pair of easily
vilified bureaucrats.
 As expected, "Rules" climaxes with the trial, and although
Friedkin inserts many extreme close-ups of Childers' angry eyes and
Hodges' furrowed brow, the finale still seems awfully cut-and-dried.
Unlike the much better "Courage Under Fire," in which viewers had at
least four different sides of a story to choose from, "Rules" offers
only two, and only one of them is genuinely credible. In a courtroom
that's sometimes the case, but in a movie we need a more substantial
pay-off after two hours of build-up. James Sanford

Title
Review for Final Destination (2000)
                These days, if you see a bunch of teens on the screen
you can bet they're on their way to either a) the bedroom, b) the prom,
or c) an early grave. The luckless bunch in "Final Destination" turns
out to be on the express train to Heaven, but the movie is so absurd the
audience may feel trapped on the highway to Hell.
       The best that can be said of "Destination" is it starts
off with an intriguing idea, which should remind some viewers of the
1996 TWA Flight 800 tragedy. High school senior Alex (Devon Sawa) is
about to embark on a flight to Paris with his fellow students when he
suddenly has a terrifying premonition and becomes convinced the plane
will explode. When Alex freaks out, he's removed from the aircraft,
along with several others, including the obnoxious bully Carter (Kerr
Smith) and the cryptic Clear (Ali Larter), a loner who doesn't seem to
be able to afford any shirts long enough to cover her belly-button.
       Within minutes after takeoff, the plane does in fact blow
up, which arouses the suspicions of the FBI and almost instantly makes
Alex about as popular in his community as poor Cassandra was in ancient
Troy. Only Clear seems sympathetic to this reluctant soothsayer and even
she bristles a bit when Alex begins insisting the worst is not over for
this handful of survivors.
       Up to this point, director James Wong has cobbled
together a passably cheesy chiller. But once Alex's cohorts start to die
off suddenly (due to such odd phenomena as unexplained surges of toilet
water and semis that manage to move silently through downtown streets),
"Destination" goes into an irreversible tailspin. As the screenplay
becomes progressively sillier, Wong tries to compensate by piling on the
gore -- it's not enough here for someone to merely get their throat
slashed if there's also a way to have them set on fire and impaled with
multiple steak knives.
      What's behind it all? Evil spirits? The ghost of a
disgruntled classmate? Satan? Since the screenwriters are too lazy to
think up an answer, they have Alex simply attribute all the mayhem to
"Death."
      Give Death some credit, though. Instead of simply
inflicting these kids with fatal aneurysms or sudden strokes, Death goes
all out to give each of its victims a splashy going-away party. When it
appears check-out time is near for Clear, Death sends lightning bolts
out of a cloudless sky, has a downed power cable shower her house with
sparks, finds a way to crack open her above-ground swimming pool and
even takes the time to blow up her car.
     One of Alex's teachers is identified as Val Lewton, which
may or may not be a nod to the great director of such horror classics as
"Cat People," "Isle of the Dead" and "The Leopard Man." What Lewton
understood -- and what Wong and company miss completely -- was that
often we're more frightened by what we don't see than what we do. So
even though "Final Destination" refuses to spare us a single bloody
detail, it's a whole lot less chilling than it was meant to be. James
Sanford

Title
Review for Hurlyburly (1998)
HURLYBURLY (Fine Line)
Directed by Anthony Drazan
 There's nothing intrinsically wrong with making a movie based on a Broadway
hit; after all, such musicals as "The King and I," "Evita," "Grease" and
"Oklahoma" were hugely successful on both stage and screen. Transferring a
set-bound comedy-drama such as David Rabe's "Hurlyburly" is considerably
more of a challenge. A high-voltage showcase for William Hurt, Sigourney
Weaver, Harvey Keitel and Ron Silver when it debuted in New York in 1984,
this is a work driven purely by Rabe's crackling conversations and the
slowly mounting chaos inside a Hollywood home shared by a band of venomous,
misogynstic film industry types whose behavior is fueled by a certain kind
of "Bolivian health food" they constantly put up their noses.
 Though director Anthony Drazan has valiantly tried to pull the piece out of
its stagey shell, it doesn't lend itself to being opened up. When the
madness is all taking place in one room, as it does in the play, intensity
is generated. When it's spread out across a variety of locations, the power
of "Hurlyburly" is quickly diluted, despite a go-for-broke performance by
Sean Penn and a typically sleek and cunning Kevin Spacey characterization of
a heartless, self-adoring louse.
 Rabe's screenplay lifts large chunks of the dialogue verbatim from the
original, but the same exchanges that had potent shock value in the
theatre -- where it sometimes felt like the actors were spitting acid at
each other -- doesn't carry the same power onscreen, and while Penn's Eddie
does everything short of garroting himself to show how tormented he is, the
man has no charm or charisma. Certainly it's impossible to imagine him
attracting someone as seemingly bright as Darlene (Robin Wright Penn).
Hurt's interpretation of Eddie had a much better balance of dark and light:
He didn't feel the compulsion to unleash a few inner demons in every single
scene. Part-time hooker Bonnie (a raunchy Meg Ryan, miles away from "You've
Got Mail") says it best midway through the story when she tells Eddie, "I'm
gonna need a magnifying glass to find what's left of your good points."
 Perhaps ultimately the problems of "Hurlyburly" go deeper than differences
in acting styles and locations. It may be that the work belongs too much to
the cocaine-crazed period in which it was written. Though Drazan and his
cast nail the decadence and depravity of a setting in which no one has any
qualms about using a teenage runaway (Anna Paquin) as a convenient sex toy,
much of this material now seems as quaint as a "Just Say No" bumper sticker.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Knock Off (1998)
    A "knock-off" is generally defined as a cheaply produced imitation of a
genuine article, like those watches they sell on the streets of New York
that carry the brand name "Rolax." True to its title, "Knock Off" is a
low-budget substitute for a real action thriller, but its sense of style
manages to make it look several degrees hotter than it actually is.
Although one of the cardinal rules of moviegoing in the 1990s says that
anything starring Eurotrashy Jean-Claude Van Damme is sure to be more toxic
than a bushel of Mexican strawberries, "the Muscles from Brussels" is
surprisingly easy to take this time around, perhaps because director Tsui
Hark keeps him on the run for most of "Knock Off's" running time and keeps
Van Damme's dialogue to the bare minimum. Oftentimes, the star simply grunts
and sighs to express himself, and in times of emotional distress, Hark has
Van Damme dramatically tear off his shirt or pull down his pants in lieu of
baring his soul.
 "Knock Off" is set in 1997 Hong Kong on the eve of the British
colony's return to Chinese rule, although the political backdrop turns out
to have almost nothing to do with what little plot there is. Van Damme plays
Ray, "the king of the knock-offs," who's tired of living it up as a result
of peddling downmarket junk to unwary consumers; he wants to go legit. "I
want to go out with my reputation intact," Ray tells an associate. "I always
made a quality piece of crap." That's a lot more than Van Damme can claim,
given such blotches on his resume as "Sudden Death" and "Streetfighter," but
we digress.
 Ray has teamed up with American entrepreneur Tommy (Rob Schneider),
but after they witness a brutal murder while participating in a rickshaw
race, the would-be businessmen are drawn into a top-secret plot involving
Russian agents who want to plant micro-bombs inside counterfeit designer
jeans. The explosives can be activated by remote control, making for a truly
killer outfit.
 Oh yeah, someone named Karen (Lela Rochon) enters the picture and
makes things tougher for all concerned, since her entrance requires Ray to
ask her, "Oo duh ell ah yu?" a question that takes longer to translate than
it does to answer.
Much of Steven E. De Souza's script, in fact, sounds like it was run through
one of those erratic language translation programs a few times before the
cast got ahold of it. "If he knew it was a nanobomb, he wouldn't be carrying
it around like a cough drop" is one of the more memorable lines of dialogue.
 Though "Knock Off" features plenty of explosions - which come in
every color of the rainbow - it's Arthur Wong's endlessly creative
cinematography, incorporating what must be every kind of special lens known
to man, that gives this utter absurdity some class. You want
double-exposures, rack-focus, high-speed zooms, wide-angle shots? They're
all here, and they give this Chinese junk a touch of class.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Tigger Movie, The (2000)
Coming at a time when so many family films aim to bowl audiences over
with razzle-dazzle animation ("Toy Story 2"), state-of-the-art
animatronics ("Stuart Little") or nonstop merchandising ("Pokemon: The
First Movie"), "The Tigger Movie" represents a refreshing detour from
the norm.  Recent Disney efforts such as "Tarzan" and "Mulan" have
employed gorgeous, almost three-dimensional visuals, but "Tigger" has
a retro look that's very much in line with the 1960s shorts "Winnie
the Pooh and the Honey Tree" and the Oscar-winning "Winnie the Pooh
and the Blustery Day." As in those films, most of the art looks like
it was based on watercolors and charcoal sketches, and it's a pleasant
blast from the past.
Nor do the songs by veteran Disney music men Richard M.  Sherman and
Robert B. Sherman ("Mary Poppins") have much to do with the Phil
Collins pop of "Tarzan." Instead, they're simply clever little ditties
that spring from the characters: Pooh warbles a "Lullabee" to put a
hive full of angry bees to sleep, while Tigger's "'Round My Family
Tree" underscores his fantasy about his ancestors.
The voices may have changed a little in the past 30 years - Jim
Cummings does splendid work voicing both Tigger and Pooh, while Nikita
Hopkins' Roo has just the right mix of sweetness and spunk - but the
sweet-natured characters and gentle humor have been preserved. So has
the concept of having the story's episodes pop off the pages of a
book, a subtle reminder that if you like the movie, you might want to
read the original A.A. Milne tales.
My 4-year-old niece Rachael (who, for the record, loved the movie, as
did her 6-year-old sister Megan and 2-year-old sister Emily) astutely
compared "Tigger" to "The Last Unicorn," an underappreciated 1982
feature which has become one of her personal favorites. Like
"Unicorn," it involves a unique creature - in this case, Tigger, of
course - who goes off in search of its own kind and learns a valuable
lesson in the process.
Tigger's journey is sparked by an accident in which Tigger
inadvertently drops a boulder on the deadpan donkey Eeyore's home
(don't worry: Eeyore isn't inside at the time) and incurs the wrath of
Rabbit.
Ordinarily, Tigger might have laughed off the incident.  But Roo, the
young kangaroo who Tigger describes as being on "the smallish side of
tiny and a little bit lacking in the perpendicular," idolizes Tigger
and has innocently put thoughts in Tigger's head about the possibility
he's not the only spring-loaded feline in the world. So Tigger sets
off on an "expotition" to uncover his history, a process complicated
by the involvement of Pooh Bear, Owl, Kanga and Piglet.
The story makes the same point as "Stuart Little," that a family is
not defined by its physical similarities, but by the feelings members
share for each other. There's nothing wrong with being different,
we're told, especially if you can still love - and be loved by - those
who aren't like you.  That's an important message for children to
hear, particularly those who feel like outsiders in their peer group
because of their size or talents, and it's quite entertainingly
conveyed here.
"The Tigger Movie" is preceded by a brief music video from Lou Bega,
in which he rewrites his Top 10 hit "Mambo No.  5" as a tribute to
Disney characters: "a little bit of Minnie in my life, a little bit of
Mickey by her side," etc. It cracked up most of the kids and several
of the adults in the preview audience.

Title
Review for Big Daddy (1999)
     Before I published my favorable review of Adam Sandler's "The
Waterboy" last fall, I should have heeded the warning Sandler used as
the title for one of his CDs -- "They're All Gonna Laugh At You."
And most of my friends and co-workers did exactly that, dismissing
"Waterboy" sight unseen as one more piece of garbage foisted upon the
screen, sometimes while adding comments such as "Now, 'There's Something
About Mary,' that was a real comedy," or "I'd rather see 'Babe: Pig in
the City'; I've heard that's just phenomenal."
O.K., "The Waterboy" was not a work of art. But it never purported
to be. (And I would rather sit through "Waterboy" 20 times in a row than
have to endure "Pig in the City" even one more time.)
Its sole purpose was to provide 90 minutes worth of jokes, which it
did. And, more often than not, Sandler and co-stars Kathy Bates and
Fairuza Balk hit the target, at least as frequently as Cameron Diaz, Ben
Stiller and Matt Dillon did in "Mary."
 "Big Daddy," Sandler's follow-up, is slightly more ambitious and,
unfortunately, much less successful.
Many comedians, at one point or another in their careers, become
obsessed with proving they can do something other than tickle the
funnybone. Often this leads to artistic disaster -- ever see Bill
Murray's shudder-inducing attempt at "The Razor's Edge"? -- in which
case the joke's on them. The best and worst that can be said about
"Daddy" is that it probably won't do any permanent damage to the careers
of anyone associated with it.
Sandler plays Sonny Koufax, a New Yorker who is living large off a
big insurance settlement, much to the dismay of his girlfriend and dad,
both of whom argue that it's time for the thirtysomething Sonny to
embrace maturity. An opportunity to do just that literally knocks on the
door when Sonny is presented with Julian (Cole and Dylan Sprouse), the
five-year-old product of his best friend Kevin's (Jon Stewart)
one-night-stand back in 1993. With Kevin conveniently in China for an
extended stay, Sonny seizes the chance to masquerade as his buddy and
adopt Julian, whose mother has conveniently died of a terminal illness.
If you're wondering why Social Services would start drawing up
adoption papers without so much as even asking for ID, or why a dying
woman would send her son to live with a dad he's never even met,
remember that looking for logic in an Adam Sandler movie makes about as
much sense as shopping for a tuxedo in Victoria's Secret.
Sonny's attempts at parenting are occassionally funny -- he has a
multitude of uses for newspaper, for example --  and the bond between
child and child-man is believable. What kindergartner wouldn't be
enamored of a father figure who plays along when the kid puts on
sunglasses he believes make him invisible and whose idea of discipline
is to murmur "go to your room, or do whatever you want"? Sandler and the
Sprouse twins click together, which means that even when the gags
fizzle, the scenes don't collapse.
But when "Daddy" dips into sentiment, it loses its balance.
Director Dennis Dugan ("Problem Child," "Happy Gilmore") doesn't seem to
know if he wants to parody "Kramer vs. Kramer" or remake it, and the
actors seem similarly lost. A climactic courtroom battle is neither
credible nor uproarious, and the movie's cop-out ending is ridiculous
even by Sandler standards.
The elements that make "Daddy" interesting are mostly on its edges.
There's some pleasantly feisty verbal sparring between Kevin's fiancee
Corinne (Leslie Mann) and Sonny over her past as a Hooters waitress, and
a surprisingly tolerant atitude toward Sonny's gay friends who he
accepts unquestioningly by noting "they just watch a different kind of
porno."  In another amusing bit, Sonny and potential new flame Layla
(Joey Lauren Adams) realize they're meant for each other when it's
discovered they share a mutual passion for the music of Styx; their
first kiss is underscored by the swoony "The Best of Times."
There's always an element of danger whenever a performer tries to
do something to broaden his or her audience and if "Daddy" is somewhat
spotty, it's still an admirable attempt by Sandler at something a bit
different. He can take some consolation in the fact that Robin Williams
had to headline plenty of pictures much worse than this before getting
to do "Dead Poets Society," "Awakenings" and "Good Will Hunting."
Patience and practice inevitably pay off.

Title
Review for Career Girls (1997)
     Director Mike Leigh's "Career Girls," the follow-up to his
American breakthrough "Secrets & Lies," is a perfect example of his
improvisational style. His method of filmmaking is to give his actors
an idea for a scene --- a starting point --- and to let them run with
it. As a result, Leigh's movies tend to be full of spontaneity and
color and low on narrative drive.
In "Career Girls," you'd be hard-pressed to find a traditional
plot. It's an aimless but amiable little portrait of two Englishwomen
who lived together for four years during the Eighties and are reunited
for a weekend ten years after their split-up. Back in University days,
Hannah (Katrin Cartlidge) and Annie (Lynda Steadman) had little in
common, aside from a shared love for the music of The Cure and a
fondness for using a copy of Emily Bronte's "Wuthering Heights" as a
sort of oracle for fortelling their futures. The rundown little flat
they shared overtop a Chinese takeaway is far removed from the upscale
condos and luxury apartments Hannah is now shopping for.
In the initial flashbacks to the women's younger days, it looks
as if Leigh may have let Steadman and Cartlidge run a bit too
wild. Plagued by a serious case of facial determititus, Annie is a
twitching bundle of loose nerves, while Hannah (she insists that it be
pronounced "Hah-NAH" initially) is strident and
self-dramatizing. Neither seems like a real person so much as an
actor's exaggerated concept of a character type, and these early
scenes play like sketches lifted from "The Tracey Ullman Show."
But as Cartlidge and Steadman find the right levels, "Career
Girls" develops into an insightful meditation on the nature of
friendship, as well as a peek into the psyches of two people who think
they've dealt with the past but have actually only pushed it
aside. Both women have plenty of unresolved issues that seem to keep
getting in the way of their finding true happiness and peace of mind,
and each is a bit envious of the other. The bird-voiced and retiring
Annie admires Hannah's forthrightness and drive; Hannah, who's almost
always hiding behind some sort of a front, confesses, "I'm not strong
enough to be as vulnerable as you."
The poignancy of moments like that offset the occasional
contrivances that develop late in the film: There are at least two too
many run-ins with faces from the past, and an encounter with a former
flatmate who's now a jabbering derelict goes on long after it makes
its point. Leigh is most successful when he simply let Steadman and
Cartlidge work their quiet magic together, without distractions.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Message in a Bottle (1999)
Nicholas Sparks' novel "Message in a Bottle" is a gossamer-thin story
of a columnist who finds the item of the title on a beach, reads the
enclosed letter, and then sets out to find the man who wrote it.
When she finally tracks him down, there's an instant mutual
attraction; sure, it's a sterling example of the literature one of my
college friends called "the 'I turned around and I was in love'
books," but on its own terms it's a perfectly passable daydream.
Director Luis Mandoki's adaptation of the best-seller maintains the
same mellowness,almost to a fault. Next to this, the films of "The
Horse Whisperer" and "The English Patient" could almost be mistaken
for entries in the "Die Hard" series. If the novel is best washed down
with a pitcher of herbal iced tea, this unquestionably beautiful movie
might make some in the audience wish for a triple espresso.
The screenplay has changed the setting of the drama, the occupations
of both the leads - Garret (Kevin Costner) no longer runs a scuba
school and Theresa (Robin Wright Penn) now has some kind of research
job that somehow allows her plenty of expense money and time off to
zoom around the country - and thrown in are some backwoodsy former
in-laws to make trouble for Garret. Why bother? Theoriginal material
would have worked just fine onscreen.
"Bottle" wants so very badly to be a world-class tearjerker and
there's no denying it has a whole lot of things going for it.
Costner's performance is relaxed and charming, much closer to the guy
everybody liked in "Tin Cup" and "Field of Dreams" rather than the
self-congratulatory figure of "The Postman." He and Penn - who seems
to have carefully studied Meg Ryan's moves from "Sleepless In Seattle"
- blend comfortably together, a major plus in any romantic drama.
The film's trump card turns out to be Paul Newman as Garret's salty
dad.  He and Costner have several wonderful small scenes together, and
Newman's work radiates with world-class starpower; it takes a lifetime
of training to turn a simple "go away" into a major laugh line.
The photography by Caleb Deschanel is also astonishingly pretty,
although that's not such a shock when you remember Deschanel was the
director of "Wind," a movie that was little more than two hours of
sailing ships and sea spray.
So why does "Bottle" feel half-empty instead of half-full? Part of the
trouble lies in Mandoki's approach to the story's ending, which worked
fine in the novel but seems corny in the extreme onscreen. Also, The
movie's pace is so leisurely - this being a Costner film you can bet
there are numerous lingering close-ups of Kev - attention tends to ebb
and flow like the tides Garret and Theresa ride.
There's a lot to enjoy in "Message in a Bottle," to be sure, and it
might be just the ticket for those in the mood for anything remotely
romantic. But like a festive basket of chocolate-covered potato chips,
it's the sort of thing that certain people will definitely appreciate
more than most.

Title
Review for In Dreams (1999)
All sorts of wild things are going on in the bedroom of Claire Cooper
(Annette Bening), but not necessarily the kind of action you might
suspect.  For one thing, every time she and husband Paul (Aidan Quinn)
get hot and heavy, Claire zones out and has disturbing visions of
little girls in danger, spooky orchards and menacing strangers, none
of which puts her in the mood for love.
Is Claire a modern-day Cassandra or a garden-variety kook? "In Dreams"
eventually gets around to revealing the answer, but by then it's
doubtful anyone will care, since we've already seen Claire attempt
suicide by driving off a bridge, desperately struggle to push what
looks like 20 pounds of apples down her garbage disposal; answer the
phone with a hysterical "leave me alone!"; hurl a computer monitor out
the window after being spooked by a mysterious message; and cause a
multi-car pile-up after prancing into the middle of a busy road.
Suffice to say, she's not exactly your typical lovable heroine.
Then again, "In Dreams" was directed and co-written by Neil Jordan,
whose movies ("The Crying Game," "The Butcher Boy") usually dance on
the cutting edge. This one, unfortunately, quickly waltzes off into
Looneyville, despite a tantalizing set-up and various themes pilfered
from "Don't Look Now," "Psycho" and "Silence of the Lambs."
After awhile, the picture becomes so patently absurd all you can do is
laugh, as our girl Claire finds herself locked in a padded cell and
telepathically tortured by a cross-dressing mystery man (Robert Downey
Jr.) with a fondness for obscure nursery rhymes and raggedy clothes
that make him look like a refugee from a dinner-theater production of
"Oliver!"  Bening and Downey, perhaps forgetting they're in one of
those new-fangled "talkies," recklessly indulge in the kinds of
outrageous facial expressions not seen onscreen since the last chapter
of "The Perils of Pauline" unspooled.
Though "In Dreams" is easily the worst film Jordan has ever been
associated with - beating out "High Spirits," which featured Daryl
Hannah as an Irish ghost in what looked like a plastic trash bag -
it's full of vivid images: golden Japanese lanterns, emerald-tinted
stained-glass windows, crimson bedcovers. It's a rainbow of ravishing
colors, but the crock it leads to is decidedly not filled with
gold. James Sanford

Title
Review for Boiler Room (2000)
 In the minds of most people, Oliver Stone's 1987 film "Wall Street" is
chiefly remembered today for Michael Douglas' frighteningly funny
performance as a suave but bloodthirsty trader and for having opened
only weeks after the stock market tumble.  However, to some young
people, particularly those who re-read "The Art of War" regularly and
live for sales on Armani suits, the movie is a vital cultural touchstone
full of such pearls of wisdom as "greed is good" and "lunch is for
wimps." Writer-director Ben Younger's "Boiler Room" would love to be the
"Wall Street" of the post-yuppie era, featuring a crew of
twentysomething warriors hot on the trail of their first million and
willing to do just about anything to close a deal or get a promotion.
 Unfortunately, "Boiler Room" doesn't have Douglas or anyone like him at
its wheel. Instead, Younger gives us Ben Affleck as Jim Young, a
no-nonsense pitchman who recruits hungry youngsters into the J.T. Marlin
brokerage with promises of endless cash and luxurious living, then all
but castrates the kids if they underperform. Affleck appears to have the
moxey to pull off the role, but, much to the movie's detriment, he's not
the main character.
 In fact, he's reduced to a glorified cameo role while we're asked to
care about shiftless Seth Davis (Giovanni Ribisi) who gave up running
daily card games out of his living room to enter the trading world after
seeing the Porsches and Ferraris in the J.T. Marlin parking lot. "I was
making good money at the casino," Seth tells us in his narration, "but
these guys were mackin' it hard."
 Sadly, Seth soon learns what J.T. Marlin founder Michael (Tom Everett
Scott) and his disciples are peddling is not but blue-chip stock but
worthless shares in make-believe companies. Didn't he ever stop to
wander why the firm had its offices on Long Island instead of in
Manhattan? Or why so much paper-shredding goes on after office hours?
 Perhaps in an attempt to ape David Mamet's shark-eat-shark drama
"Glengarry Glen Ross," Younger's script is proudly profane and goes out
of its way to make almost all the major characters thoroughly
unpleasant. But Mamet's work had real bite and fire, while "Boiler Room"
is ultimately a troubled-son morality play (with bad Dad as the villain)
dressed up in tough talk and a relentless rap soundtrack.
 As he proved in last year's fiasco "The Mod Squad," Ribisi, with his
blackened eyes and thick tongue, is definitely not hero material and he
looks woefully out of place in the company of Affleck, Vin Diesel and
Scott Caan, all of whom are convincingly slimy and cold-blooded. With
such a cipher at its center, "Boiler Room" wears out its welcome about
as quickly as a telemarketer calling during the dinner hour. James
Sanford

Title
Review for Footloose (1984)
         Not long before "Footloose" was originally released 15 years
ago, I was assigned by an editor to go to Jenison High School, the only
school in the Grand Rapids area that did not have a prom. My article was
supposed to answer the question "what do teens who can't dance do for a
good time?".
 After checking with our lawyers, my boss decided the answers
were unprintable.
 Suffice to say, the youth of Jenison had a good deal in common
with the kids of Bomont, the sleepy hamlet that serves as the setting
for "Footloose," a movie which still has a lot to say about parent-child
relationships. Although Bomont has successfully outlawed dancing, that
hasn't stopped their young people from drinking, smoking pot and raising
hell every time the adults are out competing for the attention of
Reverend Shaw Moore (John Lithgow), Bomont's self-appointed spiritual
leader.
 Ironically, the Reverend is a much better father to the
community than he is to his 17-year-old daughter Ariel (Lori Singer),
one of the sassiest and most obnoxious kids around. Rev. Moore's idea of
concern is to constantly check up on Ariel, something she's come to
resent. "How come when I'm here at home you're never as interested in
what I do or say as you are when I walk out that door?" she asks him, in
a scene sure to make more than a few parents uneasy.
 The scenes between Rev. Moore and Ariel are beautifully played
by Lithgow and Singer and, much to his credit, director Herbert Ross has
given them just as much weight as the movie's showier segments. One of
the many elements that puts "Footloose" far ahead of most pictures about
teen life is that Dean Pitchford's script doesn't automatically paint
everyone over 21 as an idiot. Nor is Ariel's irresponsible behavior
presented as something to emulate; only when she stops hanging out with
rednecks and sleeping around does she find a purpose in life.
 "Footloose" is primarily remembered as the "dance movie" that
made Kevin Bacon a star, but it's a good deal savvier than it seems on
the surface. While the plot revolves around a clash between new kid in
town Ren McCormick (Bacon) and the Bomont town council -- led by Rev.
Moore -- over a proposed senior prom, interestingly "Footloose" does not
condemn the church. Instead of looking like a buffoon, Rev. Moore comes
off as a genuinely concerned, albeit somewhat misguided man who is torn
between doing what he feels is right for his followers and what his
daughter wants him to do.
 His wife Vi (a superb performance by Dianne Wiest) is the voice
of reason in the house, serving as a mediator between the two sides.
She's supportive of her husband, but recognizes his weaknesses,
including his tendency to debate with Ariel instead of listening to her.
"You can lift a congregation up so high, they have to look down to see
Heaven," Vi tells him. "But it's the one-to-one where you need a little
work."
 Gradually, we come to realize the majority of the townsfolk
have simply been overreacting to a tragedy that occurred five years ago,
in which several teens (including Rev. Moore's son) were killed in a
drunk driving accident following a party. In their shock, the Bomont
town council elected to abolish drinking and dancing, and, in the time
since, some of the locals have become progressively more paranoid about
other possible "corruptions." The movie's real villains are the
ultra-conservative couple Roger (Alan Haufrect) and Eleanor (Linda
MacEwen), who organize book burnings and get rid of teachers who assign
Kurt Vonnegut's "Slaughterhouse Five."
 Yes, there are musical numbers in "Footloose" (including the
memorable "Let's Hear It For The Boy" sequence in which farm boy
Christopher Penn learns to strut his stuff), a few uninspired fight
scenes and some now-unbelievable bits involving "Sex in the City"
goddess Sarah Jessica Parker as Ariel's dowdy best friend. But, like
"Saturday Night Fever," another movie adapted for the stage, it's
essentially a sturdy drama that could hold up even if you cut out all
the dancing and fighting. In fact, the only thing that truly dates the
movie is its soundtrack, which holds up lame metal acts like Quiet Riot
and Moving Pictures as examples of "subversive music"; if this kind of
stuff was considered shocking, imagine what the Bomontians would have
made of Marilyn Manson and Korn.
 Although the conflict over the prom is resolved predictably,
the relationship between Rev. Moore and his daughter is not. Instead of
one triumphing over the other, they reach a compromise.
"I just don't know that I believe in everything you believe in," Ariel
tells her dad. "But I believe in you." It's moments like that that make
"Footloose" much better than its reputation might lead you to believe.
James Sanford

Title
Review for 8MM (1999)
No director in recent memory has been as villified as Joel Schumacher,
the man responsible for the universally reviled "Batman and Robin." In
truth, Schumacher has made some stylish entertainments in his day,
including "Flatliners," "The Lost Boys," "Cousins" and "The Client,"
but to read some of the criticisms leveled against him on various Web
sites, you'd think he was responsible for genocide rather than for
killing off a movie franchise.
Faced with such derision, Schumacher might have seen "8mm" as a chance
to restore his artistic credibility.  Instead, the movie turns out to
be an even bigger embarrassment than "Batman and Robin"; it's far more
pretentious and self-important, and displays almost no hint of
Schumacher's usually dead-on visual sense.
In terms of its content, "8mm" is closer to the infamous howler
"Hardcore," in which George C. Scott plays a Grand Rapids Bible-beater
who cruises Hollywood looking for his trampy daughter, than to "Boogie
Nights." Even the setup borders on the ridiculous as private eye Tom
Welles (Nicolas Cage, in his dullest performance since "Zandalee") is
hired by a rich widow - named Mrs.  Christian, just to make sure we
all get the point - to determine whether or not a film she found in
her late husband's vault features a genuine sex slaying.
Why's she so concerned? Who knows? The request is just an excuse to
send Welles into a seamy underworld of sex for sale, where he teams up
with streetwise Max (Joaquin Phoenix) to find the sinister sleaze
merchants responsible for the movie. Andrew Kevin Walker's lethargic
screenplay has to throw in such cliches as a secret diary and a fight
to the death in a graveyard just to move its plot forward.
The second half of "8mm" turns into a sort of "Pornman and Robin" as
our intrepid heroes are manhandled, handcuffed to beds, tied to
crosses and threatened with all manner of debauchery. Meanwhile,
Welles' wife Amy (Catherine Keener) drops in occasionally to bleat
such time-honored standards as "why didn't you call me?" and "I can't
go on like this!" offering some credence to Tom's heterosexuality as
Schumacher routinely - and teasingly - makes it seem as if Tom and Max
are moments away from wrinkling the sheets together.
Despite numerous shots of bondage gear and women in chains, "8mm" has
little information to reveal about the S&M culture, and what
information it does present is served up with sanctimony. Making a
yawn-inducing movie about erotica is quite a trick, but Schumacher has
somehow managed to pull it off.
Come back, Mr. Freeze and Poison Ivy. All is forgiven. 

Title
Review for Beach, The (2000)
         Given his post-"Titanic" heartthrob status, it's easy to forget
Leonardo DiCaprio has usually been an actor who likes to work close to
the edge. "Titanic" and "The Man in the Iron Mask" seem almost
out-of-character for the man who previously starred in such dark works
as "The Basketball Diaries," "This Boy's Life" and "Total Eclipse."
While "The Beach" returns DiCaprio to the dangerous ground on which he's
given his best performances, the film itself turns out to be much like
its hero Richard: good-looking, slightly cryptic and ultimately more
than a little tiresome.
 The fault lies not with DiCaprio, who does as much as he can to
make Richard intriguing, or with director Danny Boyle, who brings to
"The Beach" a few splashes of the audacity that marked his breakthrough
films "Shallow Grave" and "Trainspotting," as well as his 1997 wash-out
"A Life Less Ordinary." Instead, the problems with the picture stem from
the script by John Hodge, adapted from the Alex Garland novel of the
same name. It's all set-up and no pay-off, a problem that also hobbled
Hodge's "A Life Less Ordinary."
 "The Beach" does, however, offer oodles of magnificent scenery
and, in its first half, a great wish-fulfillment premise. Richard, an
American in Thailand, comes into possession of a crudely drawn map of a
secret island where, supposedly, the pot is plentiful and the people
peaceful. With a couple of French tourists in tow, Richard journeys to
this private paradise and finds it more than lives up to its billing.
Sure, there are a few machine gun-toting farmers and a couple of
bloodthirsty sharks on hand to occasionally harsh everyone's mellow, but
every home has its drawbacks.
 There's also a secretive leader of this bohemian cult named Sal
(Tilda Swinton of "Orlando"), who will eventually cause friction between
Richard and his new love Francoise (Virginie Ledoyen). Sal also gets
what's sure to be one of the most memorable lines of 2000: "Get some
sleep. I may wish to have sex again before we eat breakfast."
 Exactly how the downfall of the beach club comes about is
awkwardly written and getting the plot on track into the third act
requires Richard to do some astounding stupid things which all but
eliminate any interest we have in him. Hodge clearly wants to turn this
daydream into "Apocalypse Now" (Richard even sees a few clips of the
Francis Ford Coppola epic during his stay in Bangkok), with a little bit
of "The Deer Hunter" tossed in for good measure. Unfortunately, the
swing from the movie's daydreamy first two-thirds into its nightmarish
finale doesn't exactly work.
 What most viewers will probably take away from "The Beach" is
memories of all that gorgeous water, in every conceivable shade of blue,
and cinematographer Darius Khondji's striking images of DiCaprio, who is
photographed by candlelight, in the glow of an iMac screen and even
against the eerie radiance of "disturbed plankton shrimp." As in all his
films, Boyle has doused the soundtrack in alluring techno and
electropop, with themes by Underworld and All Saints combining
harmoniously with the surging score by Angelo Badalamenti ("Twin
Peaks"). It's obvious though that Boyle and Hodge intended the audience
to go home with much more on their minds than postcard-pretty scenery
and terrific music. James Sanford

Title
Review for Sliding Doors (1998)
SLIDING DOORS
(Miramax)
Directed by Peter Howitt
 Everyone at one time or another has wondered after making a choice, "What
if I'd done it differently?", and that's the central conceit of "Sliding
Doors," a kind of comic-romantic "Twilight Zone" episode,  in which a young
Englishwoman named Helen gets the opportunity to live out two destinies
simultaneously. Her fortunes turn on whether or not she boards a London
subway train, the kind with sliding doors that close quickly and firmly.
 One Helen makes it onboard and gets home in time to catch her novelist
lover Gerry (John Lynch) rumpling the sheets with his shrewish American
paramour (Jeanne Tripplehorn); the other Helen doesn't make it into the car
and never learns about Gerry's afternoon delights. In each existence there's
romance, despair, a career change and a new look  for Helen: Unsurprisingly,
the blonde Helen ends up having considerably more fun than her brunette
counterpart.
 Helen is played by Gwyneth Paltrow, who's currently competing against
herself at the box-office with "Great Expectations" and "Hush." Out of the
three films, "Sliding Doors" is easily the one that showcases Paltrow to
best advantage. There's no showiness in her utilization of an English accent
(unlike her former beau Brad Pitt's "hey, look, I'm acting!" turns as an
Irishman in "The Devil's Own" and an Austrian in "Seven Years in Tibet" last
year) and, better yet, Paltrow actually sounds like she knows what "wanker"
and "bollocks" mean. But the real revelation in her performance is the
charisma that radiates from both her Helens: You may pick up hints of
Audrey Hepburn and of Paltrow's real-life mother Blythe Danner, a gifted
actress who never quite achieved prominence in films. Too often in her past
movies Paltrow has been cast as either an ice princess, a gloomy grump or a
kook, and it's a relief to watch her get a crack at playing someone
down-to-earth.
 Writer-director Peter Howitt has contrived a vehicle for his star that's
often more intriguing than it is truly funny: Despite some clever lines,
"Sliding Doors" never truly hits its comic stride. That's not to say that
the movie doesn't have many assets to offer, including a typically charming
turn by John Hannah ("Four Weddings and a Funeral") as a potential new
boyfriend for Helen, a delightful soundtrack of British hits from such bands
as Olive and Peach Union, and a satisfyingly twisted wrap-up. Howitt has
also managed to track Helen's parallel lives with a minimum of confusion,
making it a pleasure to "mind the gap" (as they say in the London tubes)
between the two diverging stories.

Title
Review for Governess, The (1998)
        On a purely dramatic level, writer-director Sarah Goldbacher's "The
Governess" isn't much more than a slightly more cerebral take on "Jane
Eyre," burdened by a near-lethal dose of  melodrama in its final half-hour.
But for sheer visual elegance, "The Governess" has few equals, and the
magnificence of its imagery more than compensates for its somewhat
overheated story.
 The movie is also bolstered tremendously by the finely tuned work
of Minnie Driver and Tom Wilkinson, two actors who've demonstrated uncommon
versatility throughout the last year, Driver in films ranging from the
ridiculous ("Hard Rain") to the near-sublime ("Good Will Hunting"), and
Wilkinson in roles running the gamut from the uptight foreman in "The Full
Monty" to the mad Marquess in "Wilde" to the villain in "Rush Hour." Both
actors are near the top of their form in "The Governess."
 Driver lands the key role of Rosina, the kind of challenging,
multi-faceted character most young actresses can only dream of playing, and
she obviously revels in it. Born into a rich Jewish household, Rosina is
sharp-witted, well-educated and bright enough to realize a woman's mind is
far less valuable in the eyes of mid-19th-century English society than her
domestic skills and drawing-room manners. Becoming a wife is viewed as the
only viable option for a girl of her class; employment opportunities are
limited to servitude or prostitution.
 After her father is murdered, Rosina dodges a marriage of
convenience to a fish merchant and takes it upon herself to provide for the
family. Since anti-Semitism runs high all around her, she masquerades as a
Christian named Mary Blackchurch to secure a job as a governess in a remote
home on Scotland's pastoral Isle of Skye, which the city-bred lass describes
in a letter home as "green, green and more green."
 The position is unrewarding at first -- "Mary" quickly realizes Clementina
(Florence Hoath), the little girl she's supposed to watch over is "a rodent
in lace petticoats" who enjoys leaving dead rats on people's pillows and
staging demented little puppet shows -- but Charles Cavendish (Wilkinson),
her employer, recognizes the governess' intelligence and allows her to
assist him in his research lab. Charles is looking for a solution to
stablize the photographs he's been taking; "Mary" finds the answer when she
accidentally splashes one of the pictures with saltwater (which, in a minor
triumph for her people, was made with kosher salt).
 What eventually develops, of course, is exactly what one would
expect in an isolated location between a lonely man with a chilly, nagging
wife (Harriet Walter) and a young woman hungry for knowledge and acceptance.
Meanwhile, "Mary" tries to hold on to her Jewish heritage by worshipping in
secret and whispering prayers in Hebrew even as she crosses herself in the
Cavendishs' church.
 Since "The Governess" deals with the early days of photography,
Goldbacher incorporates into her story all sorts of gorgeous visual effects
to accentuate the material, including sepia-tinting that makes certain
scenes look like antique postcards, complex double- and triple-exposures to
layer images on top of each other and a wonderful bit in which "Mary"
remains fixed in the center of the frame while hyperactive Clementina is
seen as a blur zooming around her. Goldbacher also weaves some powerful,
almost ethereal images into the encounters between Charles and "Mary"; the
shot of a white veil rising and falling on the virginal governess' face as
Charles caresses her is loaded with both symbolic meaning and erotic
potency. It's moments like this one that linger in the mind long after the
less convincing elements of "The Governess" have faded away.

Title
Review for Anastasia (1997)
 As subjects for family entertainment spectaculars go, the legend of
Anastasia is neither as odd a choice as Victor Hugo's "Hunchback of Notre
Dame" nor as conventional as "Cinderella," although the animated musical
"Anastasia" somehow manages to incorporate elements of both into the curious
tapestry it weaves.
It also ties in such old reliables as an adorable animal companion, a regal
and loving grandmother and three different balls for our heroine to waltz
through.
Opulence abounds in "Anastasia," thanks to the efforts of animators Don
Bluth and Gary Goldman ("An American Tail," "The Land Before Time"), but the
visual elegance can't fully camouflage a clumsy story built around the
conceit that the Russian Revolution was motivated not by the uprising of the
proletariat, but by the conjuring of the sorcerer Rasputin.
In "Anastasia," Rasputin "The Mad Monk" is transformed into a decomposing
resident of Hades, with a batch of winged green demons to do his dirty work.
At the top of his list is placing a curse on Russia's ruling Romanov family,
all of whom "disappear" - the movie's genteel explanation - except the
Empress Dowager and her granddaughter Anastasia, who are separated in their
flight fromthe palace.
Ten years later, rumors circulate that Anastasia has somehow survived and
that the Empress Dowager will pay 10 million rubles to whoever can bring the
missing heiress to Paris.
Enter Anya, a teen-age amnesiac who's en route from an orphanage to a job in
a fish factory when she takes a detour to St. Petersburg instead and meets
up with con artists Dimitri and Vlad, who see in the spunky young woman a
potential fortune.But when word of Anastasia resurfacing hits the
underworld, Rasputin vows to pull himself together - literally - and to do
away with the last of the Romanovs.
If "Anastasia" offers little in the way of valid historical background or
genuine charm, it does include some breathtakingly sophisticated animation,
particularly a terrific train crash and a gorgeous moment in which Anya
envisions the now-shuttered ballroom of the palace in its glory days, with
phantom dancers encircling her.
"Anastasia" also stands, along with "Sleeping Beauty," as one of the few
cartoons to be shot in cinemascope, which gives the animators a spacious
canvas on which to work their magic - sometimes too spacious, as many of the
backgrounds have a rushed, sketchy look.
The songs by Stephen Flaherty and Lynn Ahrens ("Once On This Island") are
generally pleasant, althoughdeleting the overlong tribute to the splendors
of Paris (featuring Gertrude Stein, Josephine Baker and Maurice Chevalier
caricatures that should baffle the matinee crowd) would have helped the
film's pace.
As the speaking voices of Anastasia and Dimitri, Meg Ryan and John Cusack
make no attempt to sound anything but American, leaving Angela Lansbury to
steal the show with her splendid reading of the Empress Dowager.
There's much to admire in "Anastasia," although it's hard to embrace a film
that seems more interested in beating Disney in the animated musical
sweepstakes. Unfortunately, in the company of such cinematic royalty as "The
Little Mermaid," "Pocahontas" and "The Lion King," "Anastasia," like the
real-life woman who inspired it, seems like a pretender rather than a
contender.

Title
Review for Déjŕ Vu (1997)
Director Henry Jaglom is proof-positive you can sustain a filmmaking career
without ever having a hit. How many among us have sat through such Jaglom
masterworks as "Venice/Venice," "Eating" or the ever-popular "Babyfever"?
Anyone? Anyone?
 That's because Jaglom is the king of the "talking head" movies, most of
which proceed as follows: A group of sophisticates (or pseudo-sophisticates)
gather in a house, pour some drinks and exchange story after story about
their tragic (or semi-tragic) lives. The actors are encouraged to improvise.
The camera drifts slowly from one solemn face to another as the audience
either drifts off to sleep or drifts toward the lobby.
 There's a dose of that in "Deja Vu," Jaglom's latest effort, but this time
out he was lucky enough to get Vanessa Redgrave to participate in the
discussion. Unsurprisingly, everything she says is well worth listening to,
even though her role as an aging jet-setter is peripheral to the main
storyline about how American fashion buyer Dana Howard (Victoria Foyt, who
co-wrote the screenplay with Jaglom) slowly realizes married British painter
Sean Elias (Stephen Dillane of "Welcome To Sarajevo") is her romantic
destiny.
 From their first meeting on the legendary white cliffs of Dover, both Dana
and Sean have the unshakable feeling they've met before -- thus, the film's
title. But the course of true love never runs smoothly, and it turns out
Dana is engaged and Sean already married. Of course, when Sean's wife starts
pushing the "let's have a baby" button and Dana's fiance runs her planned
"Fred Astaire and Ginger Rogers evening" by getting stoned, it becomes
rather obvious what's coming next.
 Though stretches of "Deja Vu" get bogged down in pointless talk, much of it
obviously made up as the camera rolled, the movie is otherwise about as
close to the mainstream as Jaglom as ever likely to get. There's a neat
framing device involving Dana's encounter with a mystery woman, a charming
Dillane performance, music by Lena Horne and Vera Lynn, and, of course, the
sensational Redgrave, who puts some needed zing into the movie's second
half.
 On the other hand, Foyt's characterization runs hot and cold, to the point
where it's tough to tell if Dana is merely wrestling with a divided heart or
struggling with undiagnosed manic depression. Take her if you must, Sean,
but don't forget to fill that lithium prescription before taking off for
paradise.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Simple Wish, A (1997)
         Once upon a time, there was a movie queen named Kathleen, who
starred in great films like ``Body Heat,'' ``Romancing the Stone,''
``The Accidental Tourist'' and ``War of the Roses.'' She was
beautiful, talented, rich and famous, and seemed destined to live
happily ever after.
  Then one day, the Wicked Witch of the West Coast blew into
town and put an evil spell on Kathleen that ruined her taste in
scripts. ``Everyone will adore you in `V.I. Warshawski,' and playing a
plump frump in `House of Cards' will do wonders for your sex appeal,''
advised the wily witch.  Before Kathleen knew it, she herself was
playing a witch and not very well, either.
  ``Hmmm,'' Kathleen thought, ``whatever happened to that happy
ending?''
  It's nowhere to be found in ``A Simple Wish,'' Kathleen
Turner's latest kamikaze mission. Perhaps she figured playing an
over-the-top villainess would give her career a needed boost, a la
Glenn Close doing Cruella DeVil.
  Sadly, Turner's turn is more reminiscent of Bette Midler
muddling through ``Hocus Pocus.'' ``A Simple Wish'' works overtime to
please, but to no avail. There's one inspired sight gag, but it
scarcely redeems the rest of this debacle.
  Martin Short, seemingly trying out a bad Jim Carrey
impersonation, is Murray, a less-than-gifted fairy godmother who turns
up in New York to assist a little girl.
  The child in question is Anabel (Mara Wilson), a veritable
fountain of faith, whose belief in magic irks her cynical brother
Charlie (Francis Capra, a youngster unencumbered by anything
resembling talent). ``There are no fairy godmothers in Manhattan!''
scoffs Charlie, a line that should bring down the house when ``A
Simple Wish'' plays the East Village.
  Shortly after Murray botches Anabel's wish, evil ex-fairy
Claudia (Turner) and her assistant Boots (Amanda Plummer) sweep into
town to swipe the magic wands from all the current wish-granters. The
ensuing comic clash between inept Murray and smarmy Claudia is almost
as funny as ``Long Day's Journey Into Night,'' and every bit as
magical.
  ``A Simple Wish'' offers a textbook example of all the worst
tendencies of `family entertainment,' including cut-rate
special-effects, a slapdash script, and the lamest one-liners this
side of ``Batman & Robin.''  Turner is neither campy nor creepy, and
the scene in which Short and Plummer bark and snarl at each other must
surely mark an all-time low for both actors.  Adorable Wilson looks on
the verge of embarassment throughout, as well she should.

Title
Review for Con Air (1997)
         Turn down the bone-rattling Dolby Digital soundtrack of ``Con
Air,'' and you'll hear the sound of the assembly line that produced
it.
  It's taken years to refine the process of building a
blockbuster and the ``Con Air'' team don't deviate from the standard
procedure. After all, originality might get in the way of the
pyrotechnics.
  The formula is thus: Cast actors with a bit of box-office
clout, such as Nicolas Cage, John Cusack and John Malkovich; hire a
director (in this case, Simon West) smart enough to shoot each
explosion with several cameras, so it can be shown multiple times from
different angles; find a script with all the depth and complexities of
a coloring book. And ``Action!''...
  ``Con Air,'' which is much better produced than it is
written or acted, spins a wild and wooly yarn about a
prisoner-transport plane that's hijacked in mid-air by the
inmates. These cunning cons are helpfully described by one officer of
the law as being ``the worst of the worst,'' and in Scott Rosenberg's
screenplay, each of the primary heavies comes with his own tagline.
  For instance, leader Cyrus ``the Virus'' Grissom (Malkovich,
all but sleepwalking) is ``a poster child for the criminally insane.''
The crimes of Hannibal Lecter wannabe Garland Greene (Steve Buscemi)
make ``the Manson family look like the Partridge Family.'' Militant
Nathan Jones (Ving Rhames), aka ``Diamond Dog,'' wrote an
autobiography and ``they're talking to Denzel about the movie.''
  Also onboard is Cameron Poe (Cage), an ex-Army Ranger who
has served his time and is supposed to be on his way home to his
ever-loving wife (Monica Potter). Looking startlingly pumped-up and
sporting locks that would make Michael Bolton envious, Cage reverts to
a ``po' folks'' accent and drops phrases like ``makes no never-mind''
to assure us that Poe is true-blue, despite his sordid
surroundings. Convention dictates that Poe will end up serving as a
double agent, appearing to assist Cyrus and company while secretly
betraying them.
  West's shoot-it-in-slow-motion style owes more to MTV than
to director Sam Peckinpah, who pioneered it and knew the key to using
undercranking effectively was to employ it sparingly. West simply
doesn't seem to have any other technique.
  Fresh moments in ``Con Air'' are few, although there's an
inspired bit of sick humor incorporating a falling body, bird
droppings and Percy Faith's Muzak masterpiece, ``A Summer Place,'' as
well as an odd nod to exotica, in the form of a Hispanic transvestite
passenger (played by the androgynous Renoly), who takes time out from
shooting cops to vogue about in a form-fitting sun-dress.
  The rest of the movie is less concerned with pushing the
boundaries of its genre than in pushing the buttons of its audience,
something West and Rosenberg do surprisingly well: For all its
calculation and predictability, ``Con-Air'' should appease the
action-starved. The picture delivers most of what it promises,
although unlike the first two ``Die Hard'' movies or ``Terminator 2,''
there's no extra spin on the material.
  In fact, Rosenberg doesn't waste a minute on building
Cusack's character, ground-bound U.S. Marshal Vince Larkin; as a
result, Cusack, who often gives his roles an eccentric edge, can do
little in this film except run from fireballs and duck when flying
debris comes his way.  Dumpling-cheeked Irish character actor Colm
Meaney (``The Commitments,'' ``The Snapper'') is squeezed into the
thankless role of a braying DEA stooge.
  Compared to Disney's action extravaganzas of the past two
summers, ``Con Air'' has none of the suspense of ``Crimson Tide'' or
``The Rock,'' although it does get off the ground faster than either
of those predecessors. As some would say, if you like this sort of
thing, this is the sort of thing you'll like.

Title
Review for Eye of the Beholder (1999)
         If you took five different jigsaw puzzles, threw the pieces
together on a table top and spent two hours trying to make a cohesive
picture out of the various bits, you might end up with something along
the lines of "Eye of the Beholder." Made in 1998, this maddening mess
features a pre-"Double Jeopardy" Ashley Judd and a pre-"Phantom Menace"
Ewan McGregor alongside a peroxide-dipped Jason Priestley, an
unflatteringly photographed Genevieve Bujold and, for reasons known only
to her agent and God, songstress k.d. lang. All concerned have seen
better days -- and been in much better movies -- than this one.
 McGregor plays Stephen Wilson, a.k.a. "The Eye," a surveillance
expert who bolts from his job at the British Consulate to follow mystery
woman Joanna Eris (Judd) all over North America. Ostensibly a wig-maker
(and she does seem to have enough fake hairpieces at hand to shame even
Cher), Joanna is also deeply disturbed and has a habit of slaying every
man who tries to get close to her.
 For most guys, this would not be a turn-on, but Stephen is
prodded into pursuing Joanna by visions of his long-lost daughter, who
tells him Joanna is really "just a little girl." A little girl who likes
to blindfold her lovers shortly before she stabs them to death perhaps,
but a little girl nevertheless. Aside from having been abandoned by her
own daddy one memorably miserable Christmas night, Joanna also received
counseling from a probation officer (Bujold) who may or may not have
helped to make her what she is today.
 In its first half-hour, "Eye" is baffling but weirdly absorbing
as well. The rest of the film, however, is just plain weird, jumping
from Pittsburgh to San Francisco to Chicago to "The Cafe at the End of
the World," a flapjack shack located somewhere on the Alaskan tundra,
where Joanna becomes the world's least-likely waitress and Stephen her
most devoted customer.
 How Stephen and Joanna have the money for all this traveling
and where Joanna comes up with all the disposable disguises she sports
are questions left unanswered. This is not a story in which logic ever
intrudes on the action. As in a dream, things seem to happen simply
because the characters want them to happen. Or perhaps, given Joanna's
obsession with astrology, because it was written in the stars.
 Director Stephan Elliott labors long and hard to make this
nonsense look as slick as possible and manages to come up with a handful
of effective scenes, such as a split-screen image of Joanna in a bubble
bath and Stephen looking longingly at the wall that separates him from
her. But after nearly two hours of voyeurism, ghosts, sight-seeing and
chases, untidily wrapped with an extremely abrupt finale, "Eye" is just
like that mass of scattered jigsaw puzzle pieces: There might possibly
be a picture there, but who wants to waste their time trying to put it
all together? James Sanford

Title
Review for Lost in Space (1998)
Ten years ago, William Hurt was "The Accidental Tourist" and now, he's "Lost
In Space."
That might seem like a journey from the sublime to the ridiculous, except
that the big-screen version of the 1960s TV show is considerably more
technically sophisticated and slightly more cerebral than the original,
which was notable chiefly for its charmingly absurd stories and
bargain-basement monsters: Remember the episode featuring the dreaded giant
carrot?
As TV-to-movie adaptations go, "Lost In Space" is probably one of the more
respectable entries in the field, with expensive production values adding a
classy sheen to what's essentially cheesy material. The film features some
impressive computer-generated animation, Akiva Goldman's script incorporates
mini-tributes to everything from the "Star Wars" movies to "The Waltons,"
and director Stephen Hopkins has avoided playing the movie as camp.
Still, something has been left out. Goldman ups the IQs - if not the
maturity levels - of most of the stalwart Robinson family and even
introduces a bit of dramatic dysfunction. Unfortunately he accomplishes this
at the expense of the characters' charms, so although libido-driven pilot
Don West (Matt LeBlanc) and disgruntled pre-teen Penny (Lacey Chabert) seem
much more human than their television counterparts, they're also less fun to
have around.
The Goldman creations that really work are his revisions of professor John
Robinson (Hurt) and the diabolical Dr. Smith (Gary Oldman). On the show,
Robinson rarely projected anything except concern, but Hurt humanizes the
man, introducing subtle twin undercurrents of jealousy toward youthful Don -
who's hot for John's daughter Judy (Heather Graham) - and Robinson's own
father, a legendary military strategist whom Don idolizes. Goldman also
restores Smith's dark heart (which vanished early on in the show), much to
Oldman's obvious delight. Graham and Mimi Rogers as mom Maureen, on the
other hand, are given little to do.
The first half of the film parallels the series' set-up, as scheming Dr.
Smith sabotages the Robinsons' mission to find a new Earth and, in the
process, becomes trapped aboard the Jupiter 2 spacecraft with the family as
they hurtle into unexplored galaxies. There's a fair amount of suspense as
the crew almost crashes into the sun and later discovers an abandoned ship
with a scary secret.
As he's proven in his scripts for the last two "Batman" movies, however,
Goldman is not particularly skilled at building plots. Though the last third
of "Lost In Space" introduces all sorts of intriguing concepts, Goldman
doesn't develop any of them particularly well, and the less said the better
about the excruciatingly cutesy Blawp, a combination monkey-chameleon which
looks glaringly fake and exists for no reason other than possible marketing
tie-ins.
Fans of the TV version will be amused by the cameos early on by series stars
June Lockhart, Angela Cartwright, Marta Kristen and Mark Goddard. Sadly
though, the innocent silliness that made the "Lost In Space" series a
classic guilty pleasure is missing in action here. Maybe the carrot monster
wasn't such a lame idea after all.

Title
Review for Kissing a Fool (1998)
         Every so often, there's a pleasant surprise hiding inside an
unpromising package. Case in point: ``Kissing A Fool,'' which comes
with a laundry list of turn-offs attached to it.
  First off, it was directed and co-written by Doug Ellin,
whose previous film, the excruciating ``Phat Beach,'' was almost as
offensive as a minstrel show. Second, it stars David Schwimmer of TV's
``Friends,'' who didn't exactly set the screen aflame in ``The
Pallbearer.'' Finally, there's that awful title, which calls to mind
George Michael's gooey ballad of the same name.
  But ``Fool'' succeeds both as a look at the competitiveness
lurking underneath many friendships and as an offbeat romantic comedy
that allows Schwimmer to convincingly play against type. One of the
handicaps of ``Pallbearer'' was Schwimmer's by-the-numbers performance
in a role almost identical to his milquetoast Ross on ``Friends.''
  ``Fool'' is something else entirely, as Schwimmer plays Max
Abbitt, an egomaniacal Chicago sportscaster who greets everyone with a
cheerful ``Wuttup?'' and who'd be obnoxious if he weren't so
ridiculous.
  Max is blissfully hedonistic until his considerably more
sensitive best friend Jay (Jason Lee, who has few equals when it comes
to finding humor in misery) introduces him to book editor Sam (Mili
Avital). Following what Jay terms a three-week ``Love Boat'' episode,
Max and Sam are engaged and living together.
  Still nursing a heart shattered by his would-be supermodel
ex-girlfriend Natasha (Vanessa Angel), Jay tries to be happy for his
friend, with only semi-convincing results.
  Starting off as an acidic look at love, ``Fool'' begins as a
variation on ``Chasing Amy,'' which also cast Lee as the guy on the
outside of an affair and which sported the same sort of slightly
grainy/gritty look Ellin has given this film.
  But by its midpoint the movie has somehow reinvented itself
as a quirky romance that recalls, of all things, ``Moonstruck,'' with
Lee as Nicolas Cage, Avital as Cher and Schwimmer as Danny
Aiello. ``Fool'' also incorporates various other colorful characters,
including Sam's bratty cousin (Judy Greer), Max's libidinous co-worker
(Kari Wuhrer) and the much-discussed Natasha, who shows up late in the
game to declare ``I go by Nastassia now'' and to try to reignite Jay's
torch.
  Author John Patrick Shanley graced ``Moonstruck'' with a
magnificent finale that untangled all its plot threads in one
astonishing, hilarious sequence. Ellin isn't a gifted enough writer to
come up with that kind of climax to his story, so ``Fool'' wheezes to
a stop rather than wrapping up with any real punch.
  But that doesn't negate the considerable charms of Avital,
Lee and Schwimmer or the frequent bursts of wit in Ellin's script,
several of which deal with Jay's sappy taste in music. When Max chides
him for wallowing in self-pity while listening to Barry Manilow
albums, Jay protests he wasn't playing Manilow discs: ``That was a
radio special!'' he insists.

Title
Review for Price Above Rubies, A (1998)
A PRICE ABOVE RUBIES
Directed by Boaz Yakin
 The last time Hollywood appropriated New York's Orthodox Jewish community
as a backdrop for drama the result was the infamous "A Stranger Among Us,"
which featured the absurd sight of Melanie Griffith, practically the poster
girl for goyim, trying to pass herself off as a Hassidic to investigate a
murder. Despite the controversy it generated during its production, "A Price
Above Rubies" turns out to be a much more credible, albeit critical, look at
a secretive, low-key society. Writer-director Boaz Yakin has fashioned a
mostly compelling story of a woman's search for identity in a world
dominated largely by men, and Renee Zellweger, previously best known as the
sweet mom from "Jerry Maguire," delivers a quietly stunning performance in
the lead.
 "Rubies" centers around Sofia (Zellweger), who grew up in an Orthodox home
and married a great scholar, just as her parents wanted her to. But now,
after having a baby and moving to New York with her husband Mendel (Glenn
Fitzgerald), Sofia's starting to feel constrained and claims she's being
tormented by an "inner fire." "I don't even know where my body ends and my
soul begins," Sofia tells her Rebbe (John Randolph) after Mendel shames her
for her enthusiasm in bed and she unintentionally makes a pass at her stern
sister-in-law Rachel (Julianna Margulies). Using his sister-in-law's
confusion and her natural talent for determining the quality of jewels to
his own advantage, Mendel's less-reverent brother Sender (Christopher
Eccleston) seduces  Sofia, then puts her to work as a buyer for his jewelry
store. Sofia's affair doesn't bring her liberation or even the sexual
release she seems to be craving, but it does finally present her with the
opportunity to have some control over her own life.
 Zellweger has a face the camera adores and a low-key charm that makes Sofia
almost instantly recognizable, even though the culture she's a part of seems
quaint and foreign at first. Although "Rubies" veers perilously close to
melodrama in its last third, Zellweger's honesty keeps the movie on track.
Eccleston and Fitzgerald are both fine as the men Sofia is caught between,
and Margulies, in a surprisingly unsympathetic role, is suitably severe.
 Yakin, also previously looked into the world of ghetto youths in his smart
and insightful "Fresh," manages to blend a certain degree of mysticism into
his drama without turning it into incomprehensible nonsense. Most authors
wouldn't even dare to have Sofia plagued by visions of the ghost of her
beloved brother: In Yakin's hands, it seems perfectly logical. James Sanford

Title
Review for Deep Impact (1998)
Deep Impact
Rated PG-13
By James Sanford
The Kalamazoo Gazette
Heavens above, it turns out we poor earthlings are about to be squished by a
comet the size of New York!
Does President Beck (Morgan Freeman) have a plan?
And, most importantly, will struggling reporter Jenny Lerner (Tea Leoni) get
to be the MSNBC anchor person during "Armageddon"?
These and many other burning questions arise during the course of "Deep
Impact," an end-of-the-world scenario that is alternately silly, sensational
and soapy. But itšs rarely moving, although the screenplay by Michael Tolkin
and Bruce Joel Rubin does everything but dice onions in an attempt to jerk
tears. Somehow though, when the curtain is coming down on life as we know
it, it's hard to fret about whether or not Jenny will make peace with her
frosty father (Maximillian Schell) or what will become of teen star-gazer
Leo Beiderman (Elijah Wood) and his girlfriend Sarah (Leelee Sobieski).
Not helping matters is the fact that Leo comes off as irritatingly earnest,
partially due to the script requirements, mostly because of Wood's one-note
performance.
Leoni's intrepid newscaster looks practically paralyzed once she gets on the
air, reading bulletins in a thin, wavering voice that would inspire millions
to reach for their remotes.
Obviously inspired by the 1951 sci-fi classic "When Worlds Collide" - with
elements of "On The Beach" thrown in - "Deep" takes a thought-provoking
premise and submerges it in suds.
While President Beck sputters sanctimony ("You will still pay your bills,"
he warns), a crew of astronauts led by veteran rocket-jockey Spurgeon Tanner
(Robert Duvall) takes off on a mission to blow up the threatening comet.
Everyone involved in this endeavor has their own family troubles to contend
with, and, added to Jenny and Leošs woes, these subplots send the film's
syrup content to toxic levels.
Disaster movies by nature are overwrought, but they shouldnšt be as
consistently absurd as this. For example, Sarah's doomed mom hands off her
newborn to Sarah, who hops on a motorcycle with the infant, leaving without
a single diaper or bottle of formula.
Somehow, no one in the Capitol seems to know about the billions of dollars
being secretly diverted into the construction of the worldšs largest
spaceship. And though everyone seems to know weeks beforehand that the
comet's impact will create a tidal wave that will drown the East Coast, it
appears there's no evacuation plan proposed.
Director Mimi Leder seems clueless when it comes to staging sentimental
scenes but she does have the proper touch for the movie's few suspenseful
patches, such as the truly scary sequences with Ron Eldard and company
racing against time to plant nuclear "moles" on the comet's surface.
The scenes of cataclysmic catastrophe in the last 10 minutes also are
impressive and sometimes even imaginative: The image of the head of the
Statue of Liberty floating through the flooded streets of Manhattan is
particularly eerie.
If only the filmmakers had stripped away the saccharine and the
self-importance of "Deep Impact" they might have found the kind of haunting
epic they're trying so hard to create. Instead they've cooked up a crockful
of hard-to-swallow melodrama, full of urgent weddings and quickie family
reunions. It would have been much more fun to drop in on the folks who
elected to party like it's never gonna be 1999.

Title
Review for October Sky (1999)
There are undoubtedly thousands of kids in America who are growing up in
dismal situations similar to that of Homer Hickam, the young hero of
"October Sky," and for them, this movie could provide a much-needed shot
of inspiration.
After all, the real-life Hickam managed to use his brain to escape a
trap of a small town, at a time when the only possible way for boys like
him to get to college was on a football scholarship. His is a story that
says there's no shame in being smart, and it could easily lead younger
viewers to think seriously about what they want to do with their
futures.
But far from being a sermonette about the virtues of  education,
"October Sky" is spirited, exciting entertainment that delivers on any
number of levels - and you don't have to be a youngster to enjoy it.
 Taken from Hickam's book "Rocket Boys," the screenplay by Lewis Colick
skillfully sidesteps most of the potential pitfalls of such a
rags-to-rockets tale and, on the occasions when it stumbles upon a
cliche, "Sky" usually finds a way to reinvent it.
 As played by Jake Gyllenhaal - he looks like a friendlier, more
emotionally balanced Robert Downey Jr. - Homer is remarkably easy to
identify with, an athletic underachiever who lives in the shadow of his
older brother Jim (Scott Miles), a star with the Big Creek Owls football
team. Most of his friends have problems of their own: Roy Lee (William
Lee Scott) is regularly devastated by his alcoholic stepfather; O'Dell
(Chad Lindberg) lost his father in a mining accident; brainy Quentin
(Chris Owen) is regarded as an object of ridicule by his classmates.
And, as the name tells us, the boys' hometown of Coalwood, W.Va., offers
exactly one occupational opportunity.
 With the October 1957 launch of Sputnik by the Soviet Union, "things'll
never be the same again," says Homer's teacher Miss Riley (Laura Dern).
She's talking about the international balance of power, but she might as
well be referring to the lives of Homer and company, who challenge
themselves to build a working rocket of their own in the face of
overwhelming skepticism, particularly from Homer's dad (Chris Cooper)
who regards the conquest of space as "a novelty."
 "Sky" works as well as it does because of a feeling of total conviction
from everyone concerned, from director Joe Johnston ("The Rocketeer,"
"Jumanji") on down. Barry Robison's production design offers a vividly
drab depiction of 1957 West Virginia, from the well-weathered bleachers
adorned with the motto "for our Owlstanding fans" to the mine elevator
that looks like a man-eating prison cell. Sincerity rings in the acting
of Gyllenhaal, Dern and Cooper, while the scene-stealing Scott and
Natalie Canerday as Homer's mom who dreams of tropical paradises turn
their
supporting roles into little triumphs. James Sanford

Title
Review for Hav Plenty (1997)
        There are some smart ideas and pleasant performances in ``Hav
Plenty,'' an attempt at a modern screwball comedy involving several
affluent African-Americans, and it's easy to admire writer Christopher
Scott Cherot's ambitions - especially after such recent low-brow
turkeys as ``Ride'' and ``I Got The Hook-Up.''
  But though its heart is in the right place, ``Plenty''
doesn't quite click. Perhaps in the end Cherot spread himself a bit
too thin: In addition to authoring the screenplay, he also produced,
directed, edited and starred in his movie.
  It's his performance as homeless young writer Lee Plenty
that handicaps the picture most severely, since, in order for the
story to work, we must believe Lee is a charmer who proves to be prime
date-bait for the women he meets. Though Cherot dons a threadbare
sweater and tattered jeans to look suitably down-at-the-heels, the
charisma the part requires eludes him.  He tries to make up for this
lack of sparkle by playing cute - blowing bubbles in his juice with a
straw, affecting a hangdog look, making little asides to the audience
- and few things are less attractive than adults trying to be
adorable.
  In form, ``Plenty'' is vaguely similar to director Paul
Mazursky's fondly remembered ``Down and Out In Beverly Hills.'' Lee,
living in his car since he lost his lease on a New York apartment,
accepts a last-minute invitation from sophisticated friend Havilland
Savage (Chenoa Maxwell) to spend New Year's Eve at her family's home
in Washington. Once in the house, Lee is practically attacked by
Havilland's lusty pal Caroline (Tammi Katherine Jones), Havilland's
unhappily married sister Leigh (Robbine Lee) and, finally, by
Havilland herself.
  The ladies just can't resist ... the discreet charm of the
destitute?  Whatever allure Lee possesses, it's not on-screen. Sex and
nudity are also conspicuous in their absence, sort of a surprise in a
movie of this type.
  Cherot's direction is more assured than his acting, and he
gets generally strong performances from his cast. Lee and Maxwell make
strong impressions, generating a sisterly friction that feels
true-to-life, and Hill Harper appears to be having some serious fun as
a Puff Daddy-ish musical impressario.
  If the cinematography by Kerwin De Vonish is sometimes a bit
on the fuzzy side, it's worth noting that ``Hav Plenty'' was made for
only $65,000, a pittance by Hollywood standards. Even so, Cherot
managed to attract Kenneth ``Babyface'' Edwards to supply a seductive
soundtrack, including a Babyface/Des'ree cover of Bruce Springsteen's
``Fire'' that undoubtedly will burn up the charts this summer.

Title
Review for Vie ręvée des anges, La (1998)
THE DREAMLIFE OF ANGELS (Sony Pictures Classics)
Directed by Erick Zonca.
         The mark of a truly good movie isn't necessarily how much you
enjoy it while you're sitting in the theater (or on the couch, as the
case may be) but how you feel about it days or weeks later. A popcorn
extravaganza like "Wild Wild West" may help to kill a couple of hours on
a hot day, but it doesn't exactly sweeten in the memory, and if you
suffer through a truly bad film you want to start forgetting the
experience as quickly as possible.
 "The Dreamlife of Angels" is a truly fine piece of work that's
certain to linger in your mind for quite awhile. You may find the
central characters a little hard to warm up to -- neither of them is
likely to be mistaken for Julia Roberts -- but their experiences, their
friendship and the difficult lessons they learn are genuinely haunting.
 "Angels" is the story of Isa (Elodie Bouchez) and Marie
(Natacha Regnier), a pair of young women fending for themselves in a
dreary corner of France. Isa sells handmade postcards when she's in
between menial temporary jobs; Marie toils in a sweatshop and lives in
an apartment that belongs to a hospitalized mother and daughter.
Eventually Isa moves in with her and the two begin to find the
fun-loving, girlish parts of their personalities they've been forced to
suppress, probably for years. They begin hanging out at the mall, trying
to crash concerts and flirting playfully with anonymous guys. It's a
fulfilling friendship and, since this is a French film, you can rest
assured it won't last.
 Before long, Marie, who initially seemed like the brighter of
the two, has fallen hopelessly for Chris (Gregoire Colin), a slick
womanizer who owns some clubs and dazzles her with his seemingly
limitless supply of cash. Isa sees through Chris and tries to steer her
friend toward a less well-heeled guy who truly adores Marie. Sadly,
Marie's self-esteem is so low she'd rather sneak away for a few
afternoon trysts in a motel room with Chris than consider spending time
with someone who might actually treat her with respect.
 Using decidedly unglamorous locales and stars, director Erick
Zonca has given the story what amounts to an almost documentary feel;
Isa and Marie seem so true-to-life at times you might feel a bit
voyeuristic. "Dreamlife" is also a movie less concerned with plot than
it is with details and character development. The waifish Isa ultimately
becomes wise and self-sufficient while the more domineering Marie
gradually collapses from the inside out. Bouchez and Regnier so
brilliantly get under the skin of these women and provide them with such
vivid personalities that by the end you feel you've known them for
years.
 Every so often Hollywood tries to Americanize French movies,
generally unsuccessfully. Let us pray no one hires Liv Tyler and Alicia
Silverstone to re-do "Dreamlife": That would truly be a nightmare. James
Sanford

Title
Review for Thousand Acres, A (1997)
A THOUSAND ACRES(Touchstone/Buena Vista)Directed by Jocelyn Moorhouse
 The film adaptation of Jane Smiley's Pulitzer Prize-winning "A Thousand
Acres" works so hard to pack as much of the book into an hour and 45
minutes that it feels like the highlights tape pulled from several
months of a daytime soap-opera. Incest, lawsuits, broken marriages,
impulsive affairs, senility, cancer, suicide: They're all present and
accounted for. You'll barely have time to weep over one crisis before an
even worse one pops up.
 But at the heart of this sometimes strident movie are two magnificent
performances, which redeem everything that surrounds them. As the
relentlessly downbeat and vengeance-hungry Rose, Michelle Pfeiffer all
but breathes fire. Mad about everything---and mad at herself
besides---Rose rips away years of cover-ups to reveal her family's
darkest secrets, as well as her private hell. When Pfeiffer challenges
her husband (Kevin Anderson) after a ruined game of Monopoly, it's a
scene Bette Davis would have come back from the grave to play.
 Equally "wow"-worthy is Jessica Lange as the serene, industrious Ginny,
whose perpetual happy face finally cracks and disintegrates. Few
actresses give themselves over to a role as thoroughly as Lange does:
She leaps into the pit at the bottom of Ginny's soul, unafraid of where
she'll land. Playing off the equally determined Pfeiffer seems to
sharpen her instincts even more; plenty of sparks fly before the finale.
 Laura Jones's screenplay sometimes short-sells the novel's themes and
its' characters' motivations, but the priviledge of watching two of
America's finest leading ladies scaling new dramatic heights is reason
enough to put "Acres" on your must-see list.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Gattaca (1997)
GATTACADirected by Andrew Niccol
 In the future, a "love child" could face problems far worse than
anything ever imagined by Diana Ross and the Supremes. After all, in the
world of "Gattaca," the right genetic make-up determines your future,
and parents are willing to pay plenty for designer genes to ensure that
their children live long, healthy and comfortable lives. Those unlucky
enough to be "natural births" run the risk of being labelled "in-valid,"
a title that guarantees a future of menial work.
 Such is the pre-determined destiny of  Vincent (Ethan Hawke), the
product of his parents' romantic getaway on "the Detroit Riveria."
Vincent dreams of being an astronaut, but, having been born with poor
vision and a 99 percent chance of heart disease, he's quickly set
straight by his father, who warns him that "the only way you'll see the
inside of a spaceship is if you're cleaning it." So what's a guy to do
but borrow the identity (i.e. the blood, urine, skin cells and hair) of
a "valid" to get into Gattaca, the training ground for astronauts?
 "Gattaca" is a smart, beautifully crafted piece of
not-so-science-fiction that manages to successfully mix social
commentary and suspense into a generally enthralling story.
Writer-director Andrew Niccol's vision of the world of the near-future
is strikingly simple, an environment dominated by golden hues and dull
greys, sparked ocassionally by electric blues and greens. While
technology has marched ahead--with instant DNA analysis making life much
easier for police officers and employers--fashion has gone back to the
Camelot years, with men confined in rigid business suits and women
sweeping up their hair into Doris Day-style honeybuns. Michael Nyman's
spare neo-classical score complements the picture beautifully.
 Vincent's risky masquerade would have provided more than enough of a
plotline by itself, but Niccol raises the stakes by introducing a love
interest (Uma Thurman) whose outer perfection hides her inner
weaknesses, as well as including a hastily resolved murder subplot
that's easily the movie's flimsiest element. Niccol also gets solid
performances out of Hawke and Jude Law, as the crippled genetic superman
who sells his persona to Vincent. Aside from looking gorgeous
throughout, Thurman doesn't have much to do, but she seems much more at
home here than she did in the campy climate of "Batman & Robin."
 Unlike most recent science-fiction, "Gattaca" actually gives you
something to talk about on the way home, and you're certain to think of
it again the next time you clip your fingernails and buff away some dry
skin.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Slums of Beverly Hills (1998)
For most people, adolescence is a lonely, often humiliating time and,
writer-director Tamara Jenkins argues in the perceptive "Slums of Beverly
Hills," it's a lot lonelier and more humiliating if you have the misfortune
to be the only female in a family that's more worried about staying a step
ahead of creditors than it is concerned making about your adjustment to
womanhood easier.
 Such is the plight of 14-year-old Vivian Abramovitz (Natasha Lyonne, who
played Woody Allen's scheming daughter in "Everyone Says I Love You") in
1976 Los Angeles. She thinks her recently developed breasts are a curse,
since they make her the butt of coarse jokes. Even worse, her father Murray
(Alan Arkin) doesn't see anything wrong with dragging Vivian and her
brothers Ben (David Krumholtz) and Rickey (Eli Marienthal) all over the city
in a series of impromptu moves, most of which happen shortly before the rent
is due on whatever "dingbat" apartment they're in.
 Vivian complains but her words fail to sway Murray. So the Abramovitzs
drift from one semi-seedy home to another, finally landing on the very brink
of Beverly Hills because Murray wants to take advantage of the good school
system. "Is this it?" Vivian asks as the quartet settles in at their
so-called "luxury" digs at the Camelot, decorated in ghastly shades of
harvest gold. "Are we bourgeoise yet?"
 Reminiscent of Patty Dann's charming novel "Mermaids" and the delightful
1990 film based on it, Jenkins' semi-autobiographical screenplay is a
haunting reminder of what it feels like to be the kind of unfortunate teen
who gets caught almost everytime she tries something a little adventurous.
When he sees his daughter all but spilling out of a halter, Murray insists
Vivian wear an over-the-shoulder bra underneath the top. And luckless Vivian
is later discovered by her dad dancing (which is bad enough) while clutching
a certain item (which makes it much, much worse).
 Although she's the center of attention in almost every scene, Lyonne proves
she's more than up to the challenge of carrying "Slums." She never overplays
Vivian's gawkiness nor her petulance, finding a charming middle ground.
Though it's a sad fact of Hollywood life that "unusual-looking" young women
like Lyonne rarely go on to major stardom, here's hoping this offbeat beauty
can beat the odds; she's genuinely funny and easy to identify with.
 Arkin, who too often underplays to the point of becoming wallpaper, offers
a surprisingly fine interpretation of Murray's silent desperation. Once a
successful restaurant owner, this sixtysomething man is now reduced to
flirting with a widowed sugar mama (Jessica Walter) to scrounge up some
extra cash.
 When cousin Rita (a delightfully zonked Marisa Tomei, in her first good
role in ages) shows up at their doorstep after escaping from a detox clinic,
"Slums" truly shifts into high gear, as the Abromovitzs go to great lengths
to try to keep Rita clean and sober, the better to use her to squeeze a
generous allowance out of rich Uncle Mickey (Carl Reiner) and Aunt Belle
(Rita Moreno). Meanwhile, Vivian has her hands full trying to resolve her
relationship with Eliot (Kevin Corrigan), a pot-dealing Charles Manson
admirer who nevertheless wins her heart.
 Not all of "Slums" works: Jenkins overplays her hand with an ill-advised
scene between Murray and Rita, and some of the scenes depicting Vivian's
sexual awakening would seem crass were it not for Lyonne's presence. But
it's rare to find a comedy with so many memorably etched characters and
rarer still to come across a movie set in the 1970s that doesn't continually
beat you over the head with goofy period relics. By the end of "Slums,"
you'll want to know more about the Abromovitzs, and any film that makes you
actually hope for a sequel must be pretty good.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Alien: Resurrection (1997)
ALIEN RESURRECTION
(Twentieth-Century Fox)
Directed by Jean-Pierre Jeunet
 Chances are good that many of the moviegoers who'll be stand in line for
"Alien Resurrection" this weekend weren't even born when the original
"Alien" debuted in the summer of 1979, introducing the world to Ripley, one
of the most dynamic --and determined-- heroines ever to appear in
science-fiction. Eighteen years later, she's still being played by Sigourney
Weaver, and the most intriguing aspect of "Resurrection" is the way Josh
Wheadon's screenplay allows Weaver the opportunity to overhaul Ripley
somewhat. After all, when we last saw her, she was plunging to her death to
avoid giving birth to a new Alien queen; by the time, "Resurrection" opens,
approximately 200 years later, scientists have successfully cloned Ripley
(after seven botched tries) from DNA samples.
 But their motives are hardly humanitarian. Indeed, when we first see
Ripley, she's in the process of undergoing a kind of Caesarian section,
having the unborn baby queen removed from her chest. From this specimen,
General Perez (Dan Hedaya) spectulates, science can learn about all facets
of the alien and possibly even find a way in which to tame them (!). "As far
as I'm concerned, Number Eight is a meat by-product," says Perez of Ripley,
who, in this new incarnation, is stronger and stranger than ever before. Her
senses are alarmingly acute, and though she looks human, her blood now
sizzles when it's spilled.
 After Perez's ship is visited by the crew of a freighter called The Betty,
"Alien Resurrection" takes a more familiar turn, as the alien specimens
escape and run amok, decimating the human population. Call (Winona Ryder),
the least off-putting of The Betty team, realizes that everyone needs
Ripley's help to survive, but at the same time, Call isn't sure this genetic
superwoman is really trustworthy: After all, who knows how human she really
is?
 Director Jean-Pierre Jeunet (best-known for the cult fave "The City of Lost
Children") manages a stylish mix of arresting imagery and largely non-stop
action. In one of the film's best shots, Jeunet's camera swoops into the
mouth of a screaming man and travels down his throat and into his chest to
reveal the gaping jaws of the alien fetus inside of him, and Internet
addicts will enjoy Jeunet's visualization of the future of computer
interfacing, which looks like a cross between religion and heroin use.
Jeunet and Wheadon also handle the story's quieter moments with equal
finesse: the eerie encounter between Ripley and her failed "forerunners" is
one of the finest, most chilling sequences in any of the "Alien" films.
 Weaver, perhaps inspired by the new kinks in Ripley's character, seems much
livelier and more vigorous than she did in the so-so "Alien 3," and there
are flashes of surprising humor in her exchanges with Call, who Ryder
underplays effectively. Michael Wincott and Ron Perlman contribute the
requisite grit as Call's uncouth co-workers and Brad Dourif's nutty take on
the chief scientist is quite amusing.
 Though "Alien Resurrection" can't entirely sidestep the feeling of deja vu
that hangs over most sequels, and ultimately wraps up with a climax that's
less exciting than most of the rest of the picture, it's a perfectly
respectable sequel, crafted with a certain degree of imagination and
produced with some of the finest special-effects money can buy. If it
doesn't have the novelty value of the original or the relentless suspense of
James Cameron's "Aliens" (1986), "Resurrection" is still a swift, rewarding
shocker in its own right. James Sanford

Title
Review for Drowning Mona (2000)
 My friend Ruth, a die-hard Bette Midler follower, sighed as she
looked at the cinema marquee. "I guess I have to go see 'Isn't She
Great'," she mumbled, with all the enthusiasm people generally reserve
for such statements as "I guess I have to pay that $700 repair bill" or
"I guess I have to have that prostate exam."
 So she got her ticket and sat down with the six other Midler
addicts who had gathered in the theater. Ruth shook her head. "Bette has
just completely lost her audience," she said.
 Ruth is right. Midler, whose name once meant money in the bank
back in the mid-1980s, is now considered a risky Bette by moviegoers.
After a string of big hits ("Down and Out in Beverly Hills," "Outrageous
Fortune," "Beaches"), she floundered for most of the 1990s in such
disappointments as "Hocus Pocus" and "Stella." Even the surprise success
of "The First Wives Club" hasn't been enough to jump-start her film
career, as evidenced by the paltry attendance for "Isn't She Great."
 Now comes "Drowning Mona," which reteams Midler with Danny
DeVito. Previously, they turned "Ruthless People" into one of the
funniest movies of the 1980s. But "Ruthless" had a snappy script and a
sensational supporting cast (Judge Reinhold, Helen Slater, Anita Morris,
Bill Pullman, etc.). "Mona" features Neve Campbell, Jamie Lee Curtis,
William Fichtner and Casey Affleck trying awfully hard to convince us
they're delightfully discombobulated while screenwriter Peter Steinfield
painstakingly spins a comic whodunit that's neither terribly funny or
particularly mysterious.
 As the Mona of the title, Midler is saddled with a two-note
character. Most of the time, she's a shrieking harridan, but once in a
while she stops howling long enough to indulge in whiny self-pity. No
wonder everyone in Verplanck, N.Y. wants her dead.
 When Mona's Yugo goes flying off a cliff into the river, nary a
tear is shed by her neighbors or her family. In fact, Ellie (Campbell),
who's been on the receiving end of Mona's fury, speculates property
values in the community will probably go up as a result. Ellie's police
chief dad (DeVito) is obligated to investigate the death, however, and
the suspects pile up speedily. Ellie and her fiance Bobby (Affleck),
trashy waitress Rona (Curtis) and Mona's slovenly husband Phil
(Fichtner) are among the most likely candidates, although the longer
"Drowning Mona" drags on, the less anyone will care about the
resolution.
 A handful of giggles arise: The chief, a devotee of Broadway
musicals, tries to coax confessions from the locals by asking them to
"imagine you're Annie and I'm Daddy Warbucks, or I'm Auntie Mame and
you're little Patrick."; a local mechanic (Kathleen Wilhoite) who
fancies herself the next Melissa Etheridge quickly composes a
hard-rocking ode to Mona's memory; on one of their dates, Ellie and
Bobby venture out to see a dinner theater production of "Oh Calcutta."
The soundtrack, ripe with such obscure 1970s pop as the Pipkins' "Gimme
Dat Ding" and David Dundas' "Jeans On," is often more amusing than
anything the script can provide.
In short, "Drowning Mona" is the sort of thing that will
probably become a staple on Comedy Central in about five years, resting
comfortably alongside such snoozers as "Once Upon A Crime" and "Who's
Harry Crumb" in the cable channel's line-up.
 But Ruth will undoubtedly show up to see it this weekend,
shaking her head and sighing as she trudges in to pay homage to her
idol. Yeah, sometimes it's tough to be a fan. James Sanford

Title
Review for Double Indemnity (1944)
         In the dazzling "Double Indemnity," Fred MacMurray's Walter
Neff is the kind of velvet-tongued cynic who used to be described as
"hard-boiled": He's a top-flight insurance salesman who makes the
mistake of calling on Phyllis Dietrichson (Barbara Stanwyck), whose
ice-colored hair hints at the cold blood in her veins. Pretending to be
concerned about her oilman husband (Tom Powers), Phyllis enlists
Walter's help in getting an accidental death policy on him, and a few
meetings later, Walter is eagerly helping Phyllis come up with an
air-tight plan to kill off her spouse and collect on the policy's double
indemnity clause, the extra money to be paid if he dies under
extraordinary circumstances, such as falling from a moving train.
 What Walter doesn't count on is the brilliant mind of boss
Barton Keyes (Edward G. Robinson), a claims manager who also happens to
have world-class deductive powers. By the time Phyllis confesses to
Walter she's "rotten to the heart," he's already in far over his head,
both with her and with Phyllis' lovesick stepdaughter Lola (Jean
Heather).
 For the generation that grew up thinking of MacMurray as the
kindly father-figure on "My Three Sons" and Stanwyck as the regal
matriarch of "The Big Valley," it's a jolt to see them playing such
devious, money-hungry types. But though Stanwyck and MacMurray (try
counting how many times he calls Phyllis "babe") both shine under Billy
Wilder's crackling direction, "Indemnity" is stolen by the fast-talking
Robinson, who turns what could have been a colorless supporting role
into a showcase. Though largely dark and foreboding in the classic
film-noir style, "Indemnity" does provide a few giggles when seen today
-- imagine a time when drive-ins served beer, secretaries didn't mind
being called "sweetheart" by their bosses and people were free to smoke
while perusing the aisles of the local Piggly Wiggly. James Sanford

Title
Review for Shanghai Noon (2000)
         If you were to make up a list of the hardest working movie
stars, martial arts master Jackie Chan would definitely belong somewhere
in the top ten. Although he's now in his late 40s and has completed at
least 75 films, Chan, who apprenticed with such masters as the Peking
Opera and Bruce Lee, continues to push his body to the limit in pursuit
of new physical challenges.
 Usually he finds a way to put a humorous spin on his stunts as
well. In his American breakthrough picture "Rumble in the Bronx," for
instance, he beat up villains using shopping carts and refrigerators. He
dispatched some bad guys in "First Strike" by brandishing a ladder as
adeptly as if it were a fencing foil. In "Rush Hour," he literally ran
up a garden wall and propelled himself onto a tree branch.
 No one can accuse him of not earning his paycheck.
 Chan collects several bruises and reaps quite a few laughs in
"Shanghai Noon" (the title is a slightly complicated spoof of Gary
Cooper's "High Noon"), playing Chon Wang, a Forbidden City
floor-scrubber who pursues the kidnapped princess Pei Pei (Lucy Liu) all
the way to Nevada in the late 19th century. Along the way, the
determined Wang confronts hostile Crow Indians in a fight that leads to
some amazing tomahawk juggling, is saddled with a ridiculously stubborn
horse and trades quips with Roy (Owen Wilson), an outlaw who's so chatty
and such a bad shot he was thrown out of his own gang.
 Wilson, who plays Roy as a 1980s Valley Guy trapped in the body
of an 1880s gunslinger, meshes very comfortably with Chan, and even when
the jokes are moldy, the duo cheerfully try to put them over anyway.
Often you'll find yourself laughing even though the punchline turned out
to be exactly what you expected.
 Although there's plenty of violence and shooting, "Noon"
somehow manages to stay reasonably sunny and lighthearted without
resorting to the condescending who-cares-it's-just-a-movie attitude that
sunk Mel Gibson's "Maverick" a few years back. Director Tom Dey, who
trained in TV commercials, has an unfortunate habit of keeping his
camera too close to the action, so much so that at times it's hard to
see exactly who's doing what. But by the same token, Dey is smart enough
to trust Chan and Wilson's instincts -- there are several clever scenes
here that were almost certainly either partially or entirely improvised
by the stars.
 "Noon" squeezes a lot of comic mileage out of the sight of the
silk-robed, ponytailed Wang mixing it up with cowboys and desperadoes.
The Indians dub him Man-Who-Fights-In-Dress and the local sheriff brands
him "the Shanghai Kid," which offends Wang slightly because, he
explains, he's not from Shanghai. That's the least of Roy's worries:
"Justice system's all screwed up," he snarls when he learns the bounty
on Wang's head is $1,000 while the reward for Roy is a mere $500.
 Of course, "Noon" wouldn't be a Chan movie if it didn't include
a few eye-popping set pieces and Chan obliges by nimbly running up a
collapsing pile of logs, doing a series of tricky moves on the slender
catwalk of a bell tower, turning a piece of rope and a horseshoe into a
lethal weapon, and managing to balance a sword on a wooden pole during a
big fight. "Noon" also concludes with the traditional series of outtakes
Chan fans expect, and they're well worth sticking around to see. James
Sanford

Title
Review for Supernova (2000)
        If you've seen the TV commercials for "Supernova," you may have
noticed the ads don't tell who's starring in the film, which may lead
you to suspect it has a cast of unknowns. Surprise -- it actually
features Angela Bassett, James Spader, Lou Diamond Phillips, Wilson Cruz
("My So-Called Life") and Robin Tunney ("End of Days").
 So why hide these stars? Probably because "Supernova" is such a
superbomb the actors wish they could take their names off of it.
 That's exactly what director Walter Hill has done. The movie
now bears the credit "directed by Thomas Lee," even though Hill oversaw
the shooting of this sci-fi adventure during the summer of 1998 (and
fellow director Francis Ford Coppola reportedly had a hand in the film's
extensive cutting and re-cutting throughout last year).
 What Hill and Coppola have ultimately come up with is an
incoherent, often ridiculous yarn which steals heavily from "Alien,"
"The Abyss" and "Sphere" but still yields pitiful results. Were it not
for the marquee value of the talent involved, "Supernova" would likely
have crashed and burned at the neighborhood video store instead of
hitting the local cineplex. Perhaps the only remarkable thing about this
foolishness is the amount of nudity (mostly male) the filmmakers managed
to cram in while still earning only a PG-13 rating.
 For the few who might still be intrigued, "Supernova" is set in
the far future, aboard a kind of spaceship/ambulance called Nightingale
(get it?). After the captain is fried in an accident, recovering drug
addict Nick Van Zant (Spader) takes command of the ship and stakes a
claim on no-nonsense doctor Kaela Evers (Bassett), who needs only a
bottle of pear brandy to turn her disposition from stormy to
sugar-sweet.
 Sex in the zero-gravity chamber has to be put on hold, though,
when the Nightingale receives a distress call from a mining colony on
gypsy moon Titan 37. Despite reservations, the crew agrees to take sole
survivor Troy Larson (Peter Facinelli) aboard, along with the
gooey-looking glowing object he's salvaged. That artifact turns out to
house galaxy-destroying "ninth-dimensional matter" (which looks
suspiciously like the contents of a lava lamp, by the way), and, given
this set-up, you can probably finish the script yourself.
 Anyone hoping Bassett might have a chance here to show off her
panache as an action star as she did so memorably in "Strange Days" will
be disappointed to learn she spends most of the movie either glowering
or jogging through corridors. Spader seems to be looking for an exit,
while most of the supporting cast struggle to hold on to their dignity.
In a frantic attempt to build suspense where none exists, the filmmakers
keep their cameras bobbing and weaving woozily over each scene. Perhaps
the photography team sampled a bit of that pear brandy themselves.
 "It's a bomb!" Dr. Evers gasps when she first realizes the
potential power of the alien force. Any audience member will agree
whole-heartedly. James Sanford

Title
Review for Center Stage (2000/I)
         There's a segment of the moviegoing public some theater
managers refer to as the Ohmigods. They're young women between the ages
of 11 and 15 -- that pre-dating period -- who flock to the cineplexes
every Friday night or Saturday afternoon to see the latest Freddie
Prinze Jr. or Joshua Jackson film and to discuss their peers. Their
comments often sound something like this: "Ohmigod, she is getting so
fat!"; "Ohmigod, he looks just like Josh Hartnett!"; "Ohmigod, 'Oops, I
Did It Again' is, like, the best song ever!"
 The Ohmigods will love "Center Stage," which was clearly
designed with them in mind. It has lots of graceful and sometimes
teasingly erotic dancing, a variety of attractive youthful stars, and a
plot that can be easily followed, even if you spend long stretches of
the movie talking to your best friend about how hot Brandon looked in
geometry class or how Trina totally embarrassed herself at the party
last week.
 Screenwriter Carol Heikkinen apparently spent more time
studying "42nd Street" and "Gold Diggers of 1933" than she did
researching what aspiring ballet dancers actually go through in their
struggle to get into the spotlight. So "Center Stage" shamelessly hauls
out every trick in the dusty old musical comedy book, from the scolding
stage mother who pushes her daughter onto the boards to the chorus girl
who miraculously gets to play the lead when the star drops out at the
last minute.
 Stop me if you've heard this one before: Bright-eyed Jody
Sawyer (Amanda Schull) lands a slot at the American Ballet Academy,
alongside "everyone who matters in American ballet." Heck, one of her
fellow students even gave up the promise of a job at Hooters to go to
ABA, so you know it must be something special.
 Jody's classmates include Eva (Zoe Saldana), the requisite
smart-mouth who violates the dress code and hides her bruised heart;
Maureen (Susan May Pratt), who's hailed by everyone as the Next Big
Thing; Sergei (Ilia Kulik), the Russian who loves to party; and Charlie
(Sascha Radetsky), the nice guy from Seattle who's too shy to tell Jody
he's in love with her. So Jody eventually drifts into the arms of vain
Cooper Nielsen (Ethan Stiefel), who changes partners as often as he
changes leotards.
 Does Jody have enormous difficulty fitting in? Does one kid
turn out to be bulimic? Does a character tell another, "whatever you
feel, just dance it"? Does someone proclaim, "I'm not dancing for them
anymore -- I'm dancing for myself"?
 You need not see "Center Stage" to correctly guess the answers
to those questions.
  Most of the cast run into problems convincingly reading their
dialogue, but that's not much of a drawback since director Nicholas
Hytner routinely stops the story for lengthy, smoothly executed dance
sequences that will make any aspiring ballerinas in the audience want to
take some extra lessons.
 While it's hardly revolutionary, Susan Stroman's choreography
is the driving force behind the film, and the main reason to sit through
it. Every time the movie threatens to put us to sleep, Stroman throws in
a revitalizing scene, such as the Broadway dance class workout
underscored by Mandy Moore's bubblegum-pop treasure "Candy" and the Red
Hot Chili Peppers' pulse-pounding "Higher Ground."
 "Center Stage" wraps up with a supremely weird rock
ballet/pantomime that sets the story of "The Red Shoes" first to the
dreary music of Michael Jackson, then to the dynamic sounds of
Jamiroquoi. It's supposed to be part of a big stage show, although the
spectacle includes so many sets and split-second costume changes it
could only happen in the movies. The number somehow manages to get a
standing ovation from an audience of tough critics. "Center Stage"
itself isn't likely to get quite the same response. James Sanford

Title
Review for 28 Days (2000)
         Sandra Bullock often comes across onscreen as a slightly more
grown-up version of the girl who was everybody's friend in high school,
the one who always had a smile and some words of wisdom handy whenever
someone needed advice or comfort. That probably has a lot to do with why
her fans show up faithfully, even when her movies are dicey propositions
at best ("Forces of Nature," "Hope Floats," "Practical Magic").
 Director Betty Thomas tries to get Bullock to turn on that old
charm again in "28 Days," in which Bullock plays Gwen, a writer who
spends more time mixing pills and cocktails than working on manuscripts.
But Bullock's not interested in coasting along on her charisma this time
out. Instead, she strains to come across as unbalanced, self-destructive
and defensive; she seems determined to show how much research she's done
on the subject, how much angst she can convey.
The screenplay by Susannah Grant ("Erin Brockovich") insists
Gwen's alcoholism is presented in the sweetest, corniest fashion
possible, however, thereby undercutting everything the actress is
struggling to accomplish. The result is a 12-step misstep.
 Because of the sizable number of romantic comedies she's made,
Bullock has often been compared to Meg Ryan, but if "28 Days" was
supposed to be her answer to Ryan's harrowing alcoholism saga "When a
Man Loves a Woman," it falls short in every category. Ripe with good
intentions and stuffed with bits and pieces ripped out of better films,
"28 Days" is a skin-deep dramedy that skillfully skates around most of
the nastier aspects of addiction. Anyone who's had a drinking problem or
participated in an intervention session will be offended by the offhand
way the movie trivializes the pain that substance abuse causes.
 Gwen may have a tendency to misbehave when she drinks, but
she's still managed to somehow retain both her fresh-faced complexion
and a spacious, funky New York City loft. Even while going through a
series of life-changing crises, Gwen finds time to do her hair and
makeup flawlessly. She may be hitting bottom, folks, but the good news
is she still looks sensational.
 After ruining the wedding of her sister Lily (Elizabeth
Perkins), Gwen lands in Serenity Glen, a rural rehab center where
recovering addicts chant empowering slogans and sing "Lean On Me" and
"Happy Trails To You" in between staging skits, attending silly lectures
(one is called "Are You a Blackout Drunk, Or Don't You Remember?") and
participating in the cutest group therapy sessions you've ever seen.
This might be where the Care Bears go for help if they fall off the
wagon.
 With the exception of the requisite doomed roommate (Azura
Skye), all of Gwen's fellow addicts are cuddly eccentrics, as warm and
transparent as vodka. The movie trudges through all the usual cliches
(Gwen's mom was a lush who drank herself to death, Gwen's counselor is a
recovering cokehead who feels her pain, Gwen's boyfriend is an enabler
who only loves her when she's plastered, etc.) without offering
bothering to freshen them up.
 "If you are young and drink a great deal, it will spoil your
health, slow your mind, make you fat -- in other words, turn you into an
adult," writer P.J. O'Rourke once said. In "28 Days," Bullock does
everything she can to take Gwen to full maturity, but Thomas and Grant
refuse to let her out of the playpen. James Sanford

Title
Review for Baby Geniuses (1999)
Every so often at the movies, we stumble across a certain moment
that's so appallingly conceived and ineptly executed you literally
can't believe your eyes, the kind of sight that causes your jaw to
drop, your stomach to lurch and your mind to boggle.  Midway through
"Baby Geniuses" comes just such a scene.
Our toddler hero Sly has escaped the underground lab of Dr. Elena
Kinder (Kathleen Turner) and is hiding out in a mall, where he comes
across a carriage occupied by a baby girl. Sly dives into the pram,
surprising the little beauty.
"Take off your clothes," he orders. "OK, but you could at least take
me to dinner first," the girl replies. Seconds later, Sly is dressed
in drag, while his accomplice is reclining on her back, smoking a
cigar and murmuring "call me."
An exceedingly unpleasant combination of cutesy kiddie matinee hijinks
and outright smarminess, "Baby Geniuses" could only be the work of
director Bob Clark, the man whose previous cinematic triumphs include
"Loose Cannons," "Porky's" and "Rhinestone," in which Sylvester
Stallone and Dolly Parton pretended to be Nashville's answer to Sonny
and Cher.  "Geniuses" shares with most of Clark's other films an utter
lack of taste and a genuinely ugly look; not only is the movie less
funny than a case of diaper rash, it's even less picturesque.
"Geniuses" does include a few mildly interesting computer-generated
special effects that allow the infants to dance and run, although the
trickery is unlikely to wow anyone familiar with the now-famous
"dancing baby" from "Ally McBeal." That the movie has spent more than
a few months on the shelf at Sony is evident in its use of the
"Mission: Impossible" theme as a joke and "show me the money" and
Austin Powers' "oh, behave, baby" as punchlines.  Nothing puts an
expiration date on a film quite like trendy humor.
Then again, "Geniuses" is so desperate to get any sort of a laugh it
sees nothing wrong with stealing liberally from both the "Home Alone"
and "Look Who's Talking" series. The story's gimmick - tots who excel
in judo as well as innuendos - wears thin about five minutes into the
film, forcing adult leads Turner, a visibly embarrassed Christopher
Lloyd and Dom DeLuise to mug and shriek nonstop in the hopes of
keeping the comedy going. Hopefully everyone received a generous
paycheck in exchange for trashing whatever artistic credibility he or
she had left.

Title
Review for U-571 (2000)
When it comes to submarine movies, the last word will
probably always be director Wolfgang Petersen's 1982
thriller "Das Boot," the story of a World War II German
U-boat's many brushes with disaster during a particularly
perilous mission.
The shadow of Petersen's film hangs heavily over "U-571,"
in which Matthew McConaughey and a group of American
sailors try to evade the enemy after commandeering a Nazi
U-boat. In fact, one key scene - in which the sub has to
dive to a dangerously low level to avoid an oncoming
destroyer - figures prominently in both movies.
In terms of the filmmaking, there's really no point
comparing the two pictures. "Das Boot" has considerably
deeper characterizations, a much creepier mood and more
believable dialogue and relationships. There's not much
time devoted to human interest stories in "U-571," an
unpretentious, no-nonsense suspense film engineered to
provide two hours of excitement. It's not art, and it won't
get a theatrical re-release 20 years from now the way "Das
Boot" recently did. But on its own simple terms, it works
just fine.
The screenplay by Sam Montgomery fictionalizes a 1941
mission by the British navy to capture an Enigma, a
machine that would help the Allies break the secret codes
used by the Germans to send messages. In "U-571," the
time frame has been shifted to the spring of 1942, when
U.S. Navy Lt. Andy Tyler (McConaughey) and his
inexperienced crew are dispatched to a disabled U-boat to
retrieve an Enigma.
Despite the importance of the assignment, Tyler can't help
but be a little distracted as he prepares to leave for it; he
just lost the chance to command his own sub because his
captain (Bill Paxton) wouldn't give him a recommendation
because of Tyler's lack of self-confidence and leadership.
"You have to be able to make hard decisions based on
imperfect information," his commander tells Tyler. "If you're
not willing to make those decisions, without pause, without
reflection, you're not ready to be a submarine captain."
With that kind of a setup, it's a safe bet Tyler will soon be
called upon to display his true mettle. Indeed he is, as he
and several of his men are forced to take over the U-boat
after their own ship is destroyed. Director Jonathan
Mostow (who made the 1997 sleeper "Breakdown")
manages to work up a pretty potent atmosphere of tension
as the crew faces dangers ranging from a bombardment of
depth charges to internal problems stemming from
misreading the sub's instructions (which are, of course, in
German).
In keeping with such other contemporary looks back at
WWII such as "Saving Private Ryan," "U-571" does not
have a bunch of superheroes or archvillains at its center.
Instead, most of the guys feel underqualified for the work
they have to do and they sometimes question Tyler's
orders even while carrying them out. Erik Palladino (Dr.
Dave on "ER") plays the loudest voice of dissent, a pest
who tries to undermine Tyler's authority and finally gets a
sock in the jaw for his trouble.
In his first time out in an action film, McConaughey hits
the right notes of heroism, while Harvey Keitel as a veteran
sea dog and a hard-to-recognize Jon Bon Jovi offer effective
support.
The real stars of "U-571," however, are the special effects
(the subs look considerably more authentic than the ones
in "Das Boot"), Richard Marvin's panicky score and the
truly outstanding sound. This is one movie you really must
see in digital stereo to fully appreciate. The explosions, the
rushing water and the terrifying creaks of metal giving way
are so vivid you can practically feel them, and for many
people that's as good a reason to go to the movies as any.
                 James Sanford

Title
Review for Babe: Pig in the City (1998)
 It's not unusual for a sequel to be slightly weirder and more challenging
than the film that inspired it, and sometimes that can be a good thing: Look
at "Star Wars" and "The Empire Strikes Back," for example. But "Babe: Pig In
The City," an utterly bewildering follow-up to the 1995 surprise hit "Babe,"
is so dark and disturbing you have to wonder what director George Miller was
shooting for. Despite its G-rating, the movie includes numerous scenes of
animals in peril, including a pit bull that nearly hangs himself, a crippled
dog that gets thrown into a wall and a goldfish that almost suffocates when
his tank is shattered. Oh yes, and we're also treated to several
heartwrenching tales from homeless animals about how they've been
mistreated, abused and abandoned by humans.
 Happy holidays, kids!
 Not that there wasn't a slightly weird undercurrent running throughout the
original "Babe" -- remember that one segment was entitled "Pork Is A Nice,
Sweet Meat" -- but the black comedy was offset by a message of positivity
and the genuinely endearing interaction between James Cromwell's Farmer
Hoggett and porcine hero Babe.
 "City"'s first mistake is to put Hoggett out of commission almost right off
the bat by having him tumble down a well in a near-fatal accident (that's
the first hint of what Miller has up his sleeve). Soon afterward, the bank
comes calling to repossess the farm, forcing Mrs. Hoggett (Magda Szubanski)
and Babe to high-tail it to town to try to cash in on Babe's new-found fame
as the world's foremost "sheep pig." The cityscape initially looks gorgeous
and inviting, incorporating everything from the Hollywood sign to the Eiffel
Tower to the Golden Gate Bridge. But looks decieve, and soon Mrs. Hoggett is
locked up, Babe has fallen into the clutches of a scuzzy, talentless clown
(Mickey Rooney in a disturbing cameo) who ends up dying of a heart attack
after accidentally setting the childrens' ward of a hospital ablaze. The
movie's dour air is not exactly broken by a score that sounds better suited
to an Irish wake than a family feature.
 And yet, despite its downbeat plot, "City" does manage to throw in just
enough clever bits to hold the interest. Particularly funny are the trio of
crooning mice from the first film (who are joined in this installment by a
kitty choir), and some snooty cosmopolitan cats who sniff "Tourists!" when
Babe and friends stroll down their street. The special effects here are even
better than in the original and the changeovers between real animals and
animatronic creations are almost impossible to detect. Those who appreciate
what filmmakers refer to as "production values" will be dazzled.
 At the same time, however, you have to feel sorry for the parents who'll
struggle to explain such bizarre bits as a mock-communion scene that
features Babe as a stand-in for Jesus or a lengthy and terrifying round-up
of Babe and company by villainous animal-control people who seem
uncomfortably close to the Nazis of "Schindler's List." In a time when so
many movies err on the side of predictability perhaps we should be grateful
for directors willing to take risks, but when the results are as unnerving
as "Pig in the City" it's a little difficult to stand up and cheer. James
Sanford

Title
Review for Star Trek: Insurrection (1998)

 There's a time-honored theory among hardcore viewers of the "Star Trek"
films: Every odd-numbered movie in the series stinks.
 For example, the first, "Star Trek: The Motion Picture," was a long-winded
yawn, but the follow-up, "The Wrath of Khan" was terrific fun. The third,
"Search For Spock," was mildly tedious, but the fourth, "The Journey Home,"
spiced up the usual formula with romance and wacky humor, as the Enterprise
crew tried to fit in in contemporary San Francisco. And so on and on.
 "Star Trek: Insurrection" is the ninth installment, following 1996's "First
Contact," which many regard as one of the very finest of the bunch.
"Insurrection" doesn't have the nightmarish visuals of that film, or as
strong a story, but it features enough goofy humor and clever plot twists to
qualify as the "Trek" that effectively breaks the curse.
 The movie's single best feature is its villain Ru'afo, played with scornful
malevolence by F. Murray Abraham; he can take his place alongside Alice
Krige's Borg Queen in "First Contact" and Ricardo Montalban's Khan as a
memorably creepy nemesis.
 Ru'afo is the leader of a race that ages so quickly they must frequently
subject themselves to the scariest onscreen face-lifts since Katherine
Helmond's nip and tuck in "Brazil." So who can blame him and his gang for
wanting to move to a planet where pulsating rings of radiation have allowed
the peaceful Baku to remain both youthfully spry and as mellow as the
inhabitants of Shangri-La?
 After meeting the Baku, most of whom talk like they've read too much Rod
McKuen ("A single moment in time can be a universe in itself," theorizes
one), Picard (Patrick Stewart) decides to prevent Ru'afo's planned
relocation of the tribe to another world. Cue the requisite explosions,
chases and perils.
 But though it moves swiftly, Michael Piller's screenplay takes a few breaks
for romance -- Picard and Riker (Jonathan Frakes, who also directed) each
get a love interest -- and laughs, as Data (Brett Spiner) rehearses "HMS
Pinafore" and Picard re-discovers the magic of the mambo. If the picture
errs on the side of touchy-feely occasionally, it still manages to regain
its bearings in time for a suspenseful climax that includes a major surprise
regarding Ru'afo.
 Though it's not quite top-flight, "Insurrection" is reasonable fun and its
tale of eternal life is quite fitting in this, the 20th anniversary of the
"Star Trek" movies. Live long and prosper, indeed.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Nightwatch (1998)
         Conventional wisdom says any film that spends an inordinantly
long amount of time on the shelf between its production and its
release must be a piece of junk.
  To get an idea of how long ``Nightwatch'' has been on hold,
please note the trailer for it was attached first to ``Scream'' in
December 1996 and then to ``Scream 2'' last Christmas.
  Astonishingly, the movie turns out to be a stylish little
horror show that's certainly better than most of its kind.
  The film is a remake by Danish director Ole Bornedal of his
own ``Nattevagten,'' a sizable hit abroad that has rarely been seen in
America.  A very boyish-looking Ewan McGregor plays Martin, a law
student who takes a job as a night watchman in a decrepit Los Angeles
morgue.
  Business there is brisk, since a serial killer is butchering
prostitutes and taking their eyes as trophies. Inspector Cray (Nick
Nol-te) is not-so-hot on the case.
  As the bodies pile up, Martin eventually becomes a suspect
in the slayings, but more likely culprits include a pill-popping
doctor (Brad Dourif), the unbalanced former security guard (Lonny
Chapman) and even Martin's misogynistic best friend James (Josh
Brolin), a twisted character who delights in manipulating and
degrading the opposite sex.
  Frankly, women don't fare too well in ``Nightwatch,'' and
Bornedal's tendency to linger on images of abuse taints the picture as
a whole. A restaurant scene featuring Martin and a down-and-out
prostitute engaging in behavior that might make even George Michael
blush is intended to be humorous, but comes off as crass exploitation.
  The palpable erotic vibe between Martin and James, on the
other hand, seems like something Bornedal and co-writer Steven
Soderbergh may not have intended: The looks James and Martin exchange
are ripe with suggestiveness, and when James pressures Martin into
fooling around with a hooker James has already slept with, it feels
like a sex-by-proxy situation.
  What a decent-enough guy like Martin is doing hanging around
with such a cretin is the movie's real mystery, much more difficult to
figure out than the identity of the murderer.
  Bornedal seems to have been more intrigued by Martin's
adjustment to life in the morgue, and the director makes excellent use
of the Cinemascope frame and some disturbing sound effects (such as
the amplified flapping of moths' wings) to show how our hero is
overwhelmed by his cold, spacious workplace.
  In addition to creating an often unnerving atmosphere - even
in its climax, which turns out to be exciting and absurd at the same
time - ``Nightwatch'' is also notable as another one of the
charismatic McGregor's quirky performances.
  Though he struggles at times to suppress his Scottish
accent, McGregor delights in capturing Martin's odd little details,
such as the way his nose sweats when he's tense.
  Brolin is memorably loathsome but Nolte and Patricia
Arquette, as Martin's lover, are greatly underused and photographed so
unmercifully they look ready for the morgue themselves.

Title
Review for High Fidelity (2000)
         Unresolved relationships can be like those mildly irritating
but fiendishly catchy pop songs you sometimes come across while
listening to the radio: Try as you might, you just can't get them out of
your mind.
 For record store owner Rob (John Cusack), the tune he can't
shake off is his former girlfriend Laura (Iben Hjejle), who recently
moved out of the dumpy apartment they shared with his racks of vintage
vinyl and CDs. "You haven't changed so much as a pair of socks since I
met you," Laura sighed, and she's not far off the mark. Rob, as readers
of Nick Hornby's novel "High Fidelity" know, is one of those guys who's
struggling to hold on to his youth by staying poor, avoiding heavy
responsibilities and hanging out with slackers and semi-slackers who
want nothing more out of life than to join a garage band or find a
mint-condition mono copy of Bob Dylan's "Blonde on Blonde."
In many ways, Rob is a quintessential Cusack hero. Although he's
reasonably bright, he over-analyzes every aspect of his life, and
despite having some ambition, he seems incapable of focusing his energy.
         To some extent, "High Fidelity" has exactly the same problem.
The screenplay is almost fervently faithful to the book, but what was
breezy and funny on the page doesn't always play out. Trying to transfer
Hornby's first-person narrative to the screen, Cusack and three other
scripters have given Rob lots of breaking-the-fourth-wall monologues
that bog down what little momentum the story has.
 The movie also mistakenly moves the action from Hornby's
mid-1990s London to contemporary Chicago. The novel's very British
attitude (all those suppressed emotions, all those worries about class
differences) doesn't survive the journey, and if "High Fidelity" is
ultimately about anything, it's about attitude.
 What the film does manage to put across is the enticing
atmosphere of an independent music shop, where clerks argue over whether
the Righteous Brothers' version of "Little Latin Lupe Lu" is better than
Mitch Ryder's cover and band names like Sigue Sigue Sputnik and Stiff
Little Fingers actually mean something to the customers. If you've spent
any time working or shopping in such a place, you'll completely identify
with Rob and his buddies.
 "High Fidelity" also scores some laughs with cameos by a
ponytailed Tim Robbins (as a Steven Seagal wannabe), Catherine
Zeta-Jones (as a chic but bubbleheaded former flame of Rob's) and even
Bruce Springsteen, who drops by to offer much-needed advice on affairs
of the heart. Cusack is his usual agreeable self -- think of Lloyd
Dobler from "Say Anything" on the edge of 30 -- and the soundtrack,
featuring artists ranging from Stereolab to Stevie Wonder, is delicious
ear candy.
 If movies were rated on the 100-point scale "American
Bandstand" used to use for records, "High Fidelity" would probably score
a 50: It doesn't have much of a beat and you can't really dance to it,
but it's way better than that new Celine Dion disc. James Sanford

Title
Review for Western (1997)
 "Western" has absolutely nothing whatsoever to do with cowboys or Indians,
but everything to do with the laissez-faire attitude frequently found in
French filmmaking and, often, in day-to-day French life. Love,
relationships, luggage, chainsaw accidents: None of them really matter all
that much in the eyes of writer-director Manuel Poirier, and certainly none
of them merit serious study. Like the heroes of his shaggy, leisurely
comedy, Poirier is content to take the trials of life lightly and, whenever
possible, to simply walk away from them altogether.
 "Western" earned a special Jury Prize at the 1997 Cannes Film Festival,
although that's not to say that this is a movie for everyone; viewers who
insist on sturdy plots, admirable characters and lots of action will
undoubtedly be bored senseless by Poirier's trek through Brittany -- the
title refers to the western region of France. This is a picture for those
who are willing to simply kick back and enjoy the ride, regardless of where
it takes them.
 Poirier is part of the new breed of French moviemakers who've chosen to
leave Paris behind and tell stories about the people who populate the
countryside and the coastal towns, and thus "Western" comes off as a loving
tribute to pastoral rural France where the natives seem much more
accomodating and good-natured than their city cousins. Taking advantage of
this regional brand of hospitality is Paco (Sergi Lopez), a shoe salesman of
Spanish descent who, through an odd series of circumstances, embarks on a
tour of Brittany with Russian-born Nino (Sacha Bourdo), a hitchhiker/car
thief who greatly envies the suave Paco's skill with the ladies.
 Part of the reason Paco his hit the road is to kill time while waiting for
his girlfriend Marinette (Elisabeth Vitali) to decide whether or not they
should move in together. She's an antiques dealer Paco met shortly after his
car was stolen -- by Nino -- and, in her attempts to help him out afterward,
the two fell madly in love. Afraid of moving too fast, Marinette decrees
they need to spend three weeks apart and after this trial separation they
can figure out what course of action to take.
 So Paco, now unemployed because of the lost car, decides to savor his
freedom, taking Nino along for company. With no real itinerary or goal, the
two spend their days scheming to meet women and their nights trying to sleep
with whomever they've met. Though Paco is easily the more attractive of the
pair, it's Nino who winds up finding the most intriguing lover, a mother of
eight named Nathalie (Marie Matheron), who wants her house to be full of
children, not men. Each of her kids is the result of a one-night-stand with
a stranger who happened to be passing through town, and given the variety of
races represented around her dining room table, Nathalie could be the Gallic
answer to Mia Farrow.
 Fans of French film will spot Poirier's incorporation of such New Wave
staples as jump-cuts and lingering long shots throughout "Western." These
techniques work nicely with the film's off-the-cuff feeling. "Western" is so
free-form it would not be surprising to discover the whole thing was simply
improvised and that Poirier and company made the story up as they went
along.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Rushmore (1998)
There aren't a lot of zippy one-liners or acidic putdowns. Slapstick
is kept to a minimum. Dirty jokes are practically non-existent.
So what is it that makes "Rushmore" so consistently funny?
The question is probably unanswerable, but it appears to have
something to do with the combined forces of director Wes Anderson and
Owen Wilson's offbeat script, the spectacularly dry comic performances
by Bill Murray and newcomer Jason Schwartzman and that peculiar magic
that seems to develop out of nowhere whenever the right elements fall
into place on a film set. As he proved in his debut film, "Bottle
Rocket," originality is Anderson's hallmark, and it's evident in just
about every aspect of "Rushmore."
For instance, rather than cast the latest Tom Cruise wannabe as his
lead, Anderson has opted for Schwartzman, whose hollow eyes and
slightly inflated facial features recall a young Dustin
Hoffman. Though his plot centers on the possibility of a May-September
relationship between 15-year-old Max (Schwartzman) and comely
thirtysomething Rosemarie Cross (Olivia Williams), Anderson steers far
clear of the territory covered by "The Graduate" and "Summer of '42."
Even the soundtrack selections are unpredictable: The Who's "A Quick
One While He's Away," Chad & Jeremey's "A Summer Song," and John
Lennon's "Oh Yoko."
And who could have guessed Murray would find such a role this late in
his career, especially after a string of recent failures?  His turn as
joyless millionaire Herman Blume is both hilarious and a splendid
characterization, on a par with his performances in "Tootsie" and
"Groundhog Day."
Set primarily at a stately private school, "Rushmore" involves an
increasingly intense competition between Max and Herman for the
affections of widowed Rosemarie. For overachieving Max - who divides
his time between such activities as representing Russia in Model U.N.,
serving as the founder of Rushmore's Trap and Skeet Club and presiding
over the Calligraphy Club - Rosemarie is simply one more challenge to
meet. For Herman, she's one of the few bright spots in his otherwise
dreary existence.
She's also almost as far off the beam as the men pursuing her. With
the possible exception of Seymour Cassel's part as Max's dad, everyone
in "Rushmore" is at least slightly twisted, although rarely in obvious
ways.
Even the throwaway details in Anderson and Wilson's screenplay are
surprising. Max, we learn, got a scholarship to Rushmore on the
strength of a play he wrote at age 7, "a little one-act about
Watergate." A tense confrontation between Herman and Max's
solemn-faced prodigy Dirk (Mason Gamble) is followed by a bizarre bit
involving Herman's gleefully moronic sons. The lead role in Max's
lavish drama about Vietnam goes to a Scottish transfer student whose
pronounced burr somehow goes unnoticed by the audience.
Quirkiness abounds in "Rushmore," yet the beauty of the film is that
the weird touches and slightly warped personalities always seem to
make perfect sense in the context of the story. Even though you may
not always understand exactly why you're laughing, laugh you will.

Title
Review for American Beauty (1999)
         There have been plenty of other movies about the shallow values
of suburbanites, but few have been as consistently -- and bitterly --
funny as "American Beauty," a fairly astonishing debut film from British
stage director Sam Mendes. In the same way Chinese director Ang Lee
found fresh perspectives on the 1970s in "The Ice Storm," Mendes takes a
commonplace setting and a familiar-looking cast of characters and twists
them into frightening, fascinating new forms, with a considerable amount
of assistance from screenwriter Alan Ball (another first-timer) and a
superb cast.
 The premise of "Beauty" won't strike anyone as particularly
revolutionary, and, in fact, the film initially seems like it's going to
wind up as an updating of "Lolita," or worse, a send-up of the now-dusty
Amy Fisher scandal. Instead, it reveals its inspiration to be "Sunset
Boulevard," the seriocomic 1950 shocker about the quest to recapture
lost youth through an utterly futile love affair.
 "Beauty" delights in confounding our expectations again and
again, letting us make assumptions and then shattering them moments
later. In the blissfully boring homes that line Robin Hood Trail, where
most of the action takes place, an innocuous bottle of root beer can
serve as an aphrodisiac, a plain white platter might turn out to be a
piece of china from the Third Reich and a once-reliable daddy might
suddenly decide to quit his job and devote his days to working out and
getting high.
 That 42-year-old drop-out is Lester Burnham (Kevin Spacey), one
of those guys who probably gets misty-eyed when he sees those VW Bug
commercials with the tagline, "if you sold your soul in the '80s...".
"Both my wife and my daughter think I'm a gigantic loser," Lester notes
in his narration of the story, "and they're right." Carolyn Burnham
(Annette Bening) is an overzealous real estate agent who's so absorbed
in visions of commissions and "sold" signs she barely even notices her
husband, and teenage Janie (Thora Birch) has drifted away from the
family and settled in on her own perpetually overcast island of
adolescent angst. Conversations between the three are few, and the ones
that do develop are generally spiked with sarcasm. When Lester asks
Janie about her day in school, she dryly replies, "it was spectacular."
 "I fantasize about a life that doesn't so closely resemble
Hell," Lester says, and it turns out most of his reveries involve
Janie's friend Angela (Mena Suvari), an aspiring model with a baby doll
face and a call girl's bravado. "I'm used to guys drooling over me," she
sighes, in a tone that suggests both weariness and delight.
 Lester first sees Angela performing in a halftime show at a
high school basketball game. The number is atrocious (a smart bit of
spoofery on the part of choreographer Paula Abdul), but Lester is
transfixed by the girl nonetheless, and it's not long before he's
jogging and pumping iron regularly in an attempt to trim down his
slightly flabby physique. At the same time, the other members of the
Burnham household have found outside interests as well: Carolyn is
spending long lunch hours trying to wheedle sales secrets out of local
real estate king Buddy Kane (Peter Gallagher), while Janie has taken an
interest in the boy next door, a slightly menacing-looking kid named
Ricky (Wes Bentley) who keeps clean urine samples in his freezer just in
case his dad (Chris Cooper) wants to check him for drug use.
 Ball's script will ultimately string all of these people
together, although not always in ways you might expect. In its probe of
what lies beneath the shiny surface of everday life, "Beauty" sometimes
recalls writer-director David Lynch's "Blue Velvet" or his
ground-breaking TV series "Twin Peaks." Although Mendes is not quite as
audacious a director as Lynch was in his heyday, the film is often
visually arresting, with dazzling use of colors (particularly red) and
motifs: Lester fantasizes about Angela bathing in rose petals, while the
increasingly shrewish Carolyn trots around in a blouse adorned with a
gaudy rose pattern.
 In the underrated 1994 sleeper "The Ref," Spacey showed he has
no equal when it comes to spitting out acidic recriminations and Ball
gives him a choice selection of them here. Whether he's describing the
high point of his day -- hint: it takes place in the shower -- or
warning Janie "you'd better watch it, or you're going to turn into a
real bitch, just like your mother," Spacey consistently nails that
simmering rage that's been bubbling inside Lester for who knows how
long. It's a magnificent comic performance.
Although she's undeniably amusing, Bening's hypertense Carolyn
is slightly more problematic, sometimes careening close to caricature.
She's ultimately grounded by two offbeat and oddly poignant crying
scenes that show the woman's facade slipping and Carolyn literally
trying to slap it back into place. Birch, Bentley and especially the
wide-eyed Suvari all excel as they pull the strings of the adults around
them. Even the supporting actors stand out here, particularly Allison
Janney as a Stepford Wife whose batteries are running low and Cooper as
a martinet with a mercurial temper and some unexpected needs. James
Sanford

Title
Review for Winslow Boy, The (1999)
        The audience that embraced all those tony Merchant-Ivory
productions of years past ("Howard's End," "The Remains of the Day," "A
Room with a View") is likely to adore "The Winslow Boy," a drawing room
drama which comes from a surprising source: David Mamet, the
dramatist-director best known for such jolting works as "Glengarry Glen
Ross" and "Oleanna."
How did the salty tongued Mamet manage to come up with such a
stately -- and, shockingly,  G-rated -- film? First of all, the source
material is not his own. "Winslow" has been adapted from Terence
Rattigan's 1946 play, which was previously filmed in 1948 with Robert
Donat and again in 1988 with Ian Richardson and Emma Thompson. The piece
was based on the real-life case of a young Osborne Royal Naval Academy
cadet whose expulsion in 1908 became the talk of London after Sir Robert
Morton, the solicitor who had once defended Oscar Wilde, took up the
case. Though Mamet has reshaped the material somewhat, this is still one
of his more straightforward works; anyone expecting the twists and turns
of previous Mamet movies such as "House of Games" or "The Spanish
Prisoner" may feel slightly short-changed.
Then again, "Winslow" is not a suspense story, but a character
study. Although there's a good deal of attention paid to the intricacies
of British law, what Mamet is primarily interested in is the inner
workings of the Winslows, a South Kensington clan who forsake their
comforts and social position in an effort to clear the name of youngest
son Ronnie (Guy Edwards). Despite numerous obstacles and setbacks,
Arthur (Nigel Hawthorne), the patriarch, forges ahead with his demand
for a fair trial, even though it means sacrificing another son's Oxford
education and his daughter Catherine's (Rebecca Pidgeon) prospects for
marriage. Even Arthur's devoted wife Grace (Gemma Jones) finds it
difficult to endorse what seems to her to be less a quest for justice
than a vain attempt to restore the Winslow name.
The Winslow's reversal of fortune comes when Sir Robert Morton
(Jeremy Northam) enters the picture and decides to assist them. Though
Catherine disapproves of Morton's aloof attitude ("Nothing could stir
that dead heart," she remarks), the controlled friction that develops
between them suggests they may still be seeing each other regardless of
how the case turns out.
 In typical British style, the emotions are consistently underplayed and
the toll of the trial on the household suggested rather than dramatized.
Nor do we see any of the courtroom action, a strategy which keeps the
focus on the family. At the same time, centering so much of the drama in
the home sometimes makes "Winslow" seem a little stagy and constrained,
especially in the movie's set-up sequences.
But the performances are strong enough to carry the film along.
Hawthorne expertly renders a picture of a gentleman who seems to be
disintegrating from the inside outside, while Pidgeon, whose awkwardness
in "The Spanish Prisoner" was that picture's only glaring weak spot,
does an admirable job of showing how the "modern woman" Catherine comes
into her own while protecting her brother. With a sly smile and an arch
tone of voice, Northam communicates everything we need to know about
Morton and his true motivations. James Sanford

Title
Review for Black Dog (1998)
Black Dog
Rated PG-13
By James Sanford
The Kalamazoo Gazette
Determined to never say die even though he's failed as a muscle-bound hero
before in "Roadhouse," "Next of Kin" and "Steel Dawn," Patrick Swayze takes
the role of stolid Jack Crews, an ex-trucker and ex-con who served two years
for vehicular manslaughter.
Since his license is now revoked, Jack wants to work as a mechanic, but his
crooked-as-a-Black Dog's-hind-leg boss Cutler (Graham Beckel) pressures him
to accept $10,000 to get behind the wheel again and haul a mysterious cargo
from Georgia back to New Jersey. Though a nightmare involving a snarling
black pit bull portends bad luck, Jack agrees to make the run when he learns
the bank is about to foreclose on his house unless he can come up with
$9,000 right away.
So Jack heads for Atlanta (which a title helpfully identifies as "Atlanta,
Georgia" so we wonšt mistake the location for Atlanta, Hawaii), commandeers
an imposing-looking Peterbilt from the nefarious Red (Meat Loaf) and rolls
north. However, a series of attacks from machine gun-toting motorcyclists,
road-hogging rigmasters and Red himself - who frequently quotes the Bible,
which in the eyes of Hollywood, must mean hešs a nut - cause Jack to realize
he's transporting more than just a cargo of toilets.
Jack would dearly love to put on the air brakes on the whole situation, but
scheming Cutler has resorted to the unorthodox employee-motivation technique
of holding Jack's wife and daughter hostage until the job is done. Oh yeah,
the FBI and the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco and Firearms are also involved,
just for good measure.
Although there are no stops along the way for showers or hair appointments,
Swayze manages to stay neatly coifed throughout the arduous trip, despite
being shot at and slapped around at every turn. Since Swayze's dour
performance is strictly one-note Travis' rugged but relaxed charm is most
welcome. Loaf is tiresome as the villain, and though director Kevin Hooks
went to the trouble to hire the marvelous character actors Stephen Toblowski
and Charles Dutton for his supporting cast, they have nothing to do but bark
at each other as feuding Feds.
As a second feature at a drive-in, "Black Dog" might serve as a passable
time-killer, but it's far too ludicrous and deadpan to cut it as a
legitimate action movie. The script introduces the potentially interesting
element of one of Jack's co-workers being a traitor only to throw it away
minutes later, and other opportunities for plot development are also quickly
squelched as the pile-ups just keep on a-comin'.
Those who enjoy laughing at lousy dialogue will find "Black Dog" contains
numerous howlers, such as Cutleršs claim that Jack "could drive a truck
through Hell on the Fourth of July." Also rich is Jack's impassioned speech
to his wife: "We moved out of Newark so Tracey could have a yard and go to a
school without metal detectors in the hallways. Išm not going back!"

Title
Review for Mononoke Hime (1997)
         When it was released in Japan in 1997, the animated epic
"Mononoke Hime" captivated audiences -- it's currently second only to
"Titanic" in the list of Japan's biggest box office hits -- and
attracted the attention of American producers. But director Hayao
Miyazaki (whose other creations include "My Neighbor Totoro" and "Kiki's
Delivery Service") wasn't about to let his work be reshaped to suit U.S.
tastes. That's why, even with the addition of some familiar voices on
the soundtrack, "Princess Mononoke" retains its distinctively Japanese
flavor.
 Miyazaki's film is a far cry from the Disneyfied world of
animation. Its complex, winding plot does not pause for musical numbers
or comic relief, and the violence in the story is not bloodless. Most of
"Mononoke" is dark and unsettling, and yet it's weirdly lovely as well.
Even if you lose track of the story -- and it is sometimes a challenge
to keep up with all the developments -- the movie's steady flow of
exotic, powerful images remains riveting.
 "Mononoke" is set in Japan's Iron Age, "the days of gods and
demons," according to the narration. While saving his village from an
attacking Curse God (which looks like a gigantic, maggot-infested boar),
the young hero Ashitaka (voice of Billy Crudup) is wounded by the animal
and is forced to head west to search for a magical cure.
 While journeying through a world full of "angry ghosts,"
Ashitaka encounters the haughty Lady Eboshi (Minnie Driver), who runs
the community of Irontown and who has managed to round up a band of
warriors and lepers to help her destroy the elusive Forest Spirit. But
this magnificent semi-transparent creature is under the protection of
Eboshi's arch-enemy San (Claire Danes), a girl raised in the wild, who
bewitches Ashitaka.
 "Mononoke" delivers a none-too-subtle message about
conservation and respect for nature, but the film is so well-crafted it
never feels preachy. Although it's slightly disconcerting at first to
hear the easily identifiable Gillian Anderson speaking for the wolf
mother Moro or Billy Bob Thornton reading the part of the scheming monk
Jigo, the voice work is generally fine and most of the performers have
been smartly cast.
 Even without the dialogue, "Mononoke" would still be compelling
for its visuals alone. Inspired by Japanese mythology, Mizayaki and his
teams of animators have conjured up an eerie dreamscape full of monsters
both good and evil, as well as the tiny spectral "koodamas," curious
sprites with rattling, rotating heads. Whether you're a devotee of
animation or simply interested in Eastern culture, seeing "Princess
Mononoke" is a must. James Sanford

Title
Review for Stuart Little (1999)
         When Geena Davis won the Best Supporting Actress Oscar for her
role in "The Accidental Tourist" in 1989, she probably never dreamed
she'd one day be playing second fiddle to talking mice and chatty cats
in a children's film. Yet here she is in "Stuart Little," kissing a
rodent good-night and doing her best impersonation of Donna Reed.
 For some actors this would be considered a career low-point,
but truthfully, "Stuart" is one of the few decent movies Davis has
starred in during the last decade. Does anyone remember "Cutthroat
Island"? "Angie"? "The Long Kiss Goodnight"? Would anyone want to? For
Davis, this might almost be considered a comeback vehicle.
 Readers who cherish E.B. White's gentle novel about an
adventurous young mouse adopted by a human family may initially be
startled by the $90 million screen version, which often leans on
slapstick and noisy action sequences. Even so, they may eventually be
won over by the movie's technical wizardry -- as in the "Babe" films,
the animatronics are so convincing, you're never quite certain if you're
watching a genuine animal or a puppet -- and by the sense of wonder
permeating the story. This may not be the "Stuart" many of us remember
from our own childhoods, but it's likely to win over contemporary kids
-- and a lot of their parents as well.
 The first half of the screenplay by M. Night Shyamalan ("The
Sixth Sense") and Greg Brooker is reasonably faithful to the book,
following Stuart (a computer-animated wonder voiced appealingly by
Michael J. Fox) as he tries to adjust to life in the Little household.
The well-meaning newcomer almost immediately runs into problems with his
human brother George (Jonathan Lipnicki, the scene-stealer from "Jerry
Maguire") and the Little's snooty Persian cat Snowbell, who speaks in
the distinctively weary voice of Nathan Lane. The story's first act
climaxes with a rousing toy boat race on the river of New York's Central
Park, with Stuart adeptly skippering a model schooner.
 Just when it seems everything is falling into place however,
Snowbell decides to get rid of Stuart once and for all, with the help of
his less-than-brilliant buddy Monty (voice of Steve Zahn) and some shady
alley cats who are "mean, vicious and all hopped up on catnip."  The
crises and complications that follow should have young viewers on the
edges of their seats, while adults can savor the sterling special
effects work and the awe-inspiring sets. The production team has
stunningly recreated large portions of Manhattan in a studio so that the
Big Apple looks far brighter and more fanciful than it has in ages.
 Although its whiz-bang tone is typical of most big-budget
family films, "Stuart" does take a break every now and then for a
quieter moment. There's a wonderful interlude involving Stuart living in
a castle on a putt-putt golf course and several wry bits of humor
targeted at adult viewers. We learn Stuart was orphaned when his parents
were crushed in "a tragic Cream of Mushroom soup accident years ago"
("it's a very heavy soup," Stuart's caseworker sighs). The script also
provides some bright wisecracks for its feline villains, such as when
one kitty warns another "didn't your mother ever tell you not to go into
Central Park at night?" and his friend replies "my mother was the reason
why you didn't go into Central Park at night!"  James Sanford

Title
Review for Magnolia (1999)
         "We may be through with the past, but the past ain't through
with us." That line turns up again and again in "Magnolia," director
Paul Thomas Anderson's dizzying swing through the lives of an assortment
of L.A. residents, all of whom are troubled, mostly by unresolved
relationships or feelings they've tried to avoid. Rife with unexpected
outbursts, moments of catharsis and deeply funny observations about love
and sex, this is a film that runs you through the emotional wringer,
then shifts into reverse and pulls you back through again.
 Running a generous three hours-plus, "Magnolia" allows Anderson
to give his cast room to explore all the corners of their characters.
Almost every one of the central figures gets a soul-revealing monologue,
making this a prime example of an actor's movie, and, for that matter, a
writer's movie as well.
 It is not, however, a picture the average moviegoer is likely
to eat up. "Magnolia" shares with Anderson's previous film "Boogie
Nights" a fascination with detail and nuance, with taking scenes to
their limits and then daring to stretch them a little further to find
some extra scrap of emotion or a surprising twist. In one of the most
powerful sequences in "Boogie Nights," Heather Graham and Burt Reynolds,
as porno star Rollergirl and her director respectively, troll Los
Angeles in a limo looking for a guy who'll agree to be videotaped while
having sex with Rollergirl. The man they choose turns out to be a former
classmate of Rollergirl, which shakes her up, although she tries to
maintain a cool facade since she doesn't want the camera to see her get
flustered. Even after the episode's abrupt ending, Anderson lingered on
Graham's face, letting her eyes and lips spell out the battle going on
inside her mind between her passionless professionalism and the life she
left behind years ago.
 There are many moments like this in "Magnolia," particularly
for "Boogie" veterans William H. Macy and Julianne Moore and for a
shockingly cast-against-type Tom Cruise. It's Cruise's performance
that's likely to get the most attention, since he's by far the
raunchiest and most unsettling presence in the film, a self-adoring
macho guru named Frank Mackey who pitches his anti-feminist "Seduce and
Destroy" workshops in a series of TV infomercials. Promising his
followers he can teach how to "make that lady 'friend' your sex-starved
slave," Frank is like a foul-mouthed high school jock blown up to
gargantuan proportions.
 Macy's character is Donnie Smith, a former child prodigy who
never recovered from his early dose of celebrity and today works as a
salesman in an appliance store when he's not humiliating himself at the
neighborhood tavern, telling disinterested barflies "I used to be smart,
but now I'm just stupid." A blow-up of the $100,000 check he won on the
"What Do Kids Know?" game show hangs on his living room wall, a constant
reminder of how far he's fallen. He's also miserably lonely, confiding
to strangers "I really do have love to give, I just don't know where to
put it."
 Moore's Linda Partridge, on the other hand, went out of her way
to sidestep love by marrying solely for money. Now, as her husband Earl
(Jason Robards) slowly dies at home, Linda is completely consumed with
self-hatred and erupts at everyone she comes into contact with, from the
family lawyer to an obnoxious pharmacist who makes cracks about her
Prozac prescription.
 No one would want to identify with any of these people, and the
actors don't try to make them likable. Quite the contrary: Moore, Macy
and Cruise seem determined to show us just how unattractive and pathetic
Frank, Linda and Donnie really are by showing all their defense
mechanisms, their explosions of anger and their inability to understand
themselves.
 "Magnolia" also zooms in on some folks who are suffering in
silence, such as Officer Jim (John C. Reilly), a divorced cop and devout
Catholic who's so eager for companionship he tries to pick up Claudia
(Melora Walters), an obvious cokehead he investigates for disturbing the
peace. The timid, bookwormish Stanley (Jeremy Blackman) is the current
champion on "What Do Kids Know?" and, to judge from appearances, a
likely candidate to follow in Donnie's footsteps. Phil Parma (Philip
Seymour Hoffman), Earl's nurse, channels his energy into a frantic
last-minute search for Earl's long-estranged son and quietly endures
disapproving Linda's abuse.
 The thoughts these people can't bring themselves to speak come
through in the searing songs of Aimee Mann, which string together the
movie's various parallel plots. "Come on and save me," Mann pleads in
her delicate, bruised voice, "from the ranks of the freaks who suspect
they could never love anyone." This is not a film in which the
soundtrack was slapped on at the last minute. In one of "Magnolia"'s
most stirring scenes, each of the major characters is glimpsed singing
along to Mann's ballad "Wise Up" shortly before Anderson unleashes a
climax so startling and utterly bizarre it should cement his reputation
as one of the most audacious filmmakers around. James Sanford

Title
Review for Keeping the Faith (2000)
         In the course of only four years and a handful of movies,
Edward Norton has firmly established himself as a versatile,
extraordinarily gifted performer. Whether he's playing a schizoid murder
suspect ("Primal Fear"), a singing and dancing lawyer ("Everybody Says I
Love You"), a rehabilitated neo-Nazi ("American History X") or a
neurotic societal drop-out ("Fight Club"), Norton seems to have
cultivated an uncanny knack for disappearing into the part.
 Like so many actors, Norton also wants to direct, and based on
the results of his first effort, "Keeping the Faith," that may not be as
hazardous as it sounds. Far from being a "look at me!" vanity production
along the lines of Kevin Costner's "The Postman" or Barbra Streisand's
"The Mirror Has Two Faces," "Faith" is a cheerful, endearing ode to
friendship and the magic of Manhattan. An admirer of Woody Allen, Norton
has made his own "Annie Hall" here, and if the homage isn't the equal of
the original, so what? It's entertaining nevertheless.
Admittedly, it does take a little while for the movie to find its
bearings, and many of the scenes that introduce our heroes Father Brian
Finn (Norton) and Rabbi Jacob Schram (Ben Stiller) are so broadly played
and full of slapstick it looks as if "Faith" should have been titled
"There's Something About Clergy." But after about 15 minutes of begging
for laughter, the film finally settles down and begins concentrating on
its characters.
 And what characters they are. Brian and Jacob have been friends
for over 20 years and, despite their different beliefs, they find they
still have plenty in common, including unresolved crushes on Anna Riley,
the neighborhood tomboy who moved away just before they started junior
high school. Now Anna (Jenna Elfman) has returned to New York as a
svelte, high-powered business consultant -- "I'm like a plumber, except
I fix leaky corporations," she explains -- who's been so caught up in
her career she hasn't had time to think about romance.
 That's good news and bad news for the boys. Jacob has been
anxiously looking for a wife, but fears there will be trouble at the
temple if he marries a gentile. Brian, who had never before doubted his
choice of vocation, begins to wonder if he could give it up to be with
Anna.
 "Keeping the Faith" handles these conflicts with humor, but at
the same time the film doesn't treat them lightly. After so many years
of seeing priests portrayed onscreen as either sheep to be led astray
("The Thorn Birds"), dithering do-nothings ("End of Days") or
hungry-eyed perverts who lust after little boys ("The Butcher Boy"),
"Faith" tries to remind us many men of the cloth are essentially
well-balanced human beings. The pangs of guilt and self-doubt Brian
endures don't turn him into a monster; instead they challenge him to
examine his life and to make some hard decisions about where he wants to
go next.
 Norton, Stiller and Elfman are delightful to watch, both
individually and collectively. Elfman is a particularly happy surprise,
shaking off the shrillness that marked her roles in "EdTV" and
"Krippendorf's Tribe" to reveal her playful side. Norton, who hasn't had
much of a chance to show off his comic side in films before, sparkles,
particularly in the scenes in which he and Anna try to make sense of
their unorthodox relationship.
 Although it tends to get a trifle long-winded, Stuart
Blumberg's screenplay includes plenty of clever bits: Jacob complains
about a potential date who faxed her resume to him and put down
"jogging" as one of her skills; Brian incorporates references to the
Fugees and Brad Pitt into his sermons. Under Norton's direction,
"Keeping the Faith" typically goes for many little laughs instead of a
few howlers. It all adds up to two very pleasant hours sure to raise
your spirits. James Sanford

Title
Review for Random Hearts (1999)
         Just in time for the first frost of the season comes "Random
Hearts," a romance between two ice cubes that moves at the speed of a
glacier.
 Screenwriters have reportedly struggled for years to develop
Warren Adler's novel into a workable script, and the final version,
penned by Kurt Luedtke ("Out of Africa"), shows why the story has taken
so long to get to the cinema. It's much easier to cover a character's
transition from distraught, mournful soul to upbeat survivor in a
300-page book than in a two-hour movie. The challenge flummoxes not only
Luedtke, but also the usually unflappable Harrison Ford and Kristin
Scott Thomas, both of whom move self-consciously through most of the
film.
 But if "Hearts" is a dramatic fizzle, Sydney Pollack's
direction and the sumptuous photography of Philippe Rousselot ensure
it's still watchable. The A-list supporting cast (Charles Dutton, Bonnie
Hunt, Dylan Baker, etc.) is well-utilized and everything looks glorious,
from the magnificently colored Maryland forests to the pricey bottles of
wine served at a political fundraiser. Production designer Barbara Ling
has engineered such an eye-pleasing series of locations for the drama
that even a backwoods cabin looks as if it was personally decorated by
Martha Stewart.
 All this glamor, however, surrounds a pair of very cold fish.
William "Dutch" Van Den Broeck (Ford) is a tight-lipped Washington D.C.
internal affairs sergeant, while Kay Chandler (Thomas) is a New
Hampshire Congresswoman embroiled in a tough re-election campaign. Both
are utterly absorbed in their work, so it's no wonder their respective
spouses Peyton (Susanna Thompson) and Cullen (Peter Coyote) manage to
sneak off together and carry on an affair. Besides, don't people with
names like Cullen and Peyton always wind up together after all?
 When the lovebirds' flight to Miami crashes and Dutch drops
everything to investigate, all is revealed. The movie's strongest scenes
come in this early stretch, as Pollock and Ford do an expert job of
capturing the desperation and raw emotions that lead up to that
wrenching moment when all Dutch's worst fears are realized.
 For reasons never made particularly clear, Dutch feels
compelled to track down kay and confront her with the evidence he's
found. At first, she's aloof -- "First class isn't what it used to be. I
don't think it's worth the money," Kay blithely informs him when told
Cullen and Peyton were sitting together in 3A and 3B -- but eventually
she becomes angry and resentful. Dutch, for his part, continues to be
resolutely morose.
 Is shared grief a fertile ground for romance? Most would argue
it's not, but "Hearts" plows forward nevertheless, determined to build
something meaningful on this fragile foundation. The rambling plot is
punctuated with stony silences, vodka-soaked confessions and accusing
looks, all of which we can assume are meant to suggest smoldering
passion.
 Instead, these things serve as a lead-in to a bedroom scene in
which you half-expect to see the lover's breath. Dutch can barely manage
an interested look at Kay, and as Republican women go, she has the
unbridled sensuality of Nancy Reagan. Ford and Thomas have scored as
romantic leads with other partners in the past, but as a couple they
generate next to nothing.
 "Sooner or later, everybody knows everything," Dutch muses at
one point, and in practically no time at all viewers will realize
"Random Hearts" is simply an elegantly appointed igloo. James Sanford

Title
Review for Hard Rain (1998)
         Originally shot in 1996 and scheduled for release last May,
``Hard Rain'' is a costly embarassment Paramount is trying to sweep
under the carpet as quickly and quietly as possible. Of course, the
recent publicity about star Christian Slater's new role as a celebrity
jailbird won't help matters in that area, and although the title was
changed from ``The Flood'' to ``Hard Rain'' - supposedly to more
accurately reflect the film's content, if you can believe that - a
better choice might have been ``Total Washout.''
  All the earmarks of a troubled production are here: slapdash
visual effects, choppy continuity, a plot that never quite seems to
get going.  The direction by former cinematographer Mikael Salomon
dutifully follows the credo of ``when in doubt, shoot it in slow
motion and hope it looks good.''  Unfortunately, one body slogging
around in the water at night tends to look very much like another, and
often in ``Hard Rain'' it's a challenge to tell who's doing what.
  Nor are most viewers likely to care. After a passable first
reel in which armored car drivers Tom (Slater) and Charlie (Ed Asner)
run afoul of hijacker Jim (Morgan Freeman) and his crew, Graham Yost's
screenplay quickly degenerates into water-logged chaos as the few
folks left in the submerged town of Huntingsburg, Ind., spend the
night chasing and shooting at each other, all for the love of money,
in this case some bags containing $3 million that Tom salvaged from
the car. Somehow everyone in town has managed to get ahold of a boat
or a jet-ski, so each cast member gets an opportunity to be thrown out
of his or her watercraft into the dirty canals of this Midwestern
Venice.
  Also lurking around is a derelict former sheriff (Randy
Quaid) and, in one of the film's typically absurd twists, an art-lover
named Karen (Minnie Driver) who has made it her mission to save the
windows of the local church, come hell or, in this case, high
water. As ``Hard Rain'' doggie paddles into its final stretch it
becomes obvious that the real reason Karen is around is to give
Salomon a chance to photograph Driver and Slater in matching clingy
wet T-shirts.
  Although a couple of bickering senior citizens (Betty White
and Richard Dysart) surface occasionally to contribute some put-downs
and profanity, the only real laughs come from the character who
miraculously comes back from the dead just long enough to murmur
crucial pieces of information, and the only words in the script that
seem to ring true are Freeman's frequent declarations that ``I'm only
here for the money,'' an attitude that carries over to his lifeless
performance.
  Technically, the film is sometimes impressive, with a few OK
stunts and one solid sequence detailing Tom's escape from a flooding
jail cell. But when it resorts to throwing in a near-rape scene for
cheap thrills and throws logic out the window by having almost
everyone involved completely change their personalities in the last
reel, it's obvious this mess was created by people who probably don't
have the sense to come in out of the ``Rain.''

Title
Review for Galaxy Quest (1999)
        Label "Galaxy Quest" as another one of those bright ideas that
was never given sufficient time to develop before going in front of the
cameras. It wants very badly to lampoon the enduring popularity of "Star
Trek" -- as well as the sorry post-"Trek" careers of most of the series'
stars -- and every so often it hits its mark. More frequently than not,
however, the screenplay by David Howard and Robert Gordon opts for safe
and bland over satiric, leaving us with a movie that's watchable but
frustrating since it's so rife with unexplored potential.
 For example, if you managed to sign Sigourney Weaver in your
sci-fi comedy, wouldn't you work in a couple of "Alien" gags just to
capitalize on the casting? If Howard and Gordon ever came up with any,
they didn't make it to the final cut, leaving Weaver with little to do
except run around in a cleavage-revealing spacesuit. Her comic skills,
shown to prime advantage in "Ghostbusters" and "Working Girl," get
considerably less exposure than her chest. Nor does "Quest" get much
mileage out of Tim Allen. Wake up, guys: You've got the voice of Buzz
Lightyear on board and you can't even whip up a little "Toy Story"
parody?
 Almost immediately, "Quest" introduces us to hard-drinking
Jason (Allen), long-in-the-tooth sex kitten Gwen (Weaver, underneath a
mountain of blonde hair) and pompous Alex (Alan Rickman), the
less-than-gifted actors who starred in the cult TV series "Galaxy Quest"
almost 20 years ago. The show has long since been canceled, but the fans
remain devoted nevertheless, showing up to see their favorite characters
signing autographs at conventions or hosting ribbon-cutting ceremonies
at appliance stores.
 Among the throngs of devotees is a quartet of otherworldly
types called Thermians, who've caught the "Galaxy Quest" repeats on
their home planet in the Klatu Nebula and believe its stars truly are
heroic starship troopers. These are the same beings, it turns out, who
weep over the bad luck of the castaways on "Gilligan's Island."
The actors, all of whom are anxious for any sort of work, agree
to go along with the Thermians, not realizing the four are actual aliens
who want help battling the tyrant Sarris (Robin Sachs), a slimy cross
between a lobster and a gila monster. Genuine combat turns out to be
more than the "Quest" crew bargained for, and they're ill-equipped to
deal with flying a spaceship. "There's a red thingy moving toward the
green thingy, and I think we're the green thingy," one of them notes,
struck by the sight of a radar screen that actually works.
 Aside from Rickman's droll reading of Alex, the movie's chief
appeal is its sometimes clever special effects, including a gooey form
of teleportation and a pile of rocks that turns into an almost
unstoppable monster. The makeup effects by Stan Winston are also superb,
particularly the work on Sarris and his cohorts.
 The comic edge the story needs rarely surfaces, though.
Occasionally there's a sharp line here or there, but all too often the
humor simply doesn't connect and the screenplay isn't imaginative enough
to sustain interest. To paraphrase a famous ad line, in space, no one
can hear you yawn. James Sanford

Title
Review for Bicentennial Man (1999)
     Remember when Robin Williams only wanted to make us laugh? If
you're not already nostalgic for those long-gone days, you will be after
sitting through "Bicentennial Man," Williams' latest foray into
saccharine cinema. Those who weep over phone commercials or get a catch
in the throat just thinking about Valentines Day might not mind slogging
through this epic tale of a robot's quest to become human. Everyone else
will emerge from "Bicentennial" feeling about 200 years older than they
were when they went in.
Thanks to vehicles such as "Toys," "Jack," "Jakob the Liar" and
last Christmas' "Patch Adams," Williams has now officially become the
Emmett Kelly Jr. of 1990s cinema, a clown who won't stop until your
chuckles are tinged with tears. The actor who once did such a fine job
of straddling the worlds of comedy and drama in "Good Morning Vietnam,"
"Dead Poets Society" and "The World According to Garp" has almost
disappeared completely, and in his place is a hollow, perpetually
misty-eyed impostor who's only interested in playing misunderstood
saints victimized and persecuted by the cruel, cruel world. At the rate
he's going, Williams will soon be starring in "The Michael Jackson
Story."
In "Bicentennial," inspired by Isaac Asimov's "The Positronic Man,"
Williams plays Andrew, an unusually sensitive and sentimental android
who starts his life as a servant in the household of Richard Martin (Sam
Neill) and his family and eventually embarks on a journey of
self-discovery that spans from 2005 to 2205. Director Chris Columbus
starts the film off as a corny but watchable sitcom and swings into
"Forrest Gump" territory for the slightly more serious middle stretch.
Andrew's fascination with humanity, his talent for woodworking and
his appreciation of opera mark him as something more than just a
run-of-the-mill robot, but the small-minded folk of the future refuse to
accept him as a real man because of his "positronic brain." Can Andrew
ever transcend his factory origins and become a real live love machine
in time to win the heart of his mortal girlfriend (Embeth Davidtz)?
Since Columbus pulls all the stops out in the last 45 minutes, getting
to the answer requires swallowing more syrup than you'd find in the
best-stocked International House of Pancakes.
"Bicentennial Man" has some sharp special effects, a handful of
imaginative fashions of the future and a handful of genuinely funny
jokes that are vintage Williams. Unfortunately, Columbus and Williams
are so resolutely determined to melt your heart, they finally resort to
using the cinematic equivalent of a flame-thrower. The largely
undramatic story drags on and on to a foregone conclusion, and the
movie's worthwhile moments are quickly forgotten as Williams turns on
the waterworks, Davidtz struggles to look longingly into his oozing eyes
and Celine Dion (sounding more than a little robotic herself) wails
another of her sterile love themes over the closing credits. James
Sanford

Title
Review for Object of My Affection, The (1998)
Brian Wilson said it best in a song he wrote for The Honeys back in 1963:
"The one you can't have is the one that you want the most."
That time-honored truth forms the basis for "The Object of My Affection," a
romance that may leave you teary-eyed if you've ever thrown yourself
wholeheartedly at someone who couldn't even begin to reciprocate your
feelings.
That's the predicament New Yorker Nina (Jennifer Aniston) finds herself in
when she falls for George (Paul Rudd), who's good-natured, good-looking, a
good dancer - and gay. To complicate matters, he's also her roommate and her
best friend. Though Nina's pregnant by her bulldozer of a boyfriend Vince
(John Pankow), she'd prefer to raise her baby with George, who's initially
willing to go along with the plan.
"We can make this up for ourselves, and none of the old rules apply," Nina
promises. "Sex is just no big deal," George assures her.
Famous last words.
In adapting Stephen McCauley's wonderful novel, playwright Wendy Wasserstein
("The Heidi Chronicles") has oversimplified the book's edgy personalities
and watered-down some of the material: George's love interest is now young
drama student rather than a single father, hinting that gay parenting is
still a topic too hot for Hollywood to handle. Wasserstein has also added a
sitcom-style sugarcoating in the form of Nina's wealthy, dopey family, who
throw parties for King Hussein and get phone calls at home from Martha
Stewart.
On the other hand, some of Wasserstein's changes work, particularly a bit
about George's college crush, a running joke about the romantic woes of
George's brother (Steve Zahn), and the new character of an acid-tongued but
lonely critic (Nigel Hawthorne) who offers some sage advice. And Wasserstein
hasn't soft-pedaled what the story is really about: Nina's self-delusion and
George's grief about his perceived obligation. The film effectively drives
home the point that, when forced to choose, most people - even nice ones -
will chase their own dreams instead of fulfilling someone else's.
When it comes to TV stars trying to make it on the big screen, Aniston's no
Helen Hunt, but she adequately expresses Nina's misguided emotions. Rudd,
best known as the hunky stepbrother in "Clueless," is exceptionally good,
eloquently conveying George's charm and pathos.
After a fluffy first half, director Nicholas Hytner ("The Crucible") finds
an appropriately seriocomic tone for the movie's last hour when
Wasserstein's script veers away from easy laughs and concentrates on showing
the genuine hurt that can result from letting your heart override your
brain. Though "The Object of My Affection" is touted as an offbeat romantic
comedy, anyone who's gone through a bout of unrequited love lately may find
it about as much fun as swallowing a corkscrew. Flaws aside, the movie is a
haunting reminder that sometimes there's no aphrodisiac quite as powerful as
rejection.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Spice World (1997)
 If you were to make up a mock Top-40 chart of all the movies ever made
featuring pop stars, the Spice Girls' "Spice World" would fit in well below
Prince's "Purple Rain" and several notches above Peter Frampton and the Bee
Gees' ghastly, overblown "Sgt. Pepper's Lonely Hearts Club Band." "Spice
World," directed by Bob Spiers of "Absolutely Fabulous" fame, is at the very
least unpretentious, with only one item on its agenda: to sell the Spice
Girls in a lavish 93-minute commercial. The group's many detractors may be
dismayed to discover the Girls have a winning sense of humor about
themselves, their image and their art. To borrow a line from a pop princess
of the past, these Girls just want to have fun, and sometimes the good humor
they generate is contagious.
 Although the model for "Spice World" would seem to be the Beatles' film
debut "A Hard Day's Night," the film most closely resembles the 1967
obscurity "Good Times," which attempted to launch Sonny and Cher as a
big-screen team. The concept behind "Good Times" had the duo enacting
fantasies about the kind of movie they'd like to star in, while, in the real
world, they negotiated to get out of acting in a picture they knew wasn't
right for them. What little plot "Spice World" has consists of filmmakers
Mark McKinney and George Wendt pitching script ideas to Clifford (Richard E.
Grant) , the Spice Girls' fictitious manager. At the same time, a
documentary crew headed by Alan Cumming is trying to get the real story
behind the hype, and the quintet of Girls are struggling to balance their
loyalty to old friends with the demands of world-wide superstardom.
 What sets "Spice World" apart from most rock movies is its ambivilent
attitude toward fame. Each of the Spices --Baby, Posh, Ginger, Scary and
Sporty, and yes, you will be able to identify each of them by the end of the
film-- seem to realize Spicemania won't last forever and the inevitable
reversal of fortune is coming. "In the old days, it was 'where's our next
meal coming from?'," says Baby Spice in one of the film's few quiet moments.
"Now, it's 'where's our next single going to?'."
 Still, this is hardly a scathing expose of the music scene. Much of "Spice
World" consists of the Girls' performances of revamped versions of "Say
You'll Be There" and "Wannabe," as well as their current tunes, such as the
shout-it-out salsa number "Spice Up Your Life" and the endearingly
doo-wopish "Too Much." Like the film's comedy, the music is not always
consistently good but it is consistently loud.
 Years from now, "Spice World" will undoubtedly serve as a colorful reminder
of a pop phenomenon, and that seems to be all it ever intended to be. "That
was absolutely perfect without actually being any good," a music director
tells the group after a false start on one of their songs. The same review
applies to "Spice World."

Title
Review for Go (1999)
The next time you find yourself coming up short on rent day, try this:
Get a few bottles of allergy medicine, head out to the local rave
party and sell the tablets for $20 apiece. Chances are the kids you're
selling it to will already be high and won't notice that the pills
aren't doing anything except opening up their sinuses.
That's Ronna's (Sarah Polley) strategy for avoiding eviction, and it's
typical of the kookiness of "Go," the second feature from director
Doug Liman. Like Liman's first movie, "Swingers," "Go" is propelled by
its quirks and details rather than drama; unlike the generally mellow
"Swingers," however, "Go" zooms through its shaggy dog story with the
same adrenalin rush that dominates its psychedelic soundtrack from
master DJ BT.
If "Go" is reminiscent of Robert Altman's film "Short Cuts" (in which
a couple of dozen Californians of differing social classes turn out to
share common threads), it's considerably lighter in tone.  How grim
can things get when the closest thing the movie has to a villian is a
guy who wears a Santa hat, quotes from "The Breakfast Club" and
deconstructs "The Family Circus"?
This sort of project lives or dies by its casting, and Liman has done
an outstanding job. Polley ("The Sweet Hereafter") and Katie Holmes
("Dawson's Creek") are endearingly earthy as Ronna and Claire, two
seemingly bright young women condemned to waste their days working
endless shifts at the check-out counter of a fourth-rate grocery
store. To add insult to injury, in honor of the Christmas holidays,
the cashiers are forced to wear "Yule Save More" buttons on their
Velveeta-colored aprons.
But Ronna's life becomes a bit livelier when TV stars Adam and Zack
(comedian Jay Mohr and "Party of Five's" Scott Wolf, playing amusingly
against type) come through her line. They're looking to score some
designer drugs before heading to a holiday rave, and, since their
usual dealer Simon (Desmond Askew) is out of town, they turn to Ronna
for help. She, in turn, hightails it to Todd (Timothy Olyphant), the
local drug kingpin, a decision that leads to a traumatic night for all
concerned.
Besides its characters, what elevates "Go" high above the typical
"party picture" - such as"Can't Hardly Wait," for example - is
screenwriter John August's zingy dialogue. As when a guy refuses to
reveal everything about his indiscretions, warning his lover that if
he does, "you will freak out and it will be drama, bad, not-funny
'Roseanne' kind of drama." As when would-be Vegas smoothies Tiny
(Breckin Meyer) and Marcus (Taye Diggs) debate about race and Tiny
insists it's all "a state of mind," Marcus responds by calling him
"Rhythm Nation."
For a fledgling director, getting funding from a major studio on your
second film often means having to compromise the qualities that
originally set you apart from the crowd. The buoyant, sassy and
decidedly unglossy "Go" is proof Liman has managed to avoid that trap.

Title
Review for Lake Placid (1999)
         There seems to be at least one every summer, that oddball
little thriller that comes out of nowhere to provide considerably more
jolts and laughs than the average $100 million-budgeted blockbuster. In
1997, there was the ultra-spooky "Mimic." Last year, "Disturbing
Behavior" offered an amusingly demented take on the teen horror genre.
And this summer, we have "Lake Placid," a frequently hilarious gross-out
that features A-list stars such as Bill Pullman and Bridget Fonda on the
trail of a giant crocodile which has invaded the waters of Maine.
 Yes, even the title is a joke. The mysterious serene body of
water where most of the action takes place is actually named Black Lake.
"They wanted to call it Lake Placid," sheriff Hank Keough (Brendan
Gleeson) explains. "But somebody said that name was already taken."
 The screenplay by TV's David E. Kelley ("Ally McBeal," "Chicago Hope")
delights in such goofiness. "Never been to Maine before?" Fish and Game
officer Jack Wells (Pullman) asks paleontologist Kelly (Fonda). "I have
good hygiene," she answers. "I'm not welcome."
 Kelly has been summoned from her job at a New York museum to
help hunt for clues as to why a diver was decapitated while probing the
depths of Black Lake, although her intense dislike of timber and ticks
-- and her talent for falling out of trucks and tumbling into the water
at inopportune moments -- hardly makes her a natural candidate for the
job. She also has a very low tolerance for gore and accuses Keough of
playing upon that. "Don't throw heads at me!" she shrieks when he leaves
the remains of one of the creature's victims at her feet.
 The tensions at the lake are further heightened by the arrival
of Hector Cyr (Oliver Platt), a nutty millionaire who believes
crocodiles are "divine conduits" and swims with them for some sort of
spiritual reinforcement. Cyr is immediately unwelcome and when he
insists on going along on an expedition, Keough suggests a perfect
accessory for the trip. "I brought a porkchop along for luck -- maybe
you could hang it around your neck," the sheriff tells him.
 But though the crackling dialogue suggests a screwball comedy,
"Placid" stays true to its drive-in movie roots, providing several
vicious attacks (the first appearance of the monster is particularly
startling) and some genuine suspense along with the humor. As in any
creature feature, people regularly go wandering off into the brush when
they hear strange sounds or incorrectly assume they've taken care of a
problem, only to have it jump up and bite them in the butts. "Placid"
was directed by Steve Miner whose "Warlock," with Julian Sands and Lori
Singer, was a similarly clever (albeit far less slick) variation on
shocker conventions.
 Though Pullman can't do much except look squinty-eyed and
stoic, Fonda, Platt and Gleeson, the marvelous character actor who
played the title role in director John Boorman's "The General" a few
months back, appear to be loving every minute of this nonsense. A
scene-stealing Betty White pops in and out of the picture as a
salty-tongued senior who knows more than she's willing to let on.
 Best of all, Kelley and Miner manage to squeeze it all into a
lightning-paced 82 minute package. Instead of wearing out its welcome
with a dozen false endings like so many thrillers do, "Lake Placid"
simply shakes you up, lets you go and leaves you laughing. And how can
you not like a movie that explains the appearance of an Asian-Pacific
crocodile in the U.S. by having a character remark that "someone in Hong
Kong must have flushed him down the toilet"? James Sanford

Title
Review for General, The (1998)
 If Martin Scorsese had hailed from Ireland instead of New York, he
might have made a picture like "The General," a dazzling, frequently
hilarious crime story about Martin Cahill, a legendary figure in the
Irish underworld. Cahill, marvelously played by Brendan Gleeson, saw
himself as a modern-day Robin Hood who spirited away the valuables of
the wealthy and shared part of his take with his less-fortunate
neighbors. "My way of paying taxes, y'know?" he explains to one of his
cronies.
 But his busy schedule of thieving didn't get in the way of his family
life. He fathered children by both his wife Frances (Maria Doyle
Kennedy) and her sister Tina (Angeline Ball), an arrangement neither
woman had a problem with, according to the film. There are echoes of
HBO's superb series about gangsters in the suburbs, "The Sopranos," in
the way Martin manages to come home from his unsavory career and still
have the energy to throw a backyard birthday party or shop for racing
pigeons, another of his passions. Buying larger ticket items is a bit
more complex, however. When he decides to purchase a new house, Frances
has to remind him that realtors aren't likely to accept 80,000 pounds in
cash.
 Cahill's nemesis is police inspector Ned Kenny (Jon Voight), with whom
he maintains a prickly relationship that has undercurrents of grudging
mutual admiration. Voight, whose recent performances have ranged from
the flat-out bizarre ("Anaconda," "U-Turn") to underplayed ("Rosewood"),
finds the perfect key for Kenny, a beleaguered cop who calls Cahill a
"scooombug," yet seems on some level to enjoy the mind games the men
throw out at each other.
 "The General" was directed by John Boorman, whose films such as
"Deliverance" and "The Emerald Forest" are red-blooded examples of macho
cinema at its most virile. But though this is one of Boorman's lighter
works, it still has plenty of violence, colorful language and raging
testosterone. At one point, Cahill, suspecting an associate of
treachery, nails the man's hand to a snooker table, hoping to get a
confession. When the terrified guy still pleads his innocence, Cahill
relents, apologizes and even drives him to the emergency room.
 Not enough can be said about Gleeson's amazing characterization of
Cahill; did the Academy Award voters who handed the Best Actor Oscar to
Roberto Benigni's soppy Jerry Lewis impersonation bother to take a look
at this work? It's tremendous, full of witty little touches, such as the
way Cahill is constantly wandering through the streets with his face
hidden behind his hands, like a movie star caught by the paparazzi in an
indiscretion. Much of what Cahill does is morally reprehensible and even
shocking, and Boorman and Gleeson don't attempt to make him admirable.
By the same token, it's obvious they were fascinated with him and in
this vivid black comedy they manage to rope us into sharing their
obsession.

Title
Review for Beyond the Mat (1999)
        Former Denver Bronco Darrin Drozdov had an unusual talent: the
ability to vomit on command. That might not have been his ticket to a
job in Hollywood or a gig with one of the networks, but it was enough to
attract the attention of World Wrestling Federation czar Vince McMahon,
who had big plans for "Droz."
 McMahon dubbed him Puke and planned to make him a star in the
WWF. Excited by the job offer, Drozdov called home. "You'll be real
proud of me, Mama," he says. "I'm now known as Puke."
 Drozdov's is one of several funny/sad stories told in Barry W.
Blaustein's powerful documentary "Beyond the Mat," which looks not only
at the WWF, but also smaller establishments such as the All-Pro
Wrestling School (run by a rotund accountant who looks like a giant
Weeble) and Philadelphia's outrageously savage Extreme Championship
Wrestling, which Blaustein calls "the Ellis Island of wrestling, where
old wrestlers go to be reborn and new wrestlers go to be discovered."
 Although the subject matter may not sound tremendously
appealing to non-fans of the showy sport, "Beyond the Mat" turns out to
be less interested in the cartoonish brutality of pro wrestling than it
is with the lives of the people who make their living in the ring. Much
of the violence is either carefully choreographed or faked, but when
they're not in the spotlight or in front of throngs of screaming fans,
the wrestlers themselves turn out to be candid, surprisingly low-key
guys.
 The most pathetic of the bunch is former "Wrestlemania"
superstar Jake "The Snake" Roberts, who once fought in front of 80,000
people at the Pontiac Silverdome and now can be found performing in
cut-rate shows in places like Kearney, Neb. Roberts blames his squalid
family history -- he says he was conceived when his mother, then 13, was
raped by her mom's boyfriend -- and his frosty father for his drug
problems and his inability to reach out to his college-aged daughter, a
psychology major who acknowledges "he makes me nervous and I make him
nervous."
 Other potentially troublesome father-child relationships are
brewing in Mick Foley's household. Just prior to a showdown with an
opponent who calls himself The Rock, Foley, known to WWF followers as
Mankind, is seen reassuring his young son Dewey and daughter Noelle that
Daddy won't get hurt at work. Sitting at ringside, however, the kids get
to see their father hurled into a column of speakers and beaten into
submission with a metal folding chair upside the head. Backstage, while
a plastic surgeon sews Foley's scalp back together, the wrestler tries
again to explain to Noelle that the gashing wound is "just a boo-boo."
 Why would a grown man keep on doing this kind of thing? Perhaps
the answer lies in the life of Terry Funk, a legendary figure in
wrestling circles. Against his doctor's advice and his family's wishes,
the 53-year-old insisted on continuing his career because vanity and
pride demand it. If there's a recurring theme in "Beyond the Mat," it's
that these men will always run to the limelight, even if they have to
trample on the feelings of those around them to get there.
 And, wherever guys are willing to put their bodies on the line,
you can bet there will be producers like McMahon ready to exploit and
promote them. McMahon, who reportedly tried to suppress the movie, comes
across as the consummate opportunist, a man who runs new talent through
the mill, feasts on the results and tosses out the leftovers. Even when
he's smiling and lighthearted, there's a fierceness in his eyes that's
downright spooky.
 Blaustein, who wrote the screenplays for Eddie Murphy's "The
Nutty Professor" and "Coming to America," has a sharp eye and a knack
for getting his cameras in the right place at the right time. For
instance, rather than shooting the big match between The Rock and
Mankind, he instead turns his focus to the horrified reactions of
Foley's wife and children, all of whom are in tears long before the
finale. The resulting footage is absolutely heartbreaking, a reminder
that even phoney battles can provoke some very real emotions. James
Sanford

Title
Review for Pleasantville (1998)
        Back in the mid-1960s, my uncle worked for RCA and managed to get my
family a deal on what was then a state-of-the-art color TV. When we had
"company" over, there were always a few people who insisted on looking at
the set; my sisters and I used to giggle everytime the NBC peacock would
spread its rainbow-hued tail across the screen and prompt amazed gasps from
our guests. What was the big deal? we wondered.
 It's been a long time since anyone made much of a fuss over seeing
colors, but writer-director Gary Ross' "Pleasantville" might change that.
This ambitious, multi-layered movie can be read in a number of different
ways: as a charmingly eccentric fish-out-of-water comedy; as a parable about
the time when the cheerful conformity of the 1950s gave way to the "do your
own thing" vibes of the 1960s; as a rich "Wizard of Oz"-style fairy tale. Or
you can simply choose to appreciate it as a truly rewarding piece of
escapist entertainment. Regardless of how you choose to see "Pleasantville,"
this smart, funny, visually dazzling film is the kind of moviegoing
experience you're unlikely to forget.
 Putting a modern fable onscreen is extraordinarily difficult, the
kind of assignment that's perplexed even veteran directors such as Steven
Spielberg (in the charmless "Hook") and Barry Levinson (whose ghastly "Toys"
was a box office disaster), and though Ross' delightfully clever scripts for
"Big" and "Dave" were both Oscar-nominated he did not direct either film.
For a first film, "Pleasantville" is remarkably smooth without seeming
slick, and crucial tonal transitions in the story that could easily have
proven forced instead seem effortlessly natural.
 What sets Ross' work apart from that of most fledgling directors is
its focus; not only does he know exactly what he wants each scene to say, he
understands how to best get his points across. "Pleasantville" teems with
allusions to the Bible (a burning bush, a radiant red apple), references to
vintage TV ("Andy Griffith Show" star Don Knotts plays the character who
sets the tale in motion) and parallels to historical events, including
Hitler's rise to power and the Krystalnacht he ordered in 1938. It all
sounds far too heavy and portentous to be easily incorporated into what's
essentially a story about contemporary teen twins David (Tobey Maguire) and
Jen (Reese Witherspoon) trapped in the black-and-white confines of an eerily
wholesome 1950s series called "Pleasantville," but against considerable odds
all these diverse elements come together splendidly in the course of two
hours.
 For the socially awkward David, a chance to live among placcid,
predictable people is a dream come true, especially since he's a
"Pleasantville" fanatic and knows all the intricacies of such episodes as
"Trouble at the Barber Shop" and "Bud Gets A Job." For Jen, who prides
herself on being sexually adventurous and grimly anti-intellectual, the
prospect of mingling with the compulsively cheerful and resolutely
celibate -- even married couples sleep in separate single beds --
Pleasantvilleans looks like an opportunity to make some major alterations in
this insular little hamlet. To paraphrase the Talking Heads, Pleasantville
is a place where nothing ever happens; when these outsiders disrupt the
monotony, the results terrify some residents and liberate everyone else.
 The dissention even spreads to David and Jen's hollowly happy home
away from home, where their bland dad George (William H. Macy) is unnerved
by the abrupt changes in mom Betty (Joan Allen), who's no longer always
around when it's time to serve the pineapple kabobs to guests, or to prepare
copious amounts of biscuits, pancakes, bacon and hamsteak for each morning's
breakfast; she'd rather hang out with a soda shop owner (Jeff Daniels) who
dreams of becoming an artist. Bob (J.T. Walsh), Pleasantville's mayor, frets
over such new developments in town as workers who decide to walk off their
mundane jobs in search of more rewarding careers and teens who have suddenly
taken to splitting their time between the library and Lovers Lane. Once
intellectual and hormonal passions have been aroused, there's no turning
back, and the mundane grays of Pleasantville slowly begin to give way to
vivid living color.
 The staggeringly beautiful scenes that depict this transformation
were created by visual effects supervisor Chris Watts and scores of
assistants. But breathtaking as it is, the technical wizardry would be
pointless were it not for the movie's emotional content and resonant
performances by the entire cast; these are the things that elevate
"Pleasantville" out of the realm of pure fantasy and into the category of
human drama. Beyond the digitally composed imagery is a haunting, deeply
affecting story about learning to love, fulfilling your potential and
refusing to be bound by conventionality.
 "Your senses will never be the same" was the tagline used to
promote the splashy, thunderingly loud 1975 film of the Who's "Tommy." But
that slogan could just as easily be applied to "Pleasantville," a brilliant
"art-film" in the very best sense of the term and one that -- for a while
anyway -- may well change the way you look at the world.
James Sanford

Title
Review for I Know What You Did Last Summer (1997)
I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMERDirected by Jim Gillespie
  Hearing that "I Know What You Did Last Summer" comes from the
word-processor of Kevin Williamson, writer of last year's surprisingly
smart "Scream," could entice you to take a look at this teens-in-peril
thriller. Alas, the sophomore jinx has struck hard: Though "Summer"
eventually runs through most of the cliches of its genre, it's
noticeably lacking in the witty spins "Scream" put on such material.
Call it a case of tired blood.
 "Summer" begins with a beach party gone wrong. High school grads Julie
(Jennifer Love Hewitt), Helen (Sarah Michelle Gellar), Barry (Ryan
Phillippe) and Ray (Freddie Prinze Jr.) spend the night of July 4th
whooping it up, but they have little to celebrate when they accidentally
run down a man on their way home. Terrified of being held on murder
charges, the four decide to dump the body in the ocean, only to find
their crime resurfacing a year later, as a mysterious stalker begins
terrorizing them and sending ominous notes that seem to warn of impending
doom.
 From this point on, you can probably play it by ear, since Williamson's
script has no major surprises lurking in it. The resolution of the story
falls flat, partially because it's completely unbelievable and partially
because the killer turns out to be the most obvious suspect. And while
any cod in the audience will undoubtedly shiver at the sight of a
murderer in fisherman's garb, it looks pretty silly to us land-lubbers.
 Throughout, Hewitt and Gellar scream with conviction, Phillippe preens
and Prinze basically does a lot of blank-eyed staring (he's much better
in "The House of Yes," in which he actually has a character
to play). The only interesting performance comes from Anne Heche,
playing the inscrutable near-albino sister of a murder victim. What
she's doing in this trifle is anyone's guess, but she brings some
much-needed spookiness to what's essentially an "Afterschool Special"
with a body count.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Runaway Bride (1999)
         "Runaway Bride" begins with a startling image, that of the
lovely Maggie Carpenter (Julia Roberts) in her wedding gown and on
horseback, racing through the fields of rural Maryland to the tune of
U2's "I Still Haven't Found What I'm Looking For." Right away, we know
we've entered the realm of the screwball comedy where everyone is quirky
and everything is slightly askew. In some ways, "Bride" serves as a
mirror image of another one of Roberts' hits, "My Best Friend's
Wedding": In that film, her character was breaking up another person's
nuptuals, while in this one, Maggie successfully sabotages her own.
 It turns out the escape we're seeing marks the third time
Maggie has fled the altar at the last minute, a personality trait that
has made her a legend/laughingstock in her hometown and in her own home.
"You can't imagine how much cake we've gotten stuck with," complains
Maggie's grandmother. "It's a wonder I don't weigh 300 pounds."
 Maggie's habit of jilting fiances draws the attention of Ike
Graham (Richard Gere), a columnist for USA Today renowned for writing
what his detractors call "bitter diatribes about women." Without
bothering to verify rumors he's heard about her, Ike conjures up a
libelous attack on Maggie which ends up damaging his reputation instead
of hers. Fired for writing these lies, Ike decides to learn the truth
about Maggie, and "Bride" quickly becomes a sensational example of how
the chemistry between two stars can turn a modest script into great fun.
         When Gere and Roberts were first paired up nine years ago in
"Pretty Woman," the result delighted a whole lot of people, and "Bride"
proves lightning can strike twice. Watching them interact onscreen is
practically intoxicating, since, like all great movie couples, they
truly bring out the best in each other. Roberts' girl-next-door vibrance
humanizes the sometimes staunchy Gere; Gere's savoir faire seems to set
Roberts completely at ease.
 Though it takes a enormous leap of faith to get past "Bride"'s
set-up (and to ignore the question of how Maggie manages to continue
snagging beaus given her reputation), the results prove to be worth it.
The screenplay by Sara Parriott and Josann McGibbon manages to map out
an unconventional route to its destination, as well as working in a
valid message about how important it is to know yourself before you
decide to tie the knot. "Bride" also offers a hilarious performance by
Christopher Meloni as Maggie's sports-minded husband-to-perhaps-be and
charming parts for such proven comic talents as Joan Cusack, Laurie
Metcalf and Paul Dooley. The casting throughout the film is flawless.
 As Roberts' romances go, "Bride" is not as witty as "Notting
Hill," but it's warmer and more consistent. Nor does it pale next to
"Pretty Woman." The filmmakers were smart enough to realize everyone
would be making comparisons so Parriott and McGibbon have thrown in a
couple of smart nods to famous "Pretty" scenes and director Garry
Marshall continues the joke by recruiting "Pretty" veterans Hector
Elizondo and Larry Miller to fill key supporting roles.
 Of course, what ultimately matters here is whether or not the
sparks still fly between the leads. Consider this evidence: When Maggie
and Ike finally succumbed to each other, the preview audience responded
with an almost deafening chorus of screams, sighes and cheers. It was
the sound of 500 or so people simultaneously falling in love all over
again.

Title
Review for Return to Oz (1985)
         Prior to its release in the summer of 1985, Disney had high
hopes for "Return to Oz," a $30 million epic the company was banking on
to recapture their youth audience. Instead, this moody non-musical
sequel to "The Wizard of Oz" bombed at the box office and was faulted by
most critics as being too weird and scary for kids. Ironically, many of
the same scribes who trashed "Oz" would sing the praises of the equally
dark, much creepier and far inferior "Babe: Pig in the City" 13 years
later.
 Had any of the reviewers bothered to read some of the other Oz
books written by L. Frank Baum they would have realized the glittering
vision of Oz MGM conceived for the 1939 "Wizard of Oz" is a far cry from
how it's generally portrayed on the page. Baum's Oz is a land of strange
magic, hostile tribes and perilous quests. "Return," which combines
elements of Baum's "The Land of Oz" and "Ozma of Oz," is a faithful
representation.
 The film begins six months after the action in "Wizard" as
Dorothy (the enchanting young Fairuza Balk, later to star in "The Craft"
and "The Waterboy") finds herself haunted by memories of the Emerald
City. After the well-meaning Aunt Em (Piper Laurie) turns the girl over
to some shady doctors for treatment, Dorothy escapes and is transported
back to Oz, along with her pet hen Billina.
 But something is seriously wrong: The Yellow Brick Road is in
ruins, vicious Wheelers are running amok and the Emerald City is
lusterless and populated by statues. Dorothy determines this devestation
is the work of the diabolical Princess Mombi (Jean Marsh) and the
all-powerful Nome King (Nicol Williamson) and, with the help of new
friends Jack Pumpkinhead and Tik Tok, she sets out to restore Oz to its
glory days.
 A rare family film that doesn't go overboard with cute
creatures and silly jokes, "Return" is a swift-moving, lavish production
with gorgeous sets, imaginative special effects and outstanding use of
Claymation in the sequences set in the Nome King's subterranean domain.
The screenplay smoothly incorporates elements of horror (Mombi's gallery
of fresh-faced spare heads is chillingly lovely) and humor into a
rousing adventure story that is best-suited for ages 10 and up; fans of
the Oz books are likely to appreciate it most of all. Though completely
unlike "The Wizard of Oz" in almost every respect, "Return to Oz" is a
terrific movie in its own right and certainly deserves critical
reconsideration. James Sanford

Title
Review for Deep Impact (1998)
         The geeky astronomer enters figures into a computer and
blanches when he sees the result. Surely it must be serious since it
causes him to toss the pizza slice he's eating back into the box, an
event underscored by a burst of menacing music.
  Heavens above, it turns out we poor earthlings are about to
be squished by a comet the size of New York!
  Does President Beck (Morgan Freeman) have a plan?
  And, most importantly, will struggling reporter Jenny Lerner
(Tea Leoni) get to be the MSNBC anchor person during Armageddon?
  These and many other burning questions arise during the
course of ``Deep Impact,'' an end-of-the-world scenario that is
alternately silly, sensational and soapy. But it's rarely moving,
although the screenplay by Michael Tolkin and Bruce Joel Rubin does
everything but dice onions in an attempt to jerk tears. Somehow
though, when the curtain is coming down on life as we know it, it's
hard to fret about whether or not Jenny will make peace with her
frosty father (Maximillian Schell) or what will become of teen
star-gazer Leo Beiderman (Elijah Wood) and his girlfriend Sarah
(Leelee Sobieski).  Not helping matters is the fact that Leo comes off
as irritatingly earnest, partially due to the script requirements,
mostly because of Wood's one-note performance.
  Leoni's intrepid newscaster looks practically paralyzed once
she gets on the air, reading bulletins in a thin, wavering voice that
would inspire millions to reach for their remotes.
  Obviously inspired by the 1951 sci-fi classic ``When Worlds
Collide'' - with elements of ``On The Beach'' thrown in - ``Deep
Impact'' takes a thought-provoking premise and submerges it in suds.
  While President Beck sputters sanctimony (``You will still
pay your bills,'' he warns), a crew of astronauts led by veteran
rocket-jockey Spurgeon Tanner (Robert Duvall) takes off on a mission
to blow up the threatening comet. Everyone involved in this endeavor
has his or her own family troubles to contend with, and, added to
Jenny and Leo's woes, these subplots send the film's syrup content to
toxic levels.
  Disaster movies by nature are overwrought, but they
shouldn't be as consistently absurd as this. For example, Sarah's
doomed mom hands off her newborn to Sarah, who hops on a motorcycle
with the infant, leaving without a single diaper or bottle of formula.
  Somehow, no one in the Capitol seems to know about the
billions of dollars being secretly diverted into the construction of
the world's largest spaceship. And though everyone seems to know weeks
beforehand that the comet's impact will create a tidal wave that will
drown the East Coast, it appears there's no evacuation plan proposed.
  Director Mimi Leder seems clueless when it comes to staging
sentimental scenes, but she does have the proper touch for the movie's
few suspenseful patches, such as the truly scary sequences with Ron
Eldard and company racing against time to plant nuclear ``moles'' on
the comet's surface.
The scenes of cataclysmic catastrophe in the last 10 minutes
also are impressive and sometimes even imaginative. The image of the
head of the Statue of Liberty floating through the flooded streets of
Manhattan is particularly eerie.
  If only the filmmakers had stripped away the saccharine and
the self-importance of ``Deep Impact'' they might have found the kind
of haunting epic they're trying so hard to create. Instead they've
cooked up a crockful of hard-to-swallow melodrama, full of urgent
weddings and quickie family reunions. It would have been much more fun
to drop in on the folks who elected to party like it's never gonna be
1999.

Title
Review for L.A. Confidential (1997)
L.A. CONFIDENTIAL(Regency/Warner Brothers)
While it's always sad to see the warm weather fading away as the fall
approaches, few will be teary-eyed at the thought of such brainless
summer movies as "Excess Baggage" or "Money Talks" moving out of
theatres to make room for slightly smarter fare.  Take, for instance,
"L.A. Confidential," which actually asks an audience to think about
what they're watching: What is this world coming to when you go to a
movie and have to pay attention? But though some viewers may be
put-off by the serpentine plotting of "L.A.", those who've been
starving for a challenging, complex story with something to say will
come away thoroughly refreshed. Director Curtis Hanson, who adapted
the James Ellroy best-seller with screenwriter Brian Helgeland, has
produced a sterling example of what Hollywood can do when filmmakers
refuse to "dumb-down" material and when actors are cast for their
talent rather than their box-office appeal. There's not a single weak
player in Hanson's ensemble cast, and little-known Australian actors
Guy Pearce and Russell Crowe are almost certain to find Stateside fame
after their breakout roles here.
         Although set in 1953 Los Angeles (at the time the city and its
police force were being glamorized weekly via TV shows like
"Dragnet"), the story is almost frightening contemporary, since police
brutality, sleazy tabloid journalism and would-be celebrities who'll
do anything to be noticed have scarcely gone out of style in the past
40-odd years.  Indeed, parallels between the "Bloody Christmas"
beatings of prisoners in an L.A. holding-tank and the recent scandal
involving the alleged molestation of a Haitian being held in a New
York City station are quite easy to draw. Ditto the young actor who's
seized at the "Movie Premiere Pot Bust" and the recent arrest of
Christian Slater, who's admitted he was high on cocaine and heroin at
the time he was booked for a recent alleged assault.
          But even if you lose track of the multiple intertwining story
strands, you won't be able to take your eyes off Kevin Spacey as a cop
who yearns for notoriety, or Crowe and Pearce, playing morally
challenged officers who represent two sides of the same coin. Even Kim
Basinger, unfairly regarded in some circles as a joke, is strikingly
good as a call-girl looking for a way out of the opulent hell she's
made for herself. Her part is small but pivotal: She's the only one in
the story self-aware enough to understand what's going on around her,
namely the war between illusion and reality, public perception versus
the ugly truth. "L.A.  Confidential" may be a period-piece, but the
issues it raises stare each of us in the face daily. James Sanford

Title
Review for Six Days Seven Nights (1998)
        On paper, at least, the idea must have looked like it couldn't miss:
Harrison Ford plays a grizzled pilot named Quinn hired to fly cosmopolitan
Robin (Anne Heche) to Tahiti, and when they crash, the two must fend off
myriad dangers on an uncharted island. Think of a "Romancing The Stone" and
"African Queen" with just a trace of the sexual politics of "Swept Away"
thrown in.
Now lower your expectations - drastically.
"Six Days, Seven Nights" is the sort of movie that looks lovely and comes
across nicely in clips, but ultimately proves to be neither erotic, exotic
or even exciting.
There's nothing glaringly awful here, just a lot of underachievement from
some people who can do - and have done - better. That said, "Six Days" is
painless enough to sit through if all you're looking for is two hours of
gorgeous tropical scenery and the odd bit of action.
Films like this rely heavily on star power, and Ford and Heche turn out to
be a far cry from Humphrey Bogart and Katharine Hepburn. In fact, they're
not even close to Michael Douglas and Kathleen Turner.
Part of the blame rests on their shoulders. Ford does not seem to be
terribly engaged by his shallow character, and Heche, though charming in her
laid-back moments, tends to mug and screech to get laughs. She also
continually plunges into the water in a variety of semi-transparent white
tops, to no great effect. Ford and Heche are working at opposite extremes,
and though they're on the screen together, it doesn't feel like they're in
the same movie much of the time.
Then again, writer Michael Browning hasn't given either actor much to work
with in terms of witty lines or romantic moments. Shortly after being
stranded, Quinn and Robin take turns getting into each other's pants, as he
removes a water snake from hers and she retrieves a flare gun from his.
Unfortunately, neither situation generates any sizzle or much in the way of
big laughs.
Neither do the antics of David Schwimmer and Jacqueline Obradors as Robin's
wormy fiance and Quinn's voluptuous fling-of-the-moment. Their subplot shows
signs of having been severely curtailed, probably an act of mercy.
Near the start, "Six Days" shows a welcome satiric streak, introducing Heche
as a put-upon assistant editor at a magazine called Dazzle, which features
stories with such enticing headlines as "Your derriere: Five ways to tame
the beast." But that soon evaporates as the movie spends its best jokes
early on, struggles vainly to establish Ford and Heche as a credible couple,
then elects late in the game to throw in machine-gun-toting pirates and
explosions as a kicker.
Director Ivan Reitman does what he can to establish a buoyant tone for the
film, and he's fairly successful. But in the final analysis,
"Six Days" is neither a true adventure nor a good comedy, neither sexy nor
suspenseful, neither fish nor fowl. One thing is certain, though: See it
tonight and you will have forgotten all about it by this time next week.
James Sanford

Title
Review for eXistenZ (1999)
 With violent video games currently under scrutiny in light of the
tragedy in Colorado, writer-director David Cronenberg's "eXistenZ" has
probably taken on a timeliness its author could never have anticipated.
But teetering on the cutting edge is hardly an unfamiliar position for
Cronenberg, whose 1982 shocker "Videodrome" prophetically warned about
the desensitization of viewers fed a steady diet of violent or
pornographic films, and whose 1986 remake of "The Fly" is often read as
an allegory about the AIDS crisis.
 "eXistenZ," which is almost lightweight in comparison to other
Cronenberg creations, spins a genuinely jolting yarn about world-famous
game designer Allegra Geller (Jennifer Jason Leigh), whose latest
breakthrough is a kill-or-be-killed program that's downloaded directly
into the body through a port in the base of the player's spine. Even the
controllers look like flattened-out, misshapen breasts. The problem with
the new technology is that it's too realistic, too convincing. Allegra
and her partner (Jude Law) finally get so swept up in what's going on
they can't tell if they're in the real world or the virtual world.
Through some clever twists, Cronenberg eventually succeeds in making the
audience feel as disoriented as Allegra, uncertain of what to believe at
any given time.
 Leigh, who couldn't underplay a part if she tried, envisions Allegra as
a kind of electronic junkie who shivers and writhes in ecstacy as she
plugs into the electronic drug she's created; to further underscore the
connection, the wires that link her to the source look uncannily like
umbilical cords. The rallying cry of Cronenberg's characters in
"Videodrome" was "Long live the new flesh!", but almost two decades
later the taut and tricky "eXistenZ" argues that sometimes progress can
take us to places we might have been better off avoiding altogether.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Flubber (1997)
FLUBBER (Disney)
Directed by Les Mayfield
 In "The Time Machine," the passive, docile Eloi were lured to their deathes
at the paws of the man-eating Morlocks by huge sirens that emerged from the
Morlocks' underground lair. Similarly, families are summoned into movie
theatres at least twice a year by the almost irresistible call of the Disney
marketing machine: How can anyone with children be expected to withstand the
non-stop barrage of ads, tie-ins and merchandising that accompanies every
major Disney production?
 To make matters worse, Disney has lately taken to remaking well-remembered
titles of the past, such as "101 Dalmatians" and "That Darn Cat," which
throws baby-boomer nostalgia into the equation and makes the sales pitch
even tougher to resist for the over-30 demographic. "Flubber," for instance,
is an update of "The Absent-Minded Professor," the 1961 Fred McMurray comedy
about an awkward scientist who discovers a kind of "flying rubber" that
allows objects, cars and basketball players to rise to new heights. Changing
the title to focus on the substance instead of the man who discovers it is a
indicator not only of how "Flubber" differs from its source, but also of
what sets these newly minted Disneys apart from the movies that inspired
them. "Flubber" features some inspired visual effects and state-of-the-art
computer animation, but it's a singularly joyless experience to sit through,
as technology once again trumps any kind of human interest.
 Actually, after "Hook" and "Jumanji," Robin Williams ought to know better
than to attach himself to family entertainment, but perhaps after the
disaster of "Father's Day" earlier this year, he figured "Flubber" might
restore a bit of his luster. Sadly not. Director Les Mayfield has no idea
what to do with Williams, aside from reining him in, always the worst way to
handle such a volatile talent. Not that Mayfield gets decent performances
out of such reputable actors as Marcia Gay Harden or Christopher McDonald
either: Almost everyone in the cast seems to realize they're here purely to
kill time between special-effects sequences and the tiresome slapsticky
antics served up by screenwriter John Hughes.
 Ever since his grand-slam with the original "Home Alone," Hughes has given
up on writing about human beings and concentrated solely on rehashing his
biggest hit. "Flubber" is no exception to the rule, as Hughes works in a
pair of moronic henchmen (Clancy Brown, Ted Levine) who must endure multiple
unfunny pratfalls while trying to steal Flubber. For no reason other than to
offer one more reminder of "Home," the bad guys are often observed by a
little boy who's a rather obvious clone of Macaulay Culkin, and does a lot
of screaming to prove it.
 Hughes' teen romances of ten years ago ("Pretty in Pink," "Some Kind of
Wonderful," etc.) had more depth than his playing out of the love triangle
between Williams, Harden and McDonald; to make matters worse, there's also a
chatty flying computer on the sidelines who keeps trying to distract
Williams from matters of the heart. At one point this horny little love
machine conjures up a holographic vixen to seduce the professor, a rather
kinky departure for Disney fare, and --needless to say-- an undeveloped
idea.
 Of course, it's doubtful that "Flubber"'s low quality will have much of an
effect on its box-office performance: "Jumanji" was every bit as
unimaginative and mean-spirited, and it still grossed over $100 million.
It's hard not to feel sorry, though, for the too-trusting Moms and Dads
who'll round up their broods and trudge to the multiplex to see this piece
of product masquerading as a movie. Chances are they'll have a better time
looking for a parking space or waiting in line at the concession stand than
they will watching "Flubber."
James Sanford

Title
Review for Drop Dead Gorgeous (1999)
     A lot of funny things probably go on backstage at any given beauty
contest, but obviously writer Lona Williams never heard about any of
them. Instead of offering any kind of juicy details -- we all knew about
how contestants put Vaseline on their teeth to brighten their smiles,
thank you -- her screenplay for "Drop Dead Gorgeous" merely trots out a
bunch of cliched characters, saddles them with Minnesota acents and
expects hilarity to follow.
With its conniving mothers and star-struck daughters, "Gorgeous"
begs unflattering comparisons to two other similar and far superior
films, both directed by Michael Ritchie. His outrageously funny "Smile"
stands as the last word on teen pageants, while his "The Positively True
Alleged Texas Cheerleader-Murdering Mom," a 1993 HBO movie starring
Holly Hunter as the kook who went to prison for attempting to hire
killers to ensure her kid made the cheerleading squad, had an edginess
and spark that's nowhere to be found here.
Clumsily directed by Michael Patrick Jann, "Gorgeous" offers a
mock-documentary look at what happens when girls from the opposite sides
of the social scale compete for the title of Sarah Rose Cosmetics
American Teen Princess. Rebecca Leeman (Denise Richards) is a well-to-do
beauty whose dad owns a furniture store, while Amber Atkins (Kirsten
Dunst) works afterschool as a beautician in a funeral home to help pay
the bills. Rebecca's mom Gladys (a tired-looking Kirstie Alley) is
snippy and snobbish; Amber's mom Annette (Ellen Barkin, in yet another
role unworthy of her) is crude and boozy. Williams, from the evidence
onscreen, never met a stereotype she couldn't embrace.
But it's not a crime to use stereotypes in a comedy if you can find
something amusing for them to say, as David E. Kelley did in "Lake
Placid." Williams, however, thinks we should be tickled just by the mere
mention of cow-tipping, lutefisk and Melissa Manchester. At one point,
fire sweeps through the Atkins' trailer and Amber reports all their
clothes "melted together, forming a big polyester meteor in our closet."
Poor people living in trailer parks and wearing polyester -- pretty
witty stuff, this.
In some kind of attempt to top "There's Something About Mary,"
"Gorgeous" also includes a mentally challenged character who bumps into
things and plays with himself in front of the contestants. It also makes
several slaps at Lutherans, with an organization called the Lutheran
Sisterhood Gun Club and a joke about the Lutheran church being holier
the Catholic church because "Lutherans use grape Kool-Aid for the blood
of Christ." To show us how stupid and trashy people are in Minnesota,
Williams has them chew tobacco, smoke incessantly and say "you betcha"
as often as possible.
Lost in this mess are a couple of respectable performances by
Richards and Dunst, the only people in the movie who seem to understand
that playing comedy does not mean you have to shout frequently and
exaggerate every gesture. Dunst, remembered as the creepy child from
"Interview With the Vampire," has turned into a highly likable young
actress, and Richards is spotlighted in one of the film's few funny
scenes, a bizarre moment involving a Frankie Valli song and an effigy of
Jesus Christ. Most of the rest of "Drop Dead Gorgeous" simply falls
flat.

Title
Review for Enemy of the State (1998)

 You don't have to go to a kids' movie this season to see bugs; there are
plenty on view in "Enemy of the State," the latest flashy, sterile package
to come off producer Jerry Bruckheimer's assembly line. Smartly playing off
public fears of illegal observation and wiretapping -- the villains here are
apparently all white Republican males, just to put a fine point on it all --
David Marconi's screenplay teems with high-tech surveillance equipment,
satellite observation and digital cameras hidden in trash bins and smoke
alarms. Too bad no one thought to have star Will Smith remake Rockwell's
"Somebody's Watching Me" as the movie's theme song.
 Smith, as Georgetown lawyer Robert Dean, is the unlikely target of all this
electronic voyeurism, thanks to a chance encounter with a former classmate
(Jason Lee) who unwittingly taped a murder and secretly passed along the
evidence to Dean. Within hours, Dean finds himself accused of everything
from having an affair with an old flame (a shopworn-looking Lisa Bonet) to
having murdered said mistress. His wife Carla (Regina King) throws him out,
his credit cards are invalidated and he finds himself in perpetual flight
from the sinister National Security Agency, headed up by cold-blooded Jon
Voight and Loren Dean.
 No one's going to mistake "Enemy" for "North By Northwest," but the picture
has enough juice to hold the interest for the first hour. By the time Gene
Hackman turns up as a former NSA agent who's been underground for the past
18 years though, the story is running out of places to go.
 Another stumbling block is Smith himself, a congenial actor but a limited
one. His emotional range does not extend to playing grief or to convincingly
portraying angry indignation. His best moments here come when he banters
with the always delightful King, whose skeptical reactions to her husband's
wild stories are priceless.
 Director Tony Scott steadfastly adheres to the first rule of the
Bruckheimer school of filmmaking, which is that no shot should be allowed to
last more than four seconds. The result is an overwhelming rush of imagery
which will either sweep you away or put you off. At least it's better suited
to this tangled tale than it was to the empty-headed, often baffling
"Armageddon."
 Though it's easy to trace the roots of "Enemy" back to such 1970s
suspensers as "Three Days of the Condor" or "The Conversation" (in which
Hackman's role was not far removed from his part here), Marconi can't come
up with a feasible finale to the chase, and the last ten minutes of the
movie provide a lame, bloody capper to a fairly exciting yarn.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Practical Magic (1998)
        All Sally Owens (Sandra Bullock) wants is a normal life.
Unfortunately, her heritage keeps tripping her up.
 Sally is a descendent of a long line of witches -- she still lives
in a tumble-down old house with her kooky aunts (Dianne Wiest and Stockard
Channing) who sell love spells to local sufferers of heartache -- and
everyone in her small New England village insists on reminding her of that.
Her shamelessly raunchy sister Gillian (Nicole Kidman) split town long ago
to avoid local scorn but Sally has stuck around, trying desperately to live
down the ridicule and struggling to break the curse that dictates every man
an Owens woman loves will meet an untimely death.
 There's a lovely theme about coming to terms with your history at
the heart of "Practical Magic," and it's drawn straight from Alice Hoffman's
enchanting best seller. Would that screenwriter Robin Swicord had taken a
bit more from the book, a character-driven chronicle of passions both earthy
and supernatural.
 Instead, the movie beefs up one of the story's least interesting
elements, the violent relationship between Gillian and her derelict beau
Jimmy (Gorin Visnjic). It plays like "Bewitched" meets "The Burning Bed,"
particularly in a woefully miscalculated finale that almost sabotages the
entire film. In the novel, Jimmy's ghost makes trouble by haunting Sally's
garden; the movie opts for a more vicious, less intriguing form of
retribution.
 The most appealing aspect of "Practical Magic," unsurprisingly, is
the pairing of Bullock and Kidman, two of the most likable stars around.
Both are in terrific form here and the chemistry they generate
single-handedly powers the film.
 Sally proves to be one of Bullock's more challenging roles,
requiring the actress to bury her sex appeal beneath layers of grief and
dread until circumstances drive her to take action rather than always
cowering on the sidelines. Generally thought of as a dramatic lightweight,
Bullock's impressive emotional range here may silence some skeptics. Kidman
is handed a far less complex role -- Swicord sees Gillian as basically a
slightly long-in-the-tooth sex kitten -- but she packs enough humor and
subtle self-disgust into it that she manages to give a bit of depth to a
stereotype.
 Director Griffin Dunne, whose acid-tinged "Addicted To Love" was
one of those movies you either loved or hated, can't quite decide which way
he wants to play this material and the tone of "Magic" swings freely between
lighthearted fun and unscary horror. The movie is at its best when Sally and
Gillian are in the process of re-establishing their sisterly bond, making
mischief at a mothers' "phone tree" meeting or frantically casting a spell.
The scenes involving the small-minded locals are unconvincing and beg the
question of how Sally's boutique manages to stay in business when everyone
around seems to despise her.
 "Magic" ultimately gets by on the combined strength of its leads
and the able assistance of Channing and Wiest, who bring a gleeful
eccentricity to their work. The movie is agreeable fluff, but if the
filmmakers had thrown in an extra dose of Bullock and Kidman and several
more pages of Hoffman's original they would have concocted a much more
potent brew.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Sweet Hereafter, The (1997)
THE SWEET HEREAFTER
(Fine Line Features)
 The key scene in "The Sweet Hereafter" includes one of the most disturbing
images you're likely to see this year: a schoolbus full of children plunges
over a bank, rolls out onto a frozen lake and pauses for a few seconds
before the ice underneath it gives way and the bus and its passengers
disappear into the frigid water below. It's a  moment that will change the
people of the tiny Canadian town of Sam Dent forever, as the once-insular
community begins to turn upon itself with neighbor betraying neighbor in a
race for justice, money and, the most elusive thing of all, peace of mind.
 Based on the acclaimed novel by Russell Banks, "The Sweet Hereafter" is
both deeply disturbing and almost relentlessly grim, which is hardly
unexpected, given the subject matter. The true surprise is director Atom
Egoyan's approach to the material. In the hands of Hollywood, this might
have been sensationalistic; at the very least it would have been ripe with
scenes of hysterical parents and angry townsfolk. But Egoyan finds in Banks'
book a fable, a story about the journey from shock to grief to renewal, "the
sweet hereafter" of the title. Late in the film, Robert Browning's "The Pied
Piper of Hamelin" is read as a bedtime story, and it becomes a perfect
metaphor for the strange chain of events that have pulled Sam Dent apart.
 The man largely responsible for the dissent is Mitchell Stephens (Ian
Holm), a lawyer from out of town who arrives in Sam Dent hoping to put
together a class-action lawsuit against the manufacturer of the bus. A
seasoned pro, Stephens knows exactly the right words to say to move these
small-towners to his side. "I'm here to give your anger a voice," he tells
the distraught parents of one of the victims. "There's no such thing as an
accident. The word doesn't mean anything to me." That's a lie, of course: To
Stephens the accident means a potential financial windfall if he can win the
case, which will ultimately turn largely on the testimony of Nicole (Sarah
Polley), a gifted young singer who survived the crash but has been left
crippled. Nicole's father Sam (Tom McCamus), with whom she's had an odd and
possibly incestuous relationship, is among the most money-hungry in the
community, although it's difficult to tell whether he wants compensation
because of Nicole's injuries or because of her new aloofness toward him.
 Stephens, too, has a difficult time with his own daughter, a drug-dazed
wanderer named Zoe (Caerthan Banks) who calls him frequently on his cellular
phone, demanding money and attention in between lies. It is this aspect of
Stephens that allows Egoyan to show us the man's secret heart and
well-shrouded grief. Obviously, Stephens' quest for remuneration for the
parents of Sam Dent is fueled at least partially by his realization that he
has in fact lost his own child, who's become one of the living dead.
 The acting is mostly low-key and understated, in keeping with the film's
tone. Holm and Polley are particularly moving, but Bruce Greenwood, as one
of the few citizens to resist Stephens' spell, is also memorable.  As in
Egoyan's previous film "Exotica," the director paints this picture
deliberately and somewhat abstractly, which may frustrate those who prefer
to have everything spelled out and clarified. In some spots, "The Sweet
Hereafter" is almost too oblique for its own good, particularly in a finale
that almost seems to smack of "The X Files." But Egoyan also conjures up
some powerful scenes, such as when Stephens interviews Dolores (Gabrielle
Rose), the bus driver who's become a town pariah since the accident, and
whose living room wall is adorned with framed photos of each of the kids on
the bus, staring out at her like a gallery of little ghosts. James Sanford

Title
Review for Switchback (1997)
SWITCHBACK
Directed by Jeb Stuart
 If you're one of those people who just can't get their fill of watching
cars skidding around on icy roads or people sliding down snow-covered hills,
you'll want to hurry up and see "Switchback," a tepid would-be chiller that
offers no shortage of perilous wintry situations. But don't be surprised if
the rest of the film leaves you cold as well: "Switchback" is messily
written and surprisingly poorly acted, considering the leads are Dennis
Quaid and Danny Glover. Quaid, stuck in a one-note role as a renegade FBI
agent, has no opportunities to exercise his rogueish charm, while Glover is
woefully out-of-place pretending to be a man of mystery. Only Jared Leto (of
TV's "My So-Called Life") seems to strike the right note, playing a
hitchhiker with a secret.
 Like every fifth movie these days, "Switchback" deals with a serial killer,
and yes, he's brazen enough to send self-congratulatory letters to the Feds.
That gets Quaid's goat, and he takes it upon himself to personally track
down and nail the murderer (why he's so determined to find the maniac will
remain a secret, just in case you end up having to watch this some night at
3a.m. on HBO). Meanwhile, seemingly kind-hearted Glover travels through the
West in a white Cadillac decorated with pictures of nude women. The car
freaks out picked-up passenger Leto and probably won't win any applause from
Gloria Steinem either. For some odd reason, a trail of blood seems to follow
the duo around, and director-screenwriter Jeb Stuart obviously hopes you're
on pins and needles wondering which man is responsible for the string of
stabbings. But, just in case you're not, Stuart casually reveals the guilty
party halfway through the movie, leaving the audience to wait for Quaid to
finally catch up to the killer. For the most part, the pursuit is a yawn a
minute, leading to a climax that would be laughable if it weren't so dull.
 Much of "Switchback" turns on outrageous coincidences and pure luck, as
when someone just happens to enter a room just in time to overhear a crucial
conversation, or someone just happens to look in the right direction at the
right time and spot a major clue. Aside from a few well-executed stunts, the
movie's only notable for being the second film within a month to feature an
emergency tracheotomy in a public place. "Playing God" had the operation
being performed in a nightclub; here, Leto saves a choking victim by doing
the procedure on the counter of a roadside diner.

Title
Review for Whole Nine Yards, The (2000)
 Watching "The Whole Nine Yards" and waiting to laugh is almost as
futile as licking a popsicle stick in the hope it may eventually start
to taste sweet.
 This lumbering, colorless attempt at comedy brings together several
stars who look not only unattractive, but downright unhealthy. Instead
of laughing at the puffy Matthew Perry and the skeletal Rosanna
Arquette, you want to drive them to the nearest clinic for a check-up.
Perhaps on the way out the door you can take a second to remind Bruce
Willis his face is capable of more than just one grim expression.
 On the other hand, Willis isn't likely to be the only person who goes
through "Yards" without cracking a smile. Mitchell Kupner's screenplay
initially strives for both the corkscrew twists of "Ruthless People" and
the dark humor of "Analyze This," only to quickly settle for the mundane
rhythms of a bad TV sitcom. The movie's idea of a running gag is to make
repeated references to the curious Canadian habit of spreading
mayonnaise on hamburgers. Absolutely hilarious.
 Set in Montreal, "Yards" sets up Perry as Oz Oseransky, a dentist
married to a harpy named Sophie (Arquette, employing the corniest French
accent since Pepe Le Pew) who'd love nothing more than a ringside seat
at her husband's funeral. When their new neighbor Jimmy Jones (Willis)
is revealed to be none other than fugitive Chicago mobster Jimmy "Tulip"
Tudeski, Oz flies into a panic, while Sophie schemes to use Jimmy to
bump off her spouse. Oz zooms to the Windy City to report Jimmy to the
authorities, meets Jimmy's curvy missus Cynthia (Natasha Henstridge) and
learns the hard way why one should not covet thy neighbor's wife.
 "I haven't made love in five years," Cynthia confesses. "Neither have I
-- I've been married," Oz replies. That's Kupner's idea of really snappy
dialogue.
 As Willis practices his studied grimace and Perry wearyingly reprises
all his anxious tics, the only zip in the picture is provided by Michael
Clarke Duncan as a hard to figure associate of Jimmy's and Amanda Peet
(TV's "Jack and Jill"), who puts considerable life into the throwaway
role of Oz's goofy receptionist. With her enormous teeth and slightly
crazed eyes, Peet has exactly the sort of manic edge so desperately
desired by and conspicuously absent from the rest of the film. James
Sanford

Title
Review for Tea with Mussolini (1999)
 Like a story Grandma might tell about days gone by, "Tea With
Mussolini" takes its time to unfold and never leads to any great
earthshattering truths, but it's so quietly charming and engagingly
performed only the most callous viewers will tune out. Based on the
early chapters of director Franco Zeffirelli's autobiography, "Tea" is
set in the Italy of the 1930s and 1940s, a coming-of-age tale that's
more interested in its young hero's environment and influences than in
his adjustment to adulthood. Luca, played by Charlie Lucas as a child
and Baird Wallace as a teen, is a young Italian without a family, the
product of a brief liaison between a clothing tycoon and his mistress.
When the father's secretary and translator Mary (Joan Plowright) can no
longer stand seeing Luca being hidden away in a church-run orphanage she
agrees to look after him, enlisting the aid of her fellow "scorpioni,"
feisty Englishwomen who have settled in Florence to bask in the culture
and seemingly endless sunshine. "There are no illegitimate children in
this world," Mary insists. "Only illegitimate parents."
 So Luca becomes the surrogate son of the saintly Mary, the spirited
painter and would-be bohemian Arabella (Judi Dench) and the high-handed
Hester (Maggie Smith), a consummate snob who truly believes Fascist
leader Mussolini is a friend of hers since she's the widow of a British
ambassador. Outside this circle but destined to become a major force in
Luca's life is Elsa (Cher), a cheerfully brash American with a taste for
modern art, elderly millionaires and youthful lovers. When her latest
husband feigns a heart attack to halt another one of her spending
sprees, Elsa complains to her pal Georgy (Lily Tomlin) that "he's too
cheap to slip a poor girl a little Picasso."
 Though "Tea" doesn't have much in the way of a linear plot, the theme
of making sacrifices in the name of love is woven throughout its various
anecdotes. There's also a hint of "Cabaret" in the way the women ignore
the early signs of trouble in the late 1930s -- Fascist attacks on
citizens, the burning of foreign flags, mandatory registration of Jews,
etc. -- in the hope that soon everything will be back to normal and
their leisurely lives can begin again. Of course, that is not meant to
be; as Hester learns, just because one has taken tea with Mussolini does
not mean you're under Il Duce's protection.
 Plowright, Smith and Tomlin play to type quite effectively, while Dench
brings a subtle layer of pathos to Arabella, who's better at protecting
other people's masterpieces than she is at creating her own. Cher, in a
role ideally suited to her natural flamboyance, sparkles. In Elsa's most
telling moment, she's asked by one of her young Italian conquests if all
American women are as exciting as she is. "Alas," she sighes. "No." You
can say that again. James Sanford

Title
Review for Guinevere (1999)
         "Guinevere" is a movie that's likely to hit home with a lot of
viewers, even those who haven't personally been involved in either side
of an older man/younger woman relationship. You don't necessarily have
had to walk in the shoes of 21-year-old Harper Sloane to understand why
she took the path she did or why she willingly put up with a lover most
women her age would have steered clear of in the first place.
 It all comes down to acceptance. For many people in their teens
and early 20s, that's something that's surprisingly hard to find in
their homes, in their schools, even in their own peer groups. As
adolescents struggle with their changing bodies, attitudes and emotions,
most of them look for some kind of confirmation that they're on the
right track and they're not nearly as awkward or uncouth or stupid as
they often feel.
 Sometimes this kind of reassurance comes from an understanding
teacher or an older friend. Or it may come from someone who doesn't
necessarily have the young person's best interests at heart. In Harper's
case, it comes from a man named Connie Fitzpatrick, who is more than
twice her age and who may or may not be a positive force in shaping her
life.
 Harper is played by Canada's answer to Jodie Foster, the
radiant Sarah Polley. She first came to prominence as a child star in
movies such as "One Magic Christmas" and director Terry Gilliam's "The
Adventures of Baron Munchausen," and in the 10 years since, she's become
an exceptionally versatile actress who's particularly good at getting a
handle on characters who rise above their circumstances. She was a
schoolgirl who slept with her father's friends to pay the bills in
director Atom Egoyan's "Exotica," a crippled survivor of a near-fatal
accident in "The Sweet Hereafter" and, perhaps to show she can lighten
up a bit when she needs to, she gave a saucy, funny performance as a
savvy grocery store clerk who successfully marketed chewable aspirin as
a designer drug for the rave set in director Doug Liman's terrific
sleeper "Go."
 Here, Polley immediately zeroes on Harper's insecurities and
quiet fears and brings them delicately to the surface. Despite her
intelligence and poise, Harper feels utterly out of place among her
wealthy family and does her best to fade into the wallpaper as everyone
she knows gathers to celebrate her sister's wedding. Connie (Stephen
Rea) has been hired to photograph the reception and he and Harper bond
immediately. He sees the unexplored potential in Harper and draws her
into his life. She follows willingly, and he christens her "Guinevere."
 Not long afterward, Harper will find out she's the latest in a
substantial string of Guineveres. In some movies -- and in a lot of
romances -- that would be the end of the story, but not here.
Writer-director Audrey Wells realizes these two still have much more to
learn about -- and from -- each other.
 Wells previously wrote the wonderful 1996 comedy "The Truth
About Cats and Dogs," in which Janeane Garafolo was cast as a young
woman who hid behind jokes and sarcasm in the hope no one would see her
romantic side. "Guinevere" offers the flip side of that story. Instead
of hiding from love, Harper is starving for a little bit of art and
idealism after having grown up in a house full of cynics. Garafalo's
character in "Cats and Dogs" was ultimately softened up by her first
brush with passion, but we know Harper will experience just the opposite
effect.
 Wearing his bohemian air as comfortably as an old sweater, Rea
makes Connie likable, even though we may question his motives and
morals. Harper may be Guinevere, but Connie is not the dashing Lancelot,
nor is he the dream-driven Arthur. He's just a middle-aged man who wants
someone to look up to him, and Harper's mother (Jean Smart) nails him
down perfectly when she tells him the one thing Harper can give that the
50ish Connie can't get from a woman his own age: that sense of youthful
awe.
 When Connie and Harper are together, you don't get a sense of
great passion, but rather a feeling you're watching a couple of people
who are getting what they need from each other at this particular
moment. That kind of reciprocity may not be the basis for a timeless
love story, but it's exactly what you'll find in a lot of friendships,
relationships and marriages. As this resonant movie clearly illustrates,
many of us don't find that elusive Camelot, especially not the first
time out. James Sanford

Title
Review for Cider House Rules, The (1999)
         When it was first published in 1985, John Irving's "The Cider
House Rules" aroused a fair amount of controversy because of its
staunchly pro-abortion stance. In adapting his book to the screen,
Irving has softened up its politics a bit and given a slightly
sentimental gloss to his extremely Dickensian tale of orphan Homer Wells
(Tobey Maguire) and his adventures in and outside the St. Cloud's
Orphanage. Even so, "Cider House" the movie is unlikely to win any
endorsements from the pro-life coalition.
 Nor, for that matter, is it certain to enchant fans of the
novel, since Irving has pared his almost 600-page work down to its
essentials, cutting numerous characters and deleting scores of colorful
incidents along the way.
 A couple of years ago, actor Tom Hulce won rave reviews for his
staging of "The Cider House Rules" as an epic two-part play at a Los
Angeles theater, and seeing the film might convince you Hulce knew the
material better than its author. The two-hour cinematic version of
"Cider" comes off as a piece of carefully written, warmly played
exposition leading up to a dramatic payoff that never materializes.
Bathed in an autumnal New England glow and tenderly scored by Rachel
Portman, this is an extremely pretty movie to look at and listen to, but
although Irving's basic plot remains, the richness of his prose hasn't
truly transferred to the screen.
 The picture is directed by Swedish-born Lasse Hallstrom, who,
in the years since his breakthrough feature "My Life As A Dog," has
specialized in chronicling unorthodox and dysfunctional families ("Once
Around," "What's Eating Gilbert Grape?", "Something to Talk About"). In
"Cider," the patriarch of the story is Dr. Wilbur Larch (Michael Caine),
who risks his career offering abortions to unhappily pregnant women in
WWII era Maine instead of dispatching them to back-alley butchers.
Homer, his assistant, has more qualms about providing such services,
until he meets first a beautiful orchard worker in the family way named
Candy (Charlize Theron), then the tragic Rose Rose (singer Erykah Badu,
doing impressive work in a difficult role) who carries both an unwanted
baby and a ghastly secret.
 The title refers to a typewritten list of restrictions posted
in the bunkhouse where Homer, Rose and some of the other migrant workers
live. Everyone ignores the decrees, perhaps because as several
characters note, "sometimes you have to break the rules to set things
straight." Picking apples in and of itself certainly calls to mind the
Garden of Eden, and that's scarcely the most daring behavior these
characters indulge in.
 Maguire brings an immediate likability to Homer -- he looks
almost like a young Dick Van Dyke -- and provides a solid anchor for the
saga. Caine is also fine, as are Theron and the charismatic Paul Rudd as
the young lovers who help introduce Homer to the world outside St.
Cloud's. Still, the movie stubbornly refuses to take off. Exactly what's
holding it back is unclear, but it could have something to do with the
way Irving and Hallstrom have tried to subvert a sprawling, occasionally
shocking epic of a book into a mellow, conventional mainstream film.
Somewhere along the way, "The Cider House Rules" turned into something
almost as safe as milk. James Sanford

Title
Review for Jane Austen's Mafia! (1998)
        A well-written spoof can stand on its own. You don't have to
know ``Mildred Pierce'' and ``Gone With the Wind'' by heart, for
example, to find Carol Burnett's take-offs on these classics
hysterically funny.
  On the other hand, you would need to be intimately
acquainted with Francis Ford Coppola's ``Godfather'' trilogy and
Martin Scorsese's ``Casino'' to even begin to appreciate most of the
gags in ``Mafia!''  the latest entry in the anything-for-a-laugh
school of filmmaking. Even if you knew the Coppola and Scorsese works
inside out, you still might find this attempted send-up more curious
than it is funny; if you have only a passing familiarity with the
films ``Mafia!'' tries to satirize, you'll be snoozing instead of
snickering.
  The only thing that sets ``Mafia!'' (still identified in the
opening credits by its pre-release title, ``Jane Austen's Mafia!'')
apart from most of the other pictures like it is the absence of Leslie
Nielsen from the cast. Otherwise, the picture is business as usual for
director Jim Abrahams, one of the original members of the teams behind
``Airplane!''  and ``Naked Gun.'' But doing too many of these
joke-athons apparently has drained Abrahams of the boundless energy
that is his usual trademark.  ``Mafia!'' lopes along aimlessly,
squandering most of its best ideas in its first half-hour.
  Though he's up to the challenge of alternately parodying Al
Pacino and Robert DeNiro, Jay Mohr doesn't quite have the comic chops
to pull it off.  An uproariously funny stand-up comedian, Mohr hasn't
yet found a big-screen role to match his talents. At least Mohr
escapes ``Mafia!'' without undue shame. Lloyd Bridges, in his last
role, is not so fortunate.
  Mohr and Bridges play the heads of the Cartino crime family,
which operates Las Vegas' shady Peppermill Casino, an establishment
notable for its high-stakes games of Candy Land and Chutes and
Ladders. A brush with death causes amoral Anthony (Mohr) to reflect
back on his people's checkered history, which includes an escape from
the Sicilian town of Salmonella, a long climb to the top of the olive
oil trade, and a move into New York's seedy underworld.
  Typical of the level of ``Mafia!'s'' humor is a scene on
Ellis Island with American Indians protesting being made to wait
because ``we had reservations'' and numerous gags about the flatulence
of the family matriarch (Olympia Dukakis, what were you thinking?).
  Every so often there's a genuinely clever bit or a bright
non sequitur, but much of the material is dated. Jokes about movies
like ``Cocktail'' and ``Child's Play'' might have gone over big in the
early days of the Bush administration, but a decade later they're a
solid indicator of ``Mafia!'s'' humor recession.

Title
Review for Xanadu (1980)
         An attempt to revive the long-dormant genre of musical fantasy,
the $20 million "Xanadu" was generally blasted by the media when it
opened in 1980; Esquire went so far as to call it "Xanadon't."
 But time has been oddly kind to this much-maligned movie. In the 19
years since it first appeared, it's generated a substantial cult
following, and it's not hard to see why, especially in light of the
big-band revival (which "Xanadu" predicted) and the mania for all things
disco (which "Xanadu" celebrates). There's never been a movie quite like
this, and there never will be again. And that may not be a bad thing.
 But taken for what it is -- an unapologetic wallow in the glitz
and gloss of the late 1970s -- "Xanadu" is actually a lot of fun. After
all, it's difficult to hate a picture that tries so desperately hard to
dazzle.
 The slender story concerns a disillusioned artist named Sonny
(Michael Beck, whose line-readings give new meaning to the term
'wooden') who's persuaded by former bandleader Danny McGuire (Gene
Kelly, looking pleasantly baffled by everything going on around him) and
the mysterious beauty Kira (Olivia Newton-John at her most radiant) to
open a state-of-the-art roller disco called -- ta da! -- Xanadu. It's
doubtful, however, that Kubla Khan's 'stately pleasure dome' had much in
common with this place, where spandex-clad vixens, guys with
over-moussed hair and other fashion victims get down to the sounds of
the Electric Light Orchestra.
 While this boogie wonderland is under construction, Sonny winds
up falling in love with the evasive Kira, who won't reveal anything
about herself except that she lives with her sisters "on the second
floor." Kira realizes love between a mortal and a goddess is strictly
taboo, but that doesn't stop her from giving her heart to Sonny. After
she's whisked back to a strangely empty-looking heaven, Sonny goes after
her and persuades her to come back to Earth one more time.
 In the movie's wildly over-the-top finale, Kira appears on the opening
night of Xanadu and takes on the personas of a tap-dancing Betty Grable,
a mini-skirted Nancy Sinatra, a boot-scottin' cowgirl and a princess
from outer space to perform a floorshow no one's likely to forget.
 Ridiculous? You bet. But Newton-John and Kelly are thoroughly
charming, the music (including Newton-John's huge hit "Magic" and the
lilting "Suddenly") is intoxicating, the production design is out of
this world and the costumes are, well, very much a product of their
time. The script also manages to contrive a pleasantly perplexing
wrap-up to the romance, rather than going for the obvious.
 Most importantly, "Xanadu" serves as a time capsule of that
magic moment when the future of pop was up for grabs. In "Dancin'," one
of the strangest musical numbers ever put on celluloid, a faux-Glenn
Miller big-band clashes with shock-rockers The Tubes, and their wildly
different styles ultimately merge into a curious but cohesive whole.
It's a hilarious and effective argument for open-mindedness.
 There's also a cheerful positivity to the entire project that's
completely out of step with the jaded 1990s. The story speaks out
against cynicism and self-defeatist thinking, insisting that those who
truly believe in their dreams will ultimately triumph. Naive as it may
sound, that kind of message is genuinely refreshing to hear these days.
As a movie, its merits are debatable, but as a relic of a long-gone era,
"Xanadu" is priceless. James Sanford

Title
Review for Washington Square (1997)
         Although the movie ``Washington Square'' bears the same title
as Henry James' novel, it takes considerable liberties with the source
material, much in the same way the recent ``Wings of the Dove'' did
with another James novel.
  Carol Doyle's screenplay remodels the character of Catherine
Sloper into something of a fledgling feminist, rather than the meek
and pathetic victim she was in ``The Heiress,'' the popular stage
adaptation by Ruth and Augustus Goetz.
  The transformation works, thanks to a typically edgy
performance by Jennifer Jason Leigh and unfussy direction by Agnieszka
Holland. Despite its turn-of-the-century setting, this retelling of
the story rings with contemporary resonance, and although Doyle has
tweaked the original, particularly with regard to the ending, she has
retained the gist of ``Washington Square.''
  It's still the bittersweet tale of well-to-do, woebegone
Catherine's flirtation with the penniless Morris Townsend (Ben
Chaplin) and her domineering father's (Albert Finney) stringent
objection to it.
  Holland and her production team have created an excellent
example of how to open up a play and make it cinematic by taking the
action out of the Sloper family's parlor and moving it into the
streets of New York, the gardens of high society, the mountains of
Europe and a variety of beautifully evoked locations.
  With her usual abandon, Leigh at first loses herself in
Catherine's gaudy dresses and nervous tics. As the story progresses,
however, the actress lets us see there is considerably more going on
with this girl than first meets the eye.
  Beneath her awkwardness is a hint of a sharp, sly mind at
work, and Doyle allows us to wonder whether Catherine is being used by
Morris or if she is in fact using him to make one final stand against
her father.
  Finney's vivid portrait of Dr. Sloper is one of the actor's
strongest performances since ``Under The Volcano'' 15 years
ago. Throughout the story, Sloper drops potent little bombs on his
graceless daughter's dreams, building up to the devestating moment
when he laments, ``How obscene that your mother should give her life
so that you can inhabit space on this earth.''
  Yet Finney doesn't allow him to sink into either
conventional villainy or melodramatic excess.
  Sloper remains imposing and, even though he's a terrible
father, he isn't entirely heartless. Though he may well be more
concerned with his daughter embarrassing him than shaming herself,
Sloper at least wants to spare her any undue humiliation.
  Chaplin - best known as the love interest in ``The Truth
About Cats and Dogs'' - lends surprising richness and depth to
Morris. Like Leigh, Chaplin is purposefully oblique about Morris'
motives, thus enhancing the drama.
  As played by Maggie Smith, the spinster aunt Lavinia comes
off as being slightly smarter and a trifle more infatuated with Morris
than she was in ``The Heiress.''
  Even so, ``Washington Square'' is ultimately Leigh's show,
and she effortlessly carries the picture. Few other young actresses
have Leigh's knack for quietly exposing tormented souls.
  Her consistently intriguing performance here should sway
those who still have reservations about her, while giving her cult of
admirers one more reason to celebrate her gift.

Title
Review for Anywhere But Here (1999)
         Most parents eventually understand there's a point at which you
have to let your children go their own way rather than directing their
destinies and dreams. Then you have parents like single mom Adele August
(Susan Sarandon) who cheerfully keep dodging that realization.
 Adele was felt suffocated living in Bay City, Wisconsin and
being married to an ice-skating instructor, so she poured her life
savings into a used Mercedes, grabbed her adolescent daughter Ann
(Natalie Portman) and headed for Beverly Hills. The plan was simple: Ann
would be enrolled in the Beverly Hills school system and begin her
career as a child star. But the real performer in the family was, of
course, Adele. Ann would rather have stayed with the folks back on the
family farm.
 Nothing doing, Adele decreed, adding "I am not going to let you turn
into a nothing girl in a nothing factory in a nothing town."
 So begins "Anywhere But Here," a beautifully modulated
comedy-drama adapted from Mona Simpson's 1986 best-seller. Refreshingly
free of melodrama and calculation, the movie gives Sarandon and Portman
ample space in which to study the mother-daughter dynamic, and the
results are frequently funny and often touching.
 "Anywhere" was directed by Wayne Wang, who previously handled
the big-screen version of Amy Tan's "The Joy Luck Club." Although nicely
made and well-acted, that picture seemed to be one variation after
another on the same theme, that of good women being victimized by
stupid, insensitive or just plain weak men. It might have been a
courtesy to the male audience if ushers nationwide had hung "women's
room" symbols on the doors of theaters playing the film.
 This movie is entirely different, both in its perspective and
in its message. Despite her bravado and lust for life ("it was as if she
wanted to taste the whole world," Ann says of her mother), Adele is a
deeply flawed woman whose ambitions always seem to be greater than her
skills. Even when the world refuses to accommodate her wishes, she plows
ahead anyway, whether her mission is trying to get Baskin-Robbins to
open its doors on Christmas Day or making a series of futile phone calls
to a guy whose interest in her ended the morning after their first date.
         Adele may not be the most multi-faceted role Sarandon has ever
tackled, but the actress throws herself into the part whole-heartedly
and creates a sensational portrait of a sometimes grating, ultimately
poignant child-woman.
 While Adele lives by the philosophy "when life gets rough and
you only have a dime in your pocket, go get your shoes shined," Ann is
the practical voice of reason in the household. She's mystified that her
mom will spend money they don't have on a fancy dress while forgetting
to pay the utility bill or that Adele will walk away from a good job
rather than participate in a strike for better wages. "We did not come
to Beverly Hills to struggle," Adele insists, to her daughter's
consternation.
 Portman, a mesmerizing screen presence whose talents were largely
wasted as the regal Queen Amidala in "Star Wars: Episode One," is in top
form here, lending Ann a gravity and wisdom beyond her years. Rather
than competing for the spotlight, Portman and Sarandon instead
concentrate on trying to discover what makes these women tick, and in
doing so, they enhance each other's performances.
 It's doubtful there will be a sequel to "Anywhere But Here,"
although this is one case in which a second installment might be
welcome. When this tender, affecting film comes to a close, you may feel
the same mix of mild sadness and deep satisfaction that comes when you
finish a terrific novel. That's an enormous compliment to everyone
involved. James Sanford

Title
Review for Smile Like Yours, A (1997)
         There are thousands of terrific ideas to base a movie on.
Infertility, however, is not one of them. But like anxious would-be
parents, Hollywood keeps on trying. Gene Wilder futilely tried to make
light of it in the forgettable ``Funny About Love,'' and now Greg
Kinnear and Lauren Holly struggle to mine impotence for laughs in ``A
Smile Like Yours,'' a tepid attempt at heartwarming comedy.
  Despite its setting in contemporary San Francisco and a few
moments of mild raunchiness, most of ``Smile'' plays like a vintage
Doris Day vehicle.  Jennifer (Holly) and Danny (Kinnear) are
blissfully married, but she wants a child.
  When Jennifer's still not in the family way after hundreds
of attempts, the tensions between the two threaten to send Danny out
of the fertility center and into the waiting arms of man-trap Lindsey
(Jill Hennessy).
  Writers Kevin Meyer and Keith Samples present a cornucopia
of cliches old (the out-of-town business trip that's mistaken for an
affair) and new (another karaoke scene, far inferior to the one in
``My Best Friend's Wedding''). If you hadn't bought a ticket and
weren't sitting in a theater, you'd swear you were watching an
extended TV sitcom.
  Jennifer's quest for motherhood comes off as borderline
maniacal, although it's supposed to be poignant and humorous. There
are moments when the movie threatens to turn into a comic ``Fatal
Attraction,'' which would have put some needed spice into this
pablum. Similarly, a cameo by Shirley MacLaine and a twisted spoof of
bargain-basement airlines near the end of the film are nice touches,
but don't develop into anything.
  Only Joan Cusack rises above the material. Cast as
Jennifer's partner in a perfume shop where people actually say things
like ``Wow, the Elysian sunflower is a nice touch!,'' Cusack has a
miserable part - she's in love with a mortician, setting the stage for
a string of sophomoric dead-guy jokes. But Cusack's played the best
friend so many times now, nobody can do it with more finesse.
  Affable and deep-dimpled Kinnear, forced to do jokes about
masturbation and rectal exams, muddles through as best he can. After a
bright debut in ``Sabrina,'' Kinnear has floundered; hopefully his
juicy role as a troubled artist in director James L. Brooks' upcoming
``Old Friends'' will better serve his talent.
  As for Holly, she's fallen victim to a terminal case of
Shelley Long Syndrome, the misconception that wide-eyed cutesy-poo
acting is adorable.  Jennifer can't just walk across a room - she
minces or scampers, generally with a coy expression on her
oh-so-darling face. Perhaps someone should warn her that once you have
a baby, you can't be the baby.

Title
Review for Butcher Boy, The (1997)
        ``The Butcher Boy,'' adapted by director Neil Jordan and
author Patrick McCabe from McCabe's novel of the same name, probes the
mind of young Irishman Francie Brady, a free-spirited kid whose
initially harmless mischief takes on an increasingly violent and
finally murderous bent as his surroundings grow darker and darker.
  Tales of troubled youth are easy to come by these days -
unfortunately this week you need look no further than the front page
of the newspaper - but Jordan doesn't handle this unsettling subject
matter in a traditional, cautionary way.
  Instead, he uses Francie's story as the launching pad for a
sometimes surrealistic portrait of working-class Irish life in the
early 1960s.  ``The Butcher Boy'' is a wildly uneven work, veering
from broad gross-out comedy to subtle observation, but its anchor is
Eamonn Owens' fascinating performance as young Francie. In looking for
his lead actor, Jordan has said he wanted to find a young James
Cagney. His search proved successful.
  As Francie's disillusioned alcoholic father, Stephen Rea (a
staple in most of Jordan's films) is quietly sensational, and so is
Aisling O'Sullivan in her brief appearance as his deeply depressed
wife.
  His Da's deterioration and mother's suicide are two of the
circumstances that put Francie on the road to trouble, but the chief
culprit is the pretentious Mrs. Nugent (Fiona Shaw). She's a
classier-than-thou type whose feud with Francie escalates into
startling physical violence. Jordan and McCabe aren't wholly
sympathetic to either party, but Mrs. Nugent's rampant Anglophilia
causes the Irish-born authors to paint her in a less flattering light
than she may deserve.
  Although it would appear that McCabe had in mind to write a
coming-of-age story, many of Francie's trials play out in an overly
familiar fashion, complete with faithless friends, workhouses not too
far removed from Dickens and priests who prove to be anything but
celibate. The filmmakers chronicle Francie's journey in a stream of
colorful, dreamy visuals, and too often ``Butcher Boy'' engages the
eye rather than the heart.
  Still, Jordan has never made a wholly uninteresting film -
even ``High Spirits,'' his misquided romp with Daryl Hannah
desperately trying to play an Emerald Isle ghost, has a certain
curiosity value - and there's just enough in ``Butcher Boy'' to make
it worthwhile. Besides, any filmmaker daring enough to cast
controversial singer-songwriter Sinead O'Connor as a foul-mouthed
version of the Virgin Mary deserves credit for pure chutzpah.

Title
Review for Next Best Thing, The (2000)
Despite 15 years of experience in movies, Madonna has rarely seemed as
comfortable on the big screen as she has on MTV or on a concert stage.
Perhaps having to follow a script cramps her creativity. She
effortlessly vamped her way through such steamy videos as "Erotica"
and "Bad Girl" but froze up when she was called upon to play a man
eater in the 1993 thriller "Body of Evidence." Although she's often
witty in interviews, her sense of humor has often deserted her in such
comedies as "Who's That Girl?" and "Shanghai Surprise."
To date, Madonna's most effective film work has come from playing
either larger-than-life icons (the indomitable Eva Peron in "Evita"
and the voluptuous nightclub singer Breathless Mahoney in "Dick
Tracy") or nonconformists with a sense of humor about themselves (the
New Wave gypsy Susan in "Desperately Seeking Susan" and the saucy
baseball player Mae in "A League of Their Own").
But whether it's due to a newfound maturity as an actress or her
off-camera role as a first-time mom, Madonna has rarely seemed as much
at home in a movie as she does in the seriocomic "The Next Best
Thing." She has a few awkward moments here and there, but she's
otherwise well-cast as Abbie, a woman speeding toward 40 without a
husband (which she might like) or a child (which she truly wants).
Despite her career as a yoga instructor, Abbie still finds fault with
her looks and her body. Gazing at herself in the mirror, Abbie raises
her breasts and whispers "1989," then lets them droop and murmurs
miserably "1999."
What Abbie does have, however, is a best friend, Robert (Rupert
Everett), who's always there to mop up her tears or mix up an
emergency margarita when she needs it most.  The tenderness of the
relationship is completely believable because of the easy and
affectionate way Everett and Madonna play off of each other. If they
ever decided to dip their toes in the talk show pool, Madonna and
Everett could make a sensational substitute for Regis and Kathie Lee.
Anyhow, back to our story: Robert would be the perfect man for Abbie,
except that he's gay ("He definitely falls into the 'What a waste!'
category," says one of Abbie's friends).  But one sizzling
Independence Day weekend, when both are feeling particularly low,
Abbie and Robert down too many drinks, dance themselves into a frenzy
and end up getting much closer than they ever have before. Their
one-time-only tryst ends in confusion, regret and, to everyone's
shock, pregnancy.
Although it initially sets itself up as a comedy, "The Next Best
Thing" slowly evolves into a surprisingly thoughtful study of family
life and moves easily from lighthearted romp to poignant drama under
the guidance of John Schlesinger, the British director who often seems
to take a personal interest in projects that examine American values
in a changing society (such as "Midnight Cowboy" and "The Falcon and
the Snowman").
If Abbie can't have everything she wants, she's willing to settle for
an unconventional arrangement in which she and Robert can live in the
same house and bring up their son together. But the situation becomes
increasingly complicated as the years go by and Abbie becomes involved
with Ben (Benjamin Bratt), a kind man who could provide the stability
and romance she's always sought.
Commendably, Thomas Ropelewski's screenplay refuses to vilify or
sanctify any of the principal characters, all of whom make some
mistakes and say things they later regret as the stakes become
higher. Even Robert, who's initially the most sympathetic of
characters, gets progressively more defensive when he feels threatened
by Ben and Abbie's plans, and Everett, one of the most disarming stars
currently working, doesn't shy away from letting us in on Robert's
insecurities and anxieties.
Even as the movie becomes progressively more serious, Ropelewski's
dialogue remains peppered with barbs, most of them aimed at the
ignorance of the well-meaning people around Abbie and Robert. A
concerned young woman asks if Abbie's baby will be gay, and Abbie
responds, "Will your kids be stupid?" When one uncouth little boy uses
a politically incorrect term to refer to Robert's love life, a girl
quickly chastises him.  "You're supposed to say 'same-sex partner'!"
she scolds.
Although its subject matter is decidedly contemporary, "The Next Best
Thing" has the ravishing production design of a vintage Technicolor
extravaganza. The colors are vibrant, from the teal curtains in
Abbie's house to the startlingly red flowers in the garden, and Elliot
Davis photographs Everett, Madonna and Bratt lovingly, bathing them in
the golden glow of candles or the cold blue lights of the city. If
every film looked this good, going to the movies would be a whole lot
easier on the eyes.

Title
Review for Life (1999)
"Life" marks yet another unexpected career move by Eddie Murphy, who's
apparently been a bit more willing to take chances in the past few
years after spending most of the late 1980s and early 1990s running
his smoother-than-thou persona into the ground with such shaky
projects as "Harlem Nights" and "Beverly Hills Cop 3."
Last year's "Holy Man" found Murphy trying to play it semi-straight;
had the film been better written, it might have worked. "Life"
continues in the same vein, attempting to find a middle ground between
the sassy Murphy of days gone by and the slightly gentler contemporary
model.  The movie doesn't entirely come off, but it's still a noble
stab at something different.
Though the advertising for "Life" plays up the picture's comic
content, this is by no means a flat-out laugh riot. Perhaps it's
Murphy and co-star Martin Lawrence's roundabout way of testing the
water to see whether audiences are willing to accept them as actors,
rather than simply as funnymen.
Robert Ramsey and Matthew Stone's script follows New Yorkers Ray
Gibson (Murphy) and Claude Banks (Lawrence) from 1932 - when they are
reluctantly pressed into service as bootleggers for crooked club owner
Spanky (Rick James) - into their septuagenarian years.
Sentenced to "the long ride" on a trumped-up murder charge during a
run through Mississippi, Claude and Ray find themselves locked up in
the dusty Camp 8, which, though not exactly a resort, does have its
little amenities; certainly this must be the only prison in the
country that allows inmates to drink and carouse openly with women or
men during their time off. When times are tough, Ray enthralls his
fellow convicts with "Kiss of theSpider Woman"-style stories about the
mythical Manhattan hot spot he'll be running when he gets out. But as
years turn into decades, it becomes clear to Ray and Claude the only
other address they're going to have will be in the cemetery.
Although that's a fairly sobering thought for a movie that starts off
on a free-wheeling, fairly lighthearted note, director Ted Demme
capably handles the transition. So does Murphy, who proves he can play
a senior citizen without immediately resorting to tics. Lawrence's
performance is less steady, although he does have a fairly powerful
moment when he catches a reflected glimpse of his withered face in a
car window.
"Life" has about an even number of pros and cons. On the positive
side, Rick Baker's makeup jobs on the stars are terrific, the rhythmic
score by Wyclef Jean is effective, and there are no duds in the
supporting cast.
However, like "Hoodlum," the 1997 Lawrence Fishburne crime drama set
during the Depression, "Life" has no real sense of period style,
throwing in scores of distracting anachronisms in both attitudes and
dialogue. And though this script is considerably less homophobic than
some other Murphy epics, isn't it time to permanently retire the
stereotype of the squealing queen with the flapping wrists?
"Life" is ultimately less satisfying as a comedy than it is as a story
about men trying to deal with a future they can't change. Fans might
be surprised and even a bit disappointed, but it's intriguing to see
Lawrence and Murphy challenging themselves. Hopefully, the next time
out will be even better.

Title
Review for Eyes Wide Shut (1999)
     Deception -- how we are deceived by others and how we deceive
ourselves -- is the theme of "Eyes Wide Shut," a perplexing, chilling
and often surprisingly comic movie that could only have come from the
mind of the late Stanley Kubrick, a director who was always more
interested in challenging his audience than in pandering to it.
Though it casts Tom Cruise and Nicole Kidman as a well-to-do couple
who've been married for nine years (which Cruise and Kidman in fact
are), this is neither a love story nor a docudrama about the private
lives of its stars. In fact, despite the advance hype, "Eyes" features
surprisingly little carnal contact between the two. That would have been
giving viewers something predictable; instead, "Eyes" confounds
expectations again and again.
So much of the movie is about the everyday illusions we create
and/or buy into that when its moments of truth arrive they're as bracing
as if you'd stepped out of a steaming shower straight into a winter
storm. The shocks go straight to the heart.
Set at Christmastime, a season in which presents and trees are
dressed up to conceal what they really are, "Eyes" follows Dr. Bill
Harford (Cruise) and his unemployed wife Alice (Kidman) through a couple
of tumultuous days and nights. Though they live a seemingly comfortable
life in a glorious apartment on New York's Central Park West, we can
sense from the very first scene a storm is about to rattle their little
paradise.
Bill and Alice have begun taking each other for granted -- instead
of looking he blandly tells her "you always look beautiful" when she
asks him what he thinks of her hair. At a party thrown by Bill's patient
Victor Ziegler (Sydney Pollack), a quietly troubled Alice pounds glasses
of champagne and teases a Eurotrashy type into spending much of the
evening on the dancefloor. Bill is almost picked up by a pair of
striking young women who promise to show him "what's at the end of the
rainbow."
Back at home, Alice ups the tension when she rolls a joint (she
tellingly keeps her stash inside a Band-Aid cannister) and tries to
knock down the invisible wall between them. What follows is a quirky
corkscrew of a conversation about human nature that ends with a
disturbing confession intended both to hurt and to haunt Bill, which it
does.
It's a powerhouse of a scene, played to absolute perfection by
Kidman, who has the smaller but far showier part in the story. Cruise,
in contrast, is in practically every scene of the movie but more often
as a low-key observer than as a participant. Though Bill is always
around, he's not often accessible.
Loneliness is the other undercurrent running through "Eyes." Bill
is forced to go off on his own to deal with his shattered ideals; a
woman (Marie Richardson) sits desperately by herself at the bedside of
her dead father; a hotel desk clerk (Alan Cumming) flirts with Bill in
the hopes of getting something started; a pianist (Todd Field) talks
about having left his family behind in Seattle.
Even when people do get together in Kubrick's sullen and dreary
world, it's not a happy sight, since it almost always involves some sort
of passionless, impersonal sex. A storeowner (Rade Sherbedgia) offers to
rent out his young daughter (Leelee Sobieski) as if she were part of his
inventory; a hooker (Vinessa Shaw) ropes in a client; costumed
participants in an elaborate ritual pair up for silent, anonymous
trysts. As Bill makes his way through New York, it becomes clear that
while cheap thrills are everywhere, fulfillment is hard to find.
Doubtless many viewers will be left dissatisfied by "Eyes" as well.
Like Martin Scorsese's "After Hours," another creepy and darkly funny
tale of a solitary man adrift in the Big Apple, this is not a movie
about likable, easily understood characters or conventional situations.
Instead Kubrick and co-screenwriter Frederic Raphael (sp?) have designed
"Eyes" as a tour of an emotionally barren Wonderland where people have
chic-sounding names like Nightingale and Domino, where first impressions
are almost always wrong and unpleasant realities are tucked away inside
glittering facades.
 Anyone who knows Kubrick's work will tell you the man was not in the
business of making crowd-pleasers, and "Eyes" is no exception to that
rule. But regardless of how you feel about it immediately afterward,
there's no denying the movie gets under the skin. In the same way a
feverish one-night-stand can leave you feeling confused, angry and still
strangely gratified, "Eyes" is a film with an impact that lingers long
after its finale. James Sanford

Title
Review for Apt Pupil (1998)

 Hollywood films are often condemned for stressing style over substance, but
that's not a charge that can be levelled at "Apt Pupil," an odd attempt at
combining a thriller about Nazism with a disturbing study of a teen gone
wrong. Director Bryan Singer's first film since his acclaimed debut "The
Usual Suspects," "Pupil" demonstrates Singer's eye for framing shots and his
skill in bringing out the best in his stars. Even so, there's something
amiss here.
 Exactly what's wrong is difficult to pinpoint. "Pupil" is crowned by a
relentlessly creepy, well-nuanced performance by Ian McKellen as Kurt
Dussander, a war criminal who eluded capture 40 years ago and is now alive
and well and living in suburbia under the name Arthur Denker. Rather than
milk Dussander for easy chills, McKellen fills out the man's psychological
profile to demonstrate how his long-dormant violent impulses slowly bubble
up to the surface after being reawakened by overly curious high school
senior Todd (Brad Renfro). For obvious reasons, Dussander is not itching to
relive his glory days and McKellen pulls off the difficult feat of actually
making viewers feel sorry for this man who sent hundreds to their deaths.
 Renfro also hits all the right notes as honor-student Todd slowly and
quietly slips into the grip of a dangerous obsession. In some ways, he's
even scarier than Dussander because his immaturity makes him less
predictable and prone to abrupt mood swings.
 The film's first hour sets up a potentially riveting look at the contrasts
and commonalities of these two men, both of whom have a penchant for fairly
twisted mind games. But since "Pupil" is based on a novella by Stephen King,
you know there's eventually going to be a whopper of a murder eventually; in
this case, the victim is an unlucky transient (played by the excellent
Canadian actor Elias Koteas from "Exotica") who calls on Dussander at the
wrong time. The rest of the movie is standard body-in-the-basement
melodrama, as a meddling guidance counselor (David Schwimmer), Todd's
blissfully ignorant parents and various investigators drift in and out of
the plot.
 "Pupil" is exceedingly well-made, beautifully photographed and sharply
edited, but it's not difficult to see why it's been sitting on the Sony
shelves for so many months (the film bears a 1997 trademark at the end). All
the artistry of Singer, Renfro, McKellen and company can't obscure the fact
that the movie never seems sure of what it's about or what it wants to say.
 Is this a cautionary tale about letting sleeping dogs lie? Is it a thriller
with a strong homoerotic bent? Is it a story that aims to contrast the
horrors of the Holocaust with the trendy anti-everything attitude found in
so many of today's kids?
 "Apt Pupil" wants to be all of these things but has no idea how to pull its
various parts together. Instead of leaving viewers shaken the movie is more
likely to leave them shaking their heads, wondering exactly what they've
been watching for the last two hours.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Deep Blue Sea (1999)
     If science can make sharks super-intelligent, why can't it do the
same for screenwriters?
That's the question posed by "Deep Blue Sea," a thriller set in an
undersea lab where medical researcher Susan McAlester (Saffron Burrows)
and her crew are being hunted by predators of their own creation. The
essentials of the storyline are best summed up by McAlester's hypertense
co-worker Tom (Michael Rapaport): "She screwed with the sharks, and now
the sharks are screwin' with us!".
 Directed by Renny Harlin, the man who gave us "Die Hard 2: Die
Harder" and "Cliffhanger" when he was at his peak and the infamous
"Cutthroat Island" at his nadir, "Sea" is essentially a series of
explosions and crises, occasionally interrupted by stern warnings about
the consequences of fooling around with Mother Nature. The movie is so
poorly written it's almost laughable, but it does provide a few genuine
jolts, which is more than can be said for most of the current crop of
horror films.
 "Sea" begins with McAlester inviting financier Russell Franklin
(Samuel L. Jackson) to her base of operations, in hope of convincing him
not to cut off funding for her quest to find a cure for Alzheimer's
Disease. She and her staff have been using "hormonal enhancers" to
tinker with the brains of a trio of sharks at their Aquatica compound
and McAlester is certain a breakthrough is just around the corner.
 Unfortunately, so is a typhoon, which devestates Aquatica and
nearly kills everyone in it. Soon the hallways are flooded, the escape
routes are impassable and the humans are turning into snacks for their
toothy pet monsters.
 "These sharks aren't just breaking down doors for the fun of
it," Franklin realizes. "They're after us!" Most of the major lines in
"Sea" are followed by exclaimation points; the rest of the insipid
dialogue by first-time writers Duncan Kennedy, Wayne Powers and Donna
Powers is either mumbled or drowned out by the thousands of gallons of
water that wash over the cast at regular intervals.
 Among those struggling to survive alongside Franklin and
McAlester are daredevil Carter Blake (Thomas Jane), simpering Janice
(Jacqueline McKenzie) and a Gospel-spouting cook nicknamed Preach (LL
Cool J), whose sidekick is a profane parrot -- really. None of the
actors is required to do much more than shriek, swim or scramble to get
out of the scene as quickly as possible. Those who like to see
dismemberment up close will be delighted by Harlin's insistance that we
get a look at every severed arm and leg in full, bloody detail.
 The attacks -- at least one of which is a real surprise -- are
generally exciting, although someone should have informed the authors
that just because a shark may have increased his brain size does not
necessarily mean he'll know how to turn on an oven, as one does here in
the movie's most ludicrous sequence. For a movie about the advancement
of knowledge, "Sea" is often flabbergastingly dumb. James Sanford

Title
Review for Jack Frost (1998)

 As a sort of litmus test to see whether or not "Jack Frost" is the movie
for you, consider your response to this bit of information: It includes
Hanson performing covers of the Spencer Davis Group's "Gimme Some Lovin'"
and the Rascals' "Good Lovin'," as well as a Spice Girls' rendition of
"Sleigh Ride."
 Still intrigued? Then consider the title character in "Frost" is a would-be
musician and that he's played by Michael Keaton, who sings as if he was the
honors graduate of the Bruce Willis School of Blues. His rocked-up version
of "Frosty the Snowman" isn't easily intelligible, although, like the
Kingsmen's "Louie Louie," it sounds vaguely dirty.
 The rest of "Jack Frost," however, is almost as pure as snow. Jack dies in
a car crash, leaving behind lonely widow Gabby (Kelly Preston) and young son
Charlie (Joseph Cross). But before any tears can be shed, Jack's back,
reincarnated as a snowman and brought to life by a magic harmonica. There's
frollicking a-plenty before the movie gets around to delivering an unsubtle
sermon about how ambitious parents should forsake their own dreams of glory
and pay more attention to their offspring, a message kids in the audience
are sure to validate.
  Though as tacky-looking as a plastic tree bedecked in ornaments from the
dollar store, "Jack Frost" probably has enough action and pre-pubescent
humor (the snowman checks himself out to see if he's anatomically correct)
to please grade-schoolers, and, though it deals with death and grief, it
does so in the glossiest, most cheerful way possible, a far cry from the
moodiness of "Babe: Pig in the City." You also have to have a certain
appreciation for any family flick that can somehow reel in Dweezil Zappa and
Henry Rollins.
 The performances are better than the silly material deserves. Keaton is his
usual casual self, Cross avoids becoming too cloying and "The Full Monty"'s
Mark Addy provides a bit of extra warmth as an understanding friend of the
family.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Gang Related (1997)
GANG RELATED
Directed by Jim Kouf
 "Gang Related" is destined to go down in history as the final film of
rapper-actor Tupac Shakur, and it's not a disgraceful send-off. In fact,
Shakur's nicely modulated performance looks all the better alongside the
rampant overplaying of co-stars James Belushi, Lela Rochon and Wendy
Crewson, all of whom seem to think in order to register on screen you have
to scream a lot of profanities and mug wildly.
 A better director might have kept them under control, but "Gang Related"
comes from Jim Kouf, better known for his screenplay for "Stakeout" than for
his direction of such sorry efforts as "Disorganized Crime." Typically,
Kouf's script for "Gang" is sturdier than his scene-setting. Shakur and
Belushi play amoral, money-hungry cops who've devised a scheme to get rich
quick by bumping off drug-dealers and stealing their money. It seems like a
good idea, since the murders can be easily disguised as gang related revenge
killings that no one else in the department will bother putting in overtime
to investigate.
 But as fate would have it, they manage to rub out a DEA agent who's working
undercover as a cocaine supplier, leading to all manner of disaster.
Desperate to cover their bloody tracks, Belushi and Shakur try to frame a
homeless vagrant (Dennis Quaid, who's unrecognizable and terrific) for the
killing by planting evidence and conning Belushi's girlfriend (Rochon) into
pretending to have witnessed the shooting. Nothing goes as planned, however,
and the duo find themselves piling lie upon lie until the whole jerry-rigged
situation threatens to tumble down on their heads.
 There are several clever twists in the story, though Kouf never quite
manages to make much of it seem credible. Perhaps he shouldn't have bothered
trying: There's a strong undercurrent of black comedy in the screenplay that
should have been brought to the forefront. Instead, Kouf---like his
heroes---keeps pushing the limits, wrapping the tale up with a "four months
later" epilogue that aims for irony and fails badly.
 Fans of Shakur will probably be pleased to have one more opportunity to
watch him working. Fans of movies will be relieved to hear the overintense
Belushi has temporarily deserted the silver screen for the TV screen. At
least it will be easier to turn him off now.
James Sanford

Title
Review for American Pie (1999)
     In the interest of full disclosure, I must preface my review of
"American Pie" by noting that I am a graduate of Forest Hills Central in
suburban Grand Rapids. That's the arch-rival school of East Grand Rapids
High, the alma mater of "Pie" author Adam Herz. As a transfer student,
however, I always thought the animosity between the two camps was based
entirely on jealousy. The only differences between FHC and EGR were FHC
kids lived in smaller homes, drove cheaper cars and spent a lot more
time acting like snobs than the East Grand Rapidians I knew.
Now EGR alumni have something else they can hold over FHC: They're
pretty funny. Despite its crass ad campaign and sleazy-sounding subject
matter, "Pie" turns out to be a generally amusing, somewhat honest
picture of the pressures put upon kids to become sexually active.
Despite a few gross-out gags and a corny wish-fulfillment finale, "Pie"
is closer to a "Fast Times at Ridgemont High" than it is to the infamous
"Porky's" trilogy.
What separates Herz's story from most films of this kind is its
depiction of young women, most of whom have some semblence of
intelligence and one of whom -- Jessica, warmly played by Natasha Lyonne
("Slums of Beverly Hills") -- is quietly fascinating in the way she
shares her hard-won wisdom with both her male and female friends. The
general rule in most of the adolescent sex comedies of the 1980s was to
objectify women as much as possible, preferrably by turning them into
strippers, hookers or frosty virgins. Herz isn't interested in playing
that game, and his movie is all the better for it.
 That's not to say that it breaks a lot of ground in other areas.
Although the jockish Oz (Chris Klein) eventually discovers he has a
heart, his buddies are mostly hormonally driven buffoons who would
rather die than face the prospect of going to college without a whit of
carnal knowledge. Finch (Eddie Kay Thomas) has an undeserved reputation
as a world-class Casanova, Jim (Jason Biggs) has already humiliated
himself via the Internet and Kevin (Thomas Ian Nicholas) can't get past
"third base" with his girlfriend Vicky (Tara Reid).
Though most of "Pie" consists of the quartet trying to get some
action before graduation, the movie also manages to touch on a lot of
little truths along the way, particularly when it focuses on the
communication gap between the sexes. Kevin and Vicky in particular have
all the classic "Men Are From Mars, Women Are From Venus" problems and
Jessica sometimes seems to function as a translator, interpreting
manspeak into womanspeak and vice versa.
The most unusual aspect of "Pie"'s male characters is their desire
to please their partners instead of just scoring. Most of them come to
the realization that a woman's feelings ultimately figure into the
sexual equation, something no one ever gave a second thought to in the
"Porky's" era.
But lest you think "Pie" is a thoughtful meditation on young love,
it also dishes out plenty of jokes, some of them predictable (such as
the hot-to-trot exchange student) and some of them so outrageous you may
laugh in spite of yourself (the "pale ale," for example, and an
encounter with an apple pie one can only hope was deep-dish). Those who
know East Grand Rapids -- renamed East Grand Falls here -- will also
enjoy the movie's allusions to the city, including a hang-out that looks
suspiciously like Eastown's renowned Yesterdog and a Trailblazers logo
prominently featured in the school.
 The only downside of "Pie" is that its probable success at the box
office will almost certainly bring on a wave of shoddy imitations, much
as "Porky's" did in the mid-1980s. For those of us who survived "The
Last American Virgin," "School Spirit" and the unforgettable "Zapped!",
the prospect of another wave of such junk is about as appealing as
guzzling a cup of "pale ale."

Title
Review for Annie (1999) (TV)
         John Huston was one of America's greatest directors, as
evidenced by such credits as "The Maltese Falcon," "The Treasure of the
Sierra Madre," "The African Queen" and "The Man Who Would Be King."
 But even geniuses slip up once in a while, and one of Huston's
biggest mishaps was filming "Annie," a mostly charmless extravaganza
adapted from the outrageously successful Broadway musical (which was in
turn, of course, taken from Harold Gray's comic strip "Little Orphan
Annie"). All sorts of bad ideas -- including casting non-singer Albert
Finney as Daddy Warbucks and throwing out much of the show's score and
substituting mundane new numbers -- came together to ruin what should
have been great fun, and matters were not helped by Huston's leaden
direction and claustrophobic staging. Released in the summer of 1982,
the movie proved to be a financial and artistic bust.
 Happily, the buoyant, endearing "Annie" about to debut on "The
Wonderful World of Disney" (premiering Sunday, Nov. 7 at 7 p.m. on ABC)
is a remake that easily outshines the first try. Since some local
theater or another always seems to be producing "Annie," it's debatable
whether or not we really needed one more go-around with the tale of a
spunky little girl who escapes "the hard-knock life" to become best
friends with a billionaire. But Irene Mecchi's screenplay is remarkably
faithful to Thomas Meehan's original book, and director-choreographer
Rob Marshall has gotten some delectable performances out of his cast.
 One of the best comes from newcomer Alicia Morton in the title
role. Most of us have been subjected over the years to a host of Annies
who came off as mini-Ethel Mermans, less concerned with creating a
credible character than they were with blowing their adult co-stars off
the stage.
 In contrast, Morton, who looks like Claire Danes' little sister, is
refreshingly down to earth. Her voice is pure and sturdy, but she
doesn't sound like an apprentice diva; when she delivers the deathless
"Tomorrow," she concentrates on the optimistic innocence of the lyric
rather than musical bombast. And, though she's "cuter than all get-out,"
as Grandma would say, Morton doesn't milk it, a la Macaulay Culkin.
 Another delightful surprise is Kathy Bates, a blowsy treat as
scheming orphanage matron Miss Hannigan. She brings a salty edge to both
her big solo "Little Girls" and to the threats she hurls at her charges
in fluent Brooklynese ("I knew ya was gonna be bad tonight, so I
punished ya aheada time," she snarls). Victor Garber's smooth tenor
makes him a solid choice for Warbucks and Audra McDonald is a walking
dream as Grace, Warbucks' devoted secretary.
 The villainy of Alan Cumming (the lusty desk clerk from "Eyes
Wide Shut") as Miss Hannigan's ne'er-do-well brother Rooster and Kristin
Chenoweth as his spectacularly stupid girlfriend Lily, is every bit as
colorful as it should be. There's even a sparkling cameo by Andrea
McArdle, Broadway's original Annie, as the bright-eyed "star-to-be" who
kicks the "N.Y.C." number into high-gear.
 Although Marshall probably had to scale back his choreography
to fit the TV frame, it still has plenty of zip, an achievement that's
particularly admirable considering, in the case of Bates, Cumming and
some of the other stars, he wasn't working with trained dancers. His
work with the girls in the numbers set in the orphanage is outstanding.
Like Morton, they come off as kids having fun rather than over-rehearsed
little professionals.
 What's almost always put "Annie" over, however, is the score by
Charles Strouse and Martin Charnin: It's tough to ruin tunes like
"You're Never Fully Dressed Without A Smile," "I Think I'm Gonna Like It
Here" and "It's A Hard-Knock Life." Under Marshall's direction, they
become the showstoppers they should be. This "Annie" also smartly
retains Warbucks' heartwarming solo "Something Was Missing," one of the
songs thrown out in the 1982 film.
 Now that Marshall and company have largely erased the memory of that
earlier fiasco, perhaps as an encore they can tackle "A Chorus Line."
Anyone remember what a mess director Richard Attenborough made of that
one? James Sanford

Title
Review for Everyone Says I Love You (1996)
         One of the strangest ironies in the history of entertainment is
the popularity of the movie musical during the Depression era. At a time
when much of America was unemployed, teetering on the edge of
destitution, filmgoers flocked to see lavish fantasies about
ultra-wealthy sophisticates who, when they tired of their New York
penthouses, would fly off to look for love on the Riviera or to peruse
the Parisian fashion houses for some new styles. With "Everyone Says I
Love You," writer-director Woody Allen attempts the Herculean task of
reviving this kind of escapist cinema in contemporary terms.
 Allen has put his own twist on the musical genre, however, by
casting actors who are not exactly renowned for their singing: Julia
Roberts, Goldie Hawn, Tim Roth, etc. As these stars valiantly try to
deliver such standards as "I'm Through With Love" and "Just You, Just
Me," it becomes apparent Allen's stunt serves a purpose by humanizing
characters who often seem closer to being stereotypes than real people.
They may be living large and running wild, but at heart these are just
everyday folks who can't carry a tune any better than most of us.
 At the center of "Everyone" is an Upper East Side family headed
up by softhearted activist Steffi (Hawn) and her second husband Bob
(Alan Alda). Steffi's daughter Skylar (Drew Barrymore) is preparing for
her upcoming marriage to lawyer Holden (Edward Norton), but she's also
tempted by a charming ex-con (Roth). Meanwhile, Steffi's other daughter
DJ (Natasha Lyonne) succumbs to passion with a gondolier while touring
Venice with her dad Joe (Allen). She's not the only one swept away by
the romance of the canals: Joe has become obsessed with fellow
vacationer Von (Roberts) and schemes to win her over.
 It's the kind of material that would have seemed effervescent
60 years ago, with RKO producing and Fred Astaire, Ginger Rogers, Edward
Everett Horton and Lucille Ball starring. But in Allen's sweaty palms,
"Everyone" often strains itself trying to entertain. Even when the movie
hits its mark, you're usually aware of how much work it took to get
there.
 Allen's own performance is particularly unsteady and sometimes
downright squirm-inducing. Now past 60, he continues his tradition of
pursuing babes. But while his romances with Mariel Hemingway in
"Manhattan" (1979) and Juliette Lewis in "Husbands and Wives" (1992)
could have been dismissed as typical mid-life flings, his courtship of
the sparkling Roberts invites snickers about whether he's robbing the
cradle or she's robbing the grave. Allen's script actually forces
Roberts at one point to describe him as "sexy and magical"; that she
delivers the line without choking proves she's an underrated actress.
Poor Roberts is also called upon to sing "All My Life," which proves to
be a severe trial for her. On the other hand, Hawn, Alda, Norton and
Roth seem to take to this kind of froth quite naturally. Norton is
particularly winning as he romps through a jewelry store to the tune of
"My Baby Just Cares For Me" and attempts to surprise Skylar with an
engagement ring hidden inside her meal at a chic eatery.
 Interestingly, considering the movie's desire to go for big
effects, its best moments are its quieter ones, such as the truly
hilarious resolution of the conflict between liberals Steffi and Bob and
their ultraconservative son (Lukas Haas) or the genuinely sweet
unresolved relationship between Joe and Steffi, which is unfortunately
ignored until the last minutes of the film.
 It should also be noted the movie's ridiculously harsh R-rating
derives from one word, used as a joke. The rest of "Everyone Says I Love
You" is every bit as wholesome and squeaky clean as any given Ruby
Keeler vehicle. James Sanford

Title
Review for Varsity Blues (1999)
 "Varsity Blues" is not so much a fully developed film as it is a crazy
quilt made up of dumb-jock jokes, adolescent sex fantasies,
generation-gap drama and sometimes dazzling gridiron action, all of
which screenwriter W. Peter Iliff tries desperately to stitch together.
The loose ends show and the final product ultimately doesn't hang
together, but "Varsity" is still a better picture than you might expect,
given that it was produced by MTV Pictures (who created last year's
debacle "Dead Man On Campus") and directed by Brian Robbins, the man who
previously brought "Good Burger" to the screen. "Varsity" also marks a
modestly auspicious screen debut for "Dawson's Creek" star James Van Der
Beek, who does a thoroughly respectable job -- and manages to pull off a
decent Southwestern accent -- as a second-string high school quarterback
reluctantly shoved into the spotlight.
 The movie is set in a Texas hamlet called West Canaan where football is
an all-consuming obsession; in one of the script's more novel touches,
the adults in town seem even more caught up in the competition than the
kids do. For example, even though he's one of the West Canaan Coyotes,
Jonathan "Mox" Moxon (Van Der Beek) would rather read "Slaughterhouse
Five" on the sidelines and prepare for an Ivy League education than
fully throw himself into the game, a mind-set that baffles coach Bud
Kilmer (Jon Voight, frighteningly true-to-life), a dictatorial type who
will do literally anything to ensure his team has a chance at the state
championship.
 In its strongest scenes "Varsity" addresses such issues as parents
trying to live vicariously through their children and the misguided
practice of patching up players with pain-killers and sending them back
out on the field instead of to the emergency room. Iliff also puts
across the sad but true notion that for some of these kids football (or,
for young women, snagging a football player) is one of the few ways to
escape spending your life in a dead-end town. The clash between the
over-zealous Kilmer and his quietly rebellious new star is equally
well-dramatized.
 But just when it looks like "Varsity" may turn into a sort of
"Loneliness of the Long Distance Runner" for the pigskin crowd, Iliff
feels compelled to throw in an excess of boozy teen free-for-alls, as
well as a ridiculous, unfunny subplot involving a dowdy sex-ed teacher
who moonlights as a stripper. These useless diversions seem to have less
to do with enhancing the story than they do with making the film
attractive to the party-hearty set, and credibility goes rapidly down
the drain as convenience store clerks give Mox free six-packs and the
team whoops it up in a topless bar where nobody bats an eye at the sight
of a bunch of 17-year-olds downing shots.
 Luckily, the movie regains its footing in time for a finale that
features some genuinely exciting plays and a fairly novel twist on the
hackneyed "big game" set-up. "Varsity Blues" fumbles too often to
qualify as a particularly good film, but in its better moments it does
have something valuable to say about its subject. James Sanford

Title
Review for Life Less Ordinary, A (1997)
Near the beginning of "A Life Less Ordinary" there's a knockout of a
scene: Exquisitely bored rich girl Cameron Diaz (in a white swimsuit
that will probably never touch water) coerces her dopey dentist fiance
into balancing a carefully polished apple on top of his head so that
she can shoot the fruit with her equally carefully polished
revolver. At the last minute, the worm squirms, just as the shot is
fired. "Call a doctor," the shootist tells her butler, in a tone that
suggests disappointment rather than despair.
Yes, director Danny Boyle and screenwriter John Hodge are up to their
old tricks again. Having previously mined murder ("Shallow Grave") and
drug abuse ("Trainspotting") for jet-black humor, they're now out to
set the romantic comedy on its ear, pairing Diaz with Scottish hottie
Ewan McGregor in a kidnap-caper-gone-awry yarn that starts off in
Heaven and wraps up with a postscript dramatized via Claymation.  No
one is likely to accuse the British filmmakers of playing it safe in
their first cruise through the American mainstream.
Even so, the millions who embraced their first two films may find "A
Life Less Ordinary" a bit less enchanting; certainly the 90 minutes
that follow that poolside scene don't come close to topping it. The
concept of angelic intervention in modern-day life must be one of
those ideas that always sounds great on paper, but on the screen it's
given us failed fantasies like last year's clunky remake of "The
Preacher's Wife," as well as John Travolta and Olivia Newton-John's
"Two Of A Kind" and director Alan Rudolph's "Made In Heaven." Casting
Holly Hunter and Delroy Lindo as militant Cupids ensures that
"Ordinary" has a much lower sugar content than most films of its
ilk---you call almost retitle it "Slugged By An Angel"---but even this
pair eventually wear out their welcome and become little more than a
mildly irritating gimmick.
What flashes of magic "Ordinary" has come not from its concept but
from its quirks. Having half-heartedly kidnapped heiress Celine (Diaz)
with the hopes of getting a fortune from her billionaire daddy, the
graceless Robert (McGregor) comes to realize his supposed victim knows
a good deal more about working these kinds of scams than he does. When
Robert tells Celine he's asking $500,000 for her return, she gasps
that at that "if word got out that I went for only $500,000, I'd never
be able to show my face in polite society again," and while Robert
wants to send an old-fashioned ransom note made up of letters clipped
from newspaper headlines, Celine nonchalantly slashes her arm and
writes the message in her own blood.
Though Hodge's story is little more than a string of set-pieces (the
karaoke fantasy, the bungled bank job, the slam-bang Road Runner-style
chase, etc) the movie looks and sounds fabulous, thanks to Boyle's
sharp eye and a soundtrack featuring everyone from Underworld to
Elvis. Even when "Ordinary" doesn't quite capture the madcap mood it's
after, it always offers something unique to look at and listen to, and
McGregor and Diaz (looking more than ever like Michelle Pfeiffer's
sullen little sister) handle the comedy deftly. If this had been the
first film from Boyle and Hodge it would probably have been celebrated
as an auspicious debut, but when you've raised the bar so high with
two instant cult classics, a middling follow-up is destined to look
much worse by comparisson.  James Sanford

Title
Review for Reindeer Games (2000)
        For every thriller like "The Usual Suspects" or "The Sixth
Sense" that can pull off a spectacular surprise ending, there are half a
dozen like "Reindeer Games" that work themselves into a sweat trying to
cram in twist after twist. After "Suspects" or "Sense" wrap up, you can
replay the movie in your mind and put all the pieces together, but when
"Reindeer Games" runs its course, you'll probably be wondering why you
bothered sitting through the film in the first place.
 You know you've wandered into a bad movie when the finale
begins with the bad guys preparing to do away with the hero, then
stopping just long enough to engage him in a long-winded conversation in
which the villains carefully explain every step they took in setting up
their wicked scheme. All this blather, of course, gives the hero several
minutes in which to figure out how he's going to escape and kill his
captors. In "Reindeer Games," Rudy Duncan (Ben Affleck) has what seems
like a week to get away from the nefarious Gabriel (Gary Sinise) and his
partners; suffice to say, theirs was an extraordinarily complicated
plan.
 The film was written by Ehren Kruger, who did a swell job of
ruining "Scream 3" by packing the last reel with absurd action and
ridiculous last-minute revelations. In "Games," the denouement involves
more double-crosses, false identities and dirty secrets than you'd find
in an entire library of Raymond Chandler novels, and you can bet no one
is going to mistake this mess for "The Big Sleep" or "Farewell, My
Lovely."
 Rudy, the closest thing to a real person in Kruger's world, is
fresh from prison and anxious to hook up with some hot chocolate and
pecan pie before going home to his family. Instead, he connects with
Ashley (Charlize Theron), the former pen pal of his now-deceased cell
mate. Aside from her mile-long false eyelashes and ugly coats, Ashley
also brings with her a vicious brother named Gabriel, who wants Rudy's
help in robbing an Indian casino.
 On its way to the big heist, "Games" wobbles uncertainly
between suspense and spoof, mixing harsh violence with awkwardly
inserted comedy. If director John Frankenheimer was hoping his film
might be mistaken for a Quentin Tarantino opus, he was sorely mistaken.
Tarantino's screenplays have a good deal more depth and color than
anything Kruger can whip up.
 Although Affleck and Sinise are reliably solid and Theron does
everything in her power to make the best of an unplayable role, no one
should have bothered wasting their energy. These "Games" were not worth
playing in the first place. James Sanford

Title
Review for Muse, The (1999)
         For 20 years, Albert Brooks' movies have been acclaimed as some
of the funniest and smartest comedies around, although the general
public has always been less appreciative of his efforts than the
critics.
 Instead of expressing bitterness about his lack of commercial
appeal, however, Brooks has turned the situation into the premise for
"The Muse," in which he plays a screenwriter named Steven Phillips who's
so desperate for a hit, he's willing to spend every dime he has -- and
probably several he doesn't -- for the services of Sarah (Sharon Stone),
a vivacious blonde said to have the power to inspire marketable scripts.
Although she charges no fees upfront, Sarah does require a good deal of
pampering and placating: a $1700-a-night suite at The Four Seasons and
trinkets from Tiffany's are barely enough to hold her interest.
 Trekking through some of the same territory covered by
"Bowfinger," "The Muse" lampoons Hollywood's tendency to accept
everything and everyone at face value. No one bothers to question
Sarah's credentials; they just look at her client list.
 Similarly, the young studio executives Steven has to contend
with may be brainless and amoral, but they look smart and stylish, which
may mean more to their bosses than possessing any sense of tact or
taste. One, who turns out to be Steven Spielberg's cousin Stan (a
brilliant cameo by Steven Wright), helpfully tells Steven to make his
movie "in color, people love color."
 But though "The Muse" is a more consistent satire than
"Bowfinger," it's not a prime example of Brooks' talent. The wild
imagination he demonstrated in the hilarious "Defending Your Life" is
tempered here, and the jokes, while generally clever, don't have the
sting of his writing in "Lost in America" or "Mother." It's almost as if
Brooks shared with Steven the desire to create something that wouldn't
create ripples in the mainstream.
 The movie's big accomplishment turns out to be giving Stone an
opportunity to display her previously unseen lighter side, a challenge
the actress eagerly accepts. She's serenely confident as Sarah, who
would be insufferable were it not for her disarming smile and upbeat
attitude. It's easily Stone's sharpest and most impressive work since
her Oscar-nominated turn in "Casino."
 As Steven's wife Laura -- who gets a little inspiration of her
own from the muse -- Andie MacDowell is quietly charming, but the scene
stealers here are the directors Brooks coaxed into participating
onscreen. Martin Scorsese's hyperactive rant about his proposed remake
of "Raging Bull" ("with a thin guy, I mean a real thin guy") is funny
enough, but James Cameron's appearance is almost enough to make you
forgive him for that "king of the world" remake at the 1998 Oscars.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Urban Legend (1998)
The most frustrating movies to sit through aren't the ones that are bad
through and through; those you can usually spot early on and leave before
wasting too much time on them. The real killers are the films that have just
enough clever ideas or funny lines to keep you in your seat, hoping against
hope that some kind of knockout ending is going to make your investment of
time and money worthwhile.
 So it goes with "Urban Legend," which tosses in a few exciting moments, a
handful of snappy jokes and a potentially solid set-up only to self-destruct
in its excruiating last half-hour. Desperate to devise a finale sure to
stun, writer Silvio Horta concocts several and runs them back to back. The
result drove a sneak preview audience to scream alright, first in gales of
disbelieving laughter and then for their money back.
 "Urban Legend" is constructed around those deathless stories that somehow
circulate through every community. Everybody knows about the babysitter who
realized too late that the threatening phone calls she was getting were
coming from inside the house, or about how washing down Pop Rocks with soda
will make your stomach explode, and similar pop mythology.
 In Horta's script, a serial killer has decided to recreate these tales of
terror in and around Pendleton College, recently named "the safest campus in
America" by no less than U.S. News and World Report. So, for example, when a
young woman fails to check the backseat of her truck before cruising down
the road, singing along to Bonnie Tyler's "Total Eclipse of the Heart," the
line "every now and then I fall apart" takes on a whole new meaning.
 This recent burst of coed carnage coincides with the 25th anniversary of
Pendleton's fabled "Stanley Hall massacre," in which a knife-wielding maniac
went from room to room slaying dorm residents. The only survivor was
Professor Wexler (Robert Englund, re-establishing his credentials as an
actor with a capital "h") who now teaches a popular class on urban legends.
Could he secretly be doing some unauthorized first-hand research into his
subject matter?
 Maybe and maybe not. Red herrings abound in "Urban Legend." They're almost
as plentiful as director Jamie Blanks' use of the old
turn-around-and-bump-into-something-and-scream cliche, which loses its shock
value in this film somewhere around the middle of the second reel.
 The real horror lies in the performances of such generally reliable types
as Jared Leto and Alicia Witt, both of whom spend most of the movie
slack-jawed and trying hard to look frightened. They definitely have their
work cut out for them by the time Horta drops his final bomb, revealing the
maniac behind the murders. It's one thing to ask viewers to suspend their
disbelief, Mr. Horta, and quite another to heave all logic out the nearest
open window.
 A few intentional laughs are provided by Joshua Jackson (that makes James
van der Beek the only "Dawson's Creek" lead not to have starred in a horror
movie this year) and particularly by Loretta Devine as a security officer
who spends her spare time worshipping blaxploitation queen Pam Grier.
There's also a Noxema commercial joke to hint at the past (and future)
career of the utterly talentless ex-model Rebecca Gayheart, whose feeble
thesping as Witt's best friend makes one long for the days of talents like
Shelley Hack and Maud Adams.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Hanging Up (2000)
 During a vacation in London a few years ago, I had a free evening and
decided I'd go down to the local cinema and see director Mike Leigh's
"Secrets and Lies." But when I told the friends I was visiting what I
had in mind, I was informed that since it was Monday night, that was not
possible. It was, they informed me, Ladies Night, and no men would be
admitted.
 I was absolutely indignant. What kind of country was this anyway? Why
in the United States, I declared, anyone with the price of admission
could attend a movie any time they wanted to, regardless of their sex.
Ladies Night, indeed -- ha!
 After having seen "Hanging Up," however, I think maybe instituting
Ladies Night Stateside might not be a bad idea. But don't just limit it
to Mondays: Make it every evening this film is playing. Trust me,
considering the movie's plot involves lots of crying over wrecked
birthday parties and stolen stuffing recipes, most guys -- and more than
a few women as well -- probably wouldn't want to know what they're
missing.
 Adapted by Nora and Delia Ephron from Delia's semi-autobiographical
book of the same name, "Hanging Up" brings together a trio of dynamite
actresses to play three two-dimensional roles. Diane Keaton (who also
directed) is Georgia, a wildly successful magazine publisher who seems
to be Martha Stewart and Diana Vreeland rolled into one. Lisa Kudrow
plays Georgia's much younger sister Maddy, a petulant soap star who
savors her role as the baby of the family.
 Squashed in between is Meg Ryan as Eve, the Jan Brady of the bunch, the
middle child who has to clean up everybody else's messes because Georgia
is too busy and Maddy too bratty. Chief among Eve's concerns is her
salty-tongued father Lou (Walter Matthau), a former screenwriter who's
senile and seemingly headed directly for death's door. He's not too
busy, however, to spend his few lucid moments obsessing over the size of
John Wayne's genitalia, something Eve finds both charming and puzzling.
"He has a bad case of uproar," one observer notes of Lou.
 Meanwhile, Eve seems afflicted with the kind of adorable klutziness
Ryan tends to turn to whenever one of her characters can't come up with
anything else to do. See Eve get knocked down and dragged around by a
huge dog. See Eve trip over her son's toys. See Eve tumble over her
husband (Adam Arkin) while frantically trying to grab the phone.
 In its first hour, "Hanging Up" is almost as irritating as a
theatergoer who feels compelled to answer his cell phone during the
performance. Paired with a strong co-star, Ryan can sparkle but when
she's left on her own -- as she is for much of the movie's first half --
her mannerisms can become grating in no time at all. Throw in a
pointless and mildly offensive subplot about an Iranian doctor (Duke
Moosekian) and his mother and you've got a real yawner of a first act.
 Once Keaton and the cracklingly good Kudrow enter the picture, "Hanging
Up" gets a much-needed jolt of energy. It's impossible to really believe
the three are sisters -- there's an obvious 20-year gap between Georgia
and Maddy -- but the chemistry between the women makes up for the lack
of credibility. Director Keaton also seems to have enjoyed shooting the
scenes of sibling rivalry and revelry since they have a spryness not
found in the Ryan-Matthau and Ryan-Arkin sequences.
 Those with a low tolerance for "chick flicks" should be warned this
film does include -- in addition to those spoiled birthdays and stuffing
theft recriminations -- a food fight in which Georgia gets flour on her
sleek black dress and screams, "This is Donna Karan!" If you can
identify with her predicament, "Hanging Up" is probably an experience
you shouldn't miss. James Sanford

Title
Review for Mighty, The (1998)
Now that the slick, sappy "Simon Birch" has almost run its course at the box
office there may not be a high desire among moviegoers to see "The Mighty,"
another story about misfit boys joining forces to survive. But it would be a
shame if this funny, warm-hearted film didn't find a sizable audience; it's
as captivating as "Simon" is contrived.
 When Hollywood attempts to portray the jinior-high years, it often opts for
a heavily sentimental approach in which everyone is cutely geeky,
daydreaming about their first kiss or trying to join a cool clique. The
realities of pre-adolescence -- particularly for those kids who, for one
reason or another, don't fit in -- are considerably less rosy.
 If, for example, you're Maxwell Kane (Elden Henson), the slow-witted son of
a convicted murderer, you might easily end up getting slammed regularly by
peers and adults alike. "Killer Kane, Killer Kane, has a son who's got no
brain," chant Max's classmates, while his gym teacher asks if he needs to
translate instructions into Neanderthal for Max to understand.
  Next door to Max lives Kevin Dillon (Kieran Culkin), a brilliant mind
trapped in a body crippled and twisted by Morquio's syndrome. His mother
(Sharon Stone) encourages Kevin to explore the world of books and science,
but she fears letting him explore the world itself. "She's afraid I'll get
trampled," Kevin tells Max. "Sometimes I think my mom would like me to stay
home with a tube down my throat."
 Separately, these two aren't making it. United, they're formidable. Kevin
shares his intellect with the almost illiterate Max, and Max provides the
physical prowess Kevin needs, or, as Max puts it, "he became my brain and I
became his feet."
 But before you write off "The Mighty" as a standard-issue sermonette about
sharing, take another look. Surrounding Kevin and Max is a circle of vivid
characters, exceptionally well-played by such actors as Harry Dean Stanton,
Gena Rowlands, James Gandolfini and, in the film's biggest surprise, an
unrecognizable Gillian Anderson as a tart with mall-hair.
 Daringly, director Peter Chelsom has infused the film with a kind of
magical realism that usually functions better on the printed page than it
does on the screen. Here, the technique not only works, it gives "The
Mighty" that extra flavor that sets it apart from other similar tales.
 In the eyes of Max and Kevin, Cincinnati is just Camelot in disguise, full
of damsels in distress, black-hearted villains and Holy Grails waiting to be
discovered. It sounds silly and precious, but Culkin and Henson are so
thoroughly convincing they rope us into the fantasy. Stone's performance as
a lonely woman living in awe of her child ("Congratulations, Mrs. Dillon: It
was a tough delivery, but you've given birth to a healthy seven-pound
dictionary," she jokes) is understated and true-to-life.
 Because of its pro-reading theme and its message about acceptance, "The
Mighty" will probably be a big attraction for teachers looking to take their
classes on a field-trip, and that's fine. But when pictures are made with as
much care and heart as this one was, they deserve to be seen by everyone.
Forget "Simon Birch": "The Mighty" is truly something special.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Postman, The (1997)
THE POSTMAN
(Warner Brothers)
 The postman doesn't deliver on Christmas Day, and "The Postman," Kevin
Costner's Christmas gift to America, doesn't deliver much in the way of
entertainment, regardless of what day it is. A bloated, overwrought telling
of a simple --and jaw-droppingly corny-- tale, this attempt at a sort of
sci-fi Western duplicates the thre-hour-plus length of Costner's directorial
debut "Dances With Wolves" (1990), without summoning up one iota of the
emotional power of the earlier film.
 Instead, "The Postman" is a textbook study of a director falling in love
with a truly bad idea and desperately struggling to turn it into a playable
movie. But despite giving a passable performance in front of the camera,
Costner is not quite a skilled enough director to elevate "The Postman" to
the epic status it so badly wants to claim.
 Adapted from David Brin's novel and set in 2013, following a second Civil
War, "The Postman" depicts life in an America in which the government has
fallen and a merciless warlord who calls himself General Bethlehem (Will
Patton) roams the land with his "racially pure" troops, terrorizing the
scattered settlements in the West, which seem --judging by the shabby
wardrobes on view-- to be populated exclusively by people who have forgotten
how to sew. When a nameless drifter (Costner) who has escaped Bethlehem's
army pretends to be a postman to get free meals and hospitality on the road,
his masquerade inadvertantly snowballs into a crusade against the General
and his men. The spirit of America is resurrected along with the mail
service, and, when he's not opposing tyranny, The Postman plays post office
with frontier babe Abby (Olivia Williams), who first begs him to impregnate
her and finally falls madly for him.
 If that all sounds more than a bit hokey, wait until you see how it plays
out. Although screenwriters Eric Roth and Brian Helgeland have made
ocassional stabs at trying to inject some humor into the proceedings, "The
Postman" is the most heavy-handed piece of jingoism since director John
Milius' 1984 camp classic "Red Dawn." Again and again Costner offers up
crowds of downtrodden souls who beam and look skyward as The Postman
delivers stirring speeches such as "Times seem tough right now, but suff's
gettin' better"; at one point, a little girl, inspired by this mail-carrying
messiah, bursts into a chorus of "America The Beautiful" and is quickly
joined by the throngs around her.
 Even worse is a scene that shows anxious townsfolk applauding The Postman
as he delivers the mail (no one seems to realize that with the postal
service restored they'll son be receiving 15 years worth of overdue bills)
and a laughably drawn-out vignette in which a little boy hands off a letter
to The Postman as he gallops by on horseback. Director Costner shows a
decided weakness for slow-motion, both in the action sequences and in the
would-be tearjerking portions of the film, and the technique doesn't always
enhance the scene.
 It should also come as no surprise that "The Postman" features a virtual
gallery of Costner close-ups, all elegantly lensed by cinematographer
Stephen Windon, whose camerawork is one of the picture's major strengths:
here's Kevin by moonlight; Kevin through frosted glass; Kevin in mountain
stream. Next to this, Barbra Streisand's "The Mirror Has Two Faces" looks
like the work of a wallflower.
 Obviously Costner believes in this material and wants to share the
qualities he sees in it with the masses. But "The Postman" collapses under
the weight of its own preachiness and ponderousness. Treat it as you would a
rancid fruitcake delivered by mail: Mark it "return to sender" and stay as
far away from it as possible.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Siege, The (1998)
 "The Siege" is already under attack by Arab anti-defamation groups, thanks
to its alarming -- and misleading -- trailer which shows U.S. army troops
rounding up Arabs and forcing them into internment camps ringed by
barbed-wire fences. However, anyone who shows up to protest what they assume
is going to be an ultra-right-wing fantasy about the benefits of martial law
will feel rather silly if they actually watch the film, which all but bends
over backward to portray Middle Easterners in a favorable light. "The word
'Arab' is not synonymous with the word 'terrorist'," an off-screen voice
assures us at one point.
 But at the same time, "The Siege" also errs in making most of its Arab and
Arab-American characters faceless and nameless. Rather than being depicted
as real people, they're shown largely as a mass of bodies being pushed
around, waiting to be rescued by sympathetic outsiders. It's almost as silly
as the infamous "Cry Freedom," which tried to relate the story of  Steven
Biko through the eyes of a white English family.
 In many ways, "The Siege" is a movie operating at cross-purposes with
itself, a tell-tale sign that too many writers worked over the script. In
this case, three are credited, although the writing is so uneven you can bet
many more cooks stirred this particular potboiler. Thanks largely to
director Edward Zwick ("Glory," "Courage Under Fire"), "The Siege" does
manage to pull off a few genuinely startling moments, such as when a meeting
of leaders is mysteriously disrupted by one pager after another going off,
or when tanks roll through the streets of New York.
 In the film, New York is targeted by terrorists, and FBI agent Anthony
Hubbard (Denzel Washington) and his partner Frank Haddad (Tony Shaloub) are
forced to accept the assistance of mysterious Elise Kraft (Annette Bening),
who's had more than diplomatic relations with some Arab suspects. In fact,
Elise's idea of pillow talk includes asking about the location of terrorist
cells in the vacinity of Manhattan.
 When the combined efforts of the FBI and the CIA fail, the President sends
General Deveraux (Bruce Willis) and scores of troops to seal off Brooklyn
and enforce martial law. Though Deveraux appears to be level-headed at
first, soon he's become a maniac who bellows "I am the law" and feels no
shame about torturing civilians. Consistency is not one of "The Siege"'s
strong suits.
 Then again, the movie is more successful at creating tension than in
building credible characters, which sometimes leaves Washington and Bening
looking borderline silly as they try to rationalize Hubbard and Kraft's
schizoid personalities. As in too many of his other recent appearances,
Willis is present only to preen, in this case underneath one of the worst
toupees since Burt Reynolds' heyday. Perhaps "The Siege" should be
picketed -- by former fans anxious to see Willis break out of his terminal
self-adoration and begin acting again.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Krippendorf's Tribe (1998)
        On the surface, ``Krippendorf's Tribe'' would appear to be a
perfectly harmless piece of family fun about an anthropologist's wacky
scheme to save his reputation by creating fake documentary footage of
a lost tribe. To this end, Professor James Krippendorf (Richard
Dreyfuss) decks his kids out in grass skirts and dark body paint and
constructs a grass hut in the back yard, where the youngsters perform
weird rituals for Dad's camera.  Krippendorf's clan - which he calls
the Shelmikedmu, a conglomeration of his children's first names -
inadvertently becomes the talk of the nation, even landing its own
series on cable's Primal Time network.
  Sounds innocuous enough. But in terms of raunchiness and
innuendo, ``Krippendorf's Tribe'' turns out to be almost as ribald as
an ``Inside Edition'' report on Monica Lewinsky. Jokes about
menstruation, circumcision, penis size and prehistorical marital aids
are sprinkled liberally throughout, and though most of this
half-hearted smuttiness is gasp-inducing rather than laugh-provoking,
all of it is certain to prompt questions from curious prepubescents.
  Charlie Peters' screenplay attempts to shoehorn some
sentimentality into the story early on, with Krippendorf trying to
adjust to his wife's death, only to throw that idea out the window
when the professor first gets his adorable publicist/ co-conspirator
(Jenna Elfman) drunk, then seduces her on-camera. Later on, in a
ghastly scene, the two almost suffocate a 100-year-old woman who
threatens to uncover the Shelmikedmu fraud.
  Welcome to what passes for family entertainment in 1998.
  ``Tribe'' manages to squander a considerable amount of
talent, including Elfman (of TV's ``Dharma and Greg'') in a shrill,
one-note part, and Lily Tomlin, straitjacketed into the dreary role of
Krippendorf's frigid, vindictive rival, Ruth Allen. Dreyfuss struggles
mightily to achieve the manic energy of Robin Williams in
``Mrs. Doubtfire'' and repeatedly comes up short.

Title
Review for Hilary and Jackie (1998)
With its story of a brilliant musician destroyed in her prime, "Hilary
and Jackie" has already drawn comparisons to "Shine," the 1995 hit
based on the life of pianist David Helfgott. But "Hilary" is a more
accomplished and demanding film, one that doesn't find a convenient
villain (like the didactic dad Armin Muller-Stahl played in "Shine")
to pin cellist Jacqueline Du Pre's troubles on.
In the 1960s and 1970s, Du Pre was celebrated for her extraordinarily
passionate playing and her often unruly style, marked by flying hair
and grandoise gestures, or "over-emphatic body movements," as one of
her early judges calls them. Emily Watson's depictions of Jackie's
performances here may remind you of the way Tori Amos appears to make
love to her keyboard in concert.  In both cases, the player and the
instrument seem to become one.
Of course, what went on off-stage was considerably more disturbing to
see. Raised in a family of music-lovers, sisters Jackie and Hilary
(Rachel Griffiths) were both pushed from an early age to
becomeconsummate musicians, although the less outgoing Hilary - a
flutist whom the film argues may have had more innate talent than her
sister - eventually crumbled in the spotlight and became a wife and
mother.
The teen-age Jackie was quickly sucked into a whirlwind of touring and
personal appearances around the world, much to her own amazement and
bewilderment; "one day I was playing, and the next I was booked up for
two years," she says. Jackie sought some sort of an anchor to help
stabilize her while the people around her seemed too caught up in
trumpeting her latest triumphs to pay attention to her needs.
"Hilary and Jackie" is told from the sides of both siblings, although
it's not one of those films in which we're shown the exact same
incidents from two different viewpoints. Instead, the "Hilary" portion
illuminates what Jackie's increasingly erratic behavior looked like to
theoutside world while the "Jackie" segment clues us in on the private
hell Jackie was going through as she tried to deal with increasing
hatred of her craft and the slow deterioration of her body. For
Jackie, who is reminded frequently by the people around her that her
whole life is her music, there's nothing to cling to when she realizes
she may not have much longer to play.
Watson, who proved in "Breaking the Waves" that she may well be
today's foremost chronicler of quiet madness, is arresting, but
Griffiths' far less flamboyant figure is every bit as
impressive. Hilary may not have Jackie's jet-set friends or splendid
London apartment, but she does have a charming, attentive husband
(David Morrissey, also excellent) Jackie hungers for, and Griffiths
subtly conveys Hilary's uneasy sense of serenity.
In trying to ease Jackie's stress, Hilary allows herself to be talked
into doing something she doesn't want to do and the results are messy
and lasting. Though Jackie's decline is sad indeed, Frank
Cottrell-Boyce's enormously insightful screenplay makes the case that
an even greater tragedy was the separation of two extremely close
sisters who were drawn apart by circumstances far beyond their
control.

Title
Review for Bored Silly (1999)
        The makers of "Bored Silly" would probably describe their
creation as good, clean fun.
 In truth, they only got the "clean" part right. Wholesome as a
glass of milk and almost as exciting to watch, this extremely low-budget
comedy at least has the courtesy to carry a title that warns potential
viewers exactly what to expect.
 "Bored Silly" strings together a collection of fuzzily
photographed and seemingly improvised sequences, slaps kooky songs such
as "I Really, Really, Really Like Girls" on the soundtrack, and calls
itself a movie. Perhaps writer-director Robert Shallcross had an idea to
make a modern-day version of the "Our Gang" comedies (popularly known
today as "The Little Rascals"), but he seems to have overlooked the fact
that those films were short subjects. In fact, when producer Hal Roach
attempted to move "Our Gang" into features with the 1936 film "General
Spanky," the public resisted the concept and Roach never tried it again.
         "General Spanky," however, was much better than "Bored Silly,"
which follows three 8-year-olds (Evan Gabriel, Seth Fjersted and Shaun
Poremba) as they try to build a fort, go fishing, make enough money to
buy some ice cream, get revenge on a neighborhood bully and spy on the
mysterious junk man, who reputedly chopped up six kids. The schedule may
sound hectic, but the movie meanders pointlessly from one anecdote to
the next, pausing often to let us watch our heroes stroll down the
street or plod through a field.
 The boys also engage in a lot of Macaulay Culkin-style
screaming and frequently are called upon to laugh uproariously at their
own zany antics. Oh yeah, there's also no shortage of whining, in case
listening to whiny children is your idea of a solid afternoon of
entertainment.
 After about 90 minutes and before the plot's loose ends can be
tied up, "Bored Silly" comes to a screeching halt, almost as if
Shallcross ran out of money before he could shoot a suitable finale. So
few viewers are likely to make it to the end of the movie, however, it's
unlikely there will be many complaints. James Sanford

Title
Review for Mad City (1997)
MAD CITY (Warner Brothers)
Directed by Costa-Gavras
 The feeding frenzy for tidbits about breaking news stories among TV
reporters has become so absurd in recent years that it hardly needs to be
satirized: Just turn on CNN or MSNBC the next time there's a revelation
about the car crash that killed Princess Diana and count how many different
ways they can present the same piece of information. Certainly no media
figures will be stung by the puffball satire "Mad City," which centers
around the circus that develops around a hostage situation in the town of
Madeline, California; though writers Tom Matthews and Eric Williams seem
anxious to take the media to task for their excesses, their screenplay is
more preachy than it is astringent.
 The weak material is unenthusiastically played by Dustin Hoffman
(unimaginative and off-putting as a reporter anxious to recapture his
glamor) and downright badly handled by John Travolta as the laid-off museum
security guard whose attempt to get his job back sets the story in motion.
Trying to put himself in the shoes of a none-too-bright working-class guy,
Travolta often looks like he's auditioning for the part of Lennie in the
next production of "Of Mice and Men." His rambling monologues about his
dreams and disappointments are underscored by music that sounds like it was
lifted from a "Waltons" episode, perhaps in a  futile attempt to make this
caricature seem human.
 "If we do not learn from the past, we are destined to repeat it," notes
museum curator Blythe Danner early on in the film. She might have added "or
at least remake it," since "Mad City" is obviously striving for a "Dog Day
Afternoon"-type atmosphere of delightful/disturbing chaos. But the film
fails as both black-comedy and as slice-of-life drama, and director
Costa-Gavras' attempt at a potent finale is embarassingly heavy-handed: "Mad
City" is a movie straight outta Dullsville.

Title
Review for Halloween H20: Twenty Years Later (1998)
        In a summer full of overlong epics like "Armageddon" and "The Mask
of Zorro," a modest quickie like "Halloween: H2O - Twenty Years Later" seems
refreshingly unpretentious. It takes almost as long to pronounce that
unwieldly title as it does to watch the movie. But here's a case in which
brevity is something of a handicap.
 There are actually some intriguing issues bubbling just below the
blood-spattered surface of "H2O," which brings back Jamie Lee Curtis of the
original two "Halloween" movies to restore some much-needed class to the
"slasher flick" genre, but the film's 85-minute running time leaves scores
of irritating unanswered questions and unresolved issues.
 Alright, no one buying a ticket for "H2O" is going in expecting an
insightful study of human nature, but much of the movie's first hour devotes
itself to detailing the disturbing, fragile bond between Curtis' character
Laurie Strode and her 17-year-old son John (Josh Hartnett), which plays like
an Oedipal version of the Meg Ryan-Andy Garcia relationship in "When A Man
Loves A Woman." Still traumatized from her violent brushes with her
psychotic brother Michael Myers, Laurie now lives under the alias of Keri
Tate and oversees Hillcrest, an exclusive prep school. She's referred to by
John as a "functioning alcoholic," which apparently means she can pound
glasses of chardonnay at lunch, down a triple-vodka dinner and still have
the energy to harangue Hillcrest's useless security guard (LL Cool J).
 Director Steve Miner, whose previous films include the clever
sleeper "Warlock," manages to sustain a fair level of tension as Laurie's
drink-induced hallucinations of Michael -- he's become her personal Baby Cha
Cha -- give way to the all-too-real thing, the chalky-faced killing machine
who shows up at school while the kids are away on a Halloween field trip.
While family counseling might have worked wonders for other siblings in
similar situations, Laurie and Michael prefer to resolve their differences
with big knives, heavy machinery and the always-reliable fireman's ax.
 Curtis is both "H2O''s trump card and its biggest problem, the
trouble being that she does such a fine job of illuminating Laurie's hollow
shell of a life that we can't help but want to know more about her and how
she's managed to keep it together for as long as she has. There's
considerably more attention paid to characterization here than one would
expect in a horror film and that may cause "H2O" to seem slightly sluggish
to fans raised on the high energy and hip wit of the "Scream" movies.
 Because Curtis takes so much care in establishing Laurie as a
fascinating, flawed woman, the slash-and-burn mayhem of the film's last 20
minutes (complete with 'victims' coming back from death's door) seems like
the writers' lazy way out of completing what could have been a much smarter,
more interesting script. There are enough flashes of intelligence in
"H2O" -- check out the music during Janet Leigh's big scene and the make of
the automobile she's driving -- to indicate everyone concerned could have
gone a bit further and pushed the boundaries of the genre a little more.
Unfortunately, the abrupt ending of "H2O" cuts it to the quick, making the
movie seem like a slow build-up to a puny pay-off.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Artemisia (1997)
ARTEMISIA
Directed by Agnes Merlet
 Controversy is swirling around "Artemisia," French filmmaker Agnes Merlet's
study of the early career of Italian painter Artemisia Gentileschi, who is
celebrated by contemporary feminists for the strides she made for women in
the male-dominated art world of the 17th century. Both Merlet and her
critics -- fronted by Gloria Steinem -- agree on Artemisia's importance both
as an artist and as a heroine. What seperates the two camps is Merlet's
attitude toward Artemisia's relationship with Agostino Tassi, whose
reputation as a Lothario, some say, was far more deserved than his acclaim
as a painter.
 "Using the few historical records remaining and her own imagination Merlet
creates a fresh interpretation of  (Artemisia's) life," says the publicity
material from Miramax Films, which is distributing the film. In
writer-director Merlet's mind, the story of Artemisia and Tassi is one of
love thwarted. Barely 17, Artemisia (played with the right combination of
innocence and fire by Valentina Cervi) prevails upon her father Orazio
(Michel Serrault) to let her study art with his friend Tassi (Miki
Manojlovic), a Baroque painter of some renown. But in the early 1600s, this
proves to be a dicey arrangement: The church forbids women to paint the
figure of the male nude and generally discourages feminine participation in
the arts as a rule.
 Artemisia refuses to heed such taboos, even though it means sacrificing her
virginity to the worldly Tassi. Out of this violation of the teacher-student
relationship comes a deep and all-consuming passion shared by both partners,
both for art and for each other. But when Orazio learns of the affair, she
charges Tassi with raping his daughter and a lascivious trial results,
complete with nuns who attempt to determine how many times Artemisia has had
sex and finger-twisting tortures to get answers from witnesses. Monica
Lewinski had better hope Ken Starr doesn't screen this picture and get
ideas.
 For what it is, essentially a steamy and well-made period-piece,
"Artemisia" plays fairly effectively. There's some heavy erotic content
between Cervi and Manojlovic that almost earned the film a dreaded NC-17
rating, but Merlet also manages to put forth the theory that Artemisia's
entire career grew out of this early heartbreak and the scandal that
followed it.
 Artist June Wayne, who supports Steinem's position against the movie,
disagrees.
"Merlet has turned Artemisia's life into just another hot pillow story,"
Wayne told the Los Angeles Times. "The film is a bodice-ripper that misses
everything important about this woman--and aesthetically she did break
ground." Wayne and Steinem are particularly offended by Merlet's
romanticization of the bond between Artemisia and Tassi, but the conflicted
emotions that drive them -- Artemisia adores her lover but fears her
father's wrath, while the more experienced Tassi seems to realize the
relationship can never work out -- make for absorbing drama.
 Indeed, the biggest disappointment in "Artemisia" comes at the end, when a
rolling title tells us that after the trial ended Artemisia went on to
marry, have a daughter and study in Rome (possibly disguised as a man,
according to some sources). At the time of her death, she was running her
own workshop in Naples and was earning a living in her chosen profession.
That part of the story would have been at least as interesting as the
sex-scandal Merlet has chosen to focus on and would probably have given its
filmmakers far fewer headaches. B

Title
Review for I Got the Hook Up (1998)
        In some respects, ``I Got The Hook-Up'' could be accurately
described as an incredible film.
  It is, for example, incredible to think that anyone involved
in this production received a paycheck for his participation: Rank
amateurs rarely receive compensation.
  It's equally incredible to discover that this film was the
work of an African-American writer: You'd have to attend the Ku Klux
Klan film festival to find more degrading images of blacks in one
sitting.
  The shiftless, trash-talking heroes of ``I Got The Hook-Up''
are Black (Master P) and Blue (A.J. Johnson), a pair of ghetto
hustlers who sell suspect goods out of their broken-down van. Though
the task of continually showering their perturbed customers with
profanity and insults takes up most of their working day, Black and
Blue still manage to take time out to steal a few boxes of cellular
phones from a geeky deliveryman.
  But, here's the big joke: The phones don't work
properly. Now everybody's mad at Black and Blue, and everywhere they
go, people chase them and yell.  Imagine what a stitch that is.
  You could get as many laughs staying home and listening to a
dial tone for 90 minutes.
  But if ``Hook-Up'' were merely unfunny, that wouldn't be a
serious offense. Instead, the screenplay by Master P incorporates such
knee-slapping elements as violence against women (one gets throttled
by thugs, and another is told by her boyfriend, ``Remind me when we
get home to whup your ass''), racism against Asians, anti-Caucasian
wisecracks, jokes about how funny it is to torment the developmentally
disabled, and generous helpings of homophobia as a transvestite hooker
cruises for clients.
  Not every female character in ``Hook-Up'' is a drug addict,
a hooker or a stripper: Some of them are merely promiscuous airheads
wanting to be taken advantage of.
  If representatives from either NOW or GLADD bothered to
watch this film, You can bet ``Hook-Up'' distributor Dimension Films
would be getting plenty of free bad publicity. One would hope the
NAACP might join them in their protest. The American Society of
Cinematographers might even want to chime in, since it's a rare film
that manages to include so much out-of-focus photography.
  Considering that its star-studded soundtrack is featured
prominently in the movie's opening credits - and would seem to be the
only conceivable reason for the movie's existence - it comes as a
surprise to find the music is generally buried under the ineptly
improvised repartee of Master P and Johnson. Almost all of it consists
of derogatory nicknames for women and plenty of creative usage of that
popular 12-letter synonym for family closeness that's sometimes used
as a term of endearment by rappers. The lame interaction of the duo
makes one wistful for the comic stylings of Dr.  Dre and Ed Lover in
``Who's The Man.''
  It's a telling sign that a movie is beyond redemption when
it can't even keep the attention of kids who've sneaked into the
theater hoping for some R-rated fun. Sure enough, after less than an
hour of ``Hook-Up,'' a trio of pre-teens in a Wednesday afternoon show
at United Artists Westmain began complaining loudly about the film's
lackluster content (OK, granted, they didn't exactly phrase it that
way) and bolted for the exit. The other half-dozen people in
attendance seemed jealous of the youths' initiative.

Title
Review for Man Who Knew Too Little, The (1997)
What a long, strange trip it's been for Bill Murray. After ascending to
the heights of box-office popularity in the 1980s with such films as
"Caddyshack," "Stripes," "Ghostbusters" and "Scrooged," he's been all
but missing-in-action during recent years. "The Man Who Knew Too Little"
is unlikely to bring on an encore of his glory days, but it's a pleasant
reminder of why Murray has always been one of the most accessible comic
talents to come out of the "Saturday Night Live" factory. Even now, he
shows none of the smug self-indulgence of Eddie Murphy or the
anything-for-a-laugh desperation of Chris Farley or Adam Sandler.
That said, it should also be noted that "The Man Who Knew Too Little"
is not one of Murray's sturdier vehicles. It's a mild variation on the
age-old innocent-guy-stumbles-into-espionage plot, with Murray as
Wallace Ritchie, a guileless American whose brother (Peter Gallagher)
signs him up for an elaborate role-playing game called "Theatre of
Life." On his way to the show, however, Wallace intercepts a message
that leads him into a real-life escapade involving blackmail, murder and
a scheme to sabotage the signing of a U.K.-Russian peace treaty, thus
bringing on a new Cold War. The joke of the story is that Wallace is
completely oblivious to the danger around him and continues believing
it's all just part of the "Theatre of Life."
It's silly stuff to be sure and far from unpredictable, but Murray's
boyish charm goes a long way toward carrying the picture and director
Jon Amiel ("Copycat," "Sommersby") keeps the nonsense perking along.
Joanne Whalley is well-matched with Murray, and veteran character actor
Alfred Molina seems to savor the chance to ham it up as an assassin
called "Boris the Butcher." "The Man Who Knew Too Little" is forgettable
fluff, but it's hard to slam any film in which the villains take a break
from chasing and shooting at each other to play the old Kerplunk! game.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Mission: Impossible II (2000)
 Even though it grossed about $400 million worldwide, has anyone really
been waiting anxiously for four years for a sequel to "Mission:
Impossible"? How many people do you know who really loved (much less
understood) that slick, cold and mostly forgettable movie?
 Apparently Tom Cruise did, and when it comes to getting films produced,
you don't need much more of a supporter than that. Perhaps, after
spending most of the late 90s exercising his acting muscles in such
weighty fare as "Eyes Wide Shut" and "Magnolia" he's been yearning for
the day when he can show up on the set, throw on a black leather jacket,
jump on a motorcycle, ride like the wind and forget all about digging
deep within his psyche to find the right emotion. "Besides," he might
rationalize, "I didn't get the Oscar for 'Magnolia,' and my fans
complained there weren't any explosions in 'Eyes Wide Shut,' so why not
give the people what they want?"
 If pyrotechnics and chases are all it takes to satisfy a summer movie
audience, no one can accuse "Mission: Impossible II" -- or "M: I-2," as
the press materials call it -- of shortchanging its viewers. There's
even a smattering of James Bond-style high-tech spy wizardry thrown in,
including a tracking device implanted in the body that can send your
position anywhere on earth to a satellite that zaps the information back
to a computer, and a variety of extraordinarily realistic masks that can
help heroes masquerade as villains and vice versa.
 Since "M: I-2" is directed by John Woo ("Face-Off," "The Killer"), it
also includes several grandiose gun battles, almost all of which are
slowed down to emphasize, Woo's followers will say, their balletic
qualities. To the masses, however, the movie's continual use of
slow-motion will probably be unintentionally funny at first, then just
plain irritating. Unfortunately for Woo, American directors have ripped
off his moves so many times now (most notably in "The Matrix," which
managed both to steal them and improve upon them) it seems as if the old
master is picking his own pocket.
 Flawed as it is, "M: I-2" is still a major improvement over the
original "Mission," which Brian DePalma seemed to direct on auto-pilot.
For starters, it's got a clearly defined plot line; the original was so
unnecessarily complicated it would have taken flow charts and a slide
show to explain.
 Robert Towne, who wrote both films, borrows heavily from Alfred
Hitchcock's 1946 masterpiece "Notorious," as Cruise's super-agent Ethan
Hunt must send the woman he loves -- in this case, an exotic-looking cat
burglar named Nyah Nordoff-Hall (Thandie Newton) -- into the arms of
evil in order to get the information he needs to save the world. In
"Notorious," Cary Grant was trying to expose Nazis; here, Hunt has to
locate the lethal Chimera virus, which devours its victims from the
inside out in record time. So the dutiful Nyah beds down with her old
boyfriend Sean Ambrose (Dougray Scott), a wealthy, wicked entrepreneur
who'd like to infect all of Australia with Chimera, then put the cure on
the market at an inflated price. Supervillains these days don't want
ransom money -- they want stock options in bio-tech firms.
 In contrast to most of today's crash-and-smash epics, which can't go
more than five minutes without dropping a one-liner, "M: I-2" maintains
a straight face, even when its characters are doing fairly ridiculous
things. When the funniest guy in the movie is Anthony Hopkins (who shows
up at the beginning and the end of the story as Hunt's boss), you know
you're watching a serious-minded film.
 Disappointingly, "M: I-2" brings back Ving Rhames as Hunt's former
partner Luther Stickell, then keeps him on the bench, plopping him in
front of a computer screen or at the controls of a helicopter instead of
letting him in on the action. That territory is reserved for Cruise and
Cruise alone, and the star does a more than capable job of handling his
stunts, including a final knife fight that, while drawn-out in the same
way as Woo's overblown finale in "Face-Off," generates at least one
major shock that's sure to have everyone gasping simultaneously.
 Cruise comes up startlingly short, however, in his scenes with Newton.
Although the story is built around their romance, there's nothing
exciting going on between them, and even when Towne follows his
"Notorious" blueprint right down to the scene in which our heroine
poisons herself in the name of duty, Hunt seems only moderately
distressed. Poor Nyah would have gotten a much warmer reception from
Cary Grant. James Sanford

Title
Review for Rugrats Movie, The (1998)

 It's every parent's nightmare. Your child kidnaps your newborn and
disappears into the woods on a stormy night with his friends. Then the media
descends on your home, anxious for all the details.
 That situation is played for laughs in "The Rugrats Movie," and while it
might also be a nightmare of many parents to have to pay to see Tommy,
Chuckie and Angelica on the big screen, "Rugrats" has more than enough
hijinks and gross-out humor to keep the under-10 crowd in hysterics for 90
minutes.
 Older viewers might catch themselves chuckling as well, especially when
Tommy's pregnant mom insists on checking into the Lipschitz Maternity Arts
Center -- which promises it's "state-of-the-art in primitive birth
alternatives" -- or when an obnoxious tabloid reporter grills grieving
parents with questions like "Is it true a dingo ate your baby?". Certainly
the kids won't pick up on how alternative-rock pioneers like Patti Smith,
Laurie Anderson and Beck provide the vocals for a nursery full of
complaining babies, or catch the easily recognizable tones of Whoopi
Goldberg and David Spade as a pair of forest rangers who assist in rescuing
the Rugrats from the wilderness.
 That's not to say that all of "Rugrats" is sophisticated and in-jokey. Many
of the jokes are built around "chocolate pants" (think diapers) and bodily
functions, the kind of lightly raunchy material that's, in Rugrat parlance,
"more fun than picking noses" to those whose ages are still in the single
digits.
 But, to balance things out slightly, "Rugrats" does offer a gently
delivered message about how older siblings need to overcome feelings of
jealousy and take part in raising a new baby. In this case, Tommy feels he's
lost his place in the Pickles family after the arrival of little brother
Dylan, who seems to exist solely to smack Tommy around and weep rivers of
tears. The only disappointment the target audience for "Rugrats" is likely
to feel comes from the movie's underemployment of bratty cousin Angelica,
who is kept out of the action for most of the movie.
 The feature is preceded by a raucous "Catdog" short, in which the
half-feline/half-canine manages to cause citywide destruction and an
airplane crash while trying to win a call-in radio contest. Its relentless
comic violence and hyperactivity would have made maverick "Golden Age"
animator Tex Avery proud.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Toy Story 2 (1999)
         Looking back over the dozens of movie sequels released in the
past 15 years, you'll find an extraordinarily high ratio of junk to
quality, as well as a lot of pictures which never should have been made
in the first place. Was there really an audience out there demanding
"The Karate Kid 4," "Species 2," "The Cannonball Run II," "Porky's
Revenge" or "Return to the Blue Lagoon"? If so, you couldn't prove it by
the box office receipts on any of these fiascoes.
 But it's safe to say a fair amount of the moviegoing public
will be interested in the further adventures of Woody the cowboy doll
and Buzz Lightyear, the stoic and slightly pompous action figure, the
characters who enchanted audiences of all ages in "Toy Story" four years
ago. Happily, "Toy Story 2" is a truly worthwhile follow-up, a
technically dazzling movie which delivers on both the action and comedy
fronts, yet still doesn't lose sight of its heart.
 Hollywood has two schools of sequels: the ones which are merely
louder, flashier repetitions of bits that worked before (for instance,
the wholly unnecessary "Lethal Weapon 4"); or the second installments
which try to probe the darker sides of the characters (as in "Babe: Pig
in the City" or the ultra-downbeat "Back to the Future, Part 2"). But
director John Lasseter has seen to it "Toy Story 2" doesn't fall into
either category. You need not have seen the original to enjoy this
adventure, although if you saw this one first, you would probably be
inspired to rush to the video store to grab a copy of the first movie.
 All the familiar voices of "Toy Story" are back, including Tom
Hanks as Woody (who's faced with a daunting moral dilemma this time
around), Tim Allen as Buzz, Don Rickles as Mr. Potato Head, John
Ratzenberger as Ham the piggy bank, Jim Varney as the Slinky Dog and
Annie Potts -- too briefly -- as the saucy Bo Peep. They're joined by
new additions Joan Cusack as Jessie the Yodelin' Cowgirl and Kelsey
Grammer as a prospector doll with the unenviable name of Stinky Pete.
You couldn't ask for a brighter array of vocal talent, and the
screenplay gives them a surplus of good lines to deliver.
 Picking up a couple of years after the original left off, "2"
finds Woody in the hands of unscrupulous toy dealer Al (Wayne Knight)
after a mix-up at a yard sale. The tireless Buzz leads Rex, Hamm, Slinky
Dog and Potato Head -- who has packed his "angry eyes" just in case he
needs them -- on a journey to Al's Toy Barn megastore, but that turns
out to be just the beginning of a wild and woolly yarn that manages to
address some bittersweet truths about friendship, sacrifice and growing
up, while still providing a steady stream of jokes and exciting moments.
         "Toy Story 2" prominently features some hilarious parodies
(including an opening sequence with Buzz which brilliantly blends
together "2001: A Space Odyssey," "Star Wars," "Tron" and "Close
Encounters of the Third Kind") and sassy asides, such as when Tour Guide
Barbie (Jodi Benson), while showing off the aisles of Al's Toy Barn to
guests, notes of the Buzz Lightyear figures on the shelves "back in
1995, short-sighted retailers did not order enough to meet demand."
 Like its predecessor, "Toy Story 2" builds to a series of
increasingly tense climaxes, only pausing along the way to welcome back
those sycophantic Martian dolls who've now stopped worshipping "the
claw" and have found instead an unlikely new deity. There's a surprising
amount of suspense in the movie's last 15 minutes, which is so
splendidly handled it should have viewers young and old teetering on the
edges of their seats. A friend recently told me he considers "Toy Story
2" to be "The Godfather, Part 2" of animated movies; he may very well be
right. James Sanford

Title
Review for Wonder Boys (2000)
         There's nothing about Michael Chabon's popular novel "Wonder
Boys" that screams "movie material." Its lead character is an English
professor, not a cop or a scientist. In place of a plot, Chabon simply
lays out the events from one bizarre weekend, including an accidental
murder (of a dog), a robbery (of a jacket that once belonged to Marilyn
Monroe), the breakdown of two marriages and lots of drug-taking.
On top of that, most of the characters are either writers,
editors or college administrators, not exactly the kinds of professions
that make for exciting viewing.
Smartly, when director Curtis Hanson and screenwriter Steve
Kloves ("The Fabulous Baker Boys") were putting together the film of
"Wonder Boys" they didn't try to impose a storyline or goose the action
quotient. Instead, they've simply taken most of the book's essence and
transferred it lovingly to the screen. Kloves' adaptation is so
faithful, in fact, that even the Alfred Stieglitz portrait of Georgia
O'Keeffe hanging over student Hannah Green's bed -- a throwaway
descriptive detail in Chabon's novel -- turns up in the movie.
 What also surfaces is one of Michael Douglas' strongest
performances of the past decade. As an actor, Douglas has always been
strongest when playing disturbed (and often disturbing) men, as he did
in "The War of the Roses," "Falling Down" and, unforgettably, in his
Oscar-winning turn in "Wall Street." And Grady Tripp, the focal point of
"Wonder Boys," has plenty to disturb him.
 On the personal front, his wife has left him and his 20-year-old
boarder Hannah (Katie Holmes) seems anxious to take her place.
Meanwhile, Sara (Frances McDormand), the chancellor at the Pittsburgh
college where Grady teaches, has just told Grady she's pregnant with his
child. Plus, there's the matter of James Leer (Tobey Maguire), the
spooky, gifted young writer who has seemingly attached himself to Grady.
         Professionally, Grady is in a funk because it's been seven
years since his last novel and he can't come up with an ending to his
sprawling new manuscript, which now stands at 2611 typewritten,
single-spaced pages. That worry is compounded by his old friend and
editor Terry Crabtree (Robert Downey Jr.), who's told Grady his job at
the publishing house is hanging by a thread and could disappear if the
new book is not a major success.
 All these major and minor crises collide in the course of 72
hours and the quiet chaos they bring is beautifully orchestrated by
Kloves' script and Hanson's smooth, easygoing direction. There's
flintiness as well as warmth in McDormand's Sara, while Holmes brings
her usual earthy radiance to Hannah. In Maguire's tricky eyes you can
see the wheels of James' slightly warped mind grinding away. Only Downey
seems slightly flat.
 "Wonder Boys" can best be described as a lighthearted dark
comedy which never pushes too hard in either direction. Like many a lost
weekend, it's frequently puzzling while it's going on but surprisingly
pleasant to look back on. James Sanford

Title
Review for Mickey Blue Eyes (1999)
         When it comes to comedy, timing is essential. And for "Mickey
Blue Eyes," the timing could hardly be worse. Although it's a generally
agreeable farce, much of its material was already covered six months ago
in the snappier "Analyze This," making "Mickey" look like a weak
imitation.
 It hardly helps that "Mickey" also includes many of the same
supporting players and even some of the same songs as director Jonathan
Demme's "Married to the Mob," which tackled almost exactly the same
subject matter 11 years ago. Replace Michelle Pfeiffer's character in
"Mob" with an eager-to-please Hugh Grant, tone down the darkness of
Demme's humor and you've got "Mickey," which might as well be titled
"Engaged to the Mob."
 That's the situation Grant's character, an auction house
manager named Michael, finds himself in when he proposes to
schoolteacher Gina Vitale (Jeanne Tripplehorn). She loves him, but she
dreads the prospect of marriage, since that would tie the squeaky-clean
Michael in with her father (James Caan) and his shady business
associates, all of whom know the proper way to dispose of a corpse and
the best tactics to use in strong-arming truck drivers.
 At times, it looks as if "Mickey" might find a tone of its own.
Certainly there's some fun to be had at the sight of the very English
Michael struggling to sound like a gangster from the Midwest -- his
attempt at a Kansas City accent lands somewhere between Arnold
Schwarzenegger and Forrest Gump -- or trying to help his future
father-in-law by unloading some incredibly ugly paintings as a way of
laundering money. Grant, who has had some bad luck in his movie choices
since "Four Weddings and a Funeral," proves here that his comeback in
"Notting Hill" was not just a fluke. He's charmingly befuddled
throughout the film.
 But most of the time the farce seems forced and the story
contrived. The best scene, involving mixed up fortune cookies in a
Chinese restaurant, comes ten minutes into the film and as "Mickey"
trudges along, the spaces between the laughs become longer and longer.
Even a feeble attempt at a twist ending isn't enough to put the picture
back on track. "Mickey" could have used more offbeat characters like
Maddie Corman's overzealous and overemotional photographer or Scott
Thompson's amusingly clueless FBI agent. Or how about surprise cameos by
Robert DeNiro or Michelle Pfeiffer? That would have really made "Mickey
Blue Eyes" worth watching. James Sanford

Title
Review for Reversal of Fortune (1990)
 "I do," the client replies, through a carnivorous smile.
 The lawyer is Harvard law professor Alan Dershowitz (Ron
Silver). The client is Claus von Bulow (Jeremy Irons), a man who had one
of the very richest, an heiress named Sunny (Glenn Close), who now
lingers in an endless coma. When Dershowitz and von Bulow first meet,
Claus is seeking someone to help him with his appeal after being
convicted of attempted murder. Dershowitz, despite considerable
reservations, takes the case.
 Director Barbet Schroeder's delectable "Reversal of Fortune"
reconstructs the infamous von Bulow scandal and makes it more mystifying
than ever by presenting it as a real-life "Rashomon." As a result,
Claus' defenders may question their position after seeing the film, but
his critics may have some moments of self-doubt as well.
 The marriage of Sunny and Claus is played mostly for
extraordinarily dark comedy, a marathon of extracurricular affairs,
pill-popping and mind games. While Sunny was usually portrayed in
newspaper accounts as a meek, frail romantic taken for a ride by gigolo
Claus, Close's portrait is far deeper and more colorful. On one hand,
she's Sunny the Valium Zombie, a paranoid hypoglycemic whose meals
consist mostly of sundaes and cigarettes and who celebrates Christmas by
washing down various drugs with multiple cups of eggnog. But Close isn't
entirely unsympathetic to the woman; when Sunny begs Claus for love,
then insists she likes to sleep with the window open in mid-winter
because she finds the chill "reassuring" she brings a sad resonance to
the stereotype of the poor little rich girl.
 Speaking of chilliness, it's a credit to Irons that he somehow
manages to make Claus' icy facade alluring and compelling. His frozen
heart is sheathed in a suave, even-tempered exterior that slowly wins
your trust.
 But just when you start to think perhaps Claus was unjustly
accused, pesky details creep into the picture. If Claus wasn't plotting
Sunny's death, why did he show his mistress a legal analysis of Sunny's
will? Why did he lie to the doctor who investigated Sunny's first coma?
And what possible reason could there have been for him to spend five
whole days in a cramped apartment with his mother's corpse before
reporting the death to the authorities. In the eyes of Schroeder and
company, Claus may or may not have tried to kill Sunny but it's certain
he did very little to stop her from destroying herself.
 In any case, it's the sorrowful Sunny whose presence hangs over
everything. "I never came out of this coma," Sunny remarks in her
ethereal narration, adding with a hint of mischief, "and I never will."
We may never learn the truth about what really went on inside the von
Bulow's Newport estate during that black Christmas, but "Reversal of
Fortune" serves up plenty of fascinating theories. James Sanford

Title
Review for Karakter (1997)
"Character," this year's Oscar-winner for Best Foriegn-Language Film, could
almost be the Dutch answer to "Les Miserables." It can't be sheer
coincidence that loaves of stolen bread are what set in motion the tragic
power struggle between Jacob Katadreuffe (Fedja van Huet), an ambitious law
officer worker, and his secret father, a merciless court bailiff named A.B.
Dreverhaven (Jan Decleir).
Twenty years earlier, Dreverhaven seduced his housekeeper Joba (Betty
Shuurman), an eerily silent young woman, and the one-time tryst resulted in
Joba's pregnancy. Though Dreverhaven offered both marriage and money, Joba
coldly refused to have any further contact with him, choosing to weather the
insults of her neighbors rather than wed a man so callous he evicts
destitute people -- even the sick -- from his properties without a second
thought.
Jacob grows up trying his best to keep his distance from Dreverhaven, only
to be drawn directly into his father's power when he unknowingly borrows a
sizable amount of money from Dreverhaven's bank. That major mistake will
come back to haunt the youth again and again as he tries to build a decent
life for himself in depressed 1920s Rotterdam. It seems every time Jacob is
on the verge of getting ahead, Dreverhaven turns up to knock him back down.
Adapted by screenwriter-director Mike Van Diem from the 1938 Dutch novel of
the same name by Ferdinand Bordewijk, "Character" is relentlessly grim, two
hours spent with a handful of miserable, monochromatic people, all of whom
are either unable or unwilling to reach out to one another.
That said, the movie is also extremely well-made, with much attention paid
to period detail and, since the actors are often non-verbal, to the
subtleties of its performances. First-time director Van Diem has bathed the
picture in a gorgeous gloss that complements the script's melodramatic
aspects; rain, shadows, fog and murky streetlights are all used to great
effect.
Jacob's fight to get out from under Dreverhaven's thumb is compelling, but
many viewers will find themselves wishing Van Diem had spent a bit more time
with some of the less angst-ridden figures in the story, such as Lorna Te
George (Tamar van den Dop), the co-worker who catches Jacob's eye, or Joba's
boarder, a fledgling Communist named Jan Maan (Hans Kesting) who resents his
snobby family. Though "Character" is fine for what it is, a little levity
would have made the gloomy atmosphere slightly less oppressive.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Dirty Work (1998)
There are many questions we should ponder during our daily meditations. What
does God look like? Why do good people suffer while bad people sometimes
prosper? Why is there air?
And why, after all these years, does Hollywood think that everyone who ever
appeared on "Saturday Night Live" deserves a film career as a reward?
Sure, there's Dan Aykroyd, Eddie Murphy and Bill Murray, who've made some
truly funny movies over the years, but they're genuinely talented. What's
the excuse for showcasing Norm Macdonald, a third-rate Dennis Miller
knockoff whose delivery is slower than Priority Mail? Macdonald is currently
best-known for his public feud with NBC and for a recent college gig in
which he allegedly went onstage plastered and offended most of the audience.
Too bad "Dirty Work," his starring debut, won't even generate that much of a
reaction. It's certainly not the worst film by an "SNL" alumni, and every so
often - maybe twice in the course of its 81 minutes and 27 seconds - "Dirty"
works in a clever idea.
But for the most part, it plods along, throwing in a surprise cameo here, a
horny senior-citizen gag there, until it's time to call it a night.
Underscoring the action with last year's hits (Third Eye Blind's
"Semi-Charmed Life," Chumbawamba's "Tubthumping," etc.) only plunges the
movie deeper into the doldrums. The sole zinger in the script goes to Don
Rickles, playing the surly cinema manager who accurately tells usher
Macdonald, "You have the personality of a dead moth."
Despite featuring the most colorful costumes of any movie so far this year,
"Dirty" is mostly dull. Mitch Weaver (Macdonald) is a ne'er-do-well who's
had 14 jobs in the past three months before he seizes on the idea of opening
a revenge-for-hire business (yes, the filmmakers put AC/DC's "Dirty Deeds
Done Dirt Cheap" on the soundtrack). With partner Sam (Artie Lange), Weaver
struggles to come up with the $50,000 needed to buy a new heart for Sam's
dying dad (Jack Warden).
But the guys work much too hard, putting whole dead fish throughout a house
to render it uninhabitable. All you really need to do is get a couple of
pints of fish oil and pour it in the air ducts, the sofa cushions and the
mattress. Not that I'd know personally, or anything.
Some mild curiosity may be generated by one final appearance by the late
Chris Farley, as the hard-drinking victim of a partial nose amputation.
Sadly, Farley looks much worse than the role requires and watching his few
scenes feels like ghoulish voyeurism.

Title
Review for Home Alone 3 (1997)
HOME ALONE 3
(Twentieth-Century Fox)
Directed by Raja Gosnell
 Less a sequel than a haphazard remake of the original "Home Alone," "Home
Alone 3" is a shining example of desperate studio executives trying to
squeeze a few more drops out of a dying cash-cow. It's also further
proof --as if any were needed-- that John Hughes-scripted movies are now a
thing to be feared instead of anticipated, as they might have been ten years
ago during his "Breakfast Club"/"Planes, Trains and Automobiles"/"Pretty in
Pink" heyday.
 At least the producers had the good sense to retire the ungracefully aging
Macaulay Culkin, whose performances in his most recent films (such as the
acclaimed "Getting Even With Dad" and the unjustly-snubbed-by-Oscar "Richie
Rich") smacked of smug self-indulgence. Unfortunately, the filmmakers have
not found a young actor with the comic timing of the younger, less affected
Culkin: Alex D. Linz, who takes the lead in this installment, seems like one
of those little dolls who's been told far too many times exactly how
adorable he is. There's a fine line between precocious and precious, and
young Mr. Linz continually errs on the side of  cutesy-poo.
 In fact, there's nothing adorable about "Home Alone 3" at all, despite
Hughes' dumping of a load of gooey sentimentality into the midst of the
proceedings, as beguiling moppet Alex (Linz) defrosts the glacial heart of a
bitter old neighbor. The spies-chasing-microchip plot is nothing more than a
facile excuse for a second act that's stuffed to the gills with poorly
executed slapstick that director Raja Gosnell obviously has no feel for. Say
what you will about the first two "Home Alone"s, but at least they were
professionally made entertainments; this one seems to have been shot and
pasted together by the least-promising students in a community-college film
class. Despite the title, the real story that's being continued here is
Hughes', and it's a depressing tale of a once-bright talent stuck in a
continuing downward spiral.

Title
Review for Double Platinum (1999) (TV)
DOUBLE PLATINUM (ABC - Airing at 9 p.m. May 16, 1999)
        There's a scene in that great trashy movie "Indecent Proposal"
in which lawyer Oliver Platt is approached by two screenwriters who need
his help in selling their big idea to a studio.
 "It's a comeback vehicle for Diana Ross!" one beams. "With
Billy Ray Cyrus!" his partner notes.
 That proposed picture could scarcely have turned out to any
goofier than "Double Platinum" (airing Sunday at 9 p.m. on ABC), in
which Miss Ross attempts to hitch her long-idle wagon to Brandy's star.
This is the kind of mesmerizingly bad melodrama in which someone bursts
into tears, then rushes to the nearest mirror so she can watch herself
weep.
 A number of things make "Platinum" an inexhaustible source of
cheap laughs, but Ross' transcendentally bizarre performance is
certainly the foremost factor. The effortless elegance that was once her
trademark has since been replaced by edgy self-consciousness and a
penchant for wallowing in the hollow, ersatz sincerity Michael Jackson
usually traffics in. Clad in gowns that look like the frilly
monstrosities unlucky girls get stuck wearing to the prom and crooning
half a dozen of the tepid ballads that have kept her far outside the Top
40 for the past 15 years, Ross is often a sorry sight.
 Though she won justifiable acclaim for her portrayal of Billie
Holiday in "Lady Sings the Blues," Ross quickly lost whatever bearings
she had as an actress; witness her stilted star turns in "Mahogany" and
"The Wiz" for evidence of that. Playing a performer shouldn't be too
much of a stretch for her, but Ross invests many of her lines in
"Platinum" with the same level of emotionalism most people use when
reading from the phone book.
 Nina Shengold's unintentionally uproarious teleplay takes two
hours to lay out what '80s R&B group Klymaxx once said in four funky
minutes: Divas need love, too. In a prologue set in 1981 Atlanta, we're
introduced to aspiring songstress Olivia Harris (Ross, shot in such soft
focus she looks like a five-foot stack of cotton candy in a bad wig)
who's approached by a silver-tongued devil of an agent after one of her
allegedly knockout sets.
 He wants her to run away to New York; being a mother and a
wife, Olivia hesitates. "Don't throw away a dream like this, kid --
life's too short," he tells her, sounding like someone who O.D.'d on
Busby Berkeley musicals.
 So Olivia does what any mom would. She goes home, wrings her
lovely hands over another one of her wild-eyed husband Adam's (Brian
Stokes Mitchell) poker games ("Don't worry about that mess -- you can
clean it up in the morning," hubby cheerfully tells her) and then turns
to her infant daughter Kayla for advice. "Tell me what to do," Olivia
whispers to the baby and although it's unlikely the child replied "hit
the road," that's Olivia's next move.
 Fast-forward 18 years, and Kayla, still clueless about her
mom's true identity, has turned into an exotic beauty who wins dinner
with the now-successful Olivia in a radio contest. Yes, the mother and
child reunion is only a filet mignon away, but when Olivia drops her
little love bomb, Kayla crabs she wants nothing to do with "America's
crown princess, who does everything for needy children, but left one of
her own behind."
 Can the promise of superstardom override the heartache of
abandonment? Olivia thinks so, and uses her clout and connections to
turn Kayla into a sensation. This is one of those stories in which the
wide-eyed ingenue comes to New York one day, lands an agent and a record
deal before unpacking her bags and has the Number Two song in America
before week's end. But even though mom goes to extremes to please, there
are still trials aplenty before the big finale in which Kayla struts her
stuff in front of a sold-out audience of the best-behaved teens in
history. It's easily the least credible concert scene since Barbra
Streisand sang "Woman in the Moon" to silence an arena full of rowdy
rockers in "A Star Is Born."
 At least the producers of "Platinum" allowed Brandy to throw a
couple of her hits ("Have You Ever?" and "Almost Doesn't Count") on the
soundtrack, although the woefully staged production number that
accompanies "Happy" is embarassingly silly with some of the worst
choreography since the last Lynda Carter variety special.
 As evidenced by her work in her UPN series "Moesha" and last
year's "I Still Know What You Did Last Summer," Brandy the actress has a
certain quiet charm. When she tries to convey rage or grief however,
she's well outside her range and the results are amateurish. In her
defense, the character of Kayla as written seems almost schizoid, going
from cherub to shrew and back at the drop of a hat.
 Like any piece of classic cheese, "Platinum" gives both its
stars several memorably overwrought  lines: "I was a real person once,"
"You don't get any prizes for abandoning your baby," and "Let me mend
your heart, even though I'm the one who broke it" are some choice
examples. Yes, this is a terrible movie, gracelessly directed by Robert
Allan Ackerman and crowned by a would-be showstopping disco romp by Ross
that shouldn't give Cher any sleepless nights. But for fans of
high-gloss nonsense, there hasn't been anything to equal this since
Whitney Houston was cast as an Oscar-nominated actress in "The
Bodyguard." Fiascos of this magnitude don't come along every day and
deserve to be savored. James Sanford

Title
Review for Postman Always Rings Twice, The (1946)
         Considered smutty back in the days when novels could still be
"banned in Boston," "The Postman Always Rings Twice" nevertheless became
a best-seller upon publication in 1934. It was still a hot potato over a
decade later when MGM decided to film it, and considerable laundering of
the book's language and sexual content were required before "Postman"
could withstand the scrutiny of the censors.
 Despite the whitewash, the John Garfield/Lana Turner version is
far superior to the 1981 Jack Nicholson/Jessica Lange remake, which,
despite being more faithful to Cain, is a dreary slog with only Lange's
striking performance to recommend it. In contrast, Garfield and Turner
electrify; there's no nudity or on-screen sex in the picture, yet the
erotic charge between these two is incredibly potent. Moving at an
almost breathless pace, "Postman" sends wanderer Frank Chambers
(Garfield) into the orbit of heavenly body Cora Smith (Turner), the
dissatisfied wife of Nick (Cecil Kellaway), owner of the Twin Oaks Lunch
Room. Frank is hired as a jack-of-all-trades and almost instantly sets
about giving Cora a helping hand in her plans to turn the none-too-busy
restaurant into a major attraction. A major attraction also develops
between the two, and it isn't long before they're taking moonlit swims
together and cooking up plans to get rid of congenial lush Nick.
 Despite a ludicrous score that underlines each plot twist with
screaming strings, "Postman" remains an amazing piece of work, certainly
the finest film ever turned out by Tay Garnett, a workman-like director
who made scores of undistinguished pictures during his 40-year career.
Garnett gives Turner one of the most memorable entrances in film
history: She's introduced as the camera pans up from her white shoes to
her magnificent legs to her clinging white outfit, crowned by a white
turban. Platinum blonde Cora's wardrobe becomes the movie's most subtle
joke -- almost everything is white, including her beret and her bathing
suit! Turner, never the most versatile of actresses, is startlingly
alive here; as a star who was celebrated more for her figure than for
her talent, perhaps she could relate to the role of a young woman who
feels her light is being hidden underneath the bushel of a confining
marriage. When Cora becomes infuriated, as in the scene in which Frank
talks about looking for bargains and Cora hisses "you won't find
anything cheap here," that fire shoots out, and Turner's eyes could burn
holes in the screen.
 As the happy-go-lucky Frank, Garfield is equally arresting. He
understood -- as Nicholson did not -- that in order for the audience to
identify with Frank, he must come off as an everyday guy pulled by fate
into an inescapable whirlpool of lust and paranoia. James Sanford

Title
Review for Out-of-Towners, The (1999)
Like a paper dress or a Bobby Sherman 45, Neil Simon's "The Out of
Towners" is one of those relics of the early 1970s that hasn't
improved with age. Seen today, the Jack Lemmon/Sandy Dennis comedy
about an Ohio couple who suffer almost every conceivable humiliation
during their weekend in New York comes off as a grating one-note bore
that relies entirely on a perceived universal aversion toward NYC and
its residents for its humor.
At least the 1999 version of "The Out-of-Towners" (the original title
was not hypenated, but this one is; go figure) is canny enough to
acknowledgethat attitudes toward the Big Apple have changed
dramatically in the last 30 years.  "I only hated New York when it was
hip to hate New York," scoffs advertising exec Henry Clark (Steve
Martin) when his wife Nancy (Goldie Hawn) reminds him how much he
dislikes Gotham.
Lifelong Ohioans Henry and Nancy head east when he's offered an
interview at a prominent Manhattan agency. Their agenda is to fly into
the city, stay overnight, go to the meeting and return home. Of
course, if everything went according to the plan, there wouldn't be
much of a movie.
How much you enjoy this "Out-of-Towners" will have a lot to do with
how many times you can laugh at what amounts to a series of variations
on the same joke. The script by Marc Lawrence (based on Simon's
original) is essentially one minor catastrophe after another - flight
problems, car problems, hotel problems, cab problems, etc. - for Henry
and Nancy to muddle through. Some of these are funny, some are not,
almost all are utterly predictable.
The movie is funniest when it diverges from the woe-is-us concept to
allow Hawn and Martin a little comic breathing room. It's much more
amusing to see Hawn attempt to seduce an L.A. smoothie (Mark McKinney)
or to tell a guy she mistakes for Andrew Lloyd Webber how "Cats" "hit
so home for us" than it is to see her scurrying away from an attack
dog or creating unintentional havoc on a plane. Martin's best moments
come at the beginning and end of the picture, in an airport goodbye
scene with his son and in an amusing homage to Milos Forman's film of
"Hair."
Aside from John Cleese as a wonderfully starchy (at least in public)
hotel manager and a wonderful little joke about a sedan's faulty
navigational system, the rest of "The Out-of-Towners" is uninspired if
not unpleasant.  The picture would have had a bit more punch if
director Sam Weisman had any clues about staging slapstick
sequences. The physical comedy here is overblown and clumsy.
Nor does Weisman seem to have had much control over his extras. The
background people in this movie, particularly in the Logan Airport
scenes, often seem to be trying to steal the focus away from Martin
and Hawn.  The result is so distracting it's hard to believe nobody
called for a reshoot.

Title
Review for Astronaut's Wife, The (1999)
         Here's further proof Hollywood's powers that be have no sense
whatsoever: Last week, the trade paper Variety reported we'll soon be
treated to a "Starsky and Hutch" movie.
 Yes, "Starsky and Hutch," that utterly vapid 1970s cop series
featuring David Soul and Paul Michael Glaser as undercover cops who
regularly cruised discos with their sidekick Huggy Bear (Antonio
Fargas), a dopey would-be pimp. Has anyone even thought about "Starsky
and Hutch" since it left the air 20 years ago? It's just the latest sign
that absolutely anything can be turned into big-screen fodder these
days, provided it's been done before.
  Take, for example, "The Astronaut's Wife," in which pixieish
schoolteacher Charlize Theron begins to suspect her husband is not the
man he used to be. Although writer-director Rand Ravich doesn't
acknowledge as much in the credits, the movie is essentially an update
of the 1958 drive-in classic "I Married A Monster From Outer Space,"
which, like "Invaders From Mars" (1953) and "Invasion of the Body
Snatchers" (1955), utilized the prevailing fear of Communism and loss of
individuality in a sci-fi context.
 In "Monster," newlywed Gloria Talbot is spooked by spouse Tom
Tryon's aloofness and the way he and the other men in town gather down
at the bar every night simply to talk, not to drink. Eventually, she
learns Tryon and most of the other local guys are actually
alcohol-intolerant creatures from the planet Andromeda who have stolen
human bodies. Their plan is to impregnate women and repopulate Earth
with monsters like themselves.
 In "Wife," Theron's Jillian becomes pregnant with twins shortly
after her husband Spence (Johnny Depp) returns from a space shuttle
mission during which he lost contact with mission control for two
mysterious minutes. Although joyous at first, Jillian is unnerved by
Spence's strange behavior -- including the odd faces he makes after
tasting a drink at a party -- and begins to think something might be
horribly wrong.
 Jillian makes this assumption so early on in the story one
might expect Ravich has a big twist up his sleeve, a la "The Sixth
Sense." But no. Once it has set its course, the languorous "Wife"
lumbers to a wholly predictable conclusion made worse by Ravich's
attempt to throw in an unsurprising surprise at the very last minute.
 The movie is also handicapped by its casting. Theron, in a role
almost identical to her part in "The Devil's Advocate," tries terribly
hard but she's not a skilled enough actress to carry a film on her own.
She can manage one emotional state per scene, usually tearful shock,
which doesn't make for a particularly fascinating character.
 Although the always edgy Depp might seem the perfect choice to
play a man who may or may not be under an alien influence, the actor has
little to do here but stand around looking ominous. He's stifled by the
script; Ravich shows us so little of the early Spence it's difficult to
determine exactly how much the man has changed.
 The other key figures in "Wife" are as run-of-the-mill as they
come, including a possibly crazy former NASA exec (Joe Morton),
Jillian's hard-luck kid sister (Clea DuVall) and an understanding
veteran astronaut's wife (Blair Brown) who counsels Jillian. Only DuVall
shows any signs of life, putting a nasty spin on such lines to her
sister as "you landed Johnny Rocket Boy and I keep getting different
versions of Throws Up On Himself Elmo."
 Ravich tries to disguise his well-worn material with bursts of
stolen style, having the camera do Brian DePalma-style circles around
Jillian in moments of stress or throwing in a weird little MTV-ish
episode with Jillian standing perfectly still in a school hallway while
children run around her at lightning speed. Perhaps Ravich was so
concerned with making the movie look good he forgot about coherence:
Those who like to pick out continuity errors will particularly enjoy the
sequence in which our heroine ducks into a subway station in the middle
of the night and emerges minutes later in the light of day. James
Sanford

Title
Review for Ice Storm, The (1997)
In Suburbia, circa 1973, however, most of the principals in "The Ice
Storm" seem content to follow the lyrics of the Hombres' hit and "let
it all hang out." Even the young reverend attends a local swingers'
party, noting (via a scary metaphor) that "sometimes the shepherd
needs the company of the sheep."
Everyone who wants company seems to find it. Ben Hood (Kevin
Kline) carries on a dead-end affair with neighbor Jane (Sigourney
Weaver), the quintessential bored housewife, who rejects Ben's
attempts at afterglow intimacy. "I have a husband," she snaps. "I
don't particularly feel the need for another." Ben's teenage daughter
Wendy (the brilliant Christina Ricci, a long way from "Casper" and
"That Darn Cat") makes time with both of Jane's sons, the overly
sensitive Mikey (Elijah Wood) and the twisted Sandy (Adam Hann-Byrd),
a budding psycho who graduates from blowing up toy planes to savaging
rose bushes with a whip. Even Ben's wife Elena (Joan Allen), after a
failed attempt to release her pent-up sexual tension through
shoplifting, begins looking for a more satisfying outlet.
The irony, of course, is that even though there's plenty of
physical togetherness, emotionally everyone is on their own
channel. And, often it seems as if director Ang Lee is purposely
keeping these needy characters at arm's length as well, and his
frequent cutaways to shots of ice cubes, ice cube trays and ice
buckets are not exactly the most subtle way to let us know what he
thinks of the residents of New Canaan.
But "The Ice Storm" is most effective at capturing the
desperately hip attitude that seemed to hang like incense smoke around
upper-middle-class/lower-middle-age adults in the early years of the
Me Decade. From the huge Peter Pan collars that sprout from the shirts
of the men to bedside copies of "Watership Down" and "When She Was
Good," Lee's film is a catalogue of scary '70's trendiness, and it
climaxes with a wife-swapping "key party" ("one of those California
things," a participant notes, excitedly) that today seems as peculiar
as an Aztec ceremony. Somehow in the wake of AIDS, it's easier to
relate to the sexually repressive atmosphere of "The Wings of the
Dove" than the wildly self-indulgent free-for-alls of "The Ice Storm."
James Sanford

Title
Review for Metroland (1997)
 If you thought that exchange was taken from director Stanley
Kubrick's "Eyes Wide Shut," you're wrong, but not terribly far off the
mark. It's actually from "Metroland," a British drama based on Julian
Barnes' 1980 novel. Both "Metroland" and "Eyes" deal with a comfortable
marriage jeopardized by temptation, but whereas Kubrick's film had the
wife (Nicole Kidman) instigating the conflict, in "Metroland" it's the
husband who opens Pandora's box.
 "Metroland" is set in 1977. Chris (Christian Bale) has settled
down comfortably in a middle-class London suburb with his wife Marion
(Emily Watson) and their baby daughter. He's got the job, the mortgage,
the car payments, the backyard garden and all that goes with it. Then
Chris' old pal Toni (Lee Ross) shows up, still living the swinging life
in his mid-30s. Now Chris has something else to deal with: self-doubt.
 He flashes back to his days in Paris almost a decade ago, when
he wore black turtlenecks, attended Truffaut movies and dreamed of being
a photographer. Did he make the right choice in leaving behind that
bohemian lifestyle for the safety and tranquility of his homeland? Would
he have been happier had he stuck with his free-spirited French lover
Annica (Elsa Zylberstein), instead of abandoning her to go off with
Marion? The primary difference between the character of Chris in
"Metroland" and Bill (Tom Cruise) in "Eyes" is that while Bill went
looking for thrills in the present day, Chris is probing his past,
looking back on what he's already done.
 "Metroland" is likely to strike a chord with a lot of young
husbands, especially those who find themselves sometimes envying their
single friends. Though the movie is considerably more straightforward
than "Eyes" and doesn't have an enormous amount of ground-breaking
information to impart about making marriages work, Bale and Watson are
utterly credible, as is the beguiling Zylberstein in a role that might
have gone to Teri Garr 15 years ago.
 Adrian Hodges' script manages to mix a bit of fantasy into
Chris' mundane existance without throwing off the tone of the film, but
his real strength is his dialogue; some of his words have surprising
sting. Especially memorable is the first conversation between Chris and
Marion, in which he insists he'll never get married and live in the
suburbs. "I think you will," she tells him. "You're not original enough
not to."  James Sanford

Title
Review for Gloria (1999)
Roger Ebert has often brought up the idea that instead of rehashing
the classics, filmmakers should concentrate on revising movies that
weren't very good to begin with. Hollywood may have taken his comments
to heart.
Director Terrence Malick's "The Thin Red Line" is a loose remake of
the unsuccessful 1964 film of the same name, and now director Sidney
Lumet has tackled "Gloria," based on a 1980 melodrama that was nothing
to shout about, but did feature a memorably flinty, Oscar-nominated
performance by Gena Rowlands.
And what are the results of these experiments?  Malick's epic is
flawed but intermittently fascinating, rife with luscious
imagery. "Gloria," on the other hand, finds Sharon Stone doing her
darnedest to squeeze into Rowlands' high heels, and it doesn't take
long to see they don't become her.
Rowlands' Gloria was a bitter ex-gangster's moll whose heart had long
ago gone into a deep-freeze. Stone's Gloria, aside from the occasional
flip remark or crude comment, turns out to be a soft-shell crab. For a
woman who's supposedly so street-seasoned, she's weirdly skittish and
sentimental.
The reason for her transformation from bad mutha to mother figure is
Nicky Nunez (Jean-Luke Figueroa), a 7-year-old whose family was been
massacred by the henchmen of Gloria's ex-boyfriend Kevin (Jeremy
Northam), minutes after Nicky's dad sent the kid off with a valuable
computer disk and a teary "you da man." For reasons never made clear,
the supposedly steely Gloria steals Nicky from Kevin's clutches and
gives him a tour of New York, all the while dodging the bad guys who
want that precious disk.
Unable to commit to being a thriller or a character study, the movie
settles for being an excitement-free drag. Lumet, whose talent peaked
25 years ago with "Dog Day Afternoon" and "Network," throws in one
amazingly sloppy car chase, but otherwise does nothing to perk up the
picture's sluggish pace.
Stone's work here has two modes, shrill and mushy, and her Noo Yawk
accent quickly unravels; in one scene she's talking about having been
in jail for "twee" years, while in the next she sharply pronounces the
"h" in "therapy." Bad dialects also hobble Northam and even George
C. Scott, who turns up briefly as one of Gloria's former sugar
daddies.
If there's anything to be said in the movie's favor, it's that
"Gloria" offers a few glimmers of the natural wit Stone demonstrated
during her recent appearance on Bravo's "Inside the Actors' Studio."
After Nicky, who's shared her motel bed the night before, tells Gloria
he likes sleeping with her, Stone delivers her reply - "You're not the
first guy to tell me that" - with a smug sneer that would have made
Mae West proud. James Sanford

Title
Review for Edge, The (1997)
THE EDGE
(Twentieth-Century Fox)
Directed by Lee Tamahori
        There's something irresistibly intriguing about the idea of a
wilderness-survival story penned by playwright David Mamet ("Glengarry
Glen Ross") and featuring the anything-but-rough-and-tumble Anthony
Hopkins in the lead. The concept seems so far-fetched it leads "The
Edge" some certifiable curiosity value right from the start. Add in the
intensity of Mr. Actors' Studio himself, Alec Baldwin, and you know you
must be in for a wild ride.
        Or perhaps not. The most startling thing about "The Edge" is how
traditional the whole thing seems. Bookwormish Hopkins and oily
fashion-photographer Baldwin, stranded in the Canadian countryside after
a plane crash, confront a variety of dangers and --- in typical Mamet
style --- have to get in touch with their inner manliness before they
can
return to civilization. A few scattered profanities, a couple of gory
accidents and a subplot about suspected adultery are all that separates
this story from the grade-school classic "My Side of the Mountain."
        Mamet's screenplay seems to have something it wants to say about
the
changing definitions of manhood, but his message never quite comes
through as director Lee Tamahori keeps interrupting the story for
regular visits from a cranky Kodiak who seems to get his kicks out of
terrorizing our heroes. The bear attacks get progressively sillier and
less believable until the inevitable final confrontation, a moment that
requires an enormous suspension of disbelief.
        "The Edge" is on steadier ground dealing with its human
characters:
Although neither of them is particularly amiable, both have some
unexpected dimensions, and Hopkins and Baldwin deliver nuanced
performances. Another major plus is the movie's gorgeous photography
which makes the wilds of Alberta look like a great place to get lost in.

Title
Review for Lost & Found (1999/I)
The spectre of Cameron Diaz hangs heavily over "Lost & Found," and not
just because the film climaxes with David Spade rocking out with a
version of Neil Diamond's "Brother Love's Travelling Salvation Show"
that outdoes Diaz's tuneless rendition of "I Just Don't Know What To
Do With Myself" in "My Best Friend's Wedding.
Long before that unnerving sight, anyone who went to the movies last
summer will recognize "Lost" for what it is: a diluted variation on
Diaz's blockbuster "There's Something About Mary." Instead of bodily
fluids in hair, "Lost" offers dog excrement being smeared on the face;
in place of the now-infamous zipper gag, we get Spade trying to
conceal his naked figure in an apron after losing big in a strip poker
game.
For the under-12 crowd who couldn't persuade Mom and Dad to rent
"Mary" for them, this might serve as a decent substitute. But anyone
who's not a dyed-in-the-wool Spade fan might be crying "Just Shoot Me"
well in advance of the closing credits - which, by the way, try to do
for Deee-Lite's "Groove is in the Heart" what "Mary" did for the
Foundations' "Build Me Up Buttercup."
Spade, with customary smirks intact, plays Dylan Ramsey, a bistro
owner who spends considerably more time trying to put the make on
comely French neighbor Lila (Sophie Marceau) than he does putting out
kitchen fires and dealing with customers.As part of his plot to catch
Lila's eye, Dylan kidnaps her beloved dog Jack, and when Lila becomes
distraught over her chien's disappearance, Dylan is right there with a
shoulder to cry on.
Unfortunately, it's Dylan's turn to weep when the voracious Jack
swallows a diamond ring Dylan was holding on to for a friend. And the
tears just keep on coming as one of Dylan's employees, the
relentlessly jolly Wally (Artie Lange) decides to turn himself into a
clone of the boss.
Lange, in a part obviously designed to position him as a replacement
for the late Chris Farley (Spade's co-star in "Tommy Boy" and "Black
Sheep"), comes off as merely a pale imitation; say what you will about
Farley, but he had considerably more bluster and gusto than this new
model. As for Marceau, she's adorable and earned every franc of her
paycheck.
But the primary fun here comes from an unbilled cameo by Jon Lovitz as
a "certified dog whisperer" Dylan enlists in the hopes of retrieving
the ring. To call the rest of the humor in "Lost & Found" hit or miss
would be kind.

Title
Review for Third Man, The (1949)
         Post-WWII America was a place of prosperity and hope. But in
Europe, the conditions were quite different, and few films have captured
the grim atmosphere of the late 1940s as memorably as "The Third Man,"
director Carol Reed's 1949 classic. Shot on location in the war-ravaged
streets of Vienna and written by Graham Greene ("The End of the
Affair"), the movie succeeds both as a thriller and as a mood piece,
evoking a joyless world in which almost everyone has a past they won't
discuss and a future they can't fathom.
 For years, we've been watching a 93-minute cut of "The Third
Man," but now Criterion has reissued the film with 11 extra minutes
previously seen only in the European release. The additions prove you
can never have too much of a good thing.
 Set at the time of the Allied occupation, the story begins with
American author Holly Martins (Joseph Cotten) arriving in Vienna to take
a job with his long-lost buddy Harry Lime (Orson Welles). But within
minutes of getting off the train, Martins is told Lime recently died in
an accident. The conflicting stories of the alleged witnesses to the
death make Martins suspicious and, despite protests from British officer
Calloway (Trevor Howard), Martins tracks down Lime's girlfriend Anna
(Alida Valli) and begins searching for the truth about his friend's
fate.
 Elements of German Expressionism, Italian Neo-Realism and
American film noir pop up regularly throughout "The Third Man," but Reed
forges them all into a magnificent whole. The titled camera angles
beautifully express Martins' sense of disorientation as he makes his way
through the city and sound and shadow become as much a part of the
action as any of the characters. Decades before Dolby Stereo, Reed
managed to find a way to make it appear voices were coming at the
villain from all directions during the movie's final chase through the
sewers.
 Unforgettable images and scenes abound: an angelic-looking
little boy accusing Martins of murder; a taut meeting between two men on
a ferris wheel; the unnerving sight of fingers poking up through a grate
in the street like blades of grass struggling to sprout in a rocky bed.
The music, performed entirely on the zither by Anton Karas, is some of
the most striking ever heard in a film.
 Meanwhile, Greene's dialogue crackles with grim humor and
frankness. "You were born to be murdered," Calloway tells Martins, while
the utterly disillusioned Anna's entire outlook on life is summed up in
one of her first lines: "I don't know anything anymore, except that I
want to be dead, too," she murmurs to Martins when he questions her
about Lime's untimely demise.
 While the mystery is certainly compelling enough, the
relationship between Anna and Martins is truly the heart of the film. He
falls hopelessly for her and makes a difficult sacrifice in the hopes of
winning her affection, but she's too nihilistic to put any stock in
love. Were it made today, a happy ending would probably be imposed on
these two, but Greene and Reed understood that in real life people who
don't want to be saved rarely thank those who try to rescue them. James
Sanford

Title
Review for Powwow Highway (1989)
POWWOW HIGHWAY (Warner Bros.)
Directed by Jonathan Wacks
 The acclaim heaped on the recent Native American drama "Smoke Signals" has
prompted a re-discovery of "Powwow Highway," director Jonathan Wacks'
similarly themed 1989 comedy-drama about a Northern Cheyenne odd couple who
leave their reservation and face myriad troubles in the white man's world.
Briefly -- and rather unceremoniously -- released by Warner Bros. before
being shuttled to video, "Powwow" has built up both a cult following and a
substantial critical reputation. It will play the Urban Institute for
Contemporary Arts this month.
 Next to "Smoke Signals" "Powwow" looks almost slick, with A Martinez (of
TV's "Santa Barbara" and "L.A. Law") as the disgruntled Buddy Redbow, who's
always on guard against outsiders trying to offer Indians a helping hand.
Faced with what sounds like a potentially lucrative land deal proposed by
some white businessmen, Redbow resists the offer and insists it will wind up
the way all transactions between Indians and whites do: "You get what you
want and we get the shaft," he snarls. He's intensely bitter about his
surroundings -- "This here ain't the American dream we're living," he says
of the reservation. "This here's the Third World" -- but he's also willing
to fight to hold on to what little he has.
 His best friend Philbert (Gary Farmer) is also his complete opposite, a
gentle giant who chooses to tap into Indian spirituality and tradition, even
though almost everyone else in his neighborhood ridicules him. When Redbow's
sister Bonnie (Joannelle Nadine Romero) and her kids are hauled into jail on
a trumped-up drug charge, Redbow and Philbert must make the trek from
Montana to New Mexico in a rickety 1964 Buick to bail her out. The journey
is peppered with comic run-ins with a tactless car-stereo salesman, vaguely
ethereal experiences which bewilder Redbow and confirm Philbert's beliefs
and a few mild clashes between the buddies over their very different
lifestyles. Redbow, for instance, shames Philbert for his diet of "sugar,
grease and beer" while smoking a joint.
 Martinez gives a solid, thoroughly credible performance, but it's Farmer
who makes the movie truly special; look at his half-amused/half-offended
reaction to a TV commercial featuring a car dealer wearing a feathered
headdress and whooping it up. He makes Philbert a truly memorable character.
Director Wacks has only made two films since "Powwow"; the
less-than-dazzling Ethan Hawke vehicle "Mystery Date" and a
straight-to-cable comedy called "Ed and His Dead Mother." Neither has a
fraction of the wit or insight of this uneven but engaging slice-of-life.
Unjustly neglected by audiences and by its distributor the first time
around, "Powwow" certainly deserves a second chance. James Sanford

Title
Review for Contact (1997)
        ``Contact'' is certain to inspire dozens of questions, but one
immediately springs to mind: Why can't director Robert Zemeckis
release a film every July? His mid-summer movies have long been a
welcome vacation from what's traditionally the season of
brainlessness. Five years ago this month his deliciously bitter
``Death Becomes Her'' debuted, and in 1994 his ``Forrest Gump'' turned
a worthless book into a Best Picture winner.
  Both of those films relied heavily on gimmicks: In
``Death,'' Oscar-winning special-effects put a gaping hole through
Goldie Hawn, while ``Gump'' employed computer imagery to put Tom Hanks
at the scene of practically every major event in recent American
history except the Moon landing. Despite its otherworldly set-up,
``Contact'' looks unflashy by comparison.
  Somewhat freely adapted from astronomer Carl Sagan's best
seller, the film uses the search for intelligent extraterrestial life
as the springboard for a thought-provoking exploration of the age-old
conflict of religion versus science, and faith vs. physical evidence.
  On one side is radio astronomer Ellie Arroway (Jodie
Foster), who's spent years listening to space static, waiting for some
sort of signal to emerge.  Her obsessiveness has made her something of
a laughingstock: Even her boss asks her if she's ``still waiting for
E.T to call.''
  Representing the other side of the argument is Palmer Joss
(Matthew McConaughey), referred to in some circles as ``God's
diplomat'' and a high-level spiritual leader who advises even the
president. In a move unusual for Hollywood, Joss is not written as a
holier-than-thou hypocrite or a God-fearing bumpkin, but as a
science-savvy intellectual who knows how to argue. A creepy zealot,
who's a dead ringer for '70s rocker Edgar Winter, represents the more
extreme end of the spectrum.
  The build-up of the film is exceptionally well written, as
``Contact'' gives us two attractive adults who actually discuss issues
and concepts instead of trading coy double entendres.
  Even potential cliches such as the paranoid national
security adviser (a taut James Woods) and a billionaire recluse
(played as a sly enigma by John Hurt) take on some resonance, thanks
to the stylishness of the script.
  Though she initially seems a none-too-balanced flake, Ellie
evolves into a brave woman, desperate to bridge the galactic gap, and
Foster is just about without peer when it comes to portraying earthy
idealists.
  McConaughey, in a part that's smaller than his billing would
indicate, invests Palmer with charm and a certain degree of
credibility. There's an intriguing friction between Palmer and Ellie
that both McConaughey and Foster are obviously in tune with, and they
make philosophical debate seem mighty sexy.
  Despite the best cinematic lightshow since ``2001: A Space
Odyssey,'' the crucial encounter proves to be dramatically
unfulfilling, the only part of the picture that doesn't deliver. But
screenwriters James V. Hart and Michael Goldenberg rebound with a
crowd-pleasing final twist perfectly suited to the movie's generally
understated tone.

Title
Review for Rhinestone (1984)
 Think of all those great cinematic couples: Clark Gable and Carole Lombard;
Katharine Hepburn and Spencer Tracy; Rock Hudson and Doris Day; Woody Allen
and Diane Keaton. Does the teaming of Sylvester Stallone and Dolly Parton
sound like a pairing to rank with the likes of those?
 If you say no right off the bat, you can spare yourself the agony of
sitting through "Rhinestone," which takes two miserable hours to demonstrate
the total lack of chemistry between these two stars, both of whom proceed
through the film looking as if they lost a bet with their agent.
 "Rhinestone" tells of successful country singer Jake Ferris (Parton, not
exactly cast against type) who, thanks to a lousy contract, is stuck
performing nightly in the Rhinestone, the rowdiest club in New York. Tired
of dodging her boss (Ron Leibman) and his lecherous moves, Jake makes a deal
with him: If, within two weeks, she can turn an ordinary guy off the street
into a convincing balladeer, he'll have to release her from her glitzy
prison to seek better prospects.
 And who should stumble onto the scene but Nick Martinelli (Stallone), a
mouthy Italian-American cab driver who claims to hate country music "worse
than liver," one of the film's many rib-tickling one-liners. After Jake's
meddling costs him his job, Nick agrees to go along with the transformation
process. "My Fair Rocky," anyone?
 "Rhinestone" is a depressing affair and much of the blame can be placed
squarely on Stallone's brawny shoulders. His idea of comic acting is to yell
as loud and as often as possible, generally while striking goofy poses. But
even that shtick is preferrable to his singing, which frequently sounds like
a malfunctioning chainsaw and would be better-suited to a heavy-metal act.
 In addition, through his overhauling of Phil Alden Robinson's screenplay,
Stallone has managed to squeeze himself into nearly every scene, banishing
Parton to the sidelines, where she tries valiantly to look amused and
charmed by his antics; she succeeds only in coming off like a weary hostess
waiting  for an obnoxious drunken guest to pass out so she can put the
lampshade back where it belongs.
 Parton gets no respect from director Bob Clark ("Porky's") either, who
seems to have been unable to utter the word "cut" when it came to Stallone's
hamming. Small wonder Parton only looks at ease when she's singing, and
thankfully Stallone excuses himself from the picture on a couple of
occasions to allow her time to warble a few pleasant tunes.
 Parton should not feel alone in having been slighted by the script, which
doggedly goes out of its way to offend everyone in the vacinity -- not to
mention the audience. At least it's equal-opportunity stereotyping, as
Stallone's wildly gesticulating, lip-smacking parents are every bit as
intolerable as Parton's "golly gosh" backwoodsy friends. A breezy pace might
have helped to obscure the poor writing and awkward performances, but Clark
offers no help in that department. "Rhinestone" plods along, stopping dead
in its tracks everytime Stallone feels the need to mug for the camera or
deliver an unintelligible, unfunny ad lib.
 The capper to this fiasco is an utterly ridiculous finale in which Jake and
Nick storm the stage of the Rhinestone, wailing "Stay Out of My Bedroom"
("Stay Out of the Theater" might have been a more inspired choice) and
wisecracking about each other as if they were the Sonny and Cher of country
music.
 They should live so long.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Your Friends & Neighbors (1998)
Last week on a radio talk show, an author was discussing his new book about
how the workplace could be redesigned to feed the spiritual needs of
employees. When people tell you everything is "fine," he said, the word
should be thought of as an acronym for "feelings inside not expressed."
 That theory is proven again and again throughout "Your Friends and
Neighbors," a vicious, not-for-the-faint-of-heart comedy-drama in which
seemingly nice folks frequently gather in restaurants, bookstores and bars
to reassure each other that everything in their lives and relationships is
"fine." Once these same people get behind closed doors, however, they offer
plenty of evidence to the contrary.
 If you saw writer-director Neil Labute's "In the Company of Men" last year,
you know he's not exactly Mr. Feelgood and, if anything, this second effort
is even darker and more nihilistic than "Men" because so many of  the
"Friends" are easily recognizible types. They don't, however, identify each
other personally, so it's only by reading the press notes that we learn all
their first names rhyme, almost as if they were sextuplets born to parents
with a misguided sense of humor.
 Marrieds Mary (Amy Brenneman) and Barry (Aaron Eckhart, considerably
paunchier and meeker than he was as the lady-killer in "Men") just bought a
lovely old house but it's no love nest, thanks to their sexual
incompatability. On the other hand, copywriter Terri (Catherine Keener) and
drama teacher Jerry (Ben Stiller) do have sex, but Terri can't tolerate
Jerry's habit of shouting out things like "harmony! harmony!" in the heat of
passion. Outside of these two couples stand Cheri (Nastassja Kinski), a
free-spirited artist's assistant, and Cary (Jason Patric), a misogynstic
gynecologist whose tales of vengeance against women wow Barry and Jerry.
 Though these people barely touch each other, in some ways "Friends"
qualifies as one of the most violent movies of the year. Behind Cary's dull
eyes lies an arctic wasteland and just listening to his eerie sermonettes
about sex could give you frostbite. Scariest of all, this super-arrogant
stud justifies much of the evil he perpetrates by telling his audience,
"You'd have taken the same steps: Common decency dictated it."
 Terri is almost as nasty, a hawkish creature with a face by Modigliani and
an attitude copped from a spoiled child. Asked by one of her lovers what
part of their lovemaking she most enjoyed, Terri snarls, "the silence,"
making it clear that's the end of the discussion. "Nobody actually likes
you, you know?" Cary tells Terri during a particularly heated exchange in a
bookstore; the comment doesn't faze self-absorbed Terri in the slightest.
 As "Friends" rolls along, circumstances arise that cause everyone to
re-think their lives and to take hasty action. In most cases, of course,
they do exactly the wrong thing, and Labute, again employing the same
detached point-of-view he showed in his first film, charts his characters'
moral declines mercilessly. Everyone ends up crawling from the wreckage,
some more battered than others, but none unscathed.
 The atmosphere here is sterile and deliberately calculated to focus
attention solely on these six subjects, all of whom are well-detailed,
especially by Keener, Eckhart and the quietly charming Kinski. Those who
bristle at frank talk are likely to find listening to Labute's dialogue as
unpleasant as having sandpaper rubbed against their ears for two hours
andthe story's final twist should ensure no one leaves the theater whistling
a happy tune.
 But if you can get past the shock value, there's a veritable banquet of
food for thought being presented here, as well as a wealth of humor in the
conversations. Particularly memorable are the ones that revolve around the
ridiculous "watch bracelet" Barry buys his wife as a gift -- "they're quite
big in Europe," he assures her -- and the almost-whispered argument between
Barry and Mary in a supermarket. "We need to treat each other like meat,"
Barry tells her. "Didn't we read that?" As Mary walks away in dazed disgust,
Barry can't resist getting in the final word: "It was your book!" he bleats.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Cruel Intentions (1999)
On the surface, a teen version of "Les Liaisons Dangereuses" sounds
like it might be workable. After all, Hollywood managed to transplant
Wim Wenders' "Wings of Desire" to Los Angeles and sell it as "City of
Angels," so why shouldn't writer-director Roger Kumble take a crack at
reconstructing Choderlos De Laclos' tale of romantic intrigue in
modern-day Manhattan?
"Cruel Intentions" offers 97 minutes worth of good reasons why
not. Though glossy in the extreme and occasionally imaginative, the
movie never gets past a crucial structural flaw: Behavior that would
have scandalized pre-Revolutionary France would scarcely raise an
eyebrow among today's drug-dazed and sex-crazed Upper East Side
crowd. So right off thebat, "Intentions" is in trouble.
Matters aren't helped by the casting of the colorless Ryan Phillippe
as Sebastian, this version's equivalent of Valmont. In "Dangerous
Liaisons," director Stephen Frears' acclaimed 1988 film based on De
Laclos' novel, John Malkovich's Valmont was the personification of
passionless sexuality; when he spoke, it sounded as if there were
icicles in between each word.  That Phillippe has studied Malkovich's
portrayal is clearly evident in his attempts to duplicate that sort of
eerie diction, but Phillippe's unfortunate tendency to fall back on
poses and pouts flattens his performance.
Sarah Michelle Gellar, obviously drawing on her years of playing the
bad seed on "All My Children," vamps through the Merteuil role with a
certain amount of style, although the script gives the character very
little backstory.  Screenwriter Christopher Hampton's "Liaisons"
presented Merteuil's devious games as a sort of twisted
feminism. Kumble simply sees her as a two-faced tramp.
"Intentions" pairs wealthy reprobates Catherine (Gellar) and Sebastian
as stepsiblings who plot the downfalls of graceless Cecile (Selma
Blair) and angelic Annette (Reese Witherspoon, who far outclasses her
part), an ingenue from Kansas City who trumpets her virginity in
interviews the way Brooke Shields used to do. Seduction, drugs and
homosexuality figure into the course of events, but, like the virtuous
Annette, "Intentions" is all tease and no action. There was more
nudity in "Dangerous Liaisons" and you'd find more eroticism in the
average "Dawson's Creek" episode.
Perhaps we'd find more exciting material on the cutting room floor,
since it appears "Intentions" underwent some kind of last-minute
hatchet job; for better or for worse, Joshua Jackson, Christine
Baranski and Sean Patrick Thomas barely show up before they disappear,
never to be seen again.

Title
Review for Story of Us, The (1999)
        On one level, "The Story of Us" plays like one of those shallow
"dramedies" that turn up regularly on the Lifetime network. Most of the
pain it exposes is surface level, the conflicts often feel manufactured
and the comic elements writers Alan Zweibel and Jessie Nelson have
shoehorned into their script generally operate at cross-purposes with
the overall theme of the film.
 Yet somehow the movie comes close to hitting its mark
nonetheless. That's largely due to the combined star power of Michelle
Pfeiffer and Bruce Willis, and also to some genuinely evocative patches
in Zweibel and Nelson's screenplay. Every time "Story" wanders
perilously close to the border of soap opera, the authors steer it back
on course.
 Although the subject matter -- an upper-middle-class couple
drifting straight for the rocks -- inspires memories of such searing
break-up dramas as Diane Keaton and Albert Finney's "Shoot the Moon" or
the classic "Two For the Road" with Finney and Audrey Hepburn, the
glossy execution of "Story" recalls last Christmas' "Stepmom," another
attempt to address a difficult subject in a crowdpleasing manner.
"Stepmom" was a bit more effective than this film because it focused
mostly on the young woman (Julia Roberts) trying to find her place in
her husband's family and the ex-wife (Susan Sarandon) struggling to hold
on to a world she was no longer intimately a part of.
 "Story" is more scattershot, and while we may root for Kate
(Pfeiffer) and Ben (Willis) Jordan to overcome their differences and
rekindle that old flame, we'd be cheering more enthusiastically if the
movie had let us get a better sense of their history together. What it
presents instead are flashes of events major and minor, from the time
Ben and Kate tried to get it on on the kitchen counter to the death of
their son's goldfish.
 The rest of the movie shifts a bit uneasily between some nasty
marital arguments and several quirky discussions between Kate and Ben
and their friends, played by comedians such as Paul Reiser, Rita Wilson
(who gets to do a reprise of her weeping fit from "Sleepless in
Seattle"), Julie Hagerty and Reiner himself. A lot of this talk is
undeniably amusing ("the Ten Commandments were probably a lot easier to
stick to when you dropped dead at 35," Reiser's character moans), but it
also serves to severely dilutes whatever impact the main story might
have. The jokey segments tend to stop the picture cold, often just as
it's building some momentum.
 The gimmick of having characters speak directly to the audience
is currently being done to death both in movies and on TV, but it works
surprisingly well here, as Ben and Kate's confessions turn out to be
among the film's strongest bits. At one point, Kate compares her
relationship with her husband to the children's book "Harold and the
Purple Crayon," explaining that Harold was always determined to create
his own perfect environment. "When one person is always drawing the
world the way they want it to be, the other person has to draw the world
the way it is," she sighes, "which is probably why they never wrote a
book about Harold's wife."
 There's also a certain poignancy in Ben and Kate's careful
conversations about whether or not their kids are "O.K.," as well as in
the borderline ridiculous excuses they make for calling each other
during a period of separation.
 The movie's ultimate trump card, however, is a breathless,
delirious monologue Kate delivers near the end. It's a moment that might
have been insufferable in the hands of a less skilled actress, but
Pfeiffer makes the words ring with hurt, humor and pure emotion. "The
Story of Us" has more than its share of aggravating bits and empty
scenes, but the finale manages to tip the scales in its favor. James
Sanford

Title
Review for Pretty Woman (1990)
        No matter how many times you've seen "Pretty Woman," there's
still plenty about the Richard Gere/Julia Roberts film you don't know.
For instance, when Roberts first appears onscreen as the
down-on-her-luck hooker Vivian, she's wearing a coat the movie's
production team bought off a theater usher. A young Hank Azaria
("Tuesdays with Morrie," "Godzilla") plays the detective lurking around
outside her Hollywood
Boulevard apartment. And if you look carefully during a breakfast scene,
you can watch a pancake in Julia's hand turn into a croissant and then
back into a pancake again.
These and scores of other behind-the-scenes secrets are revealed
in director Garry Marshall's commentary on the "Pretty Woman - 10th
Anniversary Edition" DVD (Buena Vista Home Entertainment). In addition
to Marshall's often funny observations about the impact of the
enormously successful romantic comedy -- "tourists to this day still
come to the Regent Beverly
Wilshire looking for Julia Roberts or Vivian or ladies of the night;
they're not there," Marshall says with a sigh - the DVD adds an extra
six minutes worth of scenes left out of the theatrical release, some
candid video of Gere and Roberts horsing around on location, the
original trailer for the film, and a music video for Natalie Cole's
"Wild Women Do."
What are most intriguing, however, are the bits of gossip and
trivia Marshall dredges up. He's willing to identify the brief shots in
which a body double was employed for Roberts and quick to point out
every editing gaffe, noting in his defense that he'd rather make his
actors look good than worry about whether his heroine is holding a
pancake or a croissant in her hand.
In case you've forgotten, Roberts and Gere both look very good
indeed in "Pretty Woman," the movie which single-handedly elevated her
from ingenue to A-list star and revived his career, which had slumped
badly since the steamy days of "An Officer and a Gentleman" and
"Breathless."
Despite their different approaches to acting ("Richard liked to
rehearse; Julia liked to wing it," according to Marshall), the stars
proved to be electrifying together, a feat they repeated in last year's
"Runaway Bride." "Pretty Woman" certainly has its share of clever lines
and seductive moments, but it was ultimately the combined magic of Gere
and Roberts that propelled this modestly budgeted film to a worldwide
gross of $438 million.
"A nicer couple you rarely find," Marshall says of his stars.
Audiences obviously agreed. James Sanford

Title
Review for Psycho (1998)
 For most directors, the purpose of doing a remake of someone's film is to
explore undeveloped themes in the original or to put fresh twists on old
material. When Nancy Meyers and Charles Shyer created their successful
recent version of "The Parent Trap," for example, they basically revamped
the humor of the 1961 Hayley Mills vehicle while preserving the storyline;
director Ron Underwood's upcoming rewrite of the giant-ape fantasy "Mighty
Joe Young" will address the issue of poachers hunting endangered species, a
topic unheard of when "Joe" came out in 1949.
 Director Gus Van Sant's modernization of Alfred Hitchcock's 1960 "Psycho,"
however, is an oddball exception to the rule, a movie so slavishly faithful
to its source that finally the audience begins to wonder what the point of
the picture is.
 Universal Pictures refused to screen this "Psycho" for critics last week,
arguing that Hitchcock never previewed his movie before its opening. But
Hitchcock had a good reason, since in 1960 no one knew about the
bait-and-switch structure of "Psycho," how the story begins as a tale of
embezzlement and paranoia and suddenly becomes a shocker about the gruesome
consequences of Oedipal obsession.
 Thirty-eight years later, even those who never saw the original know the
basics of the story, and sitting through this "Psycho" is like watching a
team of Kinkos employees assembling the world's most lavish Xerox job.
Initially there's a certain wonder to seeing Anne Heche follow in Janet
Leigh's footsteps as the doomed Marion Crane and hearing Bernard Herrmann's
nerve-shredding score in digital stereo.
 But although Van Sant has obviously worked overtime to get the basic
imagery right -- the movie's look is a cunning blend of early 1960s artifice
and 1990s attitude -- he has utterly failed in his mission to recreate the
gripping atmosphere that hung over virtually every frame of Hitchcock's
film. This is a thriller that never generates a single jolt of terror.
 In fact, almost immediately after Van Sant's careful recreation of the
infamous shower scene -- presented here with slightly more blood and much
more nudity than would ever have been allowed in 1960 -- "Psycho" becomes
one thing Hitchcock's movie never was: deadly dull.
 Van Sant's deviations from the model are cosmetic and mostly silly. Now
when demented motel manager Norman Bates (Vince Vaughn) spies on Marion
while she strips, we hear him unzip his pants, drop his trousers and breathe
heavily. Thanks, Gus, we needed that.
 Similiarly dopey is the insertion of storm clouds and a shot of what looks
like a cow standing in the middle of a foggy road during the scene in which
snooping private eye Arbogast (William H. Macy, slouching around amusingly
in a suit that looks older than its wearer) runs afoul of Mother Bates. The
only major characterization change involves Julianne Moore's portrayal of
Marion's sister Lila as a strident man-hater rather than the sweet
wallflower Vera Miles created. It's not exactly a misstep, but it doesn't
add anything to the story either.
 Plotwise, "Psycho" follows the first film as if the script had been
chieseled on tablets of stone. The biggest difference is that in 1960
audiences were shocked to discover the willowy, quietly neurotic Norman
Anthony Perkins gave us could have been capable of such savage violence.
Here, the beefier Vaughn looks like something out of a dark alley right from
the start, which removes any doubt about who's responsible for the mayhem
and murder.
 When director Jim McBride transplanted Jean-Luc Godard's New Wave classic
"Breathless" to Los Angeles as the basis for a flashy-trashy 1983 Richard
Gere vehicle, reviewers howled about what a travesty it was. But better to
be daring than to be overly reverent. Like the stuffed birds Norman Bates
collects, Van Sant's "Psycho" is merely a lifeless shell of what was once
wild and thrilling to watch.

Title
Review for Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me (1999)
         "Austin Powers: International Man of Mystery" seemed unlikely
to spawn a franchise when it was originally released two years ago.
Coming out in the weeks between the mega-hyped "The Lost World" and
"Batman and Robin," the Mike Meyers comedy passed through cinemas with
little notice, attracting a small following and amassing a passable box
office take on its way to the Blockbuster shelves.
 With most movies, that would be the end of the story. But in
the months after its video debut, "Austin" became a word-of-mouth
sensation, and people who never even considered seeing the film during
its theatrical run now found themselves looking for opportunities to
drop phrases such as "shagadelic" and "oh, behave" into conversations,
just to show their friends they were intimately familiar with
Austinspeak. While "Lost World" and "Robin" proved to be flashes in the
pan, cheerfully leering secret agent Austin Powers and his fatuous
nemesis Dr. Evil became cult figures.
 "Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me" is a perfectly disrespectful
follow-up, which brings back all the major players from the original,
adds a few welcome new faces and finds a whole new list of old movies,
TV shows and commercials for Meyers to parody or pay tribute to.
 It takes a bright writer to make something that's
simultaneously this idiotic and this consistently funny, and, as Meyers
has shown time and again, he's a pretty smart cookie, as well as a
walking pop culture catalogue. "The Thomas Crown Affair," "You Only Live
Twice," "Time Tunnel," "Jerry Maguire" and, unsurprisingly, "Star Wars"
all get skewered this time around. There's also a hilarious, devestating
mockery of Will Smith's rip-off rap hits that ought to make the one-time
Fresh Prince feel like he's reached his expiration date.
 The usual rule in making a sequel is to take what worked the
first time and merely repeat it on a more elaborate scale. But if
anything, "Shagged" seems tighter and more conservative than its
predecessor, perhaps because Meyers has so much he wants to do he
doesn't have footage or money to waste on grandoise jokes. Even the bits
reprised from "Man of Mystery" have been given an extra spin.
 One of the biggest laugh-getters the first time around was how
the filmmakers managed to come up with jaw-droppingly smutty sight gags
and still maintain their PG-13 rating. They haven't lost their knack:
The movie's opening -- an apparent send-up of the famous "Barbarella"
credit sequence which featured Jane Fonda doing an anti-gravity
striptease -- finds Austin cavorting in a hotel stark naked, his nether
regions covered by such items as a banana, a brisket, a pinwheel and a
pair of hams. Another scene involving silhouettes in a tent manages to
go even further.
 The storyline of "Shagged" -- probably an afterthought --
brings Dr. Evil (Meyers again) back from deep space, just in time to
appear on Jerry Springer with his endlessly glum son Scott (Seth Green)
in an episode entitled "My Father is Evil and Wants to Take Over the
World." The dysfunctional Evil clan is still rife with conflict,
primarily because Scott thinks his father is a loser and Dad argues that
the boy is only "quasi-evil, just one calorie, not evil enough." An
outrageous new addition to the family only serves to widen the
generation gap.
 Meanwhile, Austin, single again after his wife Vanessa
(Elizabeth Hurley) was unmasked as one of Dr. Evil's lethal "fembots,"
is swinging through the 1990s ("I put the 'grrr' in 'swinger,' baby," he
boasts), until Evil uses a time machine to fly back to 1969 London and
steal that which is most precious to our hero: his mojo. Soon Austin too
is back on Carnaby Street in its heyday, shopping for groovy new threads
with his hip American partner partner Felicity Shagwell (Heather Graham,
who has enough spunk to offset her visible lack of comic timing),
hitting the go-gos, and, in his spare time, looking for a way to keep
Evil from using a laser cannon to blow up Washington, D.C.
 Some have chosen to see Austin as a take-off on James Bond, but
"Shagged" acknowledges his real origin by including a clip from "In Like
Flint," the 1966 James Coburn movie about a spy who spent more time
coming on to the band of power-hungry superwomen trying to take over the
world than he did trying to thwart them. Check out "Flint" or one of
Dean Martin's brazenly sexist Matt Helm epics from the same period and
you'll see Austin and Bond look almost puritanical by comparison. James
Sanford

Title
Review for Mighty Joe Young (1998)

  If you remember what a disaster the ludicrous 1977 remake of "King Kong"
turned out to be, you'll likely greet Disney's update of "Mighty Joe Young"
with at least some degree of suspicion. But there's no cause for alarm:
Thanks to splendid special effects, a few clever moments and a crackling
pace, this "Joe" is likely to please fans of the 1949 film as well as
delight younger viewers who've never heard of the simian hero before.
 The title character is a 15-foot high, 2000-pound gorilla who has grown up
in the jungles of Tanzania with his guardian Jill (Charlize Theron). When
poachers come calling, Jill hastily accepts the offer of scientist Gregg
O'Hara (Bill Paxton) to relocate Joe to a Los Angeles preserve. It's not
easy for Joe to adjust to city life, however, especially when the sinister
hunter Strasser (Rade Serbedzija), who tried to do away with Jill and Joe in
their homeland 12 years earlier, arrives in town determined to get his hands
on the prized ape.
 The story is fairly hokey, but director Ron Underwood keeps things moving
along so briskly you don't have time to question its goofiness. Though
Theron and Paxton are fine and Regina King and David Paymer provide some
laughs as the animal specialists who try to help Joe make the transition to
his new home, the real star of the movie is of course Joe himself, a
combination of Industrial Light and Magic's digital animation and Rick
Baker's ape suits; he's an astonishing creation, with an impressive range of
emotions. The technical work throughout the film is flawless, and Joe's
climactic rampage through La La Land is both funny and exciting.
 Although "Joe" has taken considerable liberties with the original material,
Underwood has also inserted a few charming references to the 1949 film in
this version, including the use of "Beautiful Dreamer," the song that kept
the first Joe under control, in a seaside sequence and cameo appearances by
Terry Moore (the original Jill) and Ray Harryhausen (the stop-motion
animation genius who worked on the original movie) as an elegant couple
attending a soiree at the conservancy.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Simply Irresistible (1999)
"Simply Irresistible" begins with Sarah Michelle Gellar picking up a
case of crabs.
Actually, that's not entirely true. Despite being almost two hours
long, "Irresistible" never really goes anywhere. It just dawdles
along, never becoming interesting enough to pay attention to or bad
enough to walk out on.
It's a perfect example of a "wallpaper movie," the kind of film that
serves as pleasant background noise while you're doing something more
productive, such as making out or learning all the latest
gossip. After all, how dazzling can a romantic comedy be when Cupid is
a crustacean?
"Irresistible" sets up Gellar as Amanda Shelton, a restaurant owner
who somehow finds the dough to dress in Todd Oldham creations, even
though her business is going down the tubes. Salvation arrives in the
form of Tom Bartlett (Sean Patrick Flanery), a go-getter who's just
spent $4 million to open a swank new eatery on the top floor of the
Henri Bendel department store in New York. Tom and Amanda are brought
together when one of the aforementioned crabs crawls out of its case -
with the help of some laughably obvious wires - and attaches itself to
a leg of Tom's expensive pants.
A conversation with the rich and hunky Tom puts Amanda's hormones into
overdrive, and when she returns to the kitchen she quickly shatters
her reputation as a third-rate chef. In no time at all, she's gone
from making soups that taste "like bleu cheese and dirt" to whipping
up steamed cockles with grapefruit sauce.
The elegant entrees are the real stars of "Irresistible" and receive
much more flattering photography than either Gellar or Flanery, both
of whom often look like they've just returned from an all-night frat
party.  "Irresistible" strives for the kind of effortless sparkle of a
"Breakfast at Tiffany's," but its weirdly harsh lighting and dull
camera work would be better-suited to a documentary on heroin addicts.
That the movie has any allure whatsoever is due entirely to the
comfortable chemistry Gellar and Flanery generate, particularly inthe
scenes that have nothing to do with the silly story. Every so often
they have a moment together that's so charming you wish the rest of
the film could magically rise to the same level, much in the same way
Amanda and Tom float onto the ceiling of her kitchen at one point.
Judith Roberts' screenplay is an uncertain brew of equal parts
"Witches of Eastwick," "Pretty Woman" and "Big Night," although its
most obvious inspiration is director Alfonso Arau's 1992 classic "Like
Water For Chocolate." At least three scenes from that film are
reprised almost verbatim - including the one in which the heroine's
tears fall into a sauce and provoke crying from everyone who tastes
the dish - with no credit given whatsoever to Laura Esquivel, who
wrote both the novel "Chocolate" was based on and the
screenplay. That's simply reprehensible.

Title
Review for Thomas Crown Affair, The (1999)
         "The Thomas Crown Affair" (1968) was one of those
self-consciously "mod" caper films Hollywood cranked out by the dozens
in the late 1960s, this one starring Steve McQueen as Thomas Crown, a
millionaire who masterminded robberies simply for the thrill of it and
Faye Dunaway as a chic insurance investigator who falls under his spell
while trying to bust him. In its day, the movie's multi-screen imagery
and anti-Establishment theme ("it's me against the system," Crown says
as a rationale for his behavior) struck a chord with young moviegoers,
but it's remembered today, if at all, only for its Oscar-winning theme
song "The Windmills of Your Mind" and for a suggestive chess match
played out by McQueen and Dunaway, a scene mercilessly parodied in
"Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me."
 The chess game has been left out of the new "Thomas Crown
Affair," but that doesn't mean stars Pierce Brosnan and Rene Russo don't
find plenty of opportunities to fool around. This "Crown," a smarter and
more exciting film than the original, is essentially a two-hour excuse
to get this beautiful couple into one compromising position after
another, usually with some sort of glamorous party or exotic beach
serving as a background. Those viewers who've felt a bit cheated by such
recent squeaky-clean romances as "Runaway Bride" may be intrigued to
hear "Crown" also features some of the most physically challenging
trysts in years. Its R-rating is well-deserved.
 "Crown" also represents a big step forward for Brosnan, whose
non-James Bond screen appearances ("The Mirror Has Two Faces," "The
Lawnmower Man," etc.) have not
exactly established him as a genuine movie star. Here, he demonstrates
his light comic touch and more than holds his own against the
smouldering Russo. They're a pair to reckon with.
 The screenplay by Leslie Dixon and Kurt Wimmer changes the bank
robbery of the first film into an art heist, a crime that better suits
the ever-suave Crown (Brosnan). Investigator Catherine Banning (Russo)
deduces the enigmatic billionaire must have something to do with the
theft -- after all, he once wrecked a $100,000 sailboat just because "he
liked the splash" -- and she follows his trail straight into his arms,
where she learns they have a good deal in common.
 They're both from modest backgrounds, they both enjoy the good
life and both have trouble maintaining long-term relationships. Over
dinner one night she asks him, "is it more fun getting it than keeping
it?" and it's not hard to tell she's asking about more than just the
stolen painting.
 "Crown" shrewdly plays on the time-honored working woman's fantasy of
having it all, as Catherine ends up jetting off to Martinique and having
a passionate fling while still getting her job done. Of course in a
situation like this reality must sooner or later enter the picture, and
when it does our heroine must decide whether she's going to bed her man
or bust him.
 Given that director John McTiernan's resume includes such
now-classic thrillers as "Die Hard" and "The Hunt For Red October," it's
a given the picture's action sequences are smoothly executed. But
McTiernan also knows how to downshift for the quieter scenes, and he
even gets a surprisingly sincere performance out of Denis Leary, who
plays Catherine's somewhat sympathetic partner in crime-fighting.
 "This is an elegant crime done by an elegant person," Catherine
declares at one point. That verdict applies to the movie as well. James
Sanford

Title
Review for Forces of Nature (1999)
Like some pseudo-exotic punch that mixes kiwi juice and strawberry
nectar, "Forces of Nature" combines the terrors of "Twister" and the
comic chaos of "Planes, Trains and Automobiles," tossing in a dash or
two of "It Happened One Night" for good measure.
But though Sandra Bullock and Ben Affleck generate a certain amount of
goodwill and director Bronwen Hughes proves she can conjure up a
colorful scene, the comedy - like the airplane its central characters
meet aboard - doesn't quite get off the ground.
What's frustrating about "Forces" is that all the right elements seem
to be in place. The supporting cast (Steve Zahn, Blythe Danner, Maura
Tierney, etc.) is full of familiar faces and the movie is awash in
eye-appealing pastels and impressive computer-animated effects,
including slow-motion rain for the stars to run through. The only
thing missing is a comic spark to set the picture off.
Instead, Marc Lawrence's screenplay follows a familiar path, bringing
seemingly jinxed travelers Ben (Affleck) and Sarah (Bullock) together
on the long, long road from New York City to Savannah, Ga. Ben is
going south for his wedding; Sarah's got personal business to
settle. He's a "blurbmeister" who writes copy for book jackets (he
touts a romance set in Egypt as "a scintillating tale of erotic
mummification"); she's a semi-nutty jill-of-all trades, who claims to
have worked as a salesperson, an exotic dancer and a flight attendant
at various points in her career.
Detours along the way to their destinies include a drug bust, trouble
on a train and a stay in a motel that's even scarier than the ones
Diane Keaton photographed in her classic book "Reservations."
Meanwhile, Ben's bride-to-be Bridget (Tierney) is trying to withstand
the temptations of a good-looking lawyer (David Strickland) who woos
her with off-key renditions of old Phil Collins' hits.
Bullock, with purple highlights in her hair and a clingy wardrobe, can
play these kinds of charmingly ditsy roles in her sleep by
now. Affleck has a slightly tougher row to hoe, since Lawrence's
script doesn't exactly flesh Ben out. There's a sweetness in the way
they bounce lines off each other, but the film doesn't fully explore
the possibilities of either the stars' chemistry or the combination of
genres in its storyline; ultimately, "Forces" is all thunder and no
lightning.

Title
Review for Boys Don't Cry (1999)
         Although it's not mentioned in director Kimberly Peirce's
wrenching "Boys Don't Cry," the real-life Brandon Teena worshipped Cher,
the singer-actress who has made a career out of her ability to change
her looks to suit whatever's in fashion. But gimmicks that may work
perfectly for a superstar with a reputation for outrageousness are a
good deal more difficult to pull off in the real world. That proved to
be a lesson Brandon Teena -- who was actually a woman named Teena
Brandon -- learned too late in the game.
 "Boys Don't Cry," which takes its title from a classic song by
the Cure, lays out the facts of Teena's bizarre life and horrifying
death frankly but sympathetically. Although Peirce and Hilary Swank, the
amazing actress who plays Teena, don't make apologies for their
subject's reckless behavior, they seem to understand the sexual
confusion and desire to be different that drove a young woman to remake
herself as a male. The movie has to address some fairly shocking subject
matter, but Swank and Peirce refuse to allow Teena's story to become
lurid or titillating. In other, less capable hands, "Boys" could easily
have become either a sleazy piece of exploitation or a sanctimonious
look at how awful the Bible Belt can be towards people who don't follow
the straight and narrow path.
 The film introduces us to Teena in Lincoln, Nebraska in 1993,
after her decision to disguise herself as a man. With her hair in a
crew-cut, her chest strapped and a confident swagger in her step,
"Brandon" looks uncannily like an adolescent boy and is so kind towards
the women she dates that such tell-tale signs as her stubble-free face
and her delicate hands go mostly undetected. "They say I'm the best
boyfriend they ever had," Brandon brags to a pal.
 But when this dreamy guy is revealed to be female, opinions
change quickly and Brandon flees Lincoln to hide out in the small
Nebraska town of Falls City. There she falls in with ex-cons John (Peter
Sarsgaard) and Tom (Brendan Sexton III), neither of whom suspect there's
anything unusual about him, perhaps because they're usually too drunk or
stoned to pay much attention to anything. "People like you don't need
drugs," Tom laughs as he observes Brandon's urgent desire to fit in with
the kids in Falls City. "You just hallucinate 24 hours a day."
 Brandon also attracts the attention of John's former flame Lana
(Chloe Sevigny), the kind of girl who seems to have developed a
bulletproof shell around her heart while still in her teens. Lana, whose
life appears to consist of partying, working on the line in a cannery
and cleaning up after her slovenly mom, finds herself gradually opening
up to the new boy in town. Eventually, their relationship will have
ghastly consequences.
 The movie would have fallen flat if we didn't believe in
Brandon's masquerade and kept waiting for the moment when her true
identity would be uncovered. Swank immerses herself so completely in the
character, however, that it's entirely possible to forget you're
watching a woman pass herself off as a man. Peirce assists the illusion
by setting most of the story in poorly-lit bars, shadowy living rooms
and dark backroads and alleyways.
 Reportedly, Drew Barrymore was anxious to tackle a different
project about Brandon, one which has since been shut down. That's
probably all for the best, since Barrymore is so easily identifiable she
would have had an extremely difficult time convincing an audience she
was anything more than a renowned movie star attempting a cross-dressing
stunt. Swank, on the other hand, doesn't have to deal with nearly as
many preconceptions (unless you're one of the dozen or so filmgoers who
saw her in "The Karate Kid, Part 4") and slips easily into the crowd.
 Although Swank's phenomenal performance is unquestionably the
centerpiece of the film, Peirce gets outstanding work from just about
everyone in her cast. In Sevigny's tortured eyes and rocky voice we
learn everything we need to know about Lana's background and, perhaps,
her future. When Lana naively talks about running away with Brandon and
making a career for herself as a karaoke singer, Sevigny allows us a
brief glimpse of the desperation and need for escape that Lana learned
long ago to suppress.
 Sexton, looking like a walking bruise, and Sarsgaard are
chilling as good old boys who are always a breath away from turning into
mindless, raging monsters. The acting is so electrifying it lends the
picture the kind of punch usually found only in documentaries.
Especially in its last half-hour, "Boys Don't Cry" is often
extraordinarily tough to watch -- much in the same way the truth can be
difficult to face. James Sanford

Title
Review for 'Til There Was You (1997)
         Reputations can be deceptive. For example, director Scott
Winant and writer Winnie Holzman are best known for their involvement
in TV's ``thirtysomething'' and ``My So-Called Life,'' two shows that
addressed real-life concerns without sitcom moralizing and phoney
happy endings.
  It's now trendy to laugh at the ``yuppie angst'' of
``thirtysomething,'' but take another look and you'll find a
consistently well-written series.  The short-lived, much-loved
``Life'' (which introduced the miracle that has become Claire Danes)
was even better, offering the most credible look at teen-age life of
any show since ``Family'' in the late '70s.
  But ``'Til There Was You,'' which Winant directed and
Holzman wrote, is pure plastic, flat and transparent. All involved
were all too obviously aiming for another ``Sleepless In Seattle,''
but what they've produced is a cinematic siesta. The honesty of the
duo's TV work is gone, replaced by a synthetic airy-fairy atmosphere
that quickly becomes stifling.
  Holzman's meandering screenplay revolves around architect
Nick (Dylan McDermott) and ghostwriter Gwen (Jeanne Tripplehorn),
who've separately led parallel lives, destined to intersect.
  Both Nick and Gwen do work that goes unappreciated. Nick's
grandiose visions of design, such as putting a rooftop garden atop a
homeless shelter, don't suit his firm. Gwen, a scribe for illiterate
celebrities, realizes, ``I never put my name on anything I write.''
Each of them has also amassed a resume of lovers without finding much
fulfillment.
  They also have nicotine addiction in common, and so many
cigarettes are consumed during this movie you may want to burn incense
and set out dishes of vinegar. It may be Holzman's idea of retro-chic;
most people will find it contempo-disgusting.
  The magnet that will eventually draw Nick and Gwen together
turns out to be Francesca Lanfield (Sarah Jessica Parker), a burnt-out
former child star trying to reheat what's left of her legend by
publishing her memoirs.  Once an adorable moppet on TV's popular ``One
Big, Happy,'' Francesca is now a salty-tongued veteran of numerous
rehab clinics. ``Yes, it's me and no, I'm not dead,'' she says when
greeting fans.
  Nick meets her when Francesca sells the apartment complex
she owns to a developer, and the predatory actress soon has him under
her spell. Gwen is hired by Francesca when the would-be autobiographer
decides to let someone else do the job. Thanks to a string of
coincidences, Nick and Gwen manage to avoid meeting, even though it's
obvious that two people as dull as they are certainly deserve each
other.
  Tripplehorn and McDermott are badly miscast. Tripplehorn's
attempts at slapstick are embarrassing, while McDermott's sullen
intensity is completely wrong for this kind of fluff.
  The only joy in the film comes from Parker, so delightfully
sweet in the recent Broadway revival of ``Once Upon a Mattress,'' and
so deliciously sour here as the jaded Francesca. The acid Parker
injects into comments like ``this is extremely non-enjoyable'' is a
welcome antidote to Holzman's syrup.
  The rest of the supporting cast does what they can with what
they're given, which is generally not much. As Gwen's lifelong friend,
Jennifer Aniston begins building an interesting character, only to
disappear abruptly from the story.
  Michael Tucker, playing Gwen's deceptive dad, contributes
the film's brightest scene, when he confesses the truth about his
marriage to Gwen's mother. Tucker and Tripplehorn strike sparks, and
for a brief moment ``'Til There Was You'' soars above the humdrum and
approaches hilarity. But with Tucker's exit, the movie clunks back to
earth and dawdles along to its surprise-free finale.

Title
Review for Big One, The (1997)
Has success spoiled Michael Moore?
The downsized-worker-turned-filmmaker from Flint seemed like a renegade
David taking on a corporate Goliath when he documented his thwarted quest to
meet General Motors chairman Roger Smith in the 1989 feature "Roger and Me."
Moore cheerfully filled the role of an Everyman speaking out for a
middle-class pounded by a recession President George Bush denied was going
on.
In the years since "Roger," however, Moore has starred in the "TV Nation"
series, directed the feeble feature "American Bacon" and written "Downsize
This: Random Threats From An Unarmed American," which hit the New York Times
best-seller list (as Moorešs latest documentary "The Big One" takes great
pains to tell us).
In fact, "The Big One" centers around Moorešs misadventures on a nationwide
tour to promote his book, so right off the bat we know his days as a
commoner are long-gone. Now he flies first-class (he tries to look
embarrassed by it), is chauffeured by perky "media liaisons" (they become
easy targets for his barbs) and gives speeches in auditoriums and bookstores
filled with fawning fans.
But despite his fame Moore is still on the lookout for greedy business
tycoons looking to make a few extra bucks by closing factories and cutting
jobs.
It turns out he has numerous offenders to choose from, including the owners
of the Payday candy-bar factory in Centralia, Ill., where management freely
admits theyšre shutting down because the workers made the plant too
profitable, thus endangering the companyšs pending sale.
His minor skirmishes with middle-management types leads up to what Moore
must have seen as the challenge of a lifetime: the opportunity to meet
face-to-face with unctuous Nike CEO Phil Knight who, Moore accuses, has
built his fortune off the sweat of teen-age Indonesian girls who make tennis
shoes in his overseas factories for 40 cents an hour. Americans, Knight
rationalizes, donšt want to make shoes.
If therešs a serious flaw to "The Big One" it lies in Moorešs tendency to
mistake self-glamorization for credibility. Much more so than in "Roger and
Me," hešs the star of the show here, and donšt think he doesnšt know it.
When Moore includes a snippet of White House press secretary Mike McCurry
calling him "a dangerous person," itšs a bit obvious Moore sees this as a
badge of honor, and therešs an excessive amount of footage devoted to Moore
cheerleading for a band of Borders Books and Music employees struggling to
unionize.
"The Big One" is unequivocally a sermon to the converted, but itšs
frequently a bitterly funny one. When Moore probes the weird world of
corporate subsidies, investigating why the government has given Pillsbury
millions to promote their products in the Third World, the clips from a
commercial with a Spanish-speaking Pillsbury Doughboy are as hilarious as
they are creepy. Even material thatšs now slightly dated, such as Moorešs
campaign-contribution stunt, is still giggle-worthy.

Title
Review for Music of the Heart (1999)
         If you didn't know going in that "Music of the Heart" is based
on a true story, you might easily mistake it for Hollywood hokum. Simply
put, many of the events in the life of violinist/educator Roberta
Guaspari seem too good to be true.
 After being left high and dry with two young sons by her naval
officer husband, Guaspari took a friend's advice and seized the
opportunity to work as a substitute music teacher at an alternative
elementary school in East Harlem. Despite skepticism from her fellow
faculty members -- "their attention span doesn't go beyond 'do re mi',"
cracks one veteran of the students -- Guaspari went forward with her
plans to use the 50 violins she'd purchased during a stay in Greece as
tools to start a violin class. Soon, she had to hold a lottery to limit
her class sizes.
 Acclaim and support also poured in from the brightest lights in
the classical music world, and when Guaspari's program was threatened
because of budget cuts, such stars as Itzhak Perlman, Joshua Bell and
Isaac Stern offered their support to save it.
 It all sounds enormously uplifting and hugely contrived.
Sometimes "Music" plays that way, too, especially in the early
stretches, which include a fairly tepid romance between Guaspari and a
crusading journalist (Adian Quinn) and some early brushes with a
no-nonsense principal (Angela Bassett) that seem a bit too calculated.
Director Wes Craven, taking a break from the horror films he's best
known for (the original "Nightmare on Elm Street" and the first "Scream"
are two of his crowning achievements), initially has a tough time
getting the rhythms of his scenes down and several of them run on too
long or end abruptly.
 But "Music" does finally overcome its haphazard first reels,
due in large part to a typically vibrant performance by Meryl Streep as
Guaspari. It's no secret the movie was originally intended as a vehicle
for Madonna -- in fact, the real-life Guaspari looks more like Madonna
than Streep.
 Without denigrating Madonna's abilities, it's difficult to believe she
would have improved on Streep's work here. Streep makes Guaspari's
metamorphosis from self-pitying victim to impassioned activist seem
effortless and, while a pro might spot flaws in her musicianship, her
playing certainly looks and sounds genuine.
 On top of that, most of Streep's scenes are played opposite
children, something any actor will tell you is a challenge at the best
of times. Not only does she refuse to condescend to these little
co-stars, she dares them to rise to her level, and many of them do just
that. This is not a movie that pauses to dwell on the dimpled cheeks of
a little cutie; the kids in this cast actually have to work, probably in
much the same way Guaspari's students did.
 Though it doesn't always manage to make Guaspari's trials
credible, the script does make some valid points about how people can
impose limitations on themselves and their children. Confronting a
self-righteous African-American mom who wants to pull her son out of the
violin class because she can't see any point in him learning "dead white
men's music," Roberta asks pointedly, "What if Arthur Ashe's mother had
told him he couldn't play tennis because it was a white man's game?".
 The film actually improves on Guaspari's autobiography of the
same title by making at least some effort to individualize some of her
pupils; the book tends to address them as statistics. But ultimately
both the book and the movie have the same message, that sometimes what
we think is our biggest disaster can actually be the springboard for our
greatest triumph. It's an age-old sentiment, but Guaspari and Streep
sell it with plenty of conviction. James Sanford

Title
Review for Parent Trap, The (1998)
         Disney's release schedule of late brings to mind that old
phrase about everything old being new again. In the past two years
alone, we've been forced to sit through remakes of everything from
``101 Dalmatians'' to ``That Darn Cat.''  Now the powers that be have
dusted off ``The Parent Trap,'' the fondly remembered 1961 Hayley
Mills picture about identical twins who scheme to reunite their
long-divorced parents. Talk about a risky idea: Mills fans generally
hold ``The Parent Trap'' in the same esteem Shakespeare scholars
reserve for ``Hamlet.''
  But everyone can heave a collective sigh of relief. The 1998
``Parent Trap'' proves to be a perfectly pleasant experience, thanks
largely to newcomer Lindsay Lohan, who capably assumes a dual role as
American-raised Hallie Parker and London-based Annie James. Lohan's
got comic timing, a knack for effective imitation - her British accent
sounds exactly like her screen mom Natasha Richardson - and she's cute
without being cloying.
  Not that her expert adult supporting cast doesn't more than
carry its own weight. A robust-looking Dennis Quaid, as Hallie's
vineyard-owning dad, and the radiant Richardson, as Annie's
dress-designing mom, both bring surprising sparkle to their roles. You
can tell from the start they belong together because of their
stunning, matching smiles.
  The gold-digging blonde obstacle on the road to reunion is
assayed with just the right amounts of vinegar and saccharine by
Elaine Hendrix, who poses like Sharon Stone and takes a pratfall like
Lucille Ball. And the work of Lisa Ann Walter and Simon Kunz, as the
household helpers who come to Hallie and Annie's aid? Completely
endearing.
  The story is just as absurd as it ever was, requiring the
audience to believe that a divorcing couple would A) split up their
twins, and B) move to opposite ends of the world to stay apart from
each other and never inform the sisters about their past. But although
``Parent Trap'' gets off to a worrisome start with some wobbly summer
camp scenes that clumsily set up the action, the film shifts into gear
about half an hour in and cruises along pleasantly toward its expected
happy ending.

Title
Review for Message in a Bottle (1999)
Nicholas Sparks' novel "Message in a Bottle" is a gossamer-thin story
of a columnist who finds the item of the title on a beach, reads the
enclosed letter, and then sets out to find the man who wrote it.
When she finally tracks him down, there's an instant mutual
attraction; sure, it's a sterling example of the literature one of my
college friends called "the 'I turned around and I was in love'
books," but on its own terms it's a perfectly passable daydream.
Director Luis Mandoki's adaptation of the best-seller maintains the
same mellowness,almost to a fault. Next to this, the films of "The
Horse Whisperer" and "The English Patient" could almost be mistaken
for entries in the "Die Hard" series. If the novel is best washed down
with a pitcher of herbal iced tea, this unquestionably beautiful movie
might make some in the audience wish for a triple espresso.
The screenplay has changed the setting of the drama, the occupations
of both the leads - Garret (Kevin Costner) no longer runs a scuba
school and Theresa (Robin Wright Penn) now has some kind of research
job that somehow allows her plenty of expense money and time off to
zoom around the country - and thrown in are some backwoodsy former
in-laws to make trouble for Garret. Why bother? Theoriginal material
would have worked just fine onscreen.
"Bottle" wants so very badly to be a world-class tearjerker and
there's no denying it has a whole lot of things going for it.
Costner's performance is relaxed and charming, much closer to the guy
everybody liked in "Tin Cup" and "Field of Dreams" rather than the
self-congratulatory figure of "The Postman." He and Penn - who seems
to have carefully studied Meg Ryan's moves from "Sleepless In Seattle"
- blend comfortably together, a major plus in any romantic drama.
The film's trump card turns out to be Paul Newman as Garret's salty
dad.  He and Costner have several wonderful small scenes together, and
Newman's work radiates with world-class starpower; it takes a lifetime
of training to turn a simple "go away" into a major laugh line.
The photography by Caleb Deschanel is also astonishingly pretty,
although that's not such a shock when you remember Deschanel was the
director of "Wind," a movie that was little more than two hours of
sailing ships and sea spray.
So why does "Bottle" feel half-empty instead of half-full? Part of the
trouble lies in Mandoki's approach to the story's ending, which worked
fine in the novel but seems corny in the extreme onscreen. Also, The
movie's pace is so leisurely - this being a Costner film you can bet
there are numerous lingering close-ups of Kev - attention tends to ebb
and flow like the tides Garret and Theresa ride.
There's a lot to enjoy in "Message in a Bottle," to be sure, and it
might be just the ticket for those in the mood for anything remotely
romantic. But like a festive basket of chocolate-covered potato chips,
it's the sort of thing that certain people will definitely appreciate
more than most.

Title
Review for I'll Be Home for Christmas (1998)
My parents like to hold it over my head that I once insisted on being taken
to see "Santa Claus Conquers the Martians" many moons ago; they remember it
as one of the many trying sacrifices they've had to make over the years. Ha!
They don't know from suffering. It's painful to think about how many
innocent Moms and Dads will be subjected to the excruiatingly awful "I'll Be
Home For Christmas" because it stars Tiger Beat cover boy and ex-"Home
Improvement" regular Jonathan Taylor Thomas.
Next to this, "Santa Claus Conquers the Martians" looks like a work of
depth and brilliance.
Keeping his lousy post-"Lion King" cinematic track record up -- his
other bombs include "Man of the House" and last year's "Wild America" --
Taylor smirks and snaps his way through the role of Jake Wilkinson, a
student at a California college where everyone looks 15 and behaves as if he
or she is still in junior high. After his girlfriend Allie (Jessica Biel)
refuses to spend the holidays with him on the beach, Jake reconsiders the
offer from his father (Gary Cole) to return home to New York. As an
incentive, Dad offers a 1957 Porsche.
 Unfortunately, Jake has crossed some vengeful jocks who glue him
into a Santa suit and strand him in the desert. Supposed hilarity ensues as
the smart-mouthed St. Nick tries to scam his way across the country while
struggling to catch up with Allie, who's hitched a ride home with a would-be
Romeo named Eddie (Adam Lavorgna).
 Humor is hard to come by in "Home," unless your ribs are tickled by
gags about flatulent dogs or crazed Tom Jones fans, and anyone looking for a
bit of early seasonal cheer will find instead a few gross caricatures of
senior-citizens, just enough sexual innuendo to make pre-teens and their
parents blush and a host of hollow, loud performances of the sort normally
found only in TV commercials. Thomas strides from scene to scene with that
annoying air of superiority that finally sealed Macaulay Culkin's cinematic
fate. Don't believe the hype, child; you're not all that.
Vapid, sloppily made and utterly without merit, "I'll Be Home For
Christmas" qualifies as ho-ho-horrible.

Title
Review for Insider, The (1999)
 In an episode of "ER" for example, it's easy to show the
consequences of giving a patient the wrong medication. Likewise, in a
comedy like "Runaway Bride" or "Moonstruck," a director can let us see
the chaos that erupts as the heroine chooses true love over
responsibility.
 It's considerably trickier to convey to an audience the
consequences of what happens when crucial information is withheld from
the public due to legal maneuvering or corporate cover-ups. That's
precisely the problem director Michael Mann struggles with in "The
Insider," an intensely detail-oriented drama about the manipulation of
the news that will strike a resonant chord with many people in
journalism or TV production.
 Based on a Vanity Fair profile of Jeffrey Wigand, a former
research and development director for cigarette manufacturer Brown &
Williamson who exposed the hypocracy within the tobacco industry, this
is a film almost certain to receive plenty of coverage in the media.
 The attention would not be undeserved. It's a well-written,
masterfully acted piece of work with many thought-provoking points to
make about what happens when we let outside interests determine what is
and is not news.
 From the average moviegoer, however, the response is likely to be a
loud "ho hum."
 In tackling a challenging subject, Mann has presented his story
in a jarringly uncinematic fashion. In fact, often while watching the
movie, you may find yourself thinking this material might have been
easier to present in a play since so much of it revolves around tense
dialogues and silent soul-searching. The immediacy of live performance
might have helped immeasurably in putting across "The Insider"'s agenda
to the masses.
 Instead, Mann tries to create that intimacy through
near-continuous use of extreme close-ups. We're constantly being thrust
into the heavily lined eyes of Wigand (whose inner torments are
marvelously brought to the surface by Russell Crowe) and "60 Minutes"
producer Lowell Bergman (Al Pacino), who's determined to hack through
the jungle of gag orders and confidentiality agreements that stands
between Wigand and "60 Minutes" reporter Mike Wallace (Christopher
Plummer). The in-your-face technique is initially gripping --
particularly in an early scene involving an asthma attack -- but before
long we start to feel queasily voyeuristic and that discomfort distracts
from the drama.
 At the same time, for the patient viewer, "The Insider" is
packed with fascinating bits and pieces about how the news world
operates and the various pressures that come to bear on the people who
determine what gets on the air.
 The screenplay convincingly tracks Wigand's journey from
semi-hostile witness to whistle-blower and goes to great pains to show
how much time and energy Bergman put into winning Wigand's trust. Mann
also goes behind the scenes at "60 Minutes" to find out about the
off-camera politics and the shifting alliances of the reporters and
staff. Wallace is portrayed as a mercurial type who knows his best days
are behind him and is consumed by the idea of his legacy. He doesn't
want to retire in disgrace -- "I don't plan on spending the rest of my
days wandering in the wilderness of National Public Radio," he notes --
so he's cautious about throwing his weight behind Bergman when the going
gets rocky.
 "The Insider" also offers a remarkably restrained and effective
performance by Pacino, who Mann obviously kept on a short leash. There's
very little of the showboating that's marked (many would say "marred")
most of his post-"Scent of a Woman" films.
 In the final analysis, though, it's hard to say if Mann has
truly succeeded in getting his message to the masses. There's plenty of
quality here to be sure, and no one's likely to find fault with any of
the acting.
 But the ethical issues Mann raises remind me of the reaction of
a seemingly sophisticated woman I overheard at a screening of "Broadcast
News" 12 years ago. In that movie, TV news producer Holly Hunter is
attracted to anchorman William Hurt, but steers clear of him after
learning he faked the tears he seemed to cry during an interview with a
rape victim. Hunter's character was so devoted to the idea of truth in
journalism she couldn't comprehend that a reporter fail to see what was
wrong in staging the news or spicing up a story with crocodile tears.
 The viewer, on the other hand, complained she didn't understand
why Hunter and Hurt didn't end up together in the end. "So he made a
mistake -- big deal," she scoffed, and her friends, all of them
well-dressed and well-spoken, agreed with her. Those women probably
won't get the point of "The Insider" either, and, sadly, they're a large
part of the audience Mann is trying to reach. James Sanford

Title
Review for Snow Falling on Cedars (1999)
         With its lush imagery and muted colors, "Snow Falling on
Cedars" is a first-rate example of a feature film that should have been
a coffee table book instead. Apparently, director Scott Hicks ("Shine")
was so intent on getting the perfect shot of a drop of water sliding off
a fern or in finding bicycle bells that perfectly corresponded to the
sound of Japanese wind chimes he overlooked the fact that most people
who buy tickets to a movie are looking for a story, preferably something
with a little action, romance or humor. Those ingredients are in short
supply in "Snow," but if you want to see how lovingly an amputated arm
can be photographed, by all means, step right up.
 Hicks' self-conscious style is crippling to a story which
depends on passion and mystery to hold an audience's attention. Set in
Washington state in 1950, when much of the country was still grappling
with anti-Japanese sentiments left over from WWII, "Snow" follows the
trial of Kazou Miyamoto (Rick Yune), a fisherman accused of murdering an
American. Covering the court proceedings is reporter Ishmael (Ethan
Hawke), whose real interest lies in Miyamoto's wife Hatsue (Youki
Koduh).
 Hatsue and Ishmael were childhood sweethearts before the war
but were ultimately torn apart by Japanese traditions and her family's
exile to the Manzanar internment camp. The two barely found time to make
love in a hollowed-out cedar (and you thought back seats were bad!)
before their separation. Nine years later, Ishmael is still nursing his
broken heart.
 In its supporting roles, "Snow" employs several reliable
character actors -- James Cromwell, James Rebhorn, Richard Jenkins --
but it seems Hicks' only direction to them was to look as morose as
possible. Hawke, too, is such a Gloomy Gus he's extremely difficult to
identify with and both Ishmael and Hatsue's characters are so sketchy we
never get a sense of any bond between them, aside from the tryst in the
tree perhaps.
 The movie proceeds at a lethargic pace as Hicks stacks his
visuals one on top of another, smothering them in echoing dialogue and
an elegiac score by James Newton Howard, all of which keeps us even
further away from any developing drama. Any genuine emotion seems to
have been drained out in the name of art. Even when the camera glides
past scores of soldiers' bodies washed up on the beach at Normandy, the
movie remains so aloof, you might think you're looking at part of a new
campaign for Calvin Klein's Obsession. Like snow itself, the movie is
picturesque but chilly -- and a chore to plow through. James Sanford

Title
Review for Cookie's Fortune (1999)
Imagine Tennessee Williams penning a script for NBC's Must See TV
lineup and you'll have some idea of what director Robert Altman's
"Cookie's Fortune" is like. Though Altman is best known for such
incisive films as "Nashville," "The Player" and "Short Cuts,"
"Fortune" finds him in a mellow mood; it's a tale as easygoing and
eccentric as its characters.
What the movie does have in common with most of Altman's other works
is a mightily impressive cast, led by a delightfully batty Glenn
Close, the sweetly low-key Julianne Moore and the terrific Charles
Dutton, arguably the closest thing to a normal person Anne Rapp's
screenplay can come up with. So skilled is Altman at bringing out the
best from the people he works with that even the usually bland Liv
Tyler and Chris O'Donnell don't seem out of their league acting
alongside Close and Dutton. Though it's the screen equivalent of
cotton candy, "Fortune" is made with a very high grade of sugar.
The story is set in Holly Springs, Miss., where the suicide of kooky
Cookie Orcutt (Patricia Neal) triggers one sticky situation after
another. First, her nieces Camille (Close) and Cora (Moore) rearrange
evidence to make it look like Cookie was murdered since "nobody in
this family commits suicide - it's a disgrace," huffs Camille.
Unfortunately, the women's meddling makes Cookie's old friend Willis
(Dutton) the most likely suspect and spoils his plans to cook up some
catfish enchiladas as a homecoming dinner for Emma (Tyler), a wanderer
who's just returned to town after some hard times in the big
city. Waiting for her with open arms is Jason (O'Donnell), a dopey but
kind cop who is assisting in the investigation into Cookie's demise.
"Fortune" is practically a catalog of quirks, from Cookie's garish
lavender sneakers and junk jewelery to Willis' protestation that he
never drinks "before Tom Brokaw."
The presiding wacko is Camille, an amateur writer and director nervy
enough to rewrite Oscar Wilde's "Salome" - and give herself a
co-authorship credit - for a church production, and so demented she
demonstrates Salome's Dance of the Seven Veils with a roll of toilet
paper and moves into Cookie's house hours after discovering her
body. "You'd think the police could at least take their stupid crime
tape with them when they leave," she crabs as she tramples evidence
under foot.
Altman's last film, the failed fashion industry expose "Ready To
Wear," was crucified for its formlessness and self-indulgence, and
from the evidence presented here, he must have taken those criticisms
to heart.  Though "Fortune" goes on a bit too long and includes a
couple of running gags that wear thin, for the most part it's a tight
little story that never leaves the audience behind. The lunacy proves
surprisingly contagious.

Title
Review for Whatever (1998)
WHATEVER (Sony Pictures Classics)
Directed by Susan Skoog
"I hope the film I made tells the truth about what it is to be a
seventeen-year-old girl, what it's like to lose your virginity to the wrong
guy, to experiment with drugs, to lose your best friend, to forgive your
mother ... The excitement and wonder of adolescence goes hand-in-hand with
the anxiety and disappointments," notes writer-director Susan Skoog in the
production notes for her film "Whatever." Admirable goals, to be sure, and
"Whatever" reverberates with earnestness. "Excitement" and "wonder," well,
that's another story.
Set in a colorless New Jersey neighborhood in the spring of 1981
"Whatever" centers on Anna (Liza Weil), an aspiring painter who's
prematurely jaded, perhaps because of living with her worn-down mom (Kathryn
Rossiter) who offers advice along the lines of "don't expect so much; it
makes things easier" in between dates with married men. Though she smokes,
drinks and drugs with the best of them, Anna hasn't yet discovered sex, much
to the consternation of her best friend Brenda (Chad Morgan), a regular
Pass-Around Patty whose evenings often end with her searching for her
underwear.
The movie's Reagan Era setting works against it, summoning up
comparisons to many similar, superior teen movies that came out of the early
1980s: Anna's loveless sexual initiation calls up memories of Jennifer Jason
Leigh in "Fast Times at Ridgemont High"; her desire to transcend her
blue-collar upbringing through sheer talent is reminiscent of "Flashdance";
her feelings of shame toward her loser family seem to have drifted in from
"Pretty In Pink." The presence of Frederic Forrest as a hip art teacher
serves to remind us he once co-starred with Nicolas Cage and Deborah Foreman
in the 1983 sleeper "Valley Girl."
While Skoog loads the soundtrack with such can't-miss classics as
the Pretenders' "Mystery Achievement," Patti Smith Group's "Dancing
Barefoot" and Blondie's "The Hardest Part," too much of her sluggish
screenplay brings to mind another Blondie song, "Will Anything Happen?".
When "Whatever" eventually does get rolling, it heads straight down the
highway to Clicheville, as trampy Brenda teases her way into danger and
Anna's heart and spirit are almost shattered by the cruel whips of fate.
If "Whatever" connects on any level at all, it's because of Weil,
whose knowing eyes and sad smile give Anna a haunting quality. Most of the
other performances are one-note, although it's hard to determine if that's
the fault of the actors or Skoog's graceless directorial style, which makes
too much of this teen-angst tale feel like a 1981 "Afterschool Special"
rather than the bittersweet slice-of-life it so badly wants to be.
James Sanford

Title
Review for Girls' Night (1998)
 For decades, the British have produced scores of gritty comedy-dramas about
life among the less-fortunate, several of which have crossed the Atlantic to
become popular successes: "Secrets and Lies" and "The Full Monty" are the
most obvious recent examples. "Girls' Night" is from the same school,
although not in the same class.
 It does, however, offer a couple of sterling performances by Brenda Blethyn
(the long-suffering mom from "Secrets and Lies") and Julie Walters
(best-known in this country for her Oscar-nominated work in 1983's
"Educating Rita"). They make engaging company as Jackie and Dawn,
sisters-in-law who work side by side on an assembly line at an electronics
factory, trapped beneath a huge sign that keeps an up-to-date report of how
far behind they are on their quotas.
 Salty-tongued Jackie (Walters) rushed down the aisle because of an
unplanned pregnancy and now tries to compensate for a miserable marriage by
having an on-and-off affair with the manager of the local bingo hall. When
Dawn (Blethyn) isn't at the factory, she's at home, trying to keep some
peace amongst her rowdy children. Both women are stuck in a largely dreary
northern England town, and though they may daydream about taking off on a
luxurious holiday, they know those kinds of things don't happen to the
working class.
 Things seem to be taking a turn for the better when Dawn has a stroke of
good fortune at bingo and wins over $160,000, but just when the two should
be breaking out the champagne, there's tragic news and it turns out that if
Dawn and Jackie are ever going to have that big fling, they'd better do it
quickly.
 Blethyn's musical voice and melancholy smile are well-suited to Dawn's
self-sacrificing personality and she radiates motherly warmth and good
humor. Walters, whose movies have gone unseen on these shores lately, tells
us all we need to know about Jackie in her slight swagger and the barely
restrained bitterness that tinges her every word. Neither woman is glamorous
or even conventionally attractive but their compelling personalities keep us
hooked, wondering what's going to happen to them.
 Both actresses are far more vibrant than Kay Mellor's screenplay, which is
rather mired in gloom. Though the story is essentially simple, Mellor goes
to considerable pains to slow it down, as if she was afraid the audience
might not catch every dismal detail.
 The film perks up markedly when Dawn and Jackie find themselves swept up in
the bright lights and high stakes of Las Vegas, where they encounter rodeo
star Cody (a puffy Kris Kristofferson), a charming alternative to the
dullish men they're used to. Although the female characters ring true, this
is the kind of movie in which there are two kinds of males: the hunks and
the lunks. Small wonder it's called "Girls' Night."
James Sanford

Title
Review for I Still Know What You Did Last Summer (1998)
        Jennifer Love Hewitt may be a limited actress, but she does have two
sizable assets: a robust scream, and a gift for filling out a clingy white
tank-top. Both her talents are put to use in "I Still Know what You Did Last
Summer," a pointless sequel to last year's hit about four teens stalked by a
fisherman they mistakenly believed they killed during a post-graduation
celebration. The original at least offered a couple of suspenseful moments
and a genuinely creepy cameo by Anne Heche; "Still" throws all logic out the
window, raises the gore quotient and offers more offensive racial
stereotypes than any WB or UPN sitcom.
 The key addition this time around is R&B singer Brandy (star of the
not-bad UPN comedy "Moesha") as Karla, new best friend to troubled Julie
James (Hewitt), one of the two survivors of last year's murderous mayhem.
While there are a few giggles to be had listening to the squeaky-clean
Brandy's attempts to swear, what's not so funny is the movie's depiction of
young African-Americans as having nothing more on their minds than sex and
violence. One can only hope Mekhi Phifer, as Karla's walking hormone of a
boyfriend, was well-paid for portraying a character as one-dimensional and
grating as the shuffling, wide-eyed servants black actors used to be
relegated to playing back in the pre-Civil Rights era.
 Of course, no one goes to a movie like this expecting sharp
performances or strong writing, but "Still" is so stupid even the dopiest
viewers may give up on it before the film's ridiculous finale. Julie, Karla,
Tyrell (Phifer) and Julie's potential new boyfriend Will (Matthew Settle)
wing down to a remote island in the Bahamas, hoping for a bit of summer fun.
But when Julie's old nemesis the fisherman turns up, partytime is over and
the movie becomes one scene after another of scream-run-stalk-slash.
 All the tired old tricks are trotted out by director Danny Cannon,
including "shocker" dream sequences and the deathless "oh my God, it's just
you" scenes, in which someone realizes what they thought was a killer is
actually just a friend creeping silently around in the dark for no
particular reason. Those looking for a real cinematic scare should check out
"The Siege" and take a look at Bruce Willis' toupee -- it's far more
frightening than anything Hewitt and company have to offer.
James Sanford
